
 
 
 
 Produced by Ron Swanson
 
 
 
 
 
 LUTHER ON SIN AND THE FLOOD
 COMMENTARY ON GENESIS
 
 BY
 
 JOHN NICHOLAS LENKER, D.D.
 
 TRANSLATOR OF LUTHER'S WORKS INTO ENGLISH;
 AUTHOR OF "LUTHERANS IN ALL LANDS"
 
 
 
 
 VOL. II
 SECOND THOUSAND
 
 
 
 
 The Luther Press
 MINNEAPOLIS, MINN., U.S.A.
 1910
 
 
 
 
 _DEDICATION_.
 
 To all interested in studying the Christian Missionary problems of
 "the last times" of the modern world, this volume is dedicated.
 
 
 
 
 Copyright, 1910, by J. N. LENKER.
 
 
 
 
 _FOREWORD_.
 
 
 The first volumes of the "American Luther" we selected for publication
 were his best commentaries, then eight volumes of his Gospel and
 Epistle sermons and one volume of his best catechetical writings.
 These rich evangelical works introduced us to the real Luther, not the
 polemical, but the Gospel Luther. They contain the leaven of the
 faith, life and spirit of Protestantism. We now return to his
 spiritual commentaries on the Bible which are the foundation of all
 his writings. The more one reads Luther the greater he becomes as a
 student of the One Book.
 
 Contents of This Volume.
 
 This, the second volume of Luther's great commentary on Genesis,
 appears now in English for the first time.
 
 It covers chapters four to nine inclusive of Genesis. The subjects
 discussed are: Cain's murder, his punishment, Cain's sons, Seth and
 his sons, the wickedness of the old world, the ark, Noah's obedience,
 the universal destruction, the salvation of Noah's family, his
 sacrifice, his blessing, the rainbow covenant, Noah's fall, Ham cursed
 and Shem and Japheth blessed. These great themes are discussed by
 Moses and Luther. They have vital relations to problems pertaining to
 the end of the modern world. Our hope and prayer are that God may use
 this volume to make the book of Genesis and the whole Old Testament a
 greater spiritual blessing to the Church and that it may serve the
 servants of God in these latter days in calling people to repentance,
 faith and prayer like Noah and Luther did.
 
 In his "Dear Genesis" Luther proved that the free Evangelical religion
 he taught was not new, but as old as the first book of the Bible, and
 that it does not consist in outward forms, organizations and pomp, but
 in true faith in Christ in our hearts and lives. Genesis contains the
 only historic records accessible of the first 2364 years of the 4004
 years before Christ. It is worthy of study in our day as it was in the
 days of the Reformation.
 
 Acknowledgments.
 
 Luther advised no one should translate alone and he practiced what he
 taught. We have followed his rule and example. Pastor C. B. Gohdes of
 Baltimore translated chapter six and President Schaller of Milwaukee
 Theological Seminary, chapters five, seven, eight and nine.
 
 Inaccuracies may be due to the revision and editing, and not to the
 translators, for every good translation must be fluent and idiomatic,
 to secure which is the most difficult task. Pastor Gohdes also
 rendered valuable help in the final revision of parts. The translation
 of the analyses is by the undersigned.
 
 The few last pages of the first edition of volume one we revised and
 reprint in this volume in order to make the pages of each volume of
 our edition to correspond with the German and Latin volumes of the
 Erlangen edition. The paragraphs are numbered and the analyses given
 according to the old Walch edition.
 
 
 _Luther and World-Evangelization_.
 
 In translating Luther into practical English in practical America, and
 in this age that is growing more and more practical, we need to be
 reminded that this work is for practical use and purposes. Luther was
 radical along Bible lines in applying the truth personally and to the
 world.
 
 It is a year since the last volume of the "American Luther" appeared.
 The delay was caused by an effort to raise the work to a higher
 standard and by the publication of a book on "The True Place of
 Germans and Scandinavians in the Evangelization of the World", not a
 revision of, but a new companion volume to "Lutherans In All Lands"
 that appeared seventeen years ago. By comparing these two books one
 has the best evidence of the marvelous progress of God's Kingdom in
 recent years, and the growing world-significance of Luther's
 evangelistic writings. Evangelization at home and abroad is the
 popular religious theme today in the German fatherland and in the
 whole Protestant world. The word "world" is becoming so common its
 full meaning is not appreciated. When world-evangelization is
 discussed, it is too often from the standpoint of the nation
 discussing it. Each nation is so active in its own work that it fails
 to appreciate what others are doing. For example how little the world
 missionary conferences in English lands have to say of the German and
 Scandinavian missions and the Reformed Churches of the Lutheran work.
 Hence the fruits of Luther's evangelical writings are underestimated
 by the English people. It is opportune to translate not only Luther
 but also the best fruits of those writings in various languages during
 the past 400 years, especially since the memorable date of 1917 is
 soon to be celebrated by universal Protestantism. Luther in all
 languages and Lutherans in all lands go together. We ought to consider
 most carefully the great Reformer in his relation to the modern world
 and modern world-evangelization. The known world in his day was not so
 large. He had, however, a clear view of it all in his writings, which
 is due to his faithful study of the Scriptures. The Bible gave him a
 knowledge of the world, including all lands and all times. His
 commentary of eleven volumes on Genesis illustrates this. The first
 volume on Genesis treats of the first part of the ancient world; the
 second volume, the one before us, treats of the second part and end of
 the old world. This Luther would have us apply to the last times of
 the modern world.
 
 Luther Educational and Devotional.
 
 Here, as everywhere in his catechisms, sermons and commentaries,
 Luther is unique among religious authors in that he is both
 educational and devotional, appealing equally to head and heart. He is
 "religiously helpful and intellectually profitable," covering every
 phase of religious, moral and social conditions, and touching every
 interest of humanity. "His words went to the mark like bullets and
 left marks like bullets." Being beyond criticism they have a unique
 place to fill in the literature and libraries of the world.
 
 Although the cry, "Read Luther!" has been raised here in the new world
 the multitudes of the English people are not rushing for his writings,
 as the Germans did when they first appeared in the old world, under
 conditions similar to what they are in America at present. If asked
 what made the German people what they are, the answer is, these
 writings, so universally circulated and read. If the Anglo-Saxons
 appreciated their educational and devotional value the 35,000 copies
 circulated the last seven years would easily, as a professor
 suggested, be increased to a hundred thousand copies.
 
 Nations Helping Nations.
 
 The world-consciousness is growing, so is the national consciousness.
 Both are characteristic of our times. Perhaps never did the national
 spirit develop as in recent years. The great powers, instead of
 dividing China, witness the national spirit growing everywhere--in
 Japan, China, India, Africa, South America, Norway, Sweden, as well as
 in Germany, England, Russia and the United States. This is a good
 sign, for the world-family is composed of nations, and each nation has
 at least one talent not to be crushed, but with which to serve all the
 others. One serves the world when he serves his nation. Luther's
 words, "I live for my countrymen", illustrates this. It is not the
 nations that have the largest armies and navies that are the greatest
 blessing to the world, but the nations that work out the best
 Christian civilization for the world to imitate and send over the
 earth the best farmers to show other nations and tribes how to
 cultivate the earth, the best teachers, preachers and authors to train
 the people, the best medical skill to relieve human suffering, the
 best mechanics and servants, the greatest philanthropists, the best
 Christians. In educational, industrial, medical and charitable mission
 work the nations dominated by Luther's writings stand high. Nations,
 like individuals, are the greatest which serve others best; not the
 nations which have the most territory, but nations which do the
 greatest service for the whole human family. The students missionary
 movement develops men, and the laymen's missionary movement raises
 money. Both are needed, but men must be trained to do their work in
 the best way and the money be used to bring the best results. Hence
 nations should help and study one another most carefully with this in
 view. Luther and his writings in the evangelization of Europe ought
 not to be overlooked in the evangelization of other continents. By
 helping abroad the home does not suffer. Among American Lutherans the
 Norwegians prove this, for they have done the most for the heathen and
 have the best home mission work.
 
 Transition and Translation or Transition and Revolution.
 
 While we are translating Luther for all Anglo-Saxons, we do not
 overlook the fact that Luther's disciples, Germans and Scandinavians,
 are themselves being translated, or are in a state of transition. The
 translation of a people and of their literature or spirit clearly
 presents a double problem, both sides of which demand at once the most
 careful work. The translation of both the people and their literature
 should run parallel and in the same, and not in an opposite,
 direction. Germans and Scandinavians have always, and do still, make
 the fatal blunder of translating from English into their own
 languages, instead of from their languages into English. They thus
 cross one another's path never to meet again. Their children and
 grandchildren, however, find it easier to translate into English,
 their mother tongue; but, alas, they have little interest in doing it.
 They make the mistake in thinking their old thoughts and classics are
 not needed in the new language. Their motto seems to be, "new
 literature for the new language", when to the English public, if not
 to themselves, the old writings would be the newest. It is marvelous
 how wide-awake preachers are mislead.
 
 Best Literature is Translations.
 
 People who are prejudiced against translations, forget that the Bible
 and our best literature are translations of the classics of the
 world's leading languages. Translations should be welcomed by a people
 who themselves are in a state of translation, especially if the
 translations are from their mother tongue into the language they are
 learning. What endless friction and confusion would be avoided, if
 people and their life and literature were translated at the same time.
 As we have said, a transition of a people without a translation of
 their literature is no transition, but a revolution. To this various
 church bodies witness. During the transition of language the best
 literature for the children to read is the translations of the
 classics of the language of the parents. There may be better
 literature, but not for these particular children, if the unity of the
 family life is to be perpetuated. Hence it becomes a vital concern
 that both children and parents understand that the best literature for
 them is such translations. But where are the German or Scandinavian
 teachers and preachers who are enthusing over putting this thought
 deep into the family life of their congregations.
 
 A Lesson from Luther and Wesley in America.
 
 What unwisdom even to attempt to build up the Lutheran Christian life
 in free, aggressive Protestant Anglo-Saxon civilization without
 Luther's writings in good Anglo-Saxon! Muhlenberg (b. 1711; d. 1787)
 and Wesley (b. 1703; d. 1791) came to America about the same time.
 Wesley returned home in 1738 after a stay of two years in the south.
 Muhlenberg spent his ministerial life of 45 years (1742-1787) in
 America, in the Keystone state, in and near Philadelphia, the
 metropolis of the new world. When the two Palatinate Germans from
 Limerick County, Ireland, Philip Embury and Barbara Heck, a
 lay-preacher and a godly woman, held the first Methodist service in
 America, in 1766, in New York City, the Lutheran faith had been
 planted here by the Dutch since 1657 in the same city, by the Swedes
 on the Delaware since 1639, (Torkillus), by the Germans since 1708
 (Kocherthal); Muhlenberg had arrived in Philadelphia in 1742, built
 churches the following year in Philadelphia and "The Trappe", and
 organized the Synod of Pennsylvania among its 60,000 Lutherans in
 1748. All these Lutherans to some extent learned, preached and
 confirmed in English. Muhlenberg was naturalized in 1754 as a subject
 of Great Britain. This and his stay in England gave an Anglican turn
 to his German pietism. When we became a free people in 1776, the
 Methodists had only 20 preachers and 3418 members in America and less
 than 76,000 followers in Europe from which to receive immigrant
 members, while the Lutherans were strong here and in Europe. Today
 American Methodists report 60,737 churches, and the Lutherans 13,533.
 Why did Wesley's followers become the dominating religious force in
 America? Not because Wesley and his writings were greater than Luther
 and his writings. Methodists did not bear Wesley's name, but they did
 have his spirit and writings. Even to the present day every Methodist
 preacher must pass an examination in Wesley's writings before
 ordination. Where were Luther's spirit and writings among his early
 American followers?
 
 Language is no more a barrier to Luther's spirit than to Wesley's.
 Methodism forged its way from English into German, Norwegian, Danish
 and Swedish and among Indians, Mexicans and Negros. People, regardless
 of language, color or condition, could not help but learn what real
 spiritual Methodism is. It was preached and sung in such simple, plain
 Anglo-Saxon, and in good translations, that it could not be
 misunderstood nor misrepresented. Wesley's simple evangelical message
 was abroad in the land in the hearts of the people. But the
 evangelical voice of Luther, the prince of translators, was hardly
 heard and even today the English world has no clear popular view of
 what spiritual Evangelical Lutheranism is. Often when they speak of
 it, they seem to think it is the opposite of what it is. Germans,
 Scandinavians and all know the spiritual side of Methodism, but the
 English world does not know the spiritual side of Lutheranism, and it
 never will until Luther's spiritual writings are translated into
 readable English and circulated broadcast over the land, and the
 hearts of the people come into direct and close touch with the heart
 of the great Reformer himself.
 
 The English world knows the statistics, the numerical strength of
 Lutherans. That needs no apology. But what does need a defense among
 Americans is the spirituality of the Lutherans. That is developed by
 the translations into the plainest vernacular of God's Word and
 Luther's evangelical sermons and commentaries. These are the best
 literature for young Germans and Scandinavians. Although translations,
 and not perfect, they are the best for them. The Bible first; Luther's
 spiritual writings second, not first nor third. Have not Lutherans in
 America been following the disciples of Luther instead of Luther;
 while Methodists have followed Wesley and not Wesley's disciples. The
 Dutch, Swedish and German Lutherans in the east, all learned English.
 We say it was a transition, but was it not a revolution? Their history
 stands forth as beacon lights of warning to the polyglot Lutherans
 migrating to the ends of earth and learning all languages. They will
 no more keep up their faith with one language than the English nation
 will keep up their trade by refusing to learn other languages. Strange
 it is that nations can learn and use other languages in one line and
 not in another--the English in church work and not in trade; the
 Germans in trade, but not in church work.
 
 It is said there are 30 million people in the United States with some
 German blood in their veins. Two thirds of these, or 20 millions, may
 be said to have some Lutheran mixture in their makeup, but only one
 and a half million of these 20 millions are communicant members of
 English and German Lutheran churches. What people in America can show
 a worse religious record? Yet the tenders of the sheep and lambs are
 afraid to feed them in the only way they can be fed. Verily whatever
 you sow, that shall you also reap. Lift up your eyes, behold the
 harvest! Can you not discern the signs of the times?
 
 It is no wonder that the United States Census of 1890, the latest
 reliable statistics on the subject, gave the number of Lutheran
 communicants using only English in this English land at 198,907;
 General Synod 143,764; United Synod South 37,457; General Council
 14,297; Ohio Synod 287; Missouri Synod 1,192--after 150 years of work.
 Our good German and Scandinavian parents, in the light of these
 figures, need not fear losing many members to purely English churches.
 "Reading Luther" in German, Swedish, Norwegian and English will bring
 better results to old and young than if read only in one language. The
 Church of the Reformation is not one-tongued, but many-tongued.
 
 English Luther in German and Scandinavian Churches.
 
 April 12th, 1910, became a memorable date in the North-west by the
 introduction of the Scandinavian languages into all the high schools
 of Minneapolis. German and Scandinavian taxpayers are gradually
 becoming more interested in having their children learn the language
 of their mothers in the public schools. This will prove to be a great
 blessing to children and home, society and state. The Church however
 will blunder, if she thinks there will now be no need of circulating
 English literature in German and Scandinavian congregations.
 Translating Luther and teaching German and Scandinavian are two ways
 of doing the same thing, for language is not an end, but a means to an
 end. Many young people are being confirmed in English and they often
 attend services in foreign languages. Many know more of the language
 than of the matter preached. When weak in the language they understand
 better what is preached if they are familiar with the thought. The
 reason many do not appreciate a sermon with the Luther ring is because
 they are familiar with neither the language nor the thought. Hence the
 need of our young people becoming familiar with Luther's sermons and
 commentaries in English. One understands better in a strange language
 what he is familiar with. This familiar knowledge would help to bridge
 the chasm between Lutheran parents and children. Ask parents and they
 will tell about the "Old Luther Readers," in their native land and
 tongue. All admit that if the young people are not interested to read
 Luther in English, they will never read him. All who do will the
 better understand sermons in German and Scandinavian. The universal
 reading of the English Luther, on the part of the young people, will
 therefore help, and not harm, the German and Scandinavian
 congregations. Luther's teachings thoroughly understood in a living
 way will bind the young to their Christian convictions, as much as the
 knowledge of a language binds them to that language. The passive
 interest therefore, on the part of German and Scandinavian pastors and
 congregations in circulating the English Luther, as far as their young
 people are concerned, should give way to active interest, for the sake
 of their own work in the future. It is important to learn your
 mother's language. You may do that and forget her faith--Better retain
 the faith than the language.
 
 J. N. Lenker.
 The Fiftieth Day (Pentecost), 1910.
 Minneapolis, Minn.
 
 
 
 
 COMMENTARY ON GENESIS.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 IV. CAIN MURDERS HIS BROTHER; CALLED TO ACCOUNT.
 
    A. HOW CAIN MURDERED HIS BROTHER.
 
       1. What moved Cain to commit murder 107.
 
       2. Cain's hypocritical actions in concealing his anger that he
          might the more easily commit the murder 108-109.
 
        * Cain the picture of all hypocrites 110-129.
 
        * The attitude of hypocrites to their neighbors. Also, how we
          are to view the efforts of the pope and bishops in behalf of
          peace and unity 111-112.
 
        * Against what people we should most guard 112.
 
       3. How Cain listened to no warning in his thoughts of murder
          113.
 
        * Complaint of the world's attitude to good admonition 114.
 
        * The ways of the hypocrite. Also, why falsehood wears a
          friendly aspect 115.
 
       4. Whether Cain's passion to murder Abel was noticeable 115.
 
       5. Cain took no notice of Abel's sighing and praying 116.
 
        * The origin of man's cruel and tyrannical nature 117.
 
    B. HOW CAIN WAS CALLED TO ACCOUNT, AND HIS BEHAVIOR.
 
       1. Who questioned Cain, and his defiant actions 118.
 
       2. Cain accused himself most when he tried to clear himself 119.
 
        * Liars speak against themselves, as is proved by examples
          119-120.
 
       3. Cain's vindication more foolish than that of the first
          parents in paradise 121.
 
        * St. Martin will absolve the devil if he repents 122.
 
        * Whoever excuses his sin follows the example of Satan and
          makes his case worse 123.
 
       4. How Cain heaps sin upon sin 124.
 
       5. Cain despairs and is in a worse state than our first parents
          after their fall 125.
 
       6. How Cain placed himself in a position where nothing could
          help him 126.
 
       7. Gently accused, and yet defiant 127.
 
       8. Cain has not the least reverence for God or his father 128.
 
        * This is a picture of all hypocrites 129.
 
       9. How his defense ends 130.
 
        * How man ought to act when his conscience accuses him of sin
          131.
 
        * The hypocrite's actions when his conscience is awakened, and
          what he is to do 132-133.
 
      10. In Cain's defense wickedness and folly are mingled 134.
 
        * How God reveals hypocrites 135.
 
        * Moses says much in few words 136.
 
        * Whether Abel and our first parents anticipated Cain's murder
          137.
 
        * Without a thought of what might restrain him, Cain commits
          the deed 138.
 
        * The picture of the sacrifice of Iphigenia applied to Moses'
          description of Cain's murder 139-140.
 
        * Cain's is no ordinary murder, and how he differs from other
          murderers 141.
 
        * The hypocrite's hatred is different from other hatred, and is
          found among the Jews and the Papists 142-143.
 
        * Cain the father of all murderers 144.
 
        * How the first parents felt over this whole affair 145.
 
          a. Their grief was so great that they could not have endured
             without special divine comfort 146.
 
          b. Their severe trial in view of the first sin 147.
 
          c. Very likely because of this murder they refrained so long
             from bearing children 148.
 
           * Whether the first parents had at the time more children
             than Cain and Abel 148.
 
        * Why Cain slew Abel, and how he did it 149.
 
      11. The time and occasion when Cain was called to account 150.
 
      12. Adam with the authority of God calls Cain to account 152.
 
 
 IV. HOW CAIN MURDERED HIS BROTHER AND WAS REQUIRED TO GIVE AN ACCOUNT,
 AND HOW HE CONDUCTED HIMSELF.
 
 A. How Cain Murdered His Brother.
 
 V. 8a. _And Cain told (talked with) Abel his brother._
 
 107. Our translation adds that Cain said: "Let us go out doors." But
 this is one of the comments of the rabbins, whose relative claim to
 credit I have fully shown on a previous occasion. Lyra, following the
 invention of Eben Ezra, relates that Cain told his brother how
 severely he had been rebuked of the Lord. But who would believe
 statements for which there is no authority in the Scriptures? We hold
 therefore to an explanation which has the warrant of the Scriptures,
 namely that Cain, finding himself rejected of God, indulged his anger,
 and added to his former sins contempt of his parents and of the Word,
 thinking within himself: "The promised seed of the woman belongs to me
 as the first-born. But my brother, Abel, that contemptible,
 good-for-nothing fellow, is evidently preferred to me by divine
 authority, manifest in the fire consuming his sacrifice. What shall I
 do, therefore? I will dissemble my wrath until an opportunity of
 taking vengeance shall occur."
 
 108. Therefore the words, "Cain told Abel his brother," I understand
 to mean that Cain, dissembling his anger, conducted himself toward
 Abel as a brother, and spoke to him and conversed with him, as if he
 bore with good nature the sentence pronounced upon him by God. In this
 manner also Saul simulated an attitude of kindness toward David. "I
 know well," said Saul, "that thou shalt surely be king," 1 Sam 24, 20;
 and yet he was all the while planning to prevent this by killing
 David. Just so Cain now conversed with Abel his brother, and said: I
 see that thou art chosen of the Lord; I envy thee not this divine
 blessing, etc. This is just the manner of hypocrites. They pretend
 friendship until an opportunity of doing the harm they intend presents
 itself.
 
 109. That such is the true sense of the passage, all the circumstances
 clearly show. For if Adam and Eve could have gathered the least
 suspicion of the intended murder, think you not that they would either
 have restrained Cain or removed Abel, and placed the latter out of
 danger? But as Cain had altered his countenance and his deportment
 toward his brother, and had talked with him in a brotherly manner,
 they thought all was safe, and the son bowed to and acquiesced in the
 admonition of his father. The appearance deceived Abel also, who, if
 he had feared anything like murder from his brother, would doubtless
 have fled from him, as Jacob fled from Esau when he feared his
 brother's wrath. What, therefore, could possibly have come into the
 mind of Jerome when he believed the rabbins, who say Cain was
 expostulating with his brother?
 
 110. Accordingly, Cain is the image and picture of all hypocrites and
 murderers, who kill under the show of godliness. Cain, possessed by
 Satan, hides his wrath, waiting the opportunity to slay his brother
 Abel; meanwhile he converses with him, as a brother beloved, that he
 might the sooner lay his hands upon him unawares.
 
 111. This passage, therefore, is intended for our instruction in the
 ways of murderers and hypocrites. Still Cain talks in a brotherly
 manner with his brother, and, on the other hand, Abel still trusts
 Cain as a brother should trust a brother; and thus he is murdered, and
 the pious parents meanwhile are deceived.
 
 Just so the pope and the bishops of our day talk and confer much
 concerning the peace and concord of the Church. But he is most
 assuredly deceived who does not understand that the exact opposite is
 planned. For true is that word of the Psalm, "The workers of iniquity
 speak peace with their neighbors, but mischief is in their hearts," Ps
 28, 3. For it is the nature of hypocrites that they are good in
 appearance, speak kindly to you, pretend to be humble, patient and
 charitable, give alms, etc.; and yet, all the while they plan
 slaughter in their hearts.
 
 112. Let us learn, then, to know a Cain and especially to beware when
 he speaks kindly, and as brother to brother. For it is in this way
 that our adversaries, the bishops and the pope, talk with us in our
 day, while they pretend a desire for concord, and seek to bring about
 doctrinal harmony. In reality, if an opportunity of seizing us and
 executing their rage upon us should present itself, you would soon
 hear them speak in a very different tone. Truly, "there is death in
 the pot," 2 Kings 4, 40; and under the best and sweetest words there
 lies concealed a deadly poison.
 
 V. 8b. _And it came to pass, when they were in the field, that Cain
 rose up against Abel his brother, and slew him._
 
 113. Here you see the deceptive character of those alluring words.
 Cain had been admonished by his father with divine authority to guard
 against sin in the future, and to expect pardon for that of the past.
 But Cain despises the twofold admonition, and indulges his sin, as all
 the wicked do. For true is the saying of Solomon, "When the wicked
 cometh, there cometh also contempt, and with ignominy cometh
 reproach," Prov 18, 3.
 
 114. Our ministry at the present day deserves no blame. We teach, we
 exhort, we entreat, we rebuke, we turn ourselves every way, that we
 may recall the multitude from security to the fear of God. But the
 world, like an untamed beast, still goes on and follows not the Word,
 but its own lusts, which it tries to smooth over by a show of
 uprightness. The prophets and the apostles stand before us as
 examples, and our own experience is instructive, also. Our
 adversaries, so often warned and convicted, know they are doing wrong,
 and yet they do not lay aside their murderous hate.
 
 115. Learn, then, what a hypocrite is; namely, one who lays claim to
 the worship of God and to charity, and yet, at the same time, destroys
 the worship of God and slaughters his brother. And all this semblance
 of good-will is only intended to bring about better opportunities of
 doing harm. For, if Abel had foreseen the implacable wrath and the
 truly diabolical anger, he would have saved himself by flight. But as
 Cain betrayed no such anger, uttered a friendly greeting and
 manifested his usual courtesy, Abel perished before he felt any fear.
 
 116. There is no doubt that Abel, when he saw his brother rising up
 against him, entreated and implored him not to pollute himself with
 this awful sin. However, a mind beset by Satan pays no regard to
 entreaties, nor heeds uplifted hands, but as a father's admonition had
 been disregarded, so now the brother is spurned as he pleads upon his
 knees.
 
 117. Light is cast here upon the bondage to Satan by which our nature,
 entangled in sins, is oppressed. Hence Paul's expression, "children of
 wrath," Eph 2, 3, and the declaration that such are taken captive by
 Satan unto his will, 2 Tim 2, 26. For when we are mere men; that is,
 when we apprehend not the blessed seed by faith, we are all like Cain,
 and nothing is wanting but an opportunity. For nature, destitute of
 the Holy Spirit, is impelled by that same evil spirit which impelled
 wicked Cain. If, however, there were in any one those ample powers, or
 that free will, by which a man might defend himself against the
 assaults of Satan, these gifts would most assuredly have existed in
 Cain, to whom belonged the birthright and the promise of the blessed
 seed. But in that very same condition are all men! Unless nature be
 helped by the Spirit of God, it cannot maintain itself. Why, then, do
 we absurdly boast of free-will? Now follows another remarkable
 passage.
 
 B. How Cain Had to Give an Account, and His Conduct.
 
 V. 9. _And Jehovah said unto Cain, Where is Abel thy brother? And he
 said, I know not: Am I my brother's keeper?_
 
 118. Good God! into what depth of sin does our miserable nature fall
 when driven onward by the devil. Murder had been committed on a
 brother, and perhaps murdered Abel lay for days unburied. Thereupon,
 as Cain returned to his parents at the accustomed time, and Abel
 returned not with him, the anxious parents asked him: Cain, thou art
 here, but where is Abel? Thou hast returned home, but Abel has not
 returned. The flock is without their shepherd. Tell us therefore,
 where thy brother is. Upon this, Cain, becoming abusive, makes answer
 to his parents, by no means with due reverence, "I know not: Am I my
 brother's keeper?"
 
 119. But it happened to Cain as to all the wicked, that by excusing
 himself he accused himself, according to the words of Christ, "Out of
 thine own mouth will I judge thee, thou wicked servant," Luke 19, 22.
 Also the heathen had a striking proverb among them, "A liar ought to
 have a good memory." Such was the judgment of heathen men, though they
 knew nothing of the judgment of God and of conscience, and had nothing
 to guide their judgment but their experience in civil affairs. And
 true it is that liars run much risk of being discovered and unmasked.
 Hence the Germans have the proverb, "A lie is a very fruitful thing."
 For one lie begets seven other lies, which become necessary to uphold
 the first lie. And yet it is impossible, after all, to prevent
 conscience from arousing and betraying itself at times, if not in
 words, then in gestures. This is proved by numberless examples. I will
 cite only one example here:
 
 120. In Thuringia there is a small town in the district of Orla,
 called Neustadt. In this town a harlot had murdered her infant, to
 which she had secretly given birth, and had thrown it, after the
 murder, into a neighboring fishpond. Accidentally the little piece of
 linen in which she had wrapped the infant, brought the horrid deed to
 light. The case was brought before the magistrate; and as the simple
 men of the place knew no better means of investigating the crime, they
 called all the young women of the town into the town hall and closely
 examined them, one by one. The face and the testimony of each one of
 these proclaimed her innocent. But when they came to her who was the
 real perpetrator of the deed, she did not wait for questions to be put
 to her, but immediately declared aloud that she was not the guilty
 person. The contrast she presented to the others in making such haste
 to defend herself, confirmed the suspicion of the magistrates. At once
 she was seized by the constables and put to death.
 
 Indeed, instances are innumerable and of daily occurrence which show
 that people, in their eagerness to defend themselves, accuse
 themselves. Sin may, indeed, lie asleep, but that word which we have
 just heard, is true. It lies at the door.
 
 121. Just so in the present case. Cain thinks he has made an effectual
 excuse for himself by saying that he is not his brother's keeper. But
 does he not confess by the very word "brother" which he takes upon his
 lips that he ought to be his keeper? Is not that equal to accusing
 himself, and will not the fact that Abel is nowhere in evidence arouse
 the suspicion in the minds of his parents that he has been murdered?
 Just so also Adam excuses himself in paradise, and lays all the blame
 on Eve. But this excuse of Cain is far more stupid; for while he
 excuses his sin he doubles it, whereas the frank confession of sin
 finds mercy and appeases wrath.
 
 122. It is recorded in the history of St. Martin, that when he
 absolved certain notorious sinners, he was rebuked by Satan for doing
 so. St. Martin is said to have replied, "Why, I would absolve even
 thee, if thou wouldst say from thy heart, I repent of having sinned
 against the Son of God, and I pray for pardon." But the devil never
 does this. For he persists in committing sin and defending the same.
 
 123. All liars and hypocrites imitate Cain their father, by either
 denying their sin or excusing it. Hence they cannot find pardon for
 their sins. And we see the same in domestic life. By the defense of
 wrong-doing, anger is increased. For whenever the wife, or the
 children, or the servants, have done wrong, and deny or excuse their
 wrong-doing, the father of the family is the more moved to wrath;
 whereas, on the other hand, confession secures pardon or a lighter
 punishment. But it is the nature of hypocrites to excuse and palliate
 their sin or to deny it altogether and under the show of religion, to
 slay the innocent.
 
 124. But here let us survey the order in which sins follow each other
 and increase. First of all Cain sins by presumption and unbelief when,
 priding himself on the privilege of his birthright, he takes it for
 granted that he shall be accepted of God on the ground of his own
 merit. Upon this pride and self-glorification immediately follow envy
 and hatred of his brother, whom he sees preferred to himself by an
 unmistakable sign from heaven. Upon this envy and hatred follow
 hypocrisy and lying. Though he designs to murder his brother, he
 accosts him in a friendly manner and thereby throws him off his guard.
 Hypocrisy is followed by murder. Murder is followed by the excusing of
 his sin. And the last stage is despair, which is the fall from heaven
 to hell.
 
 125. Although Adam and Eve in paradise did not deny their sin, yet
 their confession was lukewarm, and the sin was shifted from the one to
 the other. Adam laid it on Eve, and Eve on the serpent. But Cain went
 even farther, for he not only did not confess the murder he had
 committed, but disclaimed responsibility for his brother. And did not
 this at once prove his mind to be hostile against his brother?
 Therefore, though Adam and Eve made only a half-hearted confession,
 they had some claim to pardon, and in consequence were punished with
 less severity. But Cain, because he resolutely denied his sin, was
 rejected, and fell into despair.
 
 And the same judgment awaits all the sons of Cain, popes, cardinals,
 and bishops, who, although they plan murder against us day and night,
 say likewise, "I know not: Am I my brother's keeper?"
 
 126. There was a common proverb of old, "What is it to the Romans that
 the Greeks die?" So we think that our dangers and calamities only
 belong to ourselves. But how does this principle agree with the
 commandment of God? For his will is that we should all live together,
 and be to each other as brethren. Cain, therefore, by this very saying
 of his, heavily accuses himself when he makes the excuse that the
 custody of his brother was no affair of his. Whereas, if he had said
 to his father, "Alas, I have slain Abel, my brother. I repent of the
 deed I have done. Return upon me what punishment thou wilt," there
 might have been room for a remedy; but as he denied his sin, and,
 contrary to the will of God, disclaimed responsibility for his brother
 altogether, there was no place left for mercy or favor.
 
 127. Moreover, Moses took special pains in the preparation of this
 account, that it might serve as a witness against all hypocrites, and
 as a chronicle containing a graphic description of their character and
 of the ire to which they are aroused by Satan against God, his Word
 and his Church. It was not enough for this murderer that he had killed
 his brother, contrary to the command of God, but he added the further
 sin that he became filled with indignation and rage when God inquired
 of him concerning his brother. I say, "when God inquired of him,"
 because, although it was Adam who spoke these words to his son Cain,
 yet he spoke them by the authority of God and by the Holy Spirit. In
 view of so great a sin, was it not quite gentle to inquire, "Where is
 Abel thy brother?" And yet, to this word, which contained nothing
 severe, the hypocrite and murderer is ferocious and proud enough to
 reply, "I know not." And he is indignant that he should be called to
 an account concerning the matter at all. For the reply of Cain is the
 language of one who resists and hates God.
 
 128. But to this sin Cain adds one still worse. Justly under
 indictment for murder, he presently becomes the accuser of God, and
 expostulates with him: "Am I my brother's keeper?" He prefaces his
 reply with no such expression of reverence or honor as is due both to
 God and to his father. He did not say, "Lord, I know not." He did not
 say, "My Father, didst thou make me the keeper of my brother?" Such
 expressions as these would have indicated a feeling of reverence
 toward God or toward his parent. But he answers with pride as if he
 himself were the Lord, and plainly manifests that he felt indignation
 at being called to account by him who had the perfect right to do so.
 
 129. This is a true picture of all hypocrites. Living in manifest
 sins, they grow insolent and proud, aiming all the while to appear
 righteous. They will not yield even to God himself and his Word when
 upbraided by them. Nay, they set themselves against God, contend with
 him, and excuse their sin. Thus David says, that God is judged of men,
 but that at length he clears and justifies himself, and prevails, Ps
 51, 4. Such is the insolence of the hypocrites Moses has here
 endeavored to paint.
 
 130. But what success has Cain with his attempt? This, that his
 powerful effort to excuse himself becomes a forcible self-accusation.
 Christ says, "Out of thine own mouth will I judge thee, thou wicked
 servant," Lk 19, 22. Now, this servant wished to appear without guilt,
 saying: "I knew thee that thou art a hard man, reaping where thou
 didst not sow; and I was afraid, and hid thy talent," Mt 25, 24-25.
 Could he have brought a stronger accusation against himself, in view
 of the fact that Christ immediately turns his words against him?
 Thereby Christ evidences the wisdom of the Holy Spirit.
 
 131. Such illustrations help us to learn not to contend with God. On
 the contrary when you feel in your conscience that you are guilty,
 take heed with all your soul that you strive neither with God nor with
 men by defending or excusing your sin. Rather do this: When you see
 God point his spear at you, flee not from him; but, on the contrary,
 flee to him with a humble confession of your sin, and with prayer for
 his pardon. Then God will draw back his spear and spare you. But when,
 by the denial and excuse of your sin, you flee farther and farther
 from him, God will pursue you at close range with still greater
 determination, and bring you to bay. Nothing, therefore, is better or
 safer than to come with the confession of guilt. Thus it comes to pass
 that God's victory becomes our victory through him.
 
 132. But Cain and hypocrites in general do not this. God points his
 spear at them, but they never humble themselves before him nor pray to
 him for pardon. Nay, they rather point their spear at God, just as
 Cain did on this occasion. Cain does not say, "Lord, I confess I have
 killed my brother; forgive me." On the contrary, though being the
 accused, he himself accuses God by replying, "Am I my brother's
 keeper?" And what did he effect with his pride? His reply was
 certainly equal to the confession that he cared naught for the divine
 law, which says, "Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself," Lev 19,
 18. And again, "Do not unto another that which you would not have
 another do unto you," Mt 7, 12. This law was not first written in the
 Decalog; it was inscribed in the minds of all men. Cain acts directly
 against this law, and shows that he not only cares nothing for it, but
 absolutely despises it.
 
 133. In this manner, Cain represents a man who is not merely wicked,
 but who occupies such a height of wickedness as to combine hypocrisy
 with bloodshed, and yet is so eager to maintain the appearance of
 sanctity that he rather accuses God than concedes the justice of the
 accusation against himself. And this is what all hypocrites do. They
 blaspheme God and crucify his Son, and yet wish to appear righteous.
 For after their sins of murder, blasphemy and the like their whole aim
 is to seek means whereby to excuse and palliate the same. But the
 result always is that they betray themselves and are condemned out of
 their own mouths.
 
 134. While Cain makes an effort to clear himself, he exhibits the
 foulest stains. He thinks he made a most plausible excuse when he
 said, "Am I my brother's keeper?" But this very excuse becomes his
 most shameful accusation. The maxim of Hilary, that wickedness and
 stupidity always go hand in hand, finds unvarying application. If Cain
 had been as wise as he was wicked, he would have excused himself in
 quite a different manner. Now, under the operation of the divine rule
 that wickedness and stupidity are running mates, he becomes his own
 accuser. The same principle operates in favor of the truth, and makes
 her defense against all adversaries easy. Just as Cain betrayed by
 word and mien his indifference and hate toward his brother, so all
 adversaries of the truth betray their wickedness, the one in this way,
 the other in that.
 
 135. Facts of importance and apt for instruction are, therefore, here
 set before us. And their general import is that God does not permit
 hypocrites to remain hidden for any length of time, but compels them
 to betray themselves just when they make shrewd efforts to hide their
 hypocrisy and crime.
 
 136. Moses does not exhibit in his narrative the verbose diction
 characteristic of pagan literature, where we often find one and the
 same argument embellished and polished by a variety of colors. We find
 by experience that no human power of description can do justice to
 inward emotions. In consequence, verbosity, as a rule, comes short of
 expressing emotion. Moses employs the opposite method, and clothes a
 great variety of arguments in scant phraseology.
 
 137. Above the historian used the expression, "when they were in the
 field." Thereby Moses indicates that the murderer Cain had watched his
 opportunity to attack his brother when both were alone. All the
 circumstances plainly show that Abel was not idle at the time; for he
 was in the field, where he had to do the things his father committed
 to him. From Moses' statement we may infer that Abel's parents felt
 absolutely no fear of danger. For, although at the outset they had
 feared that the wrath of Cain would eventually break out into still
 greater sin, Cain, by his gentleness and pretended affection,
 prevented all suspicion of evil on the part of his parents. For had
 there been the least trace of apprehension, they certainly would not
 have permitted Abel to go from their presence alone. They would have
 sent his sisters with him as companions; for he no doubt had some. Or
 his parents themselves would have prevented by their presence and
 authority the perpetration of so great a crime. As already stated,
 also the mind of Abel was perfectly free from suspicion. For, had he
 suspected the least evil at the hand of his brother, he would
 doubtless have sought safety by flight. But after he had heard that
 Cain bore the judgment of God with composure, and did not envy the
 brother his honor, he pursued his work in the field with a feeling of
 security.
 
 138. What orator could do justice to the scene which Moses depicts in
 one word: "Cain rose up against his brother?" Many descriptions of
 cruelty are to be found on every hand, but could any be painted as
 more atrocious and execrable than is the case here? "He rose up
 against his brother," Moses writes. It is as if he had said, Cain rose
 up against Abel, the only brother he had, with whom he had been
 brought up and with whom he had lived to that day. But not only the
 relationship Cain utterly forgot; he forgot their common parents also.
 The greatness of the grief he would cause his parents by such a grave
 crime, never entered his mind. He did not think that Abel was a
 brother, from whom he had never received any offense whatever. For
 Cain knew that the honor of having offered the more acceptable
 sacrifice, proceeded not from any desire or ambition in Abel, but from
 God himself. Nor did Cain consider that he, who had hitherto stood in
 the highest favor with his parents, would lose that favor altogether
 and would fall under their deepest displeasure as a result of his
 crime.
 
 139. It is recorded in history of an artist who painted the scene of
 Iphigenia's sacrifice, that when he had given to the countenance of
 each of the spectators present its appropriate expression of grief and
 pain, he found himself unable to portray the vastness of the father's
 grief, who was present also, and hence painted his head draped.
 
 140. Such is the method, I think, Moses employs in this passage, when
 he uses the verb _yakam_, "Rose up against." What tragical pictures
 would the eloquence of a Cicero or a Livy have drawn in an attempt to
 portray, through the medium of their oratory, the wrath of the one
 brother, and the dread, the cries, the prayers, the tears, the
 uplifted hands, and all the horrors of the other! But not even in that
 way can justice be done to the subject. Moses, therefore, pursues the
 right course, when he portrays, by a mere outline, things too great
 for utterance. Such brevity tends to enlist the reader's undivided
 attention to a subject which the vain adornment of many words
 disfigures and mars, like paint applied to natural beauty.
 
 141. This is true also of the additional statement, "He slew him."
 Occasionally we see men start a quarrel and commit murder for a
 trivial cause, but no such ordinary murder is described here.
 Murderers of this kind immediately afterward are filled with distress;
 they grieve for the deeds they have done and acknowledge them to be
 delusions of the devil by which he blinded their minds. Cain felt no
 distress; he expressed no grief, but denied the deed he had done.
 
 142. This satanic and insatiable hatred in hypocrites is described by
 Christ in the words, "When they kill you, they will think that they do
 God service," Jn 16, 2. So the priests and the kings filled Jerusalem
 with the blood of the prophets and gloried in what they did as a great
 achievement; for they considered this as proof of their zeal for the
 Law and the house of God.
 
 143. And the fury of popes and bishops in our day is just the same.
 They are not satisfied with having excommunicated us again and again,
 and with having shed our blood, but they wish to blot out our memory
 from the land of the living, according to the description in the
 Psalm, "Rase it, rase it, even to the foundation thereof," Ps 137, 7.
 Such hatred is not human but satanic. For all human hatred becomes
 mellow in time; at all events, it will cease after it has avenged our
 injury and gratified its passion. But the hatred of these Pharisees
 assumes constantly larger dimensions, especially since it is smoothed
 over by a show of piety.
 
 144. Cain, therefore, is the father of all those murderers who
 slaughter the saints, and whose wrath knows no end so long as there
 remains one of them, as is proved in the case of Christ himself. As
 for Cain, there is no doubt of his having hoped that by putting Abel
 to death he should keep the honor of his birthright. Thus, the ungodly
 always think that their cruelty will profit them in some way. But when
 they find that their hope is vain they fall into despair.
 
 145. Now, when the fact of this shameful murder was made known to the
 parents, what do we think must have been the sad scenes resulting?
 What lamentations? What sighs and groans? But I dwell not on these
 things; they are for the man with the gifts of eloquence and
 imagination to describe. It was certainly a marvel that both parents
 were not struck lifeless with grief. The calamity was rendered the
 greater by the fact that their first-born, who had aroused so large
 hopes concerning himself, was the perpetrator of this horrible murder.
 
 146. If, therefore, Adam and Eve had not been helped from above, they
 could never have been equal to this disaster in their home; for there
 is nothing like it in all the world. Adam and Eve were without that
 consolation which we may have in sudden and unexpected calamities,
 namely, that like evils have befallen others and have not come upon us
 alone. Our first parents had only two sons, though I believe that they
 had daughters also; and therefore they lacked such instances of grief
 in the human family as we have before our eyes.
 
 147. Who can doubt, moreover, that Satan by this new species of
 temptation increased greatly the grief of our first parents? They no
 doubt thought, Behold, this is all our sin. We, in paradise, wished to
 become like God; but by our sin we have become like the devil. This is
 the case also with our son. We loved only this son, and made
 everything of him! Our other son, Abel, was righteous before us, above
 this son; but of his righteousness we made nothing! This elder son we
 hoped would be he who should crush the serpent's head; but behold, he
 himself is crushed by the serpent! Nay, he himself has become like the
 serpent, for he is now a murderer. And whence is this? Is it not
 because he was born of us, and because we, through our sin, are what
 we are? Therefore it is to our flesh; therefore it is to our sin, that
 this calamity must be traced.
 
 148. It is very probable, accordingly, and the events of the series of
 years which followed strengthen this probability, that the sorrowing
 parents, shaken to the core by their calamity, abstained for a long
 time from connubial intercourse. For it appears that when Cain
 committed this murder he was about thirty years of age. During this
 period some daughters were born unto Adam. In view of the subsequent
 statements, verse 17, that "Cain knew his wife," he no doubt married a
 sister. Moreover, since Cain himself says in verse 14, "It shall come
 to pass that everyone that findeth me shall slay me", and as it is
 further said in verse 15, "The Lord set a mark upon Cain, lest any
 finding him should kill him"--it appears most probable from all these
 circumstances that Adam had many children besides Cain and Abel, but
 these two only are mentioned, on account of their important and
 memorable history, and because these two were their first and most
 remarkable children. It is my full belief that the marriage of our
 first parents was most fruitful during the first thirty years of their
 union. Somewhere Calmana and Dibora are mentioned as daughters of
 Adam, but I know not whether the authors are worthy of credence.
 Inasmuch, therefore, as the birth of Seth is recorded as having taken
 place a long time after this murder, it seems to me very probable that
 the parents, distressed beyond measure at this monstrous crime in the
 bosom of their family, refrained for a long time from procreation.
 While Moses does not touch upon all these things, he intimates enough
 to arouse in the reader a desire to dwell upon the noteworthy events
 which the absence of detailed information permits us to survey only
 from a distance.
 
 149. But I return to the text before us. Cain is an evil and wicked
 man, and yet, in the eyes of his parents, he is a divine possession
 and gift. Abel, on the contrary, is in the eyes of his parents
 nothing; but in the eyes of God he is truly a righteous man; an
 appellation with which also Christ honors him when he calls him
 "righteous Abel"! Mt 23, 35. This divine judgment concerning Abel,
 Cain could not endure, and, therefore, he thought that by murder not
 only the hatred against his brother could be satisfied, but also his
 birthright be retained. But he was far from thinking that was sin; as
 the first-born he thought he had exercised his right. He killed Abel,
 not with a sword, as I think, but with a club or a stone, for I hold
 that there were as yet no iron weapons.
 
 150. After the murder, Cain remained unconcerned, for he thought the
 deed could be concealed by hiding the body, which he buried, or
 perhaps cast into a river, thinking that thus it would surely remain
 undiscovered by his parents.
 
 When Abel, however, had been from home a longer time than had been his
 habit, the Holy Spirit prompted Adam to inquire of Cain concerning
 Abel, saying, "Where is Abel thy brother?" The above-mentioned
 utterance of Adam, "If not, sin lieth at the door," was a prophecy
 which now began to come true. Cain thought he had laid his sin to
 rest, and all would thus remain hidden. And true it was that his sin
 did lie at rest, but it lay at rest "at the door." And who opens the
 door? None other than the Lord himself! He arouses the sleeping sin!
 He brings the hidden sin to light!
 
 151. The same thing must come to pass with all sinners. For, unless by
 repentance you first come to God, and yourself confess your sin to
 God, God will surely come to you, to disclose your sin. For God cannot
 endure that any one should deny his sin. To this fact the psalmist
 testifies: "When I kept silence, my bones wasted away through my
 roaring all the day long. For day and night thy hand was heavy upon
 me; my moisture was changed as with the drouth of summer." Ps 32, 3-4.
 For, although sin has its sleep and its security, yet that sleep is
 "at the door"; it cannot long last, and the sin cannot remain hidden.
 
 152. When Moses introduces Jehovah as speaking, I understand him to
 mean, as above, that it was Adam who spoke by the Holy Spirit in the
 place of God, whom he represented in his relation as father. The
 expression of the Holy Spirit, therefore, is intended to set forth the
 high authority of parents; when children dutifully hear and obey
 these, they hear and obey God. And I believe Adam knew by the
 revelation of the Holy Spirit that Abel had been slain by his brother;
 for his words intimate the commission of murder at a time when Cain
 still dissembled as to what he had done.
 
 
 V. CAIN PUNISHED FOR HIS MURDER.
 
    A. CAIN'S PUNISHMENT IN GENERAL.
 
       1. By whom and how he is punished 153.
 
       2. Why he was not put to death 153.
 
        * The double grief of the first parents 154.
 
        * What was Adam's church and altar 155.
 
       3. How Cain was excommunicated 156.
 
        * God's inquiry about Abel's blood.
 
          a. How unbelievers refer to it 157.
 
          b. How a theologian should use it 158.
 
          c. It is a great and important matter 159.
 
           * How Abel's death is to be viewed 159.
 
          d. Why God does not inquire after the blood of beasts
             160-161.
 
          e. Whether this inquiry was from God direct or made through
             Adam 162-163.
 
          f. How Cain felt upon this inquiry 164.
 
           * The result of sin to murderers and other sinners 165-166.
 
           * An evil conscience the result of evil-doing 166.
 
          g. How to understand the statement that Abel's blood crieth
             to heaven 167.
 
           * How God's children are to comfort themselves when the
             world oppresses them and seemingly God refuses to help
             168-171.
 
          h. This inquiry is a sign of God's care for Abel 169.
 
           * The blood of many Evangelical martyrs cry to the Papists
             170.
 
           * How God opportunely judges the afflictions of believers
             171.
 
           * Why God's vengeance does not immediately follow 172.
 
          i. The time this inquiry occurred 173.
 
           * God indeed has regard for the sufferings and tears of his
             children 174.
 
           * How sinners can meet the judgments of God 174.
 
       4. The miserable life Cain must have led after his punishment
          175.
 
    B. CAIN'S PUNISHMENT IN DETAIL.
 
       1. The Church suffered.
 
          a. How Cain's punishment and curse differed from Adam's
             176-178.
 
          b. Why Cain's person was cursed 178-179.
 
           * The more Cain desired honor, the less he received 180.
 
           * The beginning of both churches, the true and the false
             181.
 
           * Cain's whole posterity perished in sin 181.
 
          c. How his curse and punishment were lightened 182.
 
           * Whether any of Cain's posterity were saved, and holy 182.
 
           * The way the heathen had part in the promise 182-185.
 
           * The way Cain withheld his children from the true Church
             185.
 
       2. The Home suffered.
 
          a. How this curse affected the earth 186-187.
 
          b. Why Adam used such severe words in this curse 186.
 
          c. How it caused the earth to be less fruitful 187.
 
           * The difference between "Arez" and "Adama" 188.
 
       3. The State suffered.
 
        * What "No" and "Nod" mean, and how they differ 189-190.
 
        * Cain's sin punished in three ways and in each the sin was
          mitigated 191-193.
 
        * Cain a fugitive and a wanderer.
 
          a. This refers chiefly to the true Church, as is illustrated
             by many examples of the saints 194-195.
 
          b. It refers less to the false 194-195.
 
          c. Many take offense at this 196.
 
 
 V. HOW CAIN WAS PUNISHED FOR HIS MURDER.
 
 A. Cain's Punishment in General.
 
 153. If Eve overheard these words, what think you must have been the
 state of her mind! Her grief must have been beyond all description.
 But the calamity was brought home to Adam with even greater force. As
 he was the father, it fell to him to rebuke his son and to
 excommunicate him for his sin. Since, according to the ninth chapter,
 the law concerning the death-penalty for murderers was not promulgated
 until afterward when the patriarchs beheld murder becoming alarmingly
 frequent, Adam did not put Cain to death, but safeguarded his life in
 obedience to the prompting and direction of the Holy Spirit; still, it
 is a fact not to be gainsaid that the punishment ordained for him and
 all his posterity was anything but light. For in addition to that
 curse upon his body he suffered excommunication from his family,
 separation from the sight of his parents and from the society of his
 brothers and sisters, who remained with their parents, or in the
 fellowship of the Church.
 
 154. Now, Adam could not have done all this, nor could Eve have heard
 it without indescribable anguish. For a father is a father, and a son
 is a son. Gladly would Adam have spared his son and retained him at
 home, as we now sometimes see murderers become reconciled to the
 brothers of their victims. But in this case no place was left for
 reconciliation. Cain is bidden at once to be a fugitive upon the face
 of the earth. The pain of the parents was doubled in consequence. They
 see one of their sons slain, and the other excommunicated by the
 judgment of God and cut off forever from the fellowship of his
 brethren.
 
 155. Moreover, when we here speak of excommunication from the Church,
 it stands to reason that not our houses of worship, built in
 magnificent style and ample proportions out of hewn stone, are meant.
 The sanctuary, or church, of Adam was a certain tree, or a certain
 little hill under the open heaven, where they assembled to hear the
 Word of God and to offer their sacrifices, for which purpose they had
 erected altars. And when they offered their sacrifices and heard the
 Word, God was present, as we see from the experience of Abel.
 
 Also elsewhere in the sacred story, mention is made of such altars
 under the open heaven, and of sacrifices made upon them. And, if we
 should come together at this day under the open sky to bend our knees,
 to preach, to give thanks, and to bless each other, a custom would be
 inaugurated altogether beneficial.
 
 156. It was from a temple of this kind and from such a church, not a
 conspicuous and magnificent church at a particular place, that Cain
 was cast out. He was thus doubly punished; first, by a corporal
 penalty, because the earth was accursed to him, and secondly, by a
 spiritual penalty, because by excommunication, he was cast out from
 the temple and the church of God as from another paradise.
 
 157. Lawyers also have drawn upon this passage, and quite properly
 brought out the fact that Jehovah first investigated the matter and
 then passed sentence. Their application is, that no one should be
 pronounced guilty until his case has been tried; until he has been
 called to the bar, proved guilty and convicted. This, according to a
 previous statement, was also done with Adam: "The Lord God called unto
 Adam, and said unto him. Where art thou?" Gen 3, 9. And further on: "I
 will go down now, and see whether they have done altogether according
 to the cry of it, which is come unto me; and if not, I will know," Gen
 11, 5; 18, 21.
 
 158. However, dismissing the matter in its bearings upon public life,
 let us view its more attractive theological features. The element of
 doctrine and of hope is found in the fact that Jehovah inquires
 concerning the dead Abel. Clearly there is pointed out to us here the
 truth of the resurrection of the dead. God declared himself to be the
 God of Abel, although now dead, and he inquired for the dead, for
 Abel. Upon this passage we may establish the incontrovertible
 principle that, if there were no one to care for us after this life,
 Abel would not have been inquired for after he was slain. But God
 inquires after Abel, even when he had been taken from this life; he
 has no desire to forget him; he retains the remembrance of him; he
 asks: "Where is he?" God, therefore, we see, is the God of the dead.
 My meaning is that even the dead, as we here see, still live in the
 memory of God, and have a God who cares for them, and saves them in
 another life beyond and different from this corporal life in which
 saints suffer affliction.
 
 159. This passage, therefore, is most worthy of our attention. We see
 that God cared for Abel, even when dead; and that on account of the
 dead Abel, he excommunicated Cain, and visited him, the living, with
 destruction in spite of his being the first-born. A towering fact
 this, that Abel, though dead, was living and canonized in another life
 more effectually and truly than those whom the pope ever canonized!
 The death of Abel was indeed horrible; he did not suffer death without
 excruciating torment nor without many tears. Yet it was a blessed
 death, for now he lives a more blessed life than he did before. This
 bodily life of ours is lived in sin, and is ever in danger of death.
 But that other life is eternal and perfectly free from trials and
 troubles, both of the body and of the soul.
 
 160. No! God inquires not after the sheep and the oxen that are slain,
 but he does inquire after the men who are slain. Accordingly men
 possess the hope of a resurrection. They have a God who brings them
 back from the death of the body unto eternal life, a God who inquires
 after their blood as a most precious thing. The Psalmist says:
 "Precious in the sight of Jehovah is the death of his saints," Ps 116,
 15.
 
 161. This is the glory of the human race, obtained for it by the seed
 of the woman which bruised the serpent's head. The case of Abel is the
 first instance of such promise made to Adam and Eve, and God showed by
 the same that the serpent did not harm Abel, although it caused his
 murder. This was indeed an instance of the serpent's "bruising the
 heel" of the woman's seed. But in the very attempt to bite, its own
 head was crushed. For God, in answer to Abel's faith in the promised
 seed, required the blood of the dead, and proved himself thereby to be
 his God still. This is all proved by what follows.
 
 V. 10. _And he said, What hast thou done? The voice of thy brother's
 blood crieth unto me from the ground._
 
 162. Cain's sin hath hitherto lain at the door. And the preceding
 circumstances plainly show how hard he struggled to keep his sin
 asleep. For being interrogated by his father concerning his brother
 Abel and his whereabouts, he disclaimed knowledge of the matter, thus
 adding to murder lying. This answer of Cain is sufficient evidence
 that the above words were spoken by Adam in his own person, and not by
 God in his divine Majesty. For Cain believed that the deed was hidden
 from his father, as he was a mere man, while he could not have thought
 this of the divine Majesty. Therefore, had God spoken to him in his
 own person, he would have returned a different answer. But, as he
 thought himself dealing with a human being only, Cain denied his deed
 altogether, saying: "I know not. How numerous are the perils by which
 a man may perish. He may have been destroyed by wild beasts; he may
 have been drowned in some river; or he may have lost his life by some
 other death."
 
 163. Thus Cain thought that his father would think of any other cause
 of death than the perpetration of murder. But Cain could not deceive
 the Holy Spirit in Adam. Adam therefore, as God's representative,
 arraigns him with the words, "What hast thou done?" As if he had said
 "Why dost thou persist in denying the deed; be assured thou canst not
 deceive God, who hath revealed to me all. Thou thinkest the blood of
 thy brother is hidden by the earth. But it is not so absorbed and
 concealed thereby as to prevent the blood crying aloud unto God." That
 meant to awaken the sin lying at the door, and to drag it forth.
 
 164. The text before us, then, provides much consolation against the
 enemies and murderers of the Church; for it teaches us that our
 afflictions and sufferings and the shedding of our blood fill heaven
 and earth with their cries. I believe, therefore, that Cain was so
 overwhelmed and confounded by these words of his father that, as if
 thunderstruck, he knew not what to say or what to do. No doubt his
 thoughts were, "If my father Adam knows about the murder which I have
 committed, how can I any longer doubt that it is known unto God, unto
 the angels, and unto heaven and earth? Whither can I flee? Which way
 can I turn, wretched man that I am?"
 
 165. Such is the state of murderers to this day. They are so harassed
 with the stings of conscience, after the crime of murder has been
 committed, that they are always in a state of alarm. It seems to them
 that heaven and earth have put on a changed aspect toward them, and
 they know not whither to flee. A case in point is Orestes pursued by
 the furies, as described by the poets. A horrible thing is the cry of
 spilled blood and an evil conscience.
 
 166. The same is true of all other atrocious sins. Those who commit
 them, experience the same distresses of mind when remorse lays hold of
 them. The whole creation seems changed toward them, and even when they
 speak to persons with whom they have been familiar, and when they hear
 the answers they make, the very sound of their voice appears to them
 altogether changed and their countenances seem to wear an altered
 aspect. Whichever way they turn their eyes, all things are clothed, as
 it were, in gloom and horror. So grim and fierce a monster is a guilty
 conscience! And, unless such sinners are succored from above, they
 must put an end to their existence because of their anguish and
 intolerable pain.
 
 167. Again Moses' customary conciseness is in evidence, which,
 however, is more effective than an excess of words. In the first
 place, he personifies a lifeless object when he attributes to blood a
 voice filling with its cries heaven and the earth. How can that voice
 be small or weak which, rising from earth, is heard by God in heaven?
 Abel, therefore, who when alive was patient under injuries and gentle
 and placid of spirit, now, when dead and buried in the earth, can not
 brook the wrong inflicted. He who before dared not murmur against his
 brother, now fairly shrieks, and so completely enlists God in his
 cause that he descends from heaven, to charge the murderer with his
 crime. Moses, accordingly, here uses the more pregnant term. He does
 not say, "The voice of thy brother's blood speaketh unto me from the
 ground," but, "The voice of thy brother's blood crieth unto me." It is
 a cry like the shout of heralds when they raise their voices to
 assemble men together.
 
 168. These things are written, as I have observed, to convince us that
 our God is merciful, that he loves his saints, takes them into his
 special care, and demands an account for them; while, on the other
 hand, he is angry with the murderers of his saints, hates them and
 designs their punishment. Of this consolation we stand in decided
 need. When oppressed by our enemies and murderers, we are apt to
 conclude that our God has forgotten and lost interest in us. We think
 that if God cared for us, he would not permit such things to come upon
 us. Likewise, Abel might have reasoned: God surely cares nothing for
 me; for if he did, he would not suffer me thus to be murdered by my
 brother.
 
 169. But only look at what follows! Does not God safeguard the
 interests of Abel better than he could possibly have done himself? How
 could Abel have inflicted on his brother such vengeance as God does,
 now that Abel is dead? How could he, if alive, execute such judgment
 on his brother as God here executes? Now the blood of Abel cries
 aloud, who, while alive, was of a most retiring disposition. Now Abel
 accuses his brother before God of being a murderer; when alive he
 would bear all the injuries of his brother in silence. For who was it
 that disclosed the murder committed by Cain? Was it not, as the text
 here tells us, the blood of Abel, fairly deafening with its constant
 cries the ears of God and men?
 
 170. These things, I say, are all full of consolation; especially for
 us who now suffer persecution from the popes and wicked princes on
 account of our doctrine. They have practiced against us the utmost
 cruelty and have vented their rage against godly men, not in Germany
 only, but also in other parts of Europe. And all this sin is
 disregarded by the papacy, as if it were nothing but a joke. Nay, the
 Papists really consider it to be a service toward God, Jn 16, 2. All
 this sin, therefore, as yet "lieth at the door." But it shall become
 manifest in due time. The blood of Leonard Kaiser, which was shed in
 Bavaria, is not silent. Nor is the blood of Henry of Zutphen, which
 was shed in Dietmar; nor that of our brother Anthony, of England, who
 was cruelly and without a hearing slain by his English countrymen. I
 could mention a thousand others who, although their names are not so
 prominent, were yet fellow-sufferers with confessors and martyrs. The
 blood of all these, I say, will not be silent; in due time it will
 cause God to descend from heaven and execute such judgment in the
 earth as the enemies of the Gospel will not be able to bear.
 
 171. Let us not think, therefore, that God does not heed the shedding
 of our blood! Let us not imagine for a moment that God does not regard
 our afflictions! No! he collects all our tears, and puts them into his
 bottle, Ps 56, 8. The cry of the blood of all the godly penetrates the
 clouds and the heavens to the very throne of God, and entreats him to
 avenge the blood of the righteous, Ps 79, 10.
 
 172. As these things are written for our consolation, so are they
 written for the terror of our adversaries. For what think you can be
 more horrible for our tyrants to hear than that the blood of the slain
 continually cries aloud and accuses them before God? God is indeed
 long-suffering, especially now toward the end of the world; and
 therefore sin lies the longer "at the door," and vengeance does not
 immediately follow. But it is surely true that God is most grievously
 offended with all this sin, and that he will never suffer it to pass
 unpunished.
 
 173. Such judgment of God on Cain, however, I do not believe to have
 been executed on the first day, but some time afterward. For it is
 God's nature to be long-suffering, inasmuch as he waits for the sinner
 to turn. But he does not, on that account, fail to punish him. For he
 is the righteous judge both of the living and of the dead, as we
 confess in our Christian Faith. Such judgment God exercised in the
 very beginning of the world with reference to these two brothers. He
 judged and condemned the living murderer, and justified murdered Abel.
 He excommunicated Cain and drove him into such agonies of soul that
 the space of the whole creation seemed too narrow to contain him. From
 the moment Cain saw that God would be the avenger of his brother's
 blood, he felt nowhere safe. To Abel, on the other hand, God gave for
 enjoyment the full width of earth and heaven.
 
 174. Why, then, should we ever doubt that God ponders and numbers in
 his heart the afflictions of his people, and that he measures our
 tears and inscribes them on adamantine tablets? And this inscription
 the enemies of the Church shall never be able to erase by any device
 whatever except by repentance. Manasseh was a terrible tyrant and a
 most inhuman persecutor of the godly. And his banishment and captivity
 would never have sufficed to blot out these sins. But when he
 acknowledged his sin and repented in truth, then the Lord showed him
 mercy.
 
 So Paul had, and so the pope and the bishops have now, only one way
 left them: to acknowledge their sin and to supplicate the forgiveness
 of God. If they will not do this, God in his wrath will surely require
 at their hands the blood of the godly. Let no one doubt this!
 
 175. Abel is dead, but Cain is still alive. But, good God, what a
 wretched life is that which he lives! He might wish never to have been
 born, as he hears that he is excommunicated and must look for death
 and retribution at any moment. And in due time this will be the lot of
 our adversaries and of the oppressors of the Church.
 
 B. Cain's Punishment In Detail.
 
 V. 11. _And now cursed art thou from the ground, which hath opened its
 mouth to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand;_
 
 176. We have heard, so far, of the disclosure of Cain's sin through
 the voice of Abel's blood, of his conviction by Adam his father, and
 of the decision rendered with reference to the two brothers, namely,
 that the one should be canonized, or declared a saint--the first
 fruits, as it were, of the blessed seed; but that the other, the
 first-born, should be condemned and excommunicated, as shall presently
 be shown. Now Moses mentions the penalties to be visited upon such
 fratricide.
 
 177. First of all, we should mark as particularly worthy of note the
 discrimination exercised by the Holy Spirit. Previously, when the
 penalty for his sin was inflicted upon Adam, a curse was placed not
 upon the person of Adam, but only upon the earth; and even this curse
 was not absolute but qualified. The expression is this: "Cursed is the
 ground for thy sake"; and in the eighth chapter of the Romans, verse
 twenty, we read: "The creature was made subject to vanity, not
 willingly." The fact is, that the earth, inasmuch as it bore guilty
 man, became involved in the curse as his instrument, just as also the
 sword, gold, and other objects, are cursed for the reason that men
 make them the instruments of their sin. With fine reasoning the Holy
 Spirit discriminates between the earth and Adam. He diverts the curse
 to the earth, but saves the person.
 
 178. But in this instance the Holy Spirit speaks of Cain. He curses
 the person of Cain. And why is this? Is it because the sin of Cain, as
 a murderer, was greater than the sin of Adam and Eve? Not so. But
 because Adam was the root from whose flesh and loins Christ, that
 blessed seed, should be born. It is this seed, therefore, that was
 spared. For the sake of this seed, the fruit of the loins of Adam, the
 curse is transferred from the person of Adam to the earth. Thus, Adam
 bears the curse of the earth, but his person is not cursed; from his
 posterity Christ was to be born.
 
 179. Cain, however, since he fell by his sin, must suffer the curse
 being inflicted upon his person. He hears it said to him, "Cursed art
 thou," that we might understand he was cut off from the glory of the
 promised seed, and condemned never to have in his posterity that seed
 through which the blessing should come. Thus Cain was cast out from
 the stupendous glory of the promised seed. Abel was slain; therefore
 there could be no posterity from him. But Adam was ordained to serve
 God by further procreation. In Adam alone, therefore, after Cain's
 rejection, the hope of the blessed seed rested until Seth was born
 unto him.
 
 180. The words spoken to Cain, "Cursed art thou," are few, but
 nevertheless entitled to a great deal of attention, in that they are
 equal to the declaration: Thou art not the one from whom the blessed
 seed is hoped for. With this word Cain stands cast out and cut off
 like a branch from the root, unable longer to hope for the distinction
 around which he had circled. It is a fact, that Cain craved the
 distinction of passing on the blessing; but the more closely he
 encircled it the more elusive it became. Such is the lot of all
 evildoers: their failure is commensurate with their efforts to
 succeed.
 
 181. From this occurrence originate the two churches which are at war
 with each other: the one of Adam and the righteous, which has the hope
 and promise of the blessed seed; the other of Cain, which has
 forfeited this hope and promise through sin, without ever being able
 to regain it. For in the flood Cain's whole posterity became extinct,
 so that there has been no prophet, no saint, no prince of the true
 Church who could trace his lineage back to Cain. All that was denied
 Cain and withdrawn from him, when he was told: "Cursed art thou."
 
 182. We find added, however, the words, "from the ground." These words
 qualify the fearful wrath. For, if God had said, "from the heavens,"
 he would have deprived his posterity forever of the hope of salvation.
 As it is, the words, "from the ground," convey, indeed, the menacing
 decision that the promise of the seed has been forfeited, but the
 possibility is left that descendants of Cain as individuals, prompted
 by the Holy Spirit, may join themselves to Adam and find salvation.
 
 This, in after ages, really came to pass. While it is true the promise
 of the blessed seed was a distinction confined to the Jews, according
 to the statement in Psalm 147, 20: "He hath not dealt so with any
 nation," the Gentiles, nevertheless, retained the privilege of
 beggars, so to speak. It was in this manner that the Gentiles, through
 divine mercy, obtained the same blessing the Jews possessed on the
 ground of the divine faithfulness and promise.
 
 183. In like manner, all rule in the Church was absolutely denied also
 to the Moabites and Amorites; and yet many private individuals among
 them embraced the religion of the Jews. Thus, every right in the
 Church was taken away from Cain and his posterity absolutely, yet
 permission was left them to beg, as it were, for grace. That was not
 taken from them. Cain, because of his sin, was cast out from the right
 of sitting at the family table of Adam. But the right was left him to
 gather up, doglike, the crumbs that fell from his father's table, Mt
 15, 26-27. This is signified by the Hebrew expression _min haadama_,
 "From the ground."
 
 184. I make these observations because there is a great probability
 that many of the posterity of Cain joined themselves to the holy
 patriarchs. But their privileges were not those of an obligatory
 service toward them on the part of the Church, but mere toleration of
 them as individuals who had lost the promise that the blessed seed was
 to spring from their flesh and blood. To forfeit the promise was no
 trifle; still, even that curse was so mitigated as to secure for them
 the privilege of beggars, so that heaven was not absolutely denied
 them, provided they allied themselves with the true Church.
 
 185. But this is what Cain, no doubt, strove to hinder in various
 ways. He set up new forms of worship and invented numerous ceremonies,
 that thereby he might also appear to be the Church. Those, however,
 who departed from him and joined the true Church, were saved, although
 they were compelled to surrender the distinction that Christ was to be
 born from their flesh and blood. But let us now return to the text.
 
 186. Moses here uses a very striking personification. He represents
 the earth as a dreaded beast when he speaks of her as having opened
 her mouth and swallowed the innocent blood of Abel. But why does he
 treat the earth so ruthlessly since all this was done without her
 will? Yes, being a creature of God which is good, did not all
 transpire in opposition to her will and in spite of her struggle
 against it, according to Paul's teaching: "The earth was made subject
 to vanity, not willingly," Rom 8, 20. My reply is: The object was to
 impress Adam and all his posterity, so that they might live in the
 fear of God and beware of murder. The words of Adam have this import
 "Behold the earth hath opened her mouth and swallowed the blood of thy
 brother; but she ought to have swallowed thee, the murderer. The earth
 is indeed a good creature, and is good to the good and godly; but to
 the wicked she is full of pitfalls." It is for the purpose of
 inspiring murderers with fear and dread that these terrifying words
 were spoken. Nor is there any doubt that Cain, after hearing the words
 from an angry father, was overwhelmed with terror and confusion, not
 knowing whither to turn. The expression, "which hath opened its mouth
 to receive thy brother's blood from thy hand," is, indeed, terrifying,
 but it portrays the turpitude of the fratricidal deed better than any
 picture.
 
 V. 12a. _When thou tillest the ground, it shall not henceforth yield
 unto thee its strength._
 
 187. The Lord said above to Adam, "Thorns also and thistles shall it
 bring forth to thee." But the words spoken to Cain are different. As
 if he had said, "Thou hast watered and fertilized the earth, not with
 healthful and quickening rain, but with thy brother's blood. Therefore
 the earth shall be to thee less productive than to others. For the
 blood thou hast shed shall hinder the strength and the fruitfulness of
 the earth." This material curse is the second part of the punishment.
 The earth, although alike cultivated by Adam and Cain, should be more
 fruitful to Adam than to Cain and yield its return to the former for
 his labors. But to the labors of Cain it should not yield such
 returns, though by nature desirous to give in proportion to its
 fruitfulness and strength, because it was hindered by the blood
 spilled by Cain.
 
 188. Here we must offer a remark of a grammatical nature. In the
 present passage Moses terms the earth _haadama_. In the passage
 following, "A fugitive and a wanderer shalt thou be in the earth" he
 uses the term _arez_. Now _adama_ signifies, according to grammatical
 interpreters, that part of the earth which is cultivated, where trees
 grow and other fruits of the earth adapted for food. But _arez_
 signifies the whole earth, whether cultivated or uncultivated. This
 curse, therefore, properly has reference to the part of the earth
 cultivated for food. And the curse implies that where one ear of wheat
 brings forth three hundred grains for Adam, it should bring forth
 scarcely ten grains for Cain the murderer; and this for the purpose
 that Cain might behold on every side God's hatred and punishment of
 the shedding of blood.
 
 V. 12b. _A fugitive and a wanderer (vagabond) shalt thou be in the
 earth._
 
 189. This is a third punishment resting on murderers to our day. For,
 unless they find reconciliation, they have nowhere a fixed abode or a
 secure dwelling-place.
 
 We find here, in the original, two words, _No Vanod_, signifying
 vagabond and fugitive. The distinction I make between them is, that
 _No_ designates the uncertainty of one's dwelling-place. An
 illustration is furnished by the Jews, who have no established
 habitation, but fear every hour lest they be compelled to wander
 forth. _Nod_, on the other hand, signifies the uncertainty of finding
 the dwelling-place sought; with the uncertainty of a present permanent
 dwelling-place there is linked the uncertainty of a goal to strive for
 when the present uncertain dwelling-place must be abandoned. Thus, the
 punishment contains two features, the insecurity of the present
 dwelling-place and a lack of knowledge whither to turn when thrust
 forth from the insecure abode of the present. In this sense the term
 is used in Psalm 109, 10: "Let his children be continually
 _vagabonds_." That means, Nowhere shall they find a certain abode; if
 they are in Greece this year, they shall migrate to Italy the next,
 and so from place to place.
 
 190. Just such is evidently the miserable state of the Jews at the
 present day. They can fix their dwelling-place nowhere permanently.
 And to such evil God adds this other in the case of Cain, that when he
 should be driven from one place of abode he should not know where to
 turn, and thus should live suspended, as it were, between heaven and
 earth, not knowing where to abide nor where to look for a permanent
 place of refuge.
 
 191. In this manner the sin of Cain was visited with a threefold
 punishment. In the first place he was deprived of all spiritual or
 churchly glory; for the promise that the blessed seed was to be born
 from his posterity, was taken from him. In the second place, the earth
 was cursed, which is a punishment affecting his home life. The third
 punishment affects his relations to the community, in that he must be
 a vagabond without a fixed abode anywhere.
 
 192. Notwithstanding, an open door of return into the Church is left,
 but without a covenant. For, as has been explained, in the event that
 any one of Cain's posterity should ally himself with the true Church
 and the holy fathers, he was saved. Thus the Home is left, but without
 a blessing; and the State is left so that he may found a city and
 dwell there, but for how long, is uncertain. Without exaggeration,
 therefore, he may be likened to a beggar in Church, Home and State.
 
 193. This punishment is mitigated by the prohibition to slay him
 forthwith after the commission of the murderous deed, a law providing
 for the punishment of murderers which was reserved for a later day.
 Cain was saved that he might be an example for others, to teach them
 to fear God and to beware of murder. So much about the sin,
 arraignment, and punishment of Cain.
 
 194. But there are some who reply that, the godly, likewise sometimes
 endure these same curses, while the wicked, on the contrary, are free
 from them. Thus, Paul says that he also "wandered about and had no
 certain dwelling-place," 1 Cor 4, 11. Such is even our condition
 to-day, who are teachers in the churches. We have no certain
 dwelling-place; either we are driven into banishment or we expect
 banishment any hour. Such was the lot also of Christ, the apostles,
 the prophets, and the patriarchs.
 
 195. Concerning Jacob the Scriptures say "The elder shall serve the
 younger," Gen 25, 23. But does not Jacob become a servant when we see
 him, from fear of his brother, haste away into exile? Does he not, on
 his return home, supplicate his brother and fall on his knees before
 him? Is not Isaac also seen to be a most miserable beggar? Gen 6,
 1-35. Abraham, his father, goes into exile among the Gentiles and
 possesses not in all the world a place to set his foot, as Stephen
 says, Acts 7, 1-5. On the other hand, Ishmael was a king, and had the
 princes of the land of Midian as his offspring before Israel entered
 into the land of promise, Gen 25, 16. Thus, as we shall see a little
 later, Cain first built the city of Enoch, and, furthermore, became
 the ancestor of shepherds, workers in metals, and musicians. All this
 appears to prove that it is a mistake to attribute to Cain and his
 posterity a curse. The curse seems to rest with weight upon the true
 Church, while the wicked appear to thrive and flourish.
 
 196. These things are often a stumbling-block, not to the world only,
 but even to the saints, as the Psalms in many places testify. And the
 prophets, also, are frequently found to grow indignant, as does
 Jeremiah, when they see the wicked possess freedom as it were from the
 evils of life, while they are oppressed and afflicted in various ways.
 Men may therefore inquire, Where is the curse of the wicked? Where is
 the blessing of the godly? Is not the converse the truth? Cain is a
 vagabond and settled nowhere; and yet Cain is the first man that
 builds a city and has a certain place to dwell in. But we will answer
 this argument more fully hereafter. We will now proceed with the text
 of Moses.
 
 
 VI. CAIN'S CONDUCT WHEN PUNISHED.
 
    1. How he despaired. "My punishment is greater" etc.
 
       a. These words have greatly perplexed interpreters 197.
 
       b. The way Augustine explains them 197.
 
       c. The explanation of the rabbins 198.
 
        * How the rabbins pervert the Scriptures and whence their false
          comments 198-199.
 
       d. Why the rabbins' interpretation cannot be accepted 200.
 
       e. The true understanding of these words 201.
 
        * The punishment troubles Cain more than his sin 201.
 
       f. What makes these words difficult 202.
 
        * The right understanding of the words "Minso" and "Avon"
          202-203.
 
        * Grammarians cannot get at the right meaning of the Scriptures
          204.
 
        * How we should proceed in interpreting Scripture 204.
 
    2. How Cain viewed his political punishment 205.
 
    3. How he viewed his ecclesiastical punishment 206.
 
     * Why Cain was excommunicated by Adam 206-207.
 
     * In what sense Cain was a fugitive and a wanderer 208-209.
 
     * Adam received his punishment in a better way 210.
 
     * The meaning of being a fugitive and a wanderer. How the same is
       found among the papists 211-212.
 
     * The grace of God was guaranteed to Seth and his posterity 212.
 
     * Why no temptation can harm believers 212.
 
    4. Cain's fear that in turn he would be slain 213.
 
     * God shows Cain a double favor in his punishment. Why he does
       this 213.
 
     * Whether any of Cain's posterity, under the Old Testament, were
       saved 214-215.
 
    5. Whether Cain prayed that he might die, as Augustine, Lyra and
       others relate 216-217.
 
     * The fables of the rabbins cause Luther double work and why he
       occasionally cites them 218.
 
     * Whether God changed his judgment upon Cain 219.
 
     * Why God still showed Cain incidental grace 219.
 
     * The fables of the Jews concerning Cain's death and Lamech's
       punishment 220-221.
 
     * It is foolish to dispute concerning the sevenfold vengeance to
       be visited upon the one who slew Cain 222.
 
     * The divine promises.
 
       a. They are twofold, of the law and of grace 223.
 
       b. The promise Adam received 224.
 
       c. Whether God gave Cain one of these promises 224-225.
 
       d. The kind of promises well organized police stations have 226.
 
       e. The promises the Church has 227.
 
       f. Cain's promise is temporal, incidental and incomplete 227.
 
        * Was Cain murdered 228.
 
    6. How Cain had cause to fear, even though there were no people on
       the earth except Adam and Eve and his sisters 229-230.
 
     * The sign that is put upon Cain.
 
       a. Can anything definite be said of it. What the fathers thought
          of it 231.
 
       b. Why this sign was placed upon him 232.
 
       c. How he had to carry it his whole life 232.
 
       d. How the sign was a confirmation and a promise of the law 233.
 
    7. Of Cain's departure, and his excommunication from the presence
       of Jehovah.
 
       a. The first parents in obedience to God made Cain an outcast
          234-235.
 
       b. How the first parents overcame their parental affections in
          expelling Cain 236.
 
        * What should urge men to flee from their false security 237.
 
       c. His expulsion must have pierced Cain to the heart 238.
 
        * What is the presence of Jehovah 238.
 
       d. How he went from the presence of Jehovah, to be without that
          presence 239.
 
       e. It was a sad departure, both for Cain and his parents 240.
 
       f. Whither he resorted 241.
 
        * What meaning of "in the land of Nod" 241.
 
        * Of Paradise.
 
          (1) The deluge very likely destroyed paradise 241.
 
          (2) Where was paradise 242.
 
        * Of the Deluge.
 
          (1) The deluge destroyed paradise 243.
 
            * Cain lived where Babylon was built later 244.
 
          (2) The deluge gave the earth an entirely different form 244.
 
 
 VI. CAIN'S CONDUCT UPON BEING PUNISHED.
 
 V. 13. _And Cain said unto Jehovah, My punishment (iniquity) is
 greater than I can bear (than can be remitted)._
 
 197. Here Moses seems to have fixed a cross for the grammarians and
 the rabbins; for they crucify this passage in various ways. Lyra
 recites the opinions of some who see in this passage an affirmation,
 considering it to mean that in his despair Cain claimed his sin to be
 greater than could be pardoned. This is our rendering. Augustine
 likewise retained this view of the passage, for he says, "Thou liest,
 Cain; for the mercy of God is greater than the misery of all the
 sinners."
 
 198. The rabbins, however, expound the passage as a denial in the form
 of a question, as if he had said, "Is my iniquity greater than can be
 remitted?" But if this rendering be the true one, Cain not only does
 not acknowledge his sin, but excuses it and, in addition, insults God
 for laying upon him a punishment greater than he deserves. In this way
 the rabbins almost everywhere corrupt the sense of the Scriptures.
 Consequently I begin to hate them, and I admonish all who read them,
 to do so with careful discrimination. Although they did possess the
 knowledge of some things by tradition from the fathers, they corrupted
 them in various ways; and therefore they often deceived by those
 corruptions even Jerome himself. Nor did the poets of old so fill the
 world with their fables as the wicked Jews did the Scriptures with
 their absurd opinions. A great task, therefore, is incumbent upon us
 in endeavoring to keep the text free from their comments.
 
 199. The occasion for all this error is the fact that some men are
 competent to deal only with grammatical questions, but not with the
 subject matter itself; that is, they are not theologians at the same
 time. The inevitable result is mistakes and the crucifixion of
 themselves as well as of the Scriptures. For how can any one explain
 what he does not understand? Now the subject matter in the present
 passage is that Cain is accused in his own conscience. And no one, not
 only no wicked man, but not even the devil himself, can endure this
 judgment; as James witnesses, "The devils also believe and tremble
 before God," Jas 2, 19. Peter also says, "Whereas angels which are
 greater in power and might cannot endure that judgment which the Lord
 will exercise upon blasphemers," 2 Pet 2, 11. So also Manasseh in his
 prayer, verses 4 and 5, confesses that all men tremble before the face
 of the Lord's anger.
 
 200. All this is sufficient evidence that Cain, when arraigned by God,
 did not have courage to withstand and to argue with him. For God is an
 almighty adversary; the first assault he makes is upon the heart
 itself when he takes the conscience into his grasp. Of this the
 rabbins know nothing, nor can they understand it; in consequence they
 speak of this arraignment as if it took place before men, where the
 truth is either denied or facts are smoothed over. This is impossible
 when God arraigns men; as Christ says in Matthew 12, 37, "By thy words
 thou shalt be justified and by thy words thou shalt be condemned."
 
 201. Cain thus acknowledges his sin, although it is not so much the
 sin he grieves over as the penalty inflicted. The statement, then, is
 to be understood in the affirmative, and it reveals the horrors of
 despair.
 
 A further proof of Cain's despair is, that he does not utter one word
 of reverence. He never mentions the name of God or of his father. His
 conscience is so confused and so overwhelmed with terror and despair
 that he is not able to think of any hope of pardon. The Epistle to the
 Hebrews gives the same description of Esau when it states that he "for
 one mess of meat, sold his own birthright. For ye know that even when
 he afterward desired to inherit the blessing, he was rejected; for he
 found no place for change of mind, though he sought it diligently with
 tears," Heb 12, 16-17. Thus in the present instance, Cain feels his
 punishment, but he grieves more for his punishment than for his sin.
 And all persons, when in despair, do the same.
 
 202. The two original words of this passage, _minneso_ and _avon_, are
 a pair of crosses for grammarians. Jerome translates this clause, "My
 iniquity is greater than can be pardoned." Sanctes, the grammarian of
 Pagnum, a man of no mean erudition and evidently a diligent scholar,
 renders the passage, "My punishment is greater than I can bear." But
 by such a rendering we shall make a martyr of Cain and a sinner of
 Abel. Concerning the word _nasa_, I have before observed that when it
 is applied to sin it signifies, to lift sin up, or off, or on high;
 that is, to take it out of the way. Similarly the figure has found
 currency among us: the remission of sins, or to remit sin. In the
 Thirty-second Psalm, verse one, we find the expression, _Aschre Nesu
 Pascha_. This, literally translated, would make: Being blessed through
 the removal of crime, or sin. We make it: Blessed is he whose
 transgression is forgiven, or taken away. The same is found in Isaiah
 33, 24, The people that dwell therein shall be _Nesu Avon_, that
 means, relieved from sin--shall be the people whose sin is forgiven.
 
 203. The other original term, _avoni_, grammarians derive from the
 verb _anah_, which signifies "to be afflicted," as in Zechariah 9, 9:
 "Behold thy king cometh unto thee lowly (or afflicted)." Our
 translation renders it "meek." Likewise in Psalms 132, 1: "Jehovah,
 remember for David all his affliction." From the same root is derived
 the expression, "low estate," or "lowliness," used by the Virgin Mary
 in her song, Lk 1, 48. This fact induces Sanctes to render it
 "punishment."
 
 But here _avoni_ signifies "iniquity" or "sin," as it does also in
 many other passages of the Holy Scriptures, which appears more plainly
 from the verb "remit," which stands connected with it.
 
 204. Hence it is that grammarians, who are nothing but such and know
 nothing of the divine things, find their crosses in all such passages,
 and crucify, not only the Scriptures, but themselves and their hearers
 as well. In the interpretation of the Holy Scriptures, the sense is
 first to be determined; and when that appears in all respects
 consistent with itself, then the grammatical features are to receive
 attention. The rabbins, however, take the opposite course, and hence
 it grieves me that divines and the holy fathers so frequently follow
 them.
 
 V. 14. _Behold, thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the
 ground; and from thy face shall I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive
 and a wanderer in the earth; and it will come to pass, that whosoever
 findeth me will slay me._
 
 205. From these words it appears that the sentence on Cain was
 pronounced through the mouth of Adam. Cain acknowledges that he is
 driven first from Home and State, and then also from the Church. Of
 the difference between the words _adamah_ and _erez_ we spoke above.
 We showed that _erez_ signifies the earth generally, while the word
 _adamah_ means the cultivated part of the earth. The meaning therefore
 is: I am now compelled to flee from thy presence and from that part of
 the earth which I have cultivated. The whole world indeed lies before
 me, but I must be a fugitive and a vagabond upon the earth; that is, I
 shall have no certain dwelling place. In the same way fugitive
 murderers among us are punished with exile. These words, accordingly,
 cast additional light upon the utterance of Adam, "Cursed art thou
 from the ground." They refer to Cain's banishment. This part of Cain's
 punishment therefore is a civil punishment, and by it he is shut out
 from civic association.
 
 206. But that which Cain next adds, "From thy face shall I be hid," is
 an ecclesiastical punishment and true excommunication. For, as the
 priesthood and the kingdom rested with Adam, and Cain on account of
 his sin was excommunicated from Adam, he was thereby also deprived of
 the glory both of priesthood and kingdom. But why Adam adopted this
 punishment is explained by the words, "When thou tillest the ground,
 it shall not henceforth yield unto thee its strength;" as if he had
 said, Thou art cursed and thy labors are cursed also. Therefore if
 thou shalt remain with us upon earth it cannot be but that both
 thyself and we likewise must perish with hunger. For thou hast stained
 the earth with thy brother's blood, and wherever thou art, thou must
 bear about the blood of thy brother, and even the earth itself shall
 exact her penalties.
 
 207. A similar sentence we find pronounced in 1 Kings 2, 29-33, where
 Solomon gives commandment to Benaiah, son of Jehoiada, saying, "Fall
 upon Joab, that thou mayest take away the blood, which Joab shed
 without cause, from me and from my father's house. And Jehovah will
 return his blood upon his own head. But unto David, and unto his seed,
 and unto his house, and unto his throne, shall there be peace for ever
 from Jehovah." As much as to say, If Joab suffer not this punishment
 of his unjust murder, the whole kingdom must suffer that punishment
 and be shaken by wars. The meaning of Adam then, in this passage is,
 If thou shalt remain on the earth with us, God will bring punishment
 upon us for thy sake, in that the earth shall not yield us her fruit.
 
 208. But now let us reply to the question raised above. It was said to
 Cain, "A fugitive and wanderer shalt thou be in the earth." And yet,
 Cain was the first man who builds a city, and his posterity so
 increased from that time that they debauched and oppressed the Church
 of God, and so utterly overthrew it as not to leave more than eight
 persons of the posterity of Seth. All of the remainder of mankind,
 which perished in the flood, had followed Cain, as the text plainly
 declares when it affirms that the sons of God, when they came unto the
 daughters of men, begat giants and mighty men, which were of old, men
 of renown, Gen 6, 4. Therefore, since Cain had so great a posterity,
 and he built the first city, how can it be true, men ask, that he was
 a fugitive and wanderer upon earth?
 
 209. We will reply in accordance with what is written. The
 illustrations from the New Testament above mentioned, Paul, the
 apostles, Christ, and the prophets, assuredly belong to quite a
 different category. When Adam here says to Cain, "A fugitive and a
 wanderer shalt thou be in the earth," he speaks these words to him to
 send him away, without further precept. He does not say to him, "Go to
 the east;" he does not say, "Go to the south;" he does not mention any
 place to which he should go. He gives him no command what to do; but
 simply casts him out. Whither he goes and what he does, is no concern
 of his. He adds no promise of protection, he does not say: God shall
 take care of thee; God shall protect thee. On the contrary; as the
 whole sky is free to the bird, which is at liberty to fly whither it
 pleases, but is without a place where it may be secure from the
 attacks of other birds, so Adam turns Cain away. The latter feels
 this. Hence his rejoinder: "It shall come to pass that every one that
 findeth me, shall slay me."
 
 210. The condition of Adam was different and better. Adam had sinned,
 and by his sin he had sunk into death. But when he was driven out of
 paradise, God assigned him a particular task--that he should till the
 earth in a particular place. God also clothed him with a covering of
 skins. This, as we said, was a sign that God would take care of him
 and protect him. And, last but not least, a glorious promise was made
 to the woman concerning the seed which should bruise the serpent's
 head. Nothing like this was left to Cain. He was sent away absolutely
 without assignment of any particular place or task. No command was
 given him nor was any promise made him. He was like a bird aimlessly
 roving beneath the wide heavens. This is what it means to be a
 vagabond and wanderer.
 
 211. Unsettled and aimless, likewise, are all who lack God's Word and
 command, wherein person and place receive adequate direction. Such
 were we under the papacy. Worship, works, exercises--all these were
 present; but all these existed and found acceptance without a divine
 command. A trying condition was that and Cainlike--to be deprived of
 the Word; not to know what to believe, what to hope, what to suffer,
 but to undertake and to perform everything at haphazard. What monk is
 there who could affirm that he did anything right? Everything was
 man's tradition and man's teaching, without the Word. Amid these we
 wandered, being driven to and fro, and like Cain, uncertain what
 verdict God would pass, whether we should merit love or hate. Such
 was, in those days, our instruction.
 
 Unsettled and aimless like this was Cain's whole posterity. They had
 neither promise nor command from God, and lacked all definite guidance
 for life and for death. Hence, if any of them came to the knowledge of
 Christ, and allied themselves with the true Church, it was not by
 reason of a promise but through sheer compassion.
 
 212. Seth, however, who was born subsequently, had, together with his
 posterity, a definite promise, a definite abode and a definite mode of
 worship; on the other hand, Cain was aimless. He founded a city, it is
 true, but he did not know how long he should dwell in it, not having a
 divine promise. Whatever we possess without a promise is of uncertain
 duration; at any amount Satan may disturb it or take it. However, when
 we go into the fray equipped with God's command and promise, the devil
 fights in vain; God's command insures strength and safety. Therefore,
 although Cain was lord of the whole world and possessed all the
 treasures of the world, still, lacking the promise of God's help and
 the protection of his angels, and having nothing to lean upon but
 man's counsels, he was in every respect aimless and unsettled. This he
 himself admits when he further says:
 
 V. 14b. _And it shall come to pass that every one that findeth me
 shall slay me._
 
 213. This result was quite to be expected. Having neither God nor his
 father to look to for succor, having forfeited his rights both as
 priest and as ruler, he saw the possibility before him that any one
 found him, might slay him, for he was outlawed, body and soul.
 Notwithstanding, God conferred upon the nefarious murderer a twofold
 blessing. He had forfeited Church and dominion, but life and progeny
 were left. God promised him to protect his existence, and also gave
 him a wife. Two blessings these by no means to be despised; and when
 he heard the first part of his sentence pronounced by his father, they
 were more than he had a right even to hope for. They were valuable for
 the additional reason that opportunity and time for repentance were
 granted, though, in the absence of a clear promise, there was neither
 covenant nor commission. In the same manner, we found our way under
 the papacy to uncovenanted mercy (_fortuita gratia_), if I may use
 this expression, for no promise was previously given that the truth
 was to be revealed in our lifetime, and the Antichrist to become
 manifest. The reason to which these blessings are attributable, is
 consideration for the elect. It is quite credible that many of Cain's
 offspring were saved, namely, those who joined the true Church.
 Likewise, at a later day, provision was made among the Jews for
 proselytes and Gentiles.
 
 214. While a stern law existed according to which the Moabites and
 Ammonites were not admitted to the religious services, Ammonites and
 Moabites were saved, such as came to the kings of Judah to serve under
 them. Also Ruth, the mother and ancestress of our Saviour, was a
 Moabite. This is what I call uncovenanted mercy, no previous promise
 having rendered it certain.
 
 215. Also Naaman, and the king of Nineveh, and Nebuchadnezzar, and
 Evilmerodach, and others from among the Gentiles, were saved by such
 uncovenanted mercy; for, unlike the Jews, they had no promise of
 Christ. In the same way, bodily safety is vouchsafed to Cain, and a
 wife with offspring, for the sake of the elect to be saved by
 uncovenanted mercy. For, although what we said of the Moabites is true
 of all his posterity, that it was to live under a curse, it is true,
 notwithstanding, that some of the patriarchs took their wives from the
 same.
 
 V. 15a. _And Jehovah said unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain,
 vengeance shall be taken on him sevenfold._
 
 216. Jerome, in his Epistle to Damascus, contends that Cain had begged
 of the Lord that he might be slain, an opinion into which he rushes
 full sail, as it were, entertaining no doubt whatever concerning its
 truth. Lyra follows Jerome, and resolutely affirms that the context
 requires this interpretation. But this error of theirs should be laid
 at the door of the rabbins from whom they received it. The true sense
 of the passage is rather that everyone was prohibited from killing
 Cain. Judgment is pronounced here by God, and when he spares Cain's
 life and in addition permits him afterward to marry, it is done to
 stay its execution.
 
 217. Moreover, how is it likely that an ungodly person asks death at
 the very time when God exercises judgment? Death is the very
 punishment of sin; therefore he flees and dreads death as the greatest
 part of his penalty. Away, therefore, with such vagaries of the
 rabbins! With these also Lyra's suggestion may safely be classed that
 the text ought to be divided and made to mean, Whoever shall kill
 Cain, shall surely meet with severe punishment. And when it is further
 stated, He shall be punished sevenfold, they would explain it as
 meaning that in the seventh degree--in the seventh generation--the
 punishment is to be inflicted.
 
 218. Such vagaries are worthy of the rabbins after having cast away
 the light of the New Testament. However, they impose a double labor
 upon us, inasmuch as we are compelled to defend the text and to clear
 it of such corruptions, and to correct their absurd comments. If I
 quote them occasionally, it is to avoid the suspicion of proudly
 despising them, or of failing to read, and to give sufficient
 consideration to, their writings. While we read them intelligently, we
 do so with critical discrimination, and we do not permit them to
 obscure Christ, and to corrupt the Word of God.
 
 219. The Lord, accordingly, does not in this passage at all alter the
 sentence upon Cain whereby he had been doomed to a curse on earth, but
 merely vouchsafes to him this uncovenanted mercy for the sake of the
 elect that are to be saved from that curse as from a mass of dregs.
 That is the reason he said Cain should not be killed, as he feared.
 
 There is, then, no necessity for doing violence to this text as Rabbi
 Solomon does, who, after the words "whosoever slayeth Cain," puts a
 stop; making it to be a hiatus or (ellipsis), as we find in that noted
 line in Virgil (Aeneas, 135)--
 
   _Quos ego--sed motos praestat componere fluctus._
   Whom I--but now, be calm, ye boist'rous waves.
 
 And then the expression, "shall be punished sevenfold," the rabbi
 refers to Cain himself, who was punished in his seventh generation.
 For Cain begat Enoch, and Enoch begat Irad, and Irad begat Mehujael,
 and Mehujael begat Methusael, and Methusael begat Lamech.
 
 220. And the Jews' absurd comment upon that passage (verse 23, below),
 is that Lamech, when he was old, and his eyes dim, was taken by his
 son Tubal-Cain into a wood to hunt wild beasts, and that, when there
 shooting at a wild beast, Lamech accidently shot Cain, who in his
 wanderings had concealed himself in the wood. Such interpretations are
 only fables, unworthy a place or notice in our schools. Moreover, they
 militate against the very truth of the text. For if Cain was really
 designed of God to be killed in the seventh generation, and if that
 time was thus fixed for his death, he was not "a fugitive and a
 vagabond upon earth."
 
 221. We condemn, therefore, this interpretation of Rabbi Solomon, on
 the ground of critical discrimination, because it militates directly
 against that sentence which God had before pronounced; and God is not
 man, that he should change his mind, 1 Kings 15, 29-30. This rule
 should be strictly observed in all interpretation of the Holy
 Scripture, that the rendering of one passage must not subsequently
 conflict with that of another. And when the rabbins, moreover, say
 that the deluge was the particular punishment of Lamech's sin in thus
 killing Cain, Lyra refutes them. He very truly affirms that the deluge
 was the common punishment of the whole world of wicked men. We leave,
 therefore, all these Jewish absurdities and hold fast the true meaning
 of the text before us, that, when Cain feared lest he should be slain
 by any one who should find him, the Lord prevented him from being thus
 slain, and denounced on such murderer a punishment sevenfold greater
 than that of Cain.
 
 222. And, though Lyra argues and inquires how it could be that he who
 should slay Cain could deserve a sevenfold greater vengeance than Cain
 deserved, who slew his own brother, of what profit is it to us to
 inquire into the counsel of God in such matters as these, especially
 when it is certain that God permitted his mercy to stray to Cain in
 the form of promises and blessings under the Law, if I may so express
 myself, thus securing his safety.
 
 223. There are two kinds of promises, or a twofold promise, as we have
 often explained. There are the legal promises, if I may so call them,
 which depend, as it were, upon our own works, such as the following:
 "If ye be willing and obedient, ye shall eat the good of the land," Is
 1, 19. Again, I am God, showing mercy unto thousands of them that love
 me and keep my commandments, Ex 20, 6. And also above, in this case of
 Cain, "If thou doest well, shall not thy countenance be lifted up?"
 Gen 4, 7. And these legal promises have for the most part their
 corresponding threats attached to them.
 
 But the other kind of promises are promises of grace, and with them no
 threats are joined. Such are the following: "Jehovah thy God will
 raise up unto thee a prophet from the midst of thee, of thy brethren,
 like unto me; unto him ye shall hearken," Deut 18, 15. Again, "I will
 put my law in their inward parts, in their heart will I write it; and
 I will be their God, and they shall be my people," Jer 31, 33. And
 again, "I will put enmity between thee and the woman," Gen 3, 15. Now,
 these promises depend not in any way upon our works, but absolutely
 and only upon the goodness and grace of God, because he was pleased to
 make those promises and to do what he thus promised. Just in the same
 way we have the promise of Baptism, of the Lord's Supper, and of the
 Keys, etc., in which God sets before us his good will and his mercy
 and his works.
 
 224. Now, God gave no promise of the latter kind to Cain. He only said
 to him, Whosoever shall slay thee shall be punished sevenfold. But
 Adam had such a promise of grace made to him. And Cain, because he was
 the first-born, ought to have received that promise as an inheritance
 from his parents. That promise was the large and blessed promise of
 eternal glory, because by it the seed was promised which should bruise
 the serpent's head, and this without any work or merit of man. For
 that promise had no condition attached to it, such as, If thou shalt
 offer thy sacrifices, if thou shalt do good, etc.
 
 225. If, therefore, you compare this promise of grace with the words
 God spake to Cain, the latter are as a mere crust held out to a
 beggar. For even Cain's life is not promised him absolutely. Nothing
 more is said than a threat pronounced against those who should slay
 him. God does not say positively, No man shall slay thee. He does not
 say, I will so overrule all others that no one shall slay thee. Had
 the words been thus spoken, Cain might have returned into the presence
 of God and of his parents. But a command only is given to men that
 they slay not Cain. If, therefore, the words spoken to Cain be at all
 considered as a promise, it is that kind of promise which, as we have
 before said, depends on the works and will of man. And yet, even such
 promise is by no means to be despised, for these legal promises often
 embrace most important things.
 
 226. Thus, Augustine observes that God gave to the Romans their empire
 on account of their noble virtues. And in the same manner we find,
 even to this day, that the blessings of those nations which keep from
 murder, adultery, theft, etc., are greater than those of other nations
 in which these evils prevail. And yet, even governments which, as far
 as mere reason can succeed, are especially well established, possess
 nothing beyond these temporal promises.
 
 227. The Church, however, possesses the promises of grace, even the
 eternal promises. And although Cain was left utterly destitute of
 these promises, yet it was a great favor that the temporal mercies
 were left him: that he was not immediately killed, that a wife was
 given him, that children were born unto him, that he built a city,
 that he cultivated the earth, that he fed his cattle and had
 possessions, and that he was not utterly ejected from the society and
 fellowship of men. For God could not only have deprived Cain of all
 these blessings, but he could have added pestilence, epilepsy,
 apoplexy, the stone, the gout, and any other disease. And yet there
 are men disposed curiously to argue in what manner God could possibly
 have multiplied the curse of Cain sevenfold on himself or on any
 other.
 
 As God above deprives Cain of all the divine blessings, both
 spiritual--or those pertaining to the Church--and civil, so here he
 mitigates that sentence by commanding that no one shall slay Cain. But
 God does not promise at the same time that all men shall surely obey
 his command. Therefore Cain, even possessing this promise in reference
 to his body, is still a fugitive and a wanderer. And it might be that
 if he continued in his wickedness, he was liable to be slain at any
 moment; whereas, if he did well, he might live a long time. But
 nothing is promised him with certainty, for although these corporal or
 legal promises are great and important, yet they are positively
 uncertain and uncovenanted.
 
 228. Whether, therefore, Cain was killed or not, I cannot with any
 certainty say, for the Scriptures afford no plain information upon
 that point. This one thing, however, evidently can be proved from the
 present text, that Cain had no certain promise of the preservation of
 his life; but God left him to a life of uncertainty, doubt and
 restless wandering, and did no more than protect the life of Cain by a
 command and a threat which might restrain the wicked from killing him,
 on account of the certain awful punishment which would follow such
 destruction of the murderer. But a promise that he should not be
 murdered was withheld. We know, moreover, what is the nature of the
 law, or a legal command, and that there are always very few who obey
 it. Therefore, although it is not recorded at what time, in what
 place, or by whom, Cain was slain, yet it is most probable that he was
 killed. The Scriptures however make no mention of it, even as they are
 quite silent also concerning the number of the years of Cain, and say
 nothing about the day of his birth or the day of his death. He
 perished, together with his whole generation; to use a popular
 proverb, "without cross, candle, or God." A few only of his generation
 are excepted, who were saved by the uncovenanted mercy of God.
 
 229. The question is here usually asked, To what persons could the
 words of Cain possibly apply, when he says, "Everyone that findeth me
 shall slay me," when it is evident that besides Adam and Eve and their
 few daughters, no human beings were in existence. I would at once
 reply that they bear witness to the fact that we see the wicked "flee
 when no man pursueth," as the Scriptures say; for they imagine to
 themselves various perils where none really exist. Just so we see it
 to be the case with murderers at the present day, who are filled with
 fears where all is safe, who can remain quiet nowhere, and who imagine
 death to be present everywhere.
 
 230. However, when it follows in the command of God, "Yea, verily,
 whosoever slayeth Cain shall be punished sevenfold," these words
 cannot be referred exclusively to the fears of Cain, for Cain had
 sisters, and perhaps he greatly dreaded that sister whom he had
 married, lest she should take vengeance on him for the murder of her
 brother. Moreover, Cain had perhaps a vague apprehension of a long
 life, and he saw that many more sons might be born of Adam. He feared,
 therefore, the whole posterity to Adam. And it greatly increased these
 fears that God had left him nothing more than his stray mercy. I do
 not think that Cain feared the beasts at all, or dreaded being slain
 by them; for what had the sevenfold vengeance threatened upon
 murderers to do with beasts?
 
 V. 15b. _And Jehovah appointed a sign for (set a mark upon) Cain, lest
 any finding him should smite him (slay him)._
 
 231. What this mark was is not to be found in the Holy Scriptures.
 Therefore commentators have entertained various opinions. Nearly all,
 however, have come to this one conclusion--they have inferred that
 there was apparent in Cain a great tremor of his head and of all his
 limbs. They suppose that, as a physical cause of his trembling, God
 had changed, or disarranged, or mutilated some particular organ in his
 body, but left the body whole as it was first created, merely adding a
 visible outward mark, such as the trembling. This conjecture of the
 fathers contains much probability, but it cannot be proved by any
 testimony of the Scriptures. The mark might have been of another kind.
 For instance, we observe in nearly all murderers an immediate change
 in the eyes. The eyes wear an appearance of sullen ferocity, and lose
 that softness and innocence peculiar to them by nature.
 
 232. But whatever this mark was, it was certainly a most horrible
 punishment; for Cain was compelled to bear it during his whole life as
 God's penalty for the awful murder which he had committed. Rendered
 conspicuous by this degrading mark, hateful and abominable in the eyes
 of all, Cain was sent away--banished from his home by his parents. And
 although the life he asked of God was granted him, yet it was a life
 of ignominy, branded with an infamous mark of homicide; not only that
 he himself might be perpetually reminded of the sin he had committed,
 to his own confusion, but also that others might be deterred from the
 crime of committing murder. Nor could this mark be effaced by
 repentance. Cain was compelled to bear about this sign of the wrath of
 God upon him as a punishment in addition to his banishment, the curse,
 and all the other penalties.
 
 233. It is worthy of observation that the original verb used above is
 _harag_, which signifies "to kill." But the verb here found is
 _nakah_, which means "to strike." God, therefore, here gives to Cain
 security, not only from death, but also from the danger of death. This
 security, however, as we have observed, is a legal security only; for
 it merely commands that no one shall slay Cain, threatening a
 sevenfold punishment upon the person who should do so. But God does
 not promise that all men will obey his command. It was far better for
 Cain, however, to have this legal promise made him, than to be without
 any promise at all.
 
 V. 16. _And Cain went out from the presence of Jehovah, and dwelt in
 the land of Nod, on the east of Eden._
 
 234. This also is a very remarkable text, and it is a wonder that the
 fancy of the rabbins did not run riot here as usual. Moses leaves it
 to the thoughtful reader to reflect how miserable and how full of
 tears this departure of Cain from his father's house must have been.
 His godly parents had already lost their son Abel; and now, at the
 command of God, the other son departs from them into banishment,
 loaded with the divine curses, on account of his sin--the very son
 whom his parents had hoped to be the only heir of the promise, and
 whom they therefore had devotedly loved from his cradle. Adam and Eve,
 nevertheless, obey the command of God, and in conformity therewith
 they cast out their son.
 
 235. Accordingly, this passage rightly praises obedience to God, or
 the fear of God. Adam and Eve had, indeed, learned by their own
 experience in paradise that it was no light sin to depart from the
 command of God; therefore they thought: Behold, our sin in paradise
 has been punished with death, and with an infinite number of other
 calamities into which we have been thrown since we were driven out of
 paradise. And now that our son has committed so atrocious a sin, it
 behooves us not to resist the will of God and his righteous judgment,
 however bitter we feel them to be.
 
 236. The story of the woman of Tekoah is well known, whom Joab
 instructed to intercede for the banished Absalom. She pleads as an
 argument before the king, that as she had lost one son, it would be
 wicked in the extreme to deprive her of the other also. Also Rebecca
 said to Jacob, her younger son, after she had perceived the wrath of
 Esau against his brother: "Why should I be bereaved of you both in one
 day?" Gen 27, 45. Adam and Eve overcame this same pain in their
 bosoms, and thus mortified their paternal and maternal affections. For
 not only did they feel it to be their duty to obey the will of God,
 but they had also learned wisdom from former obedience. They had been
 driven out of paradise for their sin of disobedience. They feared,
 therefore, that if they now retained their son with them, contrary to
 the will of God, they should be cast out of the earth altogether.
 
 237. This part of the history of Adam and Eve, therefore, is a
 beautiful lesson in obedience to God, and a striking exhortation to
 fear God. This is also Paul's principal object in his first Epistle to
 the Corinthians, nearly all of which is written against the
 self-confidence of the human heart. For, although God is merciful, yet
 men are not therefore to sin; he is merciful to those only who fear
 and obey him.
 
 238. As it was bitter in the extreme for the parents to lose their
 son, this departure from his home was, I have no doubt, most bitter
 also to Cain himself. For he was compelled to leave, not only the
 common home, his dear parents and their protection, but his hereditary
 right of primogeniture, the prerogative of the kingdom and of the
 priesthood, and the communion of the Church.
 
 Hence it is that we have the expression in the text, that Cain "went
 out from the presence of Jehovah." We have above shown what the
 Scriptures term "the face of Jehovah," namely, all those things and
 means by which Jehovah makes himself known to us. Thus the face of
 Jehovah, under the Old Testament, was the pillar of fire, the cloud,
 the mercy-seat, etc. Under the New Testament, the face of Jehovah is
 baptism, the Lord's Supper, the ministry of the Word, etc. For by
 these things, as by visible signs, the Lord makes himself known to us,
 and shows that he is with us, that he cares for us and favors us.
 
 239. It was from this place, therefore, in which God declared that he
 was always present, and in which Adam resided as high priest, and as
 lord of the earth, that Cain "went out;" and he came into another
 place, where there was no "face of God," where there was no visible
 sign of his presence by which he could derive the consolation that God
 was present with his favor. He had no sign whatever, save those signs
 which are common to all creatures, even to the beasts, namely, the
 uses of sun and moon, of day and night, of water, air, etc. But these
 are not signs of that immutable grace of God contained in the promise
 of the blessed seed. They are only the signs of God's temporal
 blessings and of his good will to all his creatures.
 
 240. Miserable, therefore, was that going out of Cain indeed. It was a
 departure full of tears. He was compelled to leave forever his home
 and his parents, who now gave to him, a solitary man and a "vagabond,"
 their daughter as his wife, to live with him as his companion; but
 they knew not what would become either of their son or of their
 daughter. In consequence of losing three children at one time their
 grief is so much greater. No other explanation suggests itself for the
 subsequent statement "Cain knew his wife."
 
 241. Where, then, did Cain live with his wife? Moses answers, "in the
 land of Nod," a name derived from its vagabond and unsettled
 inhabitant. And where was this land situated? Beyond paradise, toward
 the east, a place indeed most remarkable. Cain came into a certain
 place toward the east, but when he came there, he was insecure and
 unprotected, for it was the land of Nod, where he could not set foot
 with certainty, because "the face of God" was not there. For this
 "face" he had left with his parents, who lived where they had paradise
 on their side, or toward the west. When Cain fled from his home he
 went toward the east. So the posterity of Cain was separated from the
 posterity of Adam, having paradise as a place of division between
 them. The passage, moreover, proves that paradise remained undestroyed
 after Adam was driven out of it. In all probability it was finally
 destroyed by the deluge.
 
 242. This text greatly favors the opinion of those who believe that
 Adam was created in the region of Damascus, and that, after he was
 driven out of paradise for his sin, he lived in Palestine; and hence
 it was in the midst of the original paradise that Jerusalem, Bethlehem
 and Jericho stood, in which places Jesus Christ and his servant John
 chiefly dwelt. Although the present aspect of those places does not
 altogether bear out that conclusion, the devastations of the mighty
 deluge were such as to change fountains, rivers and mountains; and it
 is quite possible that on the site which was afterward Calvary, the
 place of Christ's sacrifice for the world's sin, there stood the tree
 of the knowledge of good and evil, the same spot being marked by the
 death and ruin wrought by Satan and by the life and salvation wrought
 by Christ.
 
 243. It is not without a particular purpose, therefore, that Daniel
 uses the striking expression: "The end thereof (of the sanctuary, the
 sacrifice and the oblation) shall be with a flood," Dan 9, 26. As if
 he had said, The first paradise was laid waste and utterly destroyed
 by the mighty deluge, and the other, future paradise, in which
 redemption is to be wrought, shall be destroyed by the Romanists as by
 a flood.
 
 244. We may carry the analogy further by stating that as Babel was the
 cause of the destruction of the Jewish people, so this disaster had
 its beginning with Cain and his offspring, who settled in that part of
 the earth where, at a later day, Babylon was founded. These are my
 thoughts and views, derived partly from the fathers. Though they may
 not be true, they are yet probable, and have nothing ungodly in them.
 And there can be no doubt that Noah, after the flood, saw the face of
 the whole earth altogether changed from what it was before that awful
 visitation of the wrath of God. Mountains were torn asunder, fountains
 were made to break forth and the courses of the rivers themselves were
 wholly altered and diverted into other channels, by the mighty force
 of the overwhelming waters.
 
 
 VII. GENERATIONS OF CAIN AND OF THE RIGHTEOUS.
 
    A. IN GENERAL.
 
       1. Why Cain's generations were described before those of the
          righteous 245.
 
       2. How the Holy Spirit is interested more in the generations of
          the righteous than in those of Cain 246-247.
 
       3. Why the Holy Spirit gives this description of both 248.
 
       4. The relation of the two to each other 248.
 
       5. How the generations of the righteous are attacked and
          conquered by those of the godless 249.
 
        * Of Cain's marriage.
 
          a. Who was his wife, and the question of his being married
             before he committed the murder 250-251.
 
           * How to read the writings of the Jews 251.
 
          b. The question of his being married after the murder
             252-254.
 
           * That some of his posterity were saved 254.
 
 
 VII. THE GENERATIONS OF CAIN AND THE GENERATIONS OF THE GODLY.
 
 A. The Posterity of Cain in General.
 
 V. 17. _And Cain knew his wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and
 he builded a city, and called the name of the city, after the name of
 his son, Enoch._
 
 245. It is worthy of admiration that Moses describes the generation of
 the sons of Cain before the generation of the sons of God. But all
 this is done according to the fixed counsel of God. For the children
 of this world have in this life and in this their generation the
 advantage of the children of God (Lk 16, 8) with reference to the
 first promise. The spiritual seed of the woman indeed possess the
 spiritual blessing, but the seed of the serpent arrogate to themselves
 the corporal, or temporal, blessing, and they bruise the heel of the
 blessed seed. In this respect the temporal has precedence over the
 spiritual.
 
 246. But a great difference comes to the surface at a later day.
 Although Moses records the history of the posterity of Cain before the
 posterity of the righteous, yet we afterwards see that the latter are
 more especially the care of the Holy Spirit. He does not confine
 himself to a bare registration of their names, but he carefully
 numbers their years, makes mention of their death, and not only
 chronicles their own doings, as he chronicles in this passage those of
 the sons of Cain, but also the transactions and the conversations
 which Jehovah had with them, the promises he made, the help rendered
 in danger, and the blessings vouchsafed.
 
 247. None of these things are recorded of the wicked posterity of
 Cain. When Moses has said that Cain begat a son named Enoch, and that
 he built a city to which he gave the name of his son, calling it
 Enoch, the sacred historian immediately cuts off the memory of Cain
 altogether and, as it were, buries him forever with these few short
 words of record. He seems to entertain no further care or concern for
 either his life or his death. He merely records temporal
 blessings--that he begat a son and that he built a city. For as the
 gift of reproduction was not taken away from the murderer Cain,
 neither was the gift of dominion taken from him. But he lost all the
 rich blessings of the earth because it had drunk the blood of his
 brother, as we have shown above.
 
 248. The Holy Spirit records these things in order that we may see
 that there was, from the very beginning, two churches: one the church
 of the sons of Satan and of the flesh, which often makes sudden and
 great increase; and the other the church of the sons of God, which is
 usually weak and makes slow progress. Although the Scriptures do not
 relate how these two churches lived together in the beginning, yet, as
 it was declared by God to Satan, "I will put enmity between thy seed
 and her seed," it is certain that the church of Cain was ever hostile
 to the Church of Adam. And the present text fully shows that the sons
 of men so increased and prevailed that they almost completely
 perverted and destroyed the Church of the sons of God. For in the
 great flood, only eight souls of them were saved; all the rest of the
 human race perished in the waters on account of their sin.
 
 249. And this is a calamity of the true Church, common to all ages: as
 soon as she begins to increase, she is compelled to oppose with all
 her might Satan and the ungodly. She is at length tired out by the
 wickedness of her enemy, and is then either obliged to yield to her
 enraged foe, overcome by the cross and its afflictions, or she sinks
 under the seductions of pleasures and riches. So it was with the
 posterity of Adam. Broken down, at length, under so long a war with
 the sons of men, they yielded, being reduced at last to eight souls
 only, who were saved. Ungodliness having so far prevailed, and the
 godly losing ground, the Lord at length interposes and saves the few
 righteous remaining; but all the rest, both the seduced and the
 seducers, he punishes, including them in the same judgment. And we
 hope and believe the Lord will do the same in the judgment at the last
 day.
 
 250. Many questions arise here. Some inquire respecting the
 circumstances connected with the wife of Cain: at what time the murder
 was committed; whether Cain murdered his brother before he was a
 husband, or after he was married. And the Jews, moreover, say that Eve
 brought forth twins at every birth, a male and a female; and they
 assert that Cain married his sister Calmana, and Abel his sister
 Debora. Whether these things be true or not I cannot affirm. I know
 not. But they are not vital to the interests of the Church, and there
 is nothing certain known concerning them. This one thing is certain,
 that Cain had a sister for his wife. But whether or no he had her as
 his wife when he committed the murder, cannot with certainty be
 proven. However, the text before us greatly tends to the conclusion
 that Cain was married when he committed the murder of his brother; for
 it intimates that the inheritance was divided between the two brothers
 when it affirms that the care of the cattle was committed by the
 father to Abel and the tilling of the ground to Cain. I, therefore, am
 inclined to believe that both of the brothers were married.
 
 251. This conclusion is favored also by the statement made above, that
 Cain and Abel "in the process of time" brought their offerings. This
 has been explained in the following manner: At the end of the year,
 the two newly married husbands brought as offerings the new fruits
 which God had given them in this first year of their marriage; Cain
 brought the first fruits of the earth, and Abel the first fruits of
 his flock. And the time was probably the autumn of the year, the time
 when the fruits of the earth are gathered, the same season in which
 the Jews afterwards held the feast of expiation. Moses, in his
 Levitical law, seems carefully to have noted and collected the
 ancestral patterns, and to have reduced them to a code. When,
 therefore, the new husbands came to render their thanks to God for his
 blessings and to offer their gifts, and Abel's offering was accepted
 of God and not the offering of Cain, Cain's heart was immediately
 filled by Satan with hatred of his brother; and upon this hatred
 afterwards followed the horrible murder. This is the opinion of the
 Jews, which I thus relate because it does not appear to be at all far
 from the truth. But, as I have often said, the interpretations of the
 Jews are to be read with critical discrimination, so that in their
 teachings, we may retain the things consistent with the truth, but
 condemn and refute all fictions of their own making.
 
 252. If Cain was not married when he slew his brother, it is still
 more wonderful that after such a wicked deed he obtained a wife at
 all; and certainly that damsel was worthy the highest praise who
 married such a man. For how could the maiden rejoice in a marriage
 with her brother who was a murderer, accursed and excommunicated? She,
 on her part, no doubt supplicated her father, and expostulated with
 him and asked how he could give her, an innocent one, in marriage to a
 man thus accursed, and force her into banishment with him. Nay, the
 very example of her brother's murder must have naturally filled her
 with terror, lest the crime which her husband committed on his brother
 he might also dare to commit on her, his sister and his wife.
 
 253. In bringing about this marriage, Adam obviously had to exercise
 marvelous eloquence. It was for him to convince his daughter that the
 father's command was not to be disobeyed, and that while Cain,
 curse-ridden, would have to bear the penalty of his sin, God would
 still preserve and bless her, the innocent one.
 
 Nor do I entertain the least doubt that God conferred many personal
 blessings upon Cain, down the whole line of his posterity, for the
 sake of his wife, who, from motives of faith toward God and of
 obedience toward her parents, had married her murderous brother.
 
 As Christ was the minister of the circumcision for the truth of God,
 to establish the certainty of the promise made unto the Jewish
 fathers; and as, in the absence of a promise, he was the minister of
 the Gentiles, because of the mercy of God, (Rom 15, 8-9), so the like
 uncovenanted mercy was shown also to the posterity of Cain. These two
 opinions have been expressed concerning the marriage of Cain, but
 which is the truth I know not. If Cain was married after he committed
 the murder, his wife is most certainly worthy of all praise and of all
 fame, who could thus yield to the authority of her parents, and suffer
 herself to be joined in marriage with an accursed murderer.
 
 254. To myself, the first opinion appears to be much nearer the truth,
 that he murdered his brother after his marriage with his sister;
 because we have so clear a testimony in the text concerning the
 division of the inheritance. And in that case, the necessity lay on
 the wife to follow her husband. As wife and husband are one body and
 one flesh, Adam had no desire to separate them; moreover, the wife is
 bound to bear her part of the calamities of her husband. Just in the
 same manner as the posterity of Cain enjoyed a part of those blessings
 which were bestowed of God upon the innocent wife, Pharaoh, king of
 Egypt, was saved in the time of Joseph, and the King of Nineveh was
 saved in the time of his calamity, although neither of them belonged
 to the people of God. And so I also believe that some were saved out
 of the posterity of Cain, although Cain himself had utterly lost the
 promise concerning the blessed seed.
 
 
 B. THE POSTERITY OF CAIN IN DETAIL; THE GENERATIONS OF CAIN.
 
  * The names were given to the descendants of Cain, not by accident,
    but by special thought and with a definite meaning 255.
 
    1. Of Enoch.
 
       a. The meaning of his name 255-256.
 
       b. Is the first in Cain's posterity and the beginning of the
          temporal blessing 256.
 
        * Why Cain built a city 257-258.
 
    2. Irad and the meaning of his name. It was not given without a
       purpose 259.
 
    3. Mehujael and the meaning of his name 260.
 
     * The means the false church uses to suppress the true Church 260.
 
    4. Methushael and the meaning of his name 261.
 
    5. Lamech.
 
       a. What his name signifies 262.
 
        * Cain's descendants persecute the true Church. Yet some of
          Cain's posterity were saved 263.
 
       b. The reason he took two wives 264.
 
       c. Who were his wives 265.
 
       d. His sons, Jabal, Jubal, Tubal-cain, and his daughter Naamah
          266-268.
 
        * Why Moses mentions the various arts of Cain's descendants
          269.
 
        * Whether poverty drove Cain's descendants to the arts 269-270.
 
        * As the false church was before the flood so is she still, and
          will remain so to the end of the world 271.
 
        * How the Cainites increased and oppressed the true Church 272.
 
        * Why the Scriptures do not mention that some of the Cainites
          were saved 272.
 
       e. Of his haughty speech, "I have slain a man etc."
 
          (1) This is difficult to understand, and has been poorly
              treated by interpreters 273.
 
          (2) The fable explanation of these words by the Jews refuted
              274-275.
 
          (3) How others explained them 275.
 
          (4) Luther's understanding of them 276-277.
 
       f. Whether Lamech slew Cain, and thereby made himself famous
          278.
 
       g. How he attempted to be ruler upon Adam's death 279.
 
        * How the Church is oppressed from both sides 279.
 
        * Why Moses mentions the blood descendants of Cain with such
          care 280.
 
       h. Cain is not sorry for his deed, but even boasts of it 281.
 
        * The nature of the Cain church 281.
 
       i. How he seeks to avoid being slain by others 282.
 
        * The pope has the conscience of Cain and Lamech 282.
 
       j. He is a type of all the children of this world 283.
 
        * How the devil drives the Cainites to rage against the Church
          under the guise of being holy 284.
 
        * The true Church from the very beginning had to shed her blood
          285.
 
        * The tyranny of Popes Julius II and Clement VII 285.
 
        * God at all times severely punished the persecutors of his
          Church 286.
 
       k. How Lamech still wished to defend his deed 287.
 
       l. He had no Word of God, but was filled with pride 288.
 
 
 B. THE POSTERITY OF CAIN IN DETAIL.
 
 255. As regards the names of Cain's offspring, I believe that, in
 common with those of the holy patriarchs, they indicate not an absence
 of purpose or a random selection, but a definite purpose and a
 prophecy. Thus "Adam" signifies a man of, or taken out of, the red
 earth. "Eve" signifies the mother of life, or of the living. "Cain"
 signifies possession. "Abel" signifies vanity. And we find that also
 among the Gentiles many names have such a significance; not seldom
 names are found which are truly prophetic. "Enoch" is a prophetic
 name, expressive of hope in the future as a relief to Cain's mind, or
 rather to his wife's, for it was the latter who called the son she
 bore Enoch, from the Hebrew _Hanach_, which signifies, "she
 dedicated," or "she devoted."
 
 256. This is a word frequently used by Moses. As when he says, "What
 man is there that hath built a new house, and hath not dedicated it?
 let him go and return to his house, lest he die in the battle, and
 another man dedicate it," Deut 20, 5. The verb in this passage, which
 signifies originally to dedicate, here signifies to possess, or to
 enjoy; and when this possession or enjoyment begins, it is attended
 with happy signs and auspicious invocations. So when the wife of Cain
 brought forth her first son, she said to her husband, Enoch; that is,
 "Dedicate him, devote him:" for the verb is in the imperative mood. As
 if Cain had said himself, May this our beginning be happy and
 prosperous. My father Adam cursed me on account of my sin. I am cast
 out of his sight. I live alone in the world. The earth does not yield
 me her strength; she would be more fruitful to me, had I not thus
 sinned. And yet God now shows me uncovenanted mercy in giving me this
 son. It is a good and happy beginning.
 
 As in the generation of Cain the corporal blessings begin with Enoch,
 so it is another Enoch in the generation of the righteous under whom
 religion and spiritual blessings begin to flourish.
 
 257. That which is added by Moses concerning the city Cain thus built
 belongs to history. But I have before observed that Cain, when
 separated from the true church and driven into banishment, hated the
 true church. When, therefore, Cain thus first built a city, that very
 act tended to show that he not only disregarded and hated the true
 Church, but wished also to oppose and oppress it. For he reflects
 thus: Behold I am cast out by my father and I am cursed by him, but my
 marriage is not a barren one; therefore I have in this the hope of a
 great posterity. What, therefore, is it to me that I am driven by my
 father from beneath his roof? I will build a city, in which I will
 gather a church for myself. Farewell, therefore, to my father and his
 church. I regard them not.
 
 258. Accordingly, it is not through fear, or for defense, that Cain
 "built a city," but from the sure hope of prosperity and success, and
 from pride and the lust of dominion. For he had no need whatever to
 fear his father and mother, who at the divine command had thrust him
 out to go into some foreign land. Nor had he any more ground of fear
 from their children than from themselves. But Cain was inflated with
 pride through this uncovenanted mercy of God, as I have termed it;
 and, as the world ever does, he sought by means of his "city" an
 opportunity of emerging from his present state into future greatness.
 The sons of God, on the contrary, are only anxious about another city,
 "which hath foundations, whose builder and maker is God," as we have
 it described in the Epistles to the Hebrews 11, 10.
 
 V. 18a. _And unto Enoch was born Irad._
 
 259. What opinion to form concerning this name, I really know not, for
 its origin is very obscure; and yet I believe the name is not
 accidental but prophetic. In the book of Joshua we have a city called
 Ai; and this same term is used elsewhere as an appellative. Now, the
 proper name Ai signifies, "a heap," as a heap of fallen buildings. And
 if with this name you compound the verb _Irad_, the word thus
 compounded will signify increase. Although the posterity of Cain, on
 account of their excommunication, were at that time like a great heap
 of ruins, it was his prayer that they might not altogether perish, but
 be preserved and greatly increased by means of this son Irad. If
 anyone can offer a better interpretation, I will by no means despise
 it; for on obscure points like the present, conjecture is quite
 allowable.
 
 V. 18b. _And Irad begat Mehujael._
 
 260. This name is formed from the verb _mahah_, which signifies "to
 destroy," and from _jaal_, "he began," or "he attempted or dared."
 Accordingly this name signifies that the posterity of Cain should now
 enter upon so mighty an increase as to dare to set itself in array
 against the true Church and to despise it and persecute it; so
 mightily should it prevail by its wealth, wisdom, glory and numbers.
 These, indeed, are for the most part the influences through which the
 true Church is always overcome by the world and the false church.
 
 V. 18c. _And Mehujael begat Methushael._
 
 261. _Meth_ signifies "death," and _schaal_ means "to ask," or "to
 demand." Hence we have the name Saul; that is, demanded. This name
 indicates a spirit haughtier than any of the others. I understand it
 to signify that Methushael threatens that he will avenge his parents,
 who are dead, whom the other church--that is the true Church--has
 punished with excommunication and exile.
 
 V. 18d. _And Methushael begat Lamech._
 
 262. Hitherto the Cainites seem to have insulted the true Church with
 impunity and to have triumphed over them. But the name "Lamech"
 signifies that God, at the time in which Lamech was born, inflicted on
 the posterity of Cain their due punishment. The name Lamech is derived
 from the verb _makak_, which signifies to humble, to diminish, to
 suppress. Or, it may be understood actively, to mean that in the time
 of Lamech the posterity of Cain so greatly increased that the true
 Church was quite overwhelmed by them.
 
 263. Such was the posterity of Cain; men, no doubt, renowned for their
 wisdom and greatness. And I also believe that some of them were saved
 by the uncovenanted mercy of God, as I have above explained. But far
 the greater part of them most bitterly hated and persecuted the true
 Church. They could not brook inferiority to the sons of Adam, the true
 Church; therefore they set up their own forms of worship, and
 introduced many other new things for the sake of suppressing the
 church of Adam. And because the false church was thus kept separate
 from the true Church, I believe that Cain married to each other his
 sons and daughters. Accordingly, about the time of Lamech, Cain's
 posterity began to multiply exceedingly. And it is for this reason, I
 believe, that Moses here terminates the list.
 
 V. 19. _And Lamech took unto him two wives; the name of the one was
 Adah, and the name of the other Zillah._
 
 264. Here again a twofold question arises. In the first place divines
 dispute whether Lamech married these two wives on account of lustful
 passion or for some other cause. My belief is that polygamy was not
 entered into for the sake of lust, but with the object of increasing
 his family, and from the lust of dominion, and especially so if, as
 his name imports, the Lord at that time had been punishing the
 Cainites, or the posterity of Cain, by pestilence, or by some other
 calamity. In this case, Lamech probably thought by such expedient to
 retrieve his greatness. Thus barbarous nations retain polygamy to
 strengthen and establish both home and State.
 
 265. As regards the names of these two wives, the name of one is Adah;
 that is, adorned, or, having chains on the neck. _Adi_ signifies a
 neat, or elegant woman, and _adah_, the verb, signifies to adorn, or,
 to put on. And perhaps this name was given to her, not only because
 she was the mistress of the house, elegantly adorned or clothed, but
 because she was also beautiful. The name of the other wife, Zillah,
 signifies, his shade.
 
 V. 20. _And Adah bare Jabal; he was the father of such as dwell in
 tents and have cattle._
 
 266. The name Jabal is derived from the verb _jabal_, which signifies
 to bring forward, or to produce.
 
 V. 21. _And his brother's name was Jubal; he was the father of all
 such as handle the harp and pipe._
 
 267. And the name Jubal has the same origin and signification; for it
 means produced, or introduced. Both these names, therefore, contain a
 wish or prayer of Lamech concerning the increase of his family. The
 posterity of Cain always entertained the object and expectation of
 surpassing in numbers. And, no doubt, the Cainites held up this
 temporal blessing in the face of the true Church as an evident proof
 that they were not cast off by God, but were the very people of God.
 
 V. 22. _And Zillah, she also bare Tubal-cain, the forger of every
 cutting instrument of (an artificer in every workmanship of) brass and
 iron; and the sister of Tubal-cain was Naamah._
 
 268. Tubal-cain signifies, produce property. So the Romans gave such
 names as "Valerius" (from valeo), and "Augustus" (from augeo). And
 Naamah received her name from her sweetness, or beauty. This posterity
 of Cain increased infinitely; hence Moses breaks off at this point.
 
 269. Now, when he not only chronicles names but makes mention also of
 the deeds and labors of each one, the Jewish explanation is to be
 rejected that the offspring of Cain was compelled to follow other
 occupations because the earth was cursed, and hence gained their
 livelihood, one as a shepherd, another as a worker in brass, and
 another as a musician, obtaining grain and the other fruits of the
 earth from the offspring of Adam. But if the Cainites had been so
 severely pressed by hunger, they would have forgotten the harp, organ
 and other instruments of music in their extremity; for the enjoyment
 of music is not characteristic of the hungry and thirsty.
 
 270. Their invention of music and their efforts in the discovery of
 other arts is proof that they had the necessaries of life in
 abundance. The reason, therefore, that the descendants of Cain turned
 to these pursuits and were not contented with the simple food the
 earth produced, like the descendants of Adam, was that they wished to
 rule, and aimed at the high praise and glory of being men of talent. I
 believe, however, that some of them passed over to the true Church and
 followed the religion of Adam.
 
 271. And such as Moses here describes the generation of the wicked, or
 the false church, to be, from the beginning down to the mighty flood
 of waters, so we find it ever, and such it will remain until the final
 flood of fire. "The sons of this world are for their own generation
 wiser than the sons of the light," Lk 16, 8. Therefore it is that they
 ever advance and increase, and commend themselves and their own, and
 thus acquire riches, dignities and power; while the true Church, on
 the other hand, always lies prostrate, despised, oppressed,
 excommunicated.
 
 Vs. 23-24. _And Lamech said unto his wives: Adah and Zillah, hear my
 voice; ye wives of Lamech, hearken unto my speech: for I have slain a
 man for wounding me, and a young man for bruising me. If Cain shall be
 avenged sevenfold, truly Lamech seventy and sevenfold._
 
 272. Thus far Moses has given us a history of the generation of the
 children of this world, and having brought down the list to the time
 of Lamech and his wives and children, he buries them, as it were,
 altogether in silence, leaving them without any promise, either of the
 life which is to come or of the life that now is. For except that
 uncovenanted blessing of offspring and of food, the Cainites possessed
 nothing whatever. Yet they so increased in power and in multitude that
 they filled the whole world, and at length overturned and ravaged to
 such an extent the righteous nation of the children of God which
 possessed the promise of the future and eternal life, and sunk them
 into so deep a hell of wickedness, that eight men only remained to be
 saved when the flood came upon the whole world of the ungodly. And
 though there is no doubt that some of the generation of Cain were
 saved both before the flood and in the flood, yet the Scriptures do
 not mention them, to the end that we might the more fear God and walk
 according to his Word. But hard as the diamond are those human hearts
 which fail to be moved by such an example as the flood, than which
 nothing more dreadful is to be found in the whole chain of time.
 
 273. Moses, therefore, having buried in silence the entire generation
 of Cain, records only one unimportant fact respecting Lamech, but what
 the real import of that fact is, Moses does not explain. I know not
 that any other passage in the Holy Scriptures has been so diversely
 interpreted, and so rent and wrested, as this text. For ignorance at
 least, if eloquence is not, is fruitful of surmises, errors and
 fables. I will mention some of the vulgar views upon the passage now
 before us.
 
 274. The Jews compose the fable that Lamech, when he had grown old and
 was blind, was led by a youth into the woods to hunt wild beasts, not
 for the sake of their flesh but for their skins; circumstances which
 are altogether absurd, and at once prove the whole fable to be a lie.
 And they hold that Cain was there, concealed among the bushes, and in
 that solitude he not only exercised repentance but sought security for
 his life. The young man who directed the spear for Lamech, thinking he
 saw a wild beast in a certain thicket, told Lamech to hurl his spear,
 and Lamech hurled his spear and, contrary to all thought, pierced
 Cain. And they add that after Lamech had been made conscious of the
 murder he had committed, he immediately speared the youth himself, who
 also died under the wound he received. It was thus, say the Jews, that
 the "man" and the "young man" were slain by Lamech. But such
 absurdities as these are utterly unworthy of refutation. Indeed, Moses
 himself completely refutes them; he records the fact that Cain, far
 from fleeing into solitude and concealment, "built a city," which
 implies that he governed a State and thereby established for himself a
 kind of kingdom. Moreover, the ages of Cain and Lamech would not
 accord with this explanation, for it is not at all probable Cain lived
 to the time Lamech became old and blind.
 
 275. There is still another Jewish invention. After Lamech had killed
 Cain, his wives would no longer live with him, through fear of the
 punishment they foreboded would come upon him, and therefore Lamech,
 to comfort himself and to induce his wives to live with him,
 prophesied that whosoever should kill him would assuredly be punished
 "seventy and sevenfold." The Jews invent like absurdities also
 concerning the sons of Lamech, whom they say he taught to fabricate
 arms for the destruction of men. Other commentators, again, will have
 it that the sense of this text is to be taken negatively, thus: If I
 had killed a man, as Cain killed his brother, I should have been
 worthy of your reprobation.
 
 276. My interpretation, accordingly, is that the words, "If Cain shall
 be avenged sevenfold," etc., are not to be taken for the Word of God.
 For that generation did not have the Word; how, then, could Lamech be
 believed to have been a prophet? Thus, even such a man as Jerome
 produces the vagary that, inasmuch as, according to Luke,
 seventy-seven generations can be counted between Adam and Christ, it
 was after this space of time that Lamech's sin was taken away by
 Christ. If such vaporings are legitimate, anything can be proved from
 the Scriptures. Jerome even forgets that Lamech represented the
 seventh generation from Adam! The word under consideration then, is
 not to be placed upon the same level with the former, spoken to Cain;
 for that was the Word of God. It is, on the contrary, the word of a
 wicked murderer; not true, but an audacious fiction, based upon that
 spoken by Adam to Cain. But why does he deliver his discourse not
 before his church but at home, and only before his wives?
 
 277. It is probable that the good and pious women were greatly alarmed
 on account of the murder committed by their husband. The wicked
 murderer, therefore, to appear equally safe with Cain, endeavored in
 this way to reassure his wives concerning his safety from death. This
 is what the wicked church is accustomed to do; it prophesies out of
 its own head. But all such prophecies are vain. This one thing,
 however, we can gather from the present text, that Lamech did not
 utter the contents of his prophecy from the Word of God, but out of
 his own brain.
 
 278. In respect to Cain, I do not think that he was killed by Lamech,
 but that he died long before the time of Lamech. And as there were
 continual animosities between the Cainite church and the Church of
 Adam--for the Cainites could not brook their being treated as outside
 of the true communion--my opinion is, that Lamech killed some eminent
 man and some distinguished youth of the generation of the righteous,
 just as Cain, his father, had killed Abel. And I believe that, having
 committed such murders, he wished to protect himself from being killed
 by uttering the words of the text, after the manner of the protection
 vouchsafed by God to his father Cain. For Lamech was no doubt a man of
 very great abilities and the chief man in his day and State. He had
 also strengthened his cause by a novel venture, for he was the first
 man who married two wives. And he harassed the Church of the godly in
 various ways, as men are wont to do who combine talent with malice.
 Therefore he furnished his men with arms, riches, and pleasures, that
 he might overcome the true Church on every side, which alone held the
 holy faith, the pure Word, and the pure worship of God. To all else he
 paid little attention.
 
 279. It is very probable that the patriarch Adam died about this time,
 this being the first patriarchal death; and there is no doubt that
 Lamech seized this opportunity of transferring the whole government of
 the world at that time to himself, that he might have all things under
 his own rule. This is the manner in which the world acts to this day.
 The Church of God, therefore, placed as it were in the midst, is
 oppressed on either side; by tyrants and blood-thirsty men on the one
 hand, and by those who are devoted to the concerns and pleasures of
 this world on the other. As tyrants use violence and the sword to
 destroy the Church, so the latter entice her by their allurements.
 
 280. Hence it is that Moses makes a special point of recording that
 the blood-thirsty seed of the Cainites gave themselves up to pleasures
 and to other worldly pursuits. And hence it is, also, that Christ
 expressly shows that much blood was shed even before the flood, by
 testifying "that upon you may come all the righteous blood shed on the
 earth, from the blood of Abel the righteous unto the blood of
 Zachariah son of Barachiah, whom ye slew between the sanctuary and the
 altar," Mt 23, 35. Moses testifies subsequently (Gen 6, 1-13), that
 the earth before the flood was filled with iniquities; and he is not
 speaking of the iniquities and violent deeds of thieves and
 adulterers, but describes particularly the tyranny of the Cainite
 church, which pursued with all the violence of the sword the holy
 posterity of Adam. And it is for this same reason that the sacred
 historian describes the descendants of Cain by the name "giants."
 These are the reasons which lead me to conclude that Lamech followed
 in the footsteps of his father Cain and slew some distinguished man of
 the holy patriarchs and his son.
 
 281. It was certainly an evidence of the greatest tyranny in Lamech,
 that, when he had been discovered by his wives, he did not grieve for
 what he had done, but held in contempt the punishment which he had
 just cause to dread. As if he had said: I have killed a man 'tis true,
 but what is that to you? The wound of that belongs to me; I shall be
 wounded for it, not you. I have indeed killed a young man, but it is
 to my own hurt. I shall be punished for it, not you. What utterances
 could evince more contempt than these in the face of open sins?
 
 These are my thoughts on the passage now before us. The text shows
 that the Cainites were tyrannical men, proud of their success, and
 given to pleasure; and the very words of Lamech prove him to be a
 proud man, not grieving at all for the murder he had committed, but
 glorying in it as in a righteous cause. The Cainite church always
 excuses that tyranny which it exercises over the godly, as Christ
 says: "Whosoever killeth you shall think that he offereth service unto
 God," Jn 16, 2. This is expressed in the additional words of Lamech:
 
 V. 24. _If Cain shall he avenged sevenfold, truly Lamech seventy and
 sevenfold._
 
 282. Here Lamech sets himself above his father Cain, making it appear
 that he had a more righteous cause for the murder he had committed,
 and fortifying himself against those inclined to avenge the murders
 perpetrated by him. For the words of the text are not the words of the
 Lord, as we have said, but the words of Lamech himself. Just so the
 pope fortifies himself by violence, tyranny, threats and anathemas, to
 make himself secure against avengers, for he has the conscience of a
 Cain and a Lamech. Let him, says the pope, who shall do anything
 contrary to these my decrees know that he shall incur the indignation
 of St. Peter and St. Paul.
 
 283. Lamech, therefore, is an example of this world, and Moses points
 to him to show what kind of a heart, will and wisdom the world has.
 Just as if he had said in reference to Lamech: Such are the actions of
 the seed of the serpent and such are the children of this world. They
 gather riches, follow their pleasures, increase their power, and then
 abuse all these things by their tyranny, making use of them against
 the true Church, the members of which they persecute and slay. And yet
 in the midst of all these mighty sins, they fear not, but are proud
 and secure, boasting and saying, "What can the righteous do?" (Ps 11,
 3): "Our lips are our own: who is lord over us?" (Ps 12, 4): "He (the
 wicked) saith in his heart: God hath forgotten, he hideth his face, he
 will never see it," (Ps 10, 11): and other like sentiments.
 
 284. That such is the meaning of the passage in question the facts
 recorded prove, though the words of the text do not so clearly express
 that meaning. The true Church has ever Satan as its great enemy, and
 he drives the Cainites into fury, disguised as devotion, against their
 brethren, the Abels; as Christ also says, affirming that the devil was
 a murderer from the beginning, Jn 8, 44. It is declared throughout the
 Scriptures concerning the true Church, that the wicked are ever
 shedding its blood. The various passages in the Psalms speak the same
 things, "Precious shall their blood be in his sight," Ps 72, 14.
 Again, "Precious in the sight of Jehovah is the death of his saints"
 Ps 116, 15. And again, "For thy sake are we killed all the day long"
 Ps 44, 22.
 
 285. As, therefore, the Church of God has at all times, and in all
 ages, given her blood to be shed by the wicked and by false brethren,
 so also, in that first age of the world she had to suffer from her
 enemies, whom the Scriptures call "giants," and affirm that those
 "giants" filled the earth with "violence." Among these giants was also
 this Lamech now before us, who was one perhaps like Pope Julius II or
 Clement VII who although they exercised cruelty in the highest degree,
 yet wished to be called and appear as most holy saints. Just so Lamech
 here wishes to make it appear that he had a most righteous cause for
 the murder he had committed, and therefore he threatened greater
 vengeance on the man who should kill him than God himself had
 threatened on the person who should slay his father, the murderer
 Cain.
 
 286. In this manner, the Church was vexed with the cross and with
 persecutions from the very beginning of the world until God, compelled
 by the wickedness of man, destroyed the whole world by the flood. Just
 so, also, when the measure of Pharaoh's malice was full he was drowned
 with all his host in the Red Sea. Just so, again, when the measure of
 the malice of the Gentile nations was full they were all uprooted and
 destroyed by Moses and Joshua. In the same manner afterwards when the
 Jews raged against the Gospel they were so utterly destroyed that not
 one stone was left upon another in Jerusalem. Other instances are the
 Babylonians, the Medes, the Persians, the Grecians, and the Romans.
 
 287. The Scriptures therefore do not record whom Lamech killed. They
 only record that two murders were committed by him, and that Lamech,
 in his impenitence, wished to protect himself in the same manner as
 his father Cain had been divinely protected, by issuing his
 proclamation, thereby making it appear that he had righteous cause for
 the murder he committed. And if this interpretation be not the true
 one, it is at least certain that the generation of the Cainites was a
 blood-thirsty generation, and hated and persecuted the true Church.
 
 288. And it is, moreover, true that Lamech had not the Word, and that,
 accordingly, his utterance is not to be considered in the same light
 as that word which was spoken to his father Cain; for the latter was
 the voice of truth, but the word of Lamech was the voice of his own
 pride, expressive of the rule of Satan and of a church of hypocrites,
 which sins securely and yet glories in its sins as if they were deeds
 of righteousness.
 
 
 C. THE POSTERITY OF THE RIGHTEOUS IN DETAIL; THE GENERATIONS OF THE
    RIGHTEOUS.
 
    1. Of Seth.
 
       a. Why Seth is described in detail 289.
 
       b. Why Eve at Seth's birth recalled Cain's murder 290.
 
        * How and why the first parents after Abel's death refrained
          from bearing children 291.
 
       c. Seth's birth was announced before in a special way by God
          291-292.
 
        * The uncovenanted grace of the Cainites. Also, why God did not
          mention that some of them would be saved 293.
 
       d. How Eve manifested special faith and obedience in Seth's
          birth 294-295.
 
        * Why the Romish church never canonized Eve 296.
 
        * The idle fables of the Jews about Lamech and his wives, and
          about Adam's abstinence and Cain's increase, are to be
          rejected 297.
 
       e. A new generation springs from Seth, in which the promise
          shall be fulfilled 298.
 
    2. Of Enoch.
 
       a. What his name means, and why it was given to him 299.
 
        * The names of the holy patriarchs originated not by chance
          299.
 
       b. How true worship began under Enoch 300-302.
 
        * Of true worship.
 
          (1) In what it consists 301.
 
          (2) Why it was not in use before 302.
 
            * The meaning of "the name of Jehovah" or the proclaiming
              of the name of Jehovah 303.
 
          (3) The right course to take in the doctrine concerning
              divine worship 304.
 
            * God always ministered comfort to his Church under the
              cross 305.
 
          (4) What is the true worship according to the first table of
              the law 306-307.
 
          (5) How true worship according to the second table follows
              from the first 308.
 
          (6) People are to be instructed first and chiefly in the
              worship of the first table 309.
 
          (7) Whether visible signs were present in these days in their
              worship, and to what end they were necessary 310-311.
 
          (8) The worship of which Moses speaks is to be understood not
              of the Cainites but of Seth's posterity 312.
 
 * A summary review of the contents of the fourth chapter of Genesis
   313.
 
 * Why the fifth chapter was written 314.
 
 * Why the Jews cannot see the unity in the first five chapters of the
   Bible 315.
 
 
 C. THE POSTERITY OF THE RIGHTEOUS IN DETAIL.
 
 V. 25. _And Adam knew his wife again; and she bare a son, and called
 his name Seth: For, said she, God hath appointed me another seed
 instead of Abel; for Cain slew him._
 
 289. Hitherto Moses has spoken of the generation of the wicked only,
 the whole of which he buries as it were with the above brief catalog.
 The historian now turns to the description of the godly and of the
 true Church. And first of all, we are to observe the manner of
 expression Moses uses in reference to the name given by Eve to her
 son: "And she called his name Seth." Moses does not speak thus
 concerning Cain when he was born, nor concerning righteous Abel, nor
 with reference to Enoch, nor with reference to any of the others. By
 this particular expression regarding Seth and his name Moses would
 signify that this was the first son in whom flowed the stream of the
 promise which had been made to the parents in paradise. So Eve is to
 be understood when she assigns the reason for giving her son this
 name. Eve manifests her surpassing godliness and faith in giving her
 son such a name.
 
 290. The fact that Eve recalls the murder by wicked Cain of his
 brother Abel proves that there had existed a fierce enmity between
 these two churches, and that she had witnessed and suffered many evils
 and indignities from the Cainites. Because of this she now called to
 mind the awful murder which had been committed, whereby Cain wished to
 destroy the righteous seed that he might reign alone. But thanks be to
 God, says she, who hath appointed me another seed instead of Abel.
 
 291. Moses here, as is his usual manner, embraces in the fewest
 possible words the mightiest things, that he may incite the reader to
 the most diligent consideration of the works of God. Of the pain and
 righteous grief of the parents at the murder of Abel by his brother we
 have spoken before. I see no reason why we should not believe that
 after the perpetration of that horrible murder no son was born to Adam
 until the birth of Seth; for it is most probable that the awful peril
 of a recurrence of a calamity like that which they had just
 experienced, induced the godly parents to abstain from connubial
 intercourse. I believe, therefore, that by a particular promise made
 to them by an angel, their minds were again comforted and confirmed,
 and that they were influenced to believe that a son of the description
 of Seth would now be born unto them, who should hold fast the promise;
 and that, although the generation of Cain should utterly perish by
 their sin, the generation of him about to be born should be preserved
 until the promised blessed seed should come into the world.
 
 292. It is a proof of some like particular promise having been
 revealed to the parents by an angel that Eve adds to the name she gave
 to her son a kind of short sermon, and that Moses when recording this
 circumstance makes use of an expression not otherwise adopted by him
 in connection with the names Adam or Eve gave to their children: "And
 she called his name Seth." Seth is derived from the Hebrew verb
 _sath_, which signifies he placed, or he established, and was intended
 to show that this son would be, as it were, the foundation on which
 the promise concerning Christ would rest, even though many other sons
 should be born unto the parents. Eve does not give him an exalted
 name, such as "Cain," yet she gives him a name signifying that the
 posterity of Seth should never be suppressed or destroyed.
 
 293. The Cainites, cast out from the sight of their parents, are left
 under a curse, without any promise whatever, and have only so much
 mercy as they receive from the generation of the righteous as beggars,
 not as heirs. This is the mercy we above called uncovenanted mercy.
 But who, of the posterity of the Cainites, obtained that mercy, Moses
 does not mention, and his design in this omission is to keep separate
 the two churches: the one the Church of the righteous, which had the
 promise of a life to come, but in this life was poor and afflicted;
 the other the church of the wicked, which in this life is rich and
 flourishing.
 
 294. Eve, the mother of us all, is highly to be praised, as a most
 holy woman, full of faith and charity, because in the person of her
 son Seth she so nobly lauds the true Church, paying no regard whatever
 to the generation of the Cainites. For she does not say, I have gotten
 another son in the place of Cain. She prefers the slain Abel to Cain,
 though Cain was the first-born. Herein praise is due, not only to her
 faith but to her eminent obedience; for she is not only not offended
 at the judgment of God concerning righteous Abel, but she also changes
 her own judgment concerning God. When Abel was born she despised him,
 and magnified Cain as the first-born, and as the possessor, as she
 thought, of the promise. But now she acts in all things quite the
 contrary. As if she had said: After God's acceptance of him and of his
 offering, I had placed all my hopes on my son Abel, because he was
 righteous; but his wicked brother slew him. But now God hath appointed
 me another seed instead of Abel.
 
 295. She does not indulge her maternal affection for Cain. She does
 not excuse or lessen the sin of her son. But she herself
 excommunicates him, already excommunicated of God; and she banishes
 him, together with all his posterity, among the polluted mass of the
 Gentiles who live without any sure mercy of God, laying hold only as
 they can of that uncovenanted mercy which, as we have said, they
 receive as beggars, not as heirs.
 
 296. It is a great marvel, surely, that the church of the pope, having
 made up so great a list of saints, has not yet inserted in that
 catalog Saint Eve, a woman full of faith and love, and with an
 infinite number of crosses! But perhaps we are to gather from this
 omission that it would rather follow the church of the Cainites than
 the holy Church.
 
 297. I am inclined to say nothing here about that absurd and idle
 fable of the Jews, that Lamech brought his disobedient wives to Adam
 as judge, and that when Adam commanded them to render to their husband
 due benevolence the wives in reply asked Adam why he did not do the
 same to Eve. These fablers say that Adam, who had refrained from the
 bed of his wife from the murder of Abel to that time, again lived with
 her as man and wife, in order that he might not by his example induce
 others to maintain perpetual continence, and thus prevent mankind from
 being multiplied. All these fables show how impure the thoughts of the
 Jews were. Of the same description is the like argument of these Jews,
 who hold that when Seth was born, which was within a hundred years
 after the death of Abel, the children of Cain had increased unto the
 seventh generation. Such absurdities do wicked men invent to bring
 reproach upon the Holy Scriptures. And of precisely the same
 description is the opinion that Cain was born in paradise, while, as
 yet, the original righteousness of his parents remained. What is the
 object of this lying invention but to cause us to do away with Christ
 altogether? For take away original sin, and what need is there of
 Christ at all? These things are indeed, as we have intimated, unworthy
 of being mentioned here. But they are worthy the enemies of Christ and
 the enemies of grace.
 
 298. In Seth, therefore, we have a new generation, which arises from
 and comes to pass in accordance with the great original promise, that
 the seed of the woman should bruise the serpent's head. Appropriately
 the name Seth is bestowed, so that Eve may felicitate herself upon the
 fact that this seed is established, safe from overthrow. David uses
 the same verb: "If the foundations be destroyed, what can the
 righteous do?" Ps 11, 3. And the Hebrew word forms a perfect rhyme
 with its German equivalent: "Seth--steht."
 
 V. 26a. _And to Seth, to him also there was born a son; and he called
 his name Enosh._
 
 299. The verb _yikra_, he called, is in the masculine gender, by which
 you are to understand that it was the father who gave this name to his
 son. In the former case the verb was feminine, because Eve gave to her
 son Seth his name. The expression in each case is different, which
 difference of gender in a verb the Latin language does not indicate.
 
 Enosh signifies a man afflicted or full of calamity. "What is man that
 thou art mindful of him," Ps 8, 4. Seth, accordingly, intimates that
 at that time there was some persecution or affliction of the Church.
 That "old serpent," who had cast man out of paradise and had killed
 Abel, the man beloved of God, was neither asleep nor idle. Therefore,
 upon the consolation enjoyed in the birth of Seth there soon follows
 another trial or tribulation, which the godly parents Adam and Eve
 signalize by giving the name Enosh to their son. The names thus given
 are by no means to be considered accidental. They were either
 prophetical or commemorative of some particular event.
 
 V. 26b. _Then began men to call upon the name of Jehovah._
 
 300. The rabbins understand this as having reference to idolatry. They
 think that about this time the name of Jehovah began to be given to
 creatures: to the sun, the moon, etc. But Moses is not here speaking
 of what the generation of Cainites did, but what the godly generation
 of Adam did. The sacred historian is testifying that after the birth
 of Enosh there began the true worship of God, the calling upon the
 name of Jehovah.
 
 301. Here Moses most beautifully defines what it is to worship God, to
 call upon the name of Jehovah; which is, as it were, the work of the
 first table and concerns the true worship of God. Now, calling upon
 the name of Jehovah embraces the preaching of the Word, faith, or
 confidence in God, confession, etc. Paul beautifully joins these
 things together in the fourteenth verse of the tenth chapter of his
 Epistle to the Romans. True, the works of the second table also belong
 to the worship of God, but these works do not refer directly and only
 to God as do the works of the first table.
 
 302. After the confusion made in the house of Adam by Cain, the
 generation of the godly began to multiply by degrees and a little
 Church was formed, in which Adam as the high priest governed all
 things by the Word and by sound doctrine. Moses here affirms that this
 took place about the time of the birth of Enosh. Although this name
 implies that the Church had been overwhelmed by some terrible
 disaster, yet God raised her up again by his grace and mercy, and
 added the great spiritual blessing of godly assemblage in a particular
 place, with preaching, prayer and the offering of sacrifices,
 blessings which had hitherto perhaps been either hindered or forbidden
 by the Cainites. We have here, then, another evidence of the promised
 seed warring with the serpent and bruising its head.
 
 303. Furthermore, as Moses does not say: Jehovah began to be called
 upon, but the name of Jehovah, the reference to Christ recommends
 itself to our approval, since also in other passages the Schem Jehovah
 (the name of Jehovah) is so to be understood. This expression, "then
 men began to call upon the name of Jehovah," contains a meaning most
 important. It signifies that Adam, Seth, and Enosh taught and exhorted
 their posterity to expect redemption and to believe the promise
 concerning the seed of the woman, and to overcome by that hope the
 snares, the crosses, the persecutions, the hatred and the violence of
 the Cainites, and not to despair of salvation, but rather to give
 thanks unto God, assured that he would at some time deliver them by
 the seed of the woman.
 
 304. What could Adam and Seth teach greater or better than that the
 great deliverer, Christ, was promised to their posterity? And this is
 quite in keeping with the proper principle to be observed in religious
 instruction. The first care should ever be directed to the first
 table. When this table is well understood, the right understanding of
 the second table will soon follow; yea, it is then easy to fulfil the
 latter. For how is it possible that, where pure doctrine is taught,
 where men rightly believe, rightly call upon the name of Jehovah, and
 rightly give thanks unto God, the second and inferior fruits can be
 wanting?
 
 305. In this manner did it please God at that time to comfort the
 afflicted church of the godly and to prevent their despair concerning
 the future. We see throughout the pages of sacred history a perpetual
 succession and change of consolations and afflictions. Joseph in Egypt
 keeps alive his parents and his brethren when divinely visited by
 famine. After this, when these people were oppressed by wicked kings,
 they were again delivered from their cruel bondage. And Cyrus delivers
 them when captives in Babylon. When God permits his own people to be
 oppressed by the violence and guile of the devil and the world, he
 always lifts them up again and gives them prophets and godly teachers
 to restore his sinking church, and to break for a while the fury of
 Satan.
 
 306. Furthermore, it is the intention to lay down a logical definition
 when it is claimed that the worship of God does not consist in
 ceremonies devised and transmitted by men, in the erection of statues,
 or the performance of other sport suggested by reason, but in calling
 upon the name of Jehovah. Worship in its truest meaning, well-pleasing
 to God, and subsequently made mandatory in the first commandment,
 embraces the fear of God, trust in God, confession, prayer and
 preaching.
 
 307. The first commandment of the Law demands faith, that we believe
 God is the only helper in time of need, Ps 9, 9. The second
 commandment demands confession and prayer, that we call upon the name
 of Jehovah in times of peril and give thanks unto God. The third
 commandment requires that we teach the truth, and that we guard and
 defend sound doctrine.
 
 These are the true and appropriate acts of the worship of God, and
 they are those which God requires. He requires not sacrifices nor
 money nor anything of the kind. As regards the first table, he
 requires that we hear, consider and teach the Word; that we pray to
 God and fear him.
 
 308. Where these things exist, the observances and works required by
 the second table follow, as it were, of their own accord. It is
 impossible that he who does the works and performs the worship of the
 first table should not do and perform those of the second table also.
 David saith: "His delight is in the law of Jehovah; and on his law
 doth he meditate day and night. And he shall be like a tree planted by
 the stream of water; that bringeth forth its fruit in its season,
 whose leaf also doth not wither." Ps 1, 2-3. These things are evident
 consequences of the right worship of God, according to the
 commandments of the first table. He who believes God, who fears God,
 who calls upon God in tribulation, who praises God and gives thanks
 unto him for his mercies, who gladly hears the Word of God, who
 continually contemplates the works of God, and who teaches others to
 do the same things--do you think that such a one will harm his
 neighbor, or disobey his parents, or kill, or commit adultery?
 
 309. The first table, therefore, is to be set forth first of all, and
 instruction as regards the true worship is to receive precedence to
 all else. This means, first to make the tree good on which good fruit
 is to grow. Now, our adversaries take the diametrically opposite
 course; they want to have the good fruit before they have even the
 tree.
 
 310. Moreover, I believe that about this time there was added some
 visible ceremony of divine worship, for God is ever wont thus to do.
 He always joins with the Word some visible sign. When Abel and Cain
 presented their offerings God showed by a visible sign from heaven
 that he had respect unto Abel and his offering, but not unto Cain and
 his offering. And so, in all probability, it was in this case and at
 this time. When the Church began to flourish and the Word of God was
 publicly taught with considerable success, God added also some visible
 sign, that the Church might assuredly know that she pleased God.
 
 311. But whatever that sign was, whether fire from heaven or something
 else, God withheld it until the third generation, that men might learn
 to be content with the Word alone. Afterwards, when men had comforted
 themselves by the Word alone against the Cainites, in all
 tribulations, God of his great mercy added to the Word some visible
 sign. He established a place and appointed persons and ceremonies to
 which the Church might gather for the exercise of faith, for preaching
 and prayer. By means of these things, the Word or the first table and
 then a visible sign ordained of God, a Church is constituted, in which
 men undergo discipline through teaching, hearing, and the partaking of
 the sacraments. Then upon these things will assuredly follow the works
 of the second table, which are acceptable, and acts of worship, only
 on the part of those who possess and practice the first table.
 
 312. This gift of God, Moses sets forth in the few short words of the
 text before us, when he says, "Then began men to call upon the name of
 Jehovah." For this beginning to call upon the name of Jehovah was not
 on the part of the Cainites, as the Jews explained the passage, but on
 the part of the godly posterity of Adam, which alone was then the true
 Church. If any of the posterity of Cain were saved, it must of
 necessity have been by joining this Church.
 
 313. The sum of the first four chapters of Genesis is that we are to
 believe in a resurrection of the dead after this life, and a life
 eternal through the Seed of the woman. This is the blessed portion of
 the godly, of them that believe, who in this life are filled with
 afflictions and subject to injuries at the hands of all men. To the
 wicked, on the contrary, are given, as their portion, the riches and
 power of this world, which they use against the true Church of God.
 
 In the first chapter it is shown that man was created unto
 immortality, because he was created "in the image of God."
 
 The teaching also of the second chapter sets forth the same thing, "In
 the day that thou eatest thereof, thou shalt surely die." It follows
 that the first created man and woman could not have died if they had
 not eaten of that fruit. By their sin of eating they fell from
 immortality to mortality, and they begat an offspring like unto
 themselves.
 
 In the third chapter immortality is set forth anew, as restored by the
 promise of the Seed of the woman.
 
 In the fourth chapter we have an especial example of immortality set
 before us in Abel, who, after he had been slain by his brother, was
 received into the bosom of God, who testified that the voice of the
 blood of Abel cried unto him from the ground.
 
 314. And the fifth chapter, which now follows, is expressly written to
 set forth the immortality of Enoch, who was taken up into heaven by
 the Lord. Although the following chapter is necessary as a chronicle
 of the number of the years of the generation of the righteous, yet its
 most remarkable feature is its record that Enoch did not die like
 Adam, nor was slain like Abel, nor carried away, nor torn to pieces by
 lions and bears, but was taken up into heaven and translated into
 immortality by the Lord himself; all which was written that we might
 believe in the Seed of the woman, Christ our Redeemer and Satan's
 conqueror, and that through him we also might expect a life immortal
 after this mortal and afflicted life.
 
 315. This harmony of these five chapters the Jews see not, for they
 are destitute of that sun which sheds light upon these things and
 makes them manifest; which sun is Christ, by whom we have the
 remission of sins and life immortal.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 I. THE BOOK OF THE FIRST GENERATIONS OF MAN, AND THE GLORY OF THE
    CAINITES.
 
    A. THE BOOK OF THE FIRST GENERATIONS OF MAN.
 
       1. The reasons why Moses records the generations of Adam 1.
 
       2. Why he so particularly gives the years, and in the case of
          each patriarch adds "and he died" 1-2.
 
       3. Why Enoch is placed in the records of the dead 3-4.
 
        * Was Enoch a sinner, and do sinners have hope of eternal life
          4.
 
        * Of death.
 
          a. How we are to comfort ourselves against death 5.
 
          b. How reason views death, and how the best heathen
             philosophers viewed it 6.
 
          c. The knowledge the Scriptures give us of death 6.
 
       4. How we may be greatly profited by the book of the generations
          of the ancient world 7.
 
       5. Why the book of the generations of Cain is larger than that
          of Seth's 7.
 
        * How terrible that both lines were totally destroyed, except
          eight persons 8.
 
       6. The aim of Moses in writing this book of the generations of
          Adam 9.
 
        * The glory of the first world 10.
 
          a. What was this glory 9-10.
 
          b. Why this glory was revealed 10.
 
          c. Profitable and interesting to meditate upon it 11.
 
          d. The patriarchs of the first world the most holy of all
             martyrs 12.
 
    B. THE GLORY OF THE CAINITES.
 
       1. The Cainites greatly tormented God's Church, especially after
          Adam's death 12.
 
       2. To what end their hatred and persecution served the holy
          patriarchs 13.
 
        * Why Moses did not record the zeal of the holy fathers against
          the Cainites 14.
 
        * Why Moses gives such a short description of the deluge 15.
 
        * The character of the first world 16.
 
        * Luther's lamentation over the character of the last world;
          its approaching destruction, and an earnest prayer to God
          16-18.
 
 
 I. THE RECORDS OF THE GENERATIONS OF MAN AND THE GLORY OF THE
 CAINITES.
 
 A. The Records of the Generations of Man.
 
 V. 1. _This is the book of the generations of Adam._
 
 1. This chronicle has been arranged by Moses for two reasons. First,
 on account of the promise of the seed made to Adam; and second, on
 account of Enoch. Moses writes still another genealogy in the tenth
 chapter, after the flood, from a far different motive than the
 present. In the present chapter, he gives the number of the years of
 the righteous and adds with a special purpose in the case of each one,
 the words, "and he died."
 
 2. This little phrase may at first thought appear superfluous. After
 the historian has said, "All the days that Adam lived were nine
 hundred and thirty years," what seems to be the use of his adding the
 few words, "and he died"? The statement as to the number of his years
 connotes also the time of his death; for had he lived longer, the
 additional years would have been contained in the enumeration.
 
 Moses, however, does this with the definite purpose of pointing out
 the unspeakable wrath of God against sin, and the inevitable
 punishment of it, inflicted by him on the whole human race, on the
 righteous as well as on the wicked. So does the Apostle Paul pursue
 his argument, drawn from this very portion of the Holy Scripture: "As
 through one man sin entered into the world, and death through sin; and
 so death passed upon all men, for that all sinned," Rom 5, 12. This is
 a consequence perpetuated through all generations. Adam died,
 therefore Adam was a sinner. Seth died, therefore Seth was a sinner.
 Infants die, therefore infants partake of sin and so are sinners. This
 is what Moses intends to set forth when he says, concerning the whole
 line of patriarchs, that, though they were all sanctified and renewed
 by faith, yet, "they died!"
 
 3. Nevertheless, from this line of the dying there flames starlike a
 most lovely light of immortality when Moses here records concerning
 Enoch that "he was not;" that is, he no longer appeared among men, and
 yet he did not die but was taken up into heaven by the Lord himself.
 By this glorious fact is signified that the human race is indeed
 condemned to death on account of sin, and yet the hope of life and
 immortality is left us, that we need not abide in death forever.
 
 4. For this cause God thought it needful, not only that the promise of
 life should be given to the original world, but that immortality
 should be demonstrated by an object lesson. Accordingly Moses said of
 each patriarch that he fulfilled so many years of life and "died":
 that is, suffered the punishment of sin, or, was a sinner. But the
 divine historian does not use these expressions concerning Enoch. Not
 because that patriarch was not a sinner, but because, even unto such
 sinners as he, there was left a hope of eternal life through the
 blessed seed. Therefore all the patriarchs, who died in the faith of
 this seed, held fast the hope of eternal life.
 
 Enoch, therefore, is the second object lesson by which God makes it
 manifest that it is his will to give unto us life eternal after this
 life. The Lord says that Abel, who was killed by his brother, still
 lived, and that his voice cried from the ground. In the present
 instance, Enoch is taken up by the Lord himself into heaven.
 
 5. We will not despair, therefore, though we see death, derived from
 Adam, extend to every one of the whole human race. We must, indeed,
 suffer death because we are sinners. But we shall not abide in death.
 We rather have a hope in a divine purpose and providence whereby God
 designs our deliverance from death. This deliverance has begun with
 the promise of the blessed seed, and has been demonstrated by Abel and
 Enoch as object lessons. Wherefore we possess the first fruits of
 immortality. The Apostle Paul says, "For in hope were we saved," Rom
 8, 24. Hope saves us until the fullness of immortality shall be
 brought unto us at the last day, when we shall see and feel that
 eternal life which we possessed here in faith and hope.
 
 6. Now, the flesh does not understand this. The flesh judges that man
 dies like a beast. Men, occupying the front rank of philosophers have
 felt accordingly that by death the soul is separated and delivered
 from the prison of the body, to mingle, free from all bodily
 infirmities, in the assembly of the gods. Such was the immortality
 dreamed of by the philosophers, though steadfastness of grasp and of
 vision was out of the question. The Holy Scriptures, however, teach
 differently concerning the resurrection and eternal life; they place
 this hope so plainly before our eyes as to leave no room for doubt.
 
 7. Next in order, we find in this chapter a reflection of the
 condition of the primitive world. The ten antediluvian patriarchs
 belonging to the lineage of Christ, with their descendants, are
 enumerated. Nor is it a useless study to put these data before one's
 eyes on paper, according to the directions given by Moses, to see who
 the patriarchs were, who were their contemporaries, and how old they
 became, as I have taken the time to do. Cain also has his line, as
 Moses has shown in the preceding chapter, and I have no doubt that the
 posterity of Cain was far more numerous than that of righteous Seth.
 
 8. From these two families, as from roots, was the world peopled, down
 to the deluge, in which both branches, with their two classes of
 descendants (that is, the posterity of the wicked and that of the
 righteous) were rooted out of the earth, eight souls only being left,
 and even among them one was wicked. Accordingly, as in this chapter a
 magnificent picture of the primeval world is presented to our view, so
 we behold also the incalculable wrath of God, and the horrible event
 of the reduction of the total offspring of these patriarchs to eight
 souls.
 
 9. We will reserve this awful record for its proper time and place.
 Let us now do that which Moses does in the present chapter, who wants
 us to consider the exceeding splendor of this primeval age of the
 world. Adam lived beyond the age of his grandson Enoch, and died but a
 short time before Noah was born. A hundred and twenty years only
 intervened between the death of Adam and the birth of Noah. Seth died
 only fourteen years before Noah's birth. Enosh and the rest of the
 patriarchs, except Enoch, lived at the same time with Noah. Thus by a
 comparison of the figures, we shall ascertain that quite a number of
 gray-headed patriarchs, of whom one lived seven hundred, and another
 nine hundred years, were contemporaries, and teaching and governing
 the Church of the godly.
 
 10. The exceeding glory of the primitive world consists in this, that
 it contained so many good and wise and holy men. We are by no means to
 think that all these are merely common names of plain and simple men.
 They were the greatest heroes and men of renown that the world ever
 witnessed, next to Christ and John the Baptist. In the last day we
 shall behold and admire the real majesty of all these worthies, and
 then we shall truly behold the mighty deeds which these mighty men
 wrought. Yes, it will then be made manifest what Adam did, what Seth
 did, what Methuselah did, and the others; what they suffered from the
 old serpent; how they comforted and fortified themselves, by their
 hope in the promised seed, against all the harm and violence of the
 world, that is, of the Cainites; what craft they experienced; what
 injuries and hatred and contempt they bore for the glory of the
 blessed seed to be born from their lineage. We are assuredly not to
 imagine that these great and holy men lived without severe afflictions
 and innumerable crosses. All these things, I say, shall be revealed at
 the last day.
 
 11. And it is an undertaking, as I said, full of profit and pleasure
 now to contemplate with our minds, as with open eyes, that happy age,
 in which so many patriarchs lived contemporaneously, nearly all of
 whom, except Noah, had seen and known their first father, Adam.
 
 B. The Glory of the Cainites.
 
 12. Also the Cainites had their glory. Among them were men most
 eminent in the liberal arts, and the most consummate hypocrites, who
 gave the true Church a world of trouble, and harassed the holy
 patriarchs in every possible way. We may justly call all those who
 were thus oppressed by them most holy martyrs and confessors. The
 Cainites, as Moses before intimated, very soon surpassed the other
 descendants of Adam in numbers and activity. Although they were
 compelled to revere their father Adam, yet they adopted all possible
 means of oppressing the Church of the godly, and especially so after
 the death of the first patriarch, Adam. By such wickedness, these
 Cainites helped to bring on the flood as retribution.
 
 13. This power and malice of the Cainites caused the holy patriarchs
 to teach and instruct their Church with increased zeal and industry.
 What numerous and powerful sermons may we suppose were preached by
 them in the course of these most eventful years! There is no doubt
 that both Adam and Eve testified of their original state of innocence,
 described the glory of paradise and warned their posterity to beware
 of the serpent, who, by tempting them to sin, had caused all these
 great evils. How constant may we suppose them to have been in
 explaining the promise of the blessed seed! How earnestly must they
 have exhorted the hearts of their followers to be moved neither by the
 splendor of the Cainites nor by their own afflictions.
 
 14. All these particulars Moses omits to record, both because they
 could not be described on account of their infinite variety of detail
 and because the revelation of them is reserved for that great day of
 deliverance and glory!
 
 15. Likewise the flood, in spite of its horror, is described with the
 greatest brevity because he wished to leave such things to the
 meditation of men.
 
 16. For the same reasons Moses has purposely given us, in these first
 five chapters, as briefly as possible, a picture of the original and
 primeval world. It was an admirable condition of life, and yet that
 primeval age contained a multitude of the worst of men, in consequence
 not more than "eight souls" were saved from the destroying flood! What
 then, may we conclude, will be the state of things before the last day
 shall come, seeing that even now, under the revealed light of the
 Gospel, there is found so great a host of despisers of it that there
 is cause to fear that they will fill the world ere long with errors
 and prevail to the extinction of the Word altogether.
 
 17. Awful is the voice of Christ when it utters the words,
 "Nevertheless, when the Son of man cometh, shall he find faith on the
 earth?" Lk 18, 8. And in Matthew 24, 37-38, our Lord compares the last
 days with the days of Noah. These utterances of our Lord are indeed
 most awful. But the world, in its security and ingratitude, is a
 despiser of all the threats as well as all the promises of God. It
 abounds in iniquities of every kind and becomes daily more corrupt.
 From the time that the popes ceased to rule among us, who had ruled
 the whole world by means of the mere dread of their vengeance, sound
 doctrine has been despised, and men have degenerated into all but
 brutes and beasts. The number of holy and godly preachers of the Word
 is becoming less and all men are indulging their desires. The last
 day, however, shall assuredly come upon the world as a thief, and will
 overtake these men in all their security, and in the indulgence of
 their ambition, tyranny, lust, avarice, and vices of every kind.
 
 18. And let it be remembered that it is Christ himself who has
 foretold these things, and we can not possibly imagine that he would
 lie. If the primitive world, which contained so mighty a multitude of
 the greatest patriarchs, was so wholly corrupted, what may we not have
 cause to dread in the weakness of our nature? May the Lord our God
 grant that we may be gathered, as soon as possible, in the faith and
 confession of his Son Jesus Christ, unto these our fathers; yea, if it
 please him, that we may die within the next twenty years, and not live
 to see the miseries and calamities, both temporal and spiritual, of
 the last time! Amen!
 
 
 II. ADAM AND HIS SON SETH.
 
    1. The name Adam, and why given to the first man 19.
 
    2. The Jews' fables of Adam's cohabitation with Eve 20.
 
     * Purity of doctrine cannot be expected from the Jews 20.
 
    3. Why Moses so carefully describes the times of Adam 21.
 
    4. Why it is said of Adam that he was created in the likeness of
       God 21-23.
 
     * The likeness of God.
 
       a. The difference between "Zelem" and "Demuth" 22-23.
 
       b. How the likeness of God was lost and how it is restored 24.
 
       c. Whether it can be fully restored in this life 25.
 
    5. The prating of the rabbins about the name Adam 26.
 
     * Why Moses here mentions the blessing 27.
 
     * Why he did not refer to the blessing in the descriptions of Cain
       and Abel 28.
 
    6. How long it was before Adam begat Seth 29.
 
     * Abel's age when murdered 29.
 
    7. How and why Adam mourned so long for his son Abel, and therefore
       refrained from bearing children 29-30.
 
    8. The Jews' fable of Adam's vow of chastity refuted 30.
 
    9. How we are to understand that Adam begat a son in his own
       likeness 31.
 
   10. Whether Adam's son Seth had God's likeness 31.
 
   11. How Adam acquired again the lost image 32.
 
   12. How Seth secured the likeness of God 32.
 
   13. Why Adam gave his son the name Seth; its meaning 33.
 
     * The long lives of the first men.
 
       a. Longevity a part of the happy state of the first world 34.
 
       b. The causes of such long lives 34-35.
 
        * Men's bodies were much stronger and healthier than ours 35.
 
       c. Whether the climate, food and holy living contributed to this
          end 36-37.
 
        * The creatures given to man for food after the flood were
          inferior to those before, and they injured the body more than
          nourished it 37.
 
       d. Luther's thoughts on this theme 38.
 
   14. Which is the first or chief branch born from Adam and Eve 39.
 
   15. How long Adam lived after Seth's birth 39.
 
     * The glory of the first world 40.
 
     * The histories of the first world were most excellent, but they
       were destroyed in the flood 41.
 
     * Eve's age and experiences 42.
 
     * The age of the first world is called the golden age 43.
 
 
 II. ADAM AND HIS SON SETH.
 
 V. 1a. _This is the book of the generations of Adam._
 
 19. "Adam," as will be stated further on, is the common name of the
 whole human race, but it is applied to the first man more expressly as
 an appellation of dignity, because he was the source, as it were, of
 the whole human family. The Hebrew word _sepher_, "a book," is derived
 from _saphar_, which signifies "to narrate" or "to enumerate."
 Wherefore this narration or enumeration of the posterity of Adam is
 called "the book of the generations of Adam."
 
 V. 1b. _In the day that God created man, in the likeness of God made
 he him._
 
 20. This clause of the sacred text has induced the blind Jews to fable
 that Adam slept with Eve as his wife in paradise on the same day in
 which he was created, and that she conceived in that same day. Fables
 of this kind are numerous among them, nor may anything sound or pure
 in the matter of scriptural interpretation be expected of them.
 
 21. The intent of Moses, in this clause, is to record the complete age
 of Adam, and to number the days of his life from the day of his
 creation, and, at the same time, to show that before Adam there was no
 generation. Generation is to be clearly distinguished from creation.
 There was no generation before Adam, but creation only. Adam and Eve
 were not born but created, and that directly by God himself. Moses
 adds, "In the likeness of God made he him." We are to understand,
 then, that when he afterwards mentions that Adam begat Seth, he
 numbers his years from the very day of his creation.
 
 22. In respect to Adam's having been made in the likeness of God, we
 have shown above in its place what that "likeness" of God was.
 Although almost all commentators understand the expressions, "the
 likeness of God," and "the image of God," to mean one and the same
 thing, yet so far as I have been able from careful investigation to
 reach a conclusion, there is a difference between the two terms.
 _Zelem_ properly signifies "an image," or "figure," as when the
 Scripture says, Ye shall break down their images, Ex. 23, 24, in which
 passage the original term signifies nothing more than the figures, or
 statues, or images erected by men. But _demuth_ signifies "a
 likeness," or "the perfectness of an image." For instance, when we
 speak of a lifeless image, such as that which is impressed on coins,
 we say, This is the image of Brutus or of Caesar. That image, however,
 does not reproduce the likeness, nor exhibit every single feature.
 
 23. Accordingly, when Moses says that man was created also in the
 likeness of God, he points out that man resembles God not only in the
 possession of reason, or of intellect and will, but that he has also
 the likeness of God, that is, a will and an intellect, with which he
 knows God and wills what he wills.
 
 24. If man, having been created both "in the image" and "in the
 likeness" of God, had not fallen, he would have lived forever, full of
 joy and gladness, and would have possessed a will joyfully eager to
 obey the will of God. But by sin both this "likeness" and this "image"
 were lost. They are, however, in a measure, restored by faith, as we
 are told by the apostle, Col 3, 10; Eph 4, 24. For we begin to know
 God, and the spirit of Christ helps us, so that we desire to obey the
 commandments of God.
 
 25. Of these blessed gifts we possess only the first-fruits. This new
 creation within us is only as yet begun; it is not perfected here in
 the flesh. The will is in some measure stirred to praise God, to give
 him thanks, to confess sin, and to exercise patience, but all this is
 only the first-fruits. The flesh, obeying the law of its nature, still
 follows the things of the flesh, while it opposes the things of God.
 The result is that the restoration of such gifts in us is only in the
 initial stage; but the full tithe of this likeness in all its
 perfection shall be rendered in the future life, when the sinful flesh
 shall have been destroyed by death.
 
 V. 2. _Male and female created he them, and blessed them, and called
 their name Adam, in the day when they were created._
 
 26. I have above observed that the general name "Adam" was applied to
 Adam alone, by reason of his superiority. I omit to mention those
 vagaries of the rabbins, who say that no man can be called "Adam"
 unless he has a wife. Likewise, no woman can be called "Adam" unless
 married. The thought may have been drawn from the teachings of the
 fathers, but the Jews have corrupted it by their foolish fancies and
 opinions.
 
 27. Moses aims to show this blessing was not taken from man because of
 his sin, since the blessing of bearing children and ruling them
 continued with Cain though he had murdered his brother.
 
 28. Moses mentions not Abel, for he had died without an heir and is
 presented to us as an example of the resurrection of the dead. Neither
 is Cain mentioned, who because of his sin was cut off from the true
 Church.
 
 29. Scripture says nothing of what Adam and Eve did during the one
 hundred years. Some of our writers add a hundred years longer Adam
 should have lived with Eve before Cain slew his brother Abel, which
 makes Adam two hundred and thirty years of age when Seth was born. It
 seems to me plausible that the godly parents passed one hundred years
 in sorrow and mourned the great dishonor that befell their family.
 After Adam was expelled from paradise did he first beget children,
 sons and daughters, who were like him, and Abel was perhaps thirty
 years of age when he was slain. It appears the children were not much
 younger than their parents, who were not born, but created.
 
 30. I believe, accordingly, that the godly parents indulged their
 grief, and abstained from connubial intercourse. This abstinence,
 however, was not maintained with the intent which the Jews fable, who
 absurdly affirm that Adam vowed perpetual chastity, like our monks,
 and that he would still have kept his vow had he not been commanded by
 an angel from heaven to live together with his wife. Such a story as
 this is only fit to be told to a Roman pontiff of the age of forty,
 who alone is worthy of listening to such fables. No, Adam was not so
 wicked as thus to refuse the gift and command of God! Such abstinence
 would have been taking vengeance on himself for the grief he had
 endured, and it would have meant to reject the gift of that blessing
 which God had been pleased to leave to nature even in its fallen
 state.
 
 Moreover, this was a matter not left in the power of Adam. As Moses
 has clearly shown, God had created him a male. He had, therefore, need
 of a female, or wife, because the instinct of procreation was
 implanted in his nature by God the Creator, himself. If therefore Adam
 abstained, he did so for a reason only, intending to return to his Eve
 after giving vent to his grief for a time.
 
 31. Moses here expressly adds, concerning Adam, that he "begat a son
 in his own likeness, after his image." Theologians entertain various
 opinions as to the real meaning of those expressions. The simple
 meaning is, that Adam was created "in the image" and "after the
 likeness" of God, or that he was the image of God, created, not
 begotten; for Adam had no parents. But in this "image of God" Adam
 continued not; he fell from it by sin. Seth, therefore, who was
 afterwards born, was begotten, not after the image of God, but after
 the image of his father Adam. That is, he was altogether like Adam; he
 resembled his father Adam, not only in his features, but he was like
 him in every way. He not only had fingers, nose, eyes, carriage,
 voice, and speech, like his father, but he was like him in everything
 else pertaining to body and soul, in manners, disposition, will and
 other points. In these respects Seth did not bear the image of God
 which Adam possessed originally, and which he lost; but he bore the
 likeness of Adam, his father. But this likeness and image were not of
 God by creation, but of Adam by generation.
 
 32. Now, this image included original sin, and the punishment of
 eternal death on account of sin, which God inflicted on Adam. But as
 Adam, by faith in the seed that was to come, recovered the image of
 God, which he had lost, so Seth also recovered the same after he grew
 up to man's estate; for God impressed again his own "likeness" upon
 him through the Word. Paul refers to this when he says to the
 Galatians, "My little children, of whom I am again in travail until
 Christ be formed in you," Gal 4, 19.
 
 33. Of the name Seth I have spoken above. It denotes command, and
 voices the sentiments of one praying and prophesying good news, as if
 Adam had said: "Cain has not only himself fallen, but also caused his
 brother to fall. May God, therefore, grant that this my son Seth shall
 stand as a firm foundation which Satan shall not overthrow." Such
 blessing or prayer is implied in the name.
 
 Vs. 4-5. _And the days of Adam after he begat Seth were eight hundred
 years and he begat sons and daughters. And all the days that Adam
 lived were nine hundred and thirty years and he died._
 
 34. This is another part of the happiness of that age, that men
 attained to so long life. Such longevity, when compared with the
 length of our lives, seems quite incredible. A question naturally
 arises as to the cause and theory of such old age. I am not at all
 displeased with the reasons assigned by some, that the constitutions
 of men were then far better than ours are now, and also that all
 things then used for food were more healthful than those now used. To
 these particulars we must add that important requisite for a long
 life, the greatest moderation in the use and enjoyment of food. To
 what extent the latter conduces to health, is needless to explain.
 
 35. Though the body was sounder than at present, yet the general vigor
 and strength of limb which men had in paradise before the advent of
 sin, had passed away. It is true, however, that their bodily
 well-being was enhanced when, after the fall, they were renewed and
 regenerated through faith in the promised seed. For the same reason,
 also, sin was weakened through faith in the seed. As for us, we have
 lost their strength and vigor just in proportion as we have departed
 from their righteousness.
 
 36. With reference to food, who cannot easily believe that one apple,
 in that primeval age, was more excellent and afforded a greater degree
 of nourishment than a thousand in our time? The roots, also, on which
 they fed, contained infinitely more fragrance, virtue and savor, than
 they possess now. All these conditions, but notably holiness and
 righteousness, the exercise of moderation, then the excellence of the
 fruit and the salubrity of the atmosphere--all these tended to produce
 longevity till the time came for the establishment of a new order by
 God which resulted in a decided reduction of the length of man's life.
 
 37. Now, if we turn to consider thoughtfully our present mode of life,
 we find that we are much more corrupted than nourished by the meat and
 drink we consume. In addition to the immoderation characterizing our
 life, how much have the fruits themselves lost in excellence? Our
 first parents lived moderately, and chose only those things for their
 meat and drink calculated to nourish and refresh their bodies. There
 can be no doubt that after the deluge all the fruits of the earth
 deteriorated greatly. Even so, in our own age, we find all things
 deteriorate. The Italian wines and fruits differ no more from our own
 at the present day than the fruits before the deluge differed from
 those produced amid that brackishness and foulness made by the sea.
 
 38. These causes, with others which many assign for the great
 longevity of the primeval patriarchs, I by no means disapprove. But
 this one reason is quite sufficient, in my opinion, that it pleased
 God to give them such length of life in the best part of the world.
 Yet we see, as Peter strikingly says, that God willed not to spare the
 old world, no, not even the angels in heaven that sinned; so horrible
 a thing is sin. Sodom and Gomorrah were the choicest portion of the
 earth, and yet, on account of sin, they were utterly destroyed. In the
 same manner the Holy Scriptures everywhere set forth the greatness of
 sin, and exhort to the fear of God.
 
 39. We have now the root, or rather the source, of the human race,
 namely Adam and his Eve. From these Seth is born, the first branch of
 this tree. But as Adam lived eight hundred years after the birth of
 Seth, Adam saw himself in possession of numerous progeny. This was the
 period of the restoration of righteousness through the promise of the
 seed to come. Afterwards, however, when men increased, and the sons of
 God mingled with the daughters of men, the world gradually became
 corrupt, and the majesty of the holy patriarchs became an object of
 contempt.
 
 40. It is an attractive sight, to view the number of gray-headed
 patriarchs living at the same time. Only a little ciphering is
 required to do it. If you compute carefully the years of our first
 parent, Adam, you will see that he lived over fifty years with Lamech,
 Noah's father. Accordingly, Adam saw all his descendants down to the
 ninth generation, having an almost infinite number of sons and
 daughters. These, however, Moses does not enumerate, being satisfied
 to number the trunk and the immediate branches down to Noah.
 
 41. There were, without doubt, in this mighty multitude, many very
 distinguished saints, whose history, if we possessed it, would exceed
 in marvelousness all the histories of the world. Compared with it, the
 exodus of the children of Israel from Egypt, their passage through the
 Red Sea and through Jordan, their captivities and returns, would be as
 nothing. But as the primeval world itself perished, so did its
 history. In consequence, the first place in the annals of history
 belongs to the account of the flood, in comparison with which the
 others are only as sparks to the fire. Of the former world we have
 nothing but names, but these are, so to speak, great histories in
 miniature.
 
 42. It is probable that also Eve lived to the age of 800 years and saw
 this great posterity. What must have been her concern, how great her
 labors, how devoted her toils, in visiting, in teaching, and in
 training her children and grandchildren. And what must have been her
 crosses and sighs, when the generation of the Cainites opposed with so
 much determination the true Church, although some of them were even
 converted by the uncovenanted mercy of God.
 
 43. Truly that primeval time was a "golden age," in comparison with
 which our present age is scarcely worthy of being called the age of
 mud. During those primeval centuries, there lived at the same time
 nine patriarchs, together with their posterities, and all of them in
 harmony concerning the faith in the blessed seed! All these glorious
 things Moses just mentions, but does not explain; otherwise this would
 be the history of histories.
 
 
 III. ENOCH.
 
    1. Why Moses writes the history of Enoch and not that of the other
       patriarchs before the flood 43-45.
 
    2. How it is to be understood that Enoch led a godly life and how
       the monks interpret this falsely 46.
 
    3. Enoch's prophecy cited by Jude and where Jude received it 47.
 
    4. Enoch's exceptional courage and how he opposed Satan and the
       world 48.
 
    5. The length of time he led a godly life; and Moses justly praises
       him 49.
 
    6. Why Enoch is so greatly praised 50.
 
    7. The tenor of his preaching 51.
 
    8. He by no means led the life of a monk 51.
 
    9. How he was missed. "He was not" 52.
 
     * Enoch's ascension a proof of the resurrection of the dead 52.
 
   10. The effect of his ascension upon his father and grandfather
       53-55.
 
   11. Whether the other patriarchs living then at once knew that he
       ascended; and how such news affected them 54-56.
 
     * The cross must always precede consolation 54.
 
   12. Why God took Enoch 55.
 
     * The news of Enoch's ascension must have quickened the holy
       patriarchs 56.
 
   13. Enoch's ascension a sign that a better life is offered to man
       57.
 
   14. How Enoch walked and lived before God 58.
 
   15. Enoch a man as we are and yet God took him 58.
 
     * The great sorrow of the patriarchs at Enoch's disappearance and
       their great joy over such an experience 59.
 
     * Seth at the time was high priest, old and tired of life, and
       died soon after Enoch was taken 60-63.
 
     * What Luther would do if he knew in advance the day of his death
       61.
 
     * This temporal life full of want and misery 62.
 
     * The results of Seth's preaching after Enoch's ascension 63.
 
     * The longing of the holy fathers for eternal life, and how it
          should serve us 64.
 
     * Lamentation over the great corruption inherent in our flesh 65.
 
   16. Enoch's ascension was great comfort to the holy patriarchs in
       meeting death 66.
 
     * Of death.
 
       a. It is not death to believers, but a sleep 66.
 
       b. In what way death is a punishment of sin, and how it is
          sweetened 67.
 
     * Luther's thoughts of Enoch's ascension 67.
 
   17. Enoch's ascension extraordinary, and well worthy of
       consideration by all 68.
 
   18. The rabbins' foolish thoughts of Enoch's ascension refuted 69.
 
   19. Enoch doubtless had many temptations 69.
 
   20. Enoch ascended even bodily, and not with that life which he now
       lives 70.
 
     * How and why God willed that the world should have in all times a
       sign of the resurrection, and hence in the first world Enoch
       ascended, in the second Elijah, and in the third Christ 71.
 
     * Lamentation over the unbelief of the world 72.
 
     * Christ's ascension more significant than Enoch's or Elijah's 73.
 
     * The chief doctrine of the first five chapters of Genesis 74.
 
     * How and why death and the resurrection of the dead are set forth
       74.
 
 
 III. ENOCH.
 
 44. There is one history, however, that of Enoch, the seventh from
 Adam, which Moses was not willing to pass over for the reason of its
 being extraordinarily remarkable. Still, even in this case he is
 extremely brief.
 
 In the case of all the other patriarchs he mentions only the names and
 the number of their years. Enoch, however, he delineates in such a
 manner that he seems, in comparison, to slight the other patriarchs
 and, as it were, to disparage them as if they were evil men, or at
 least slighted of God. Did not Adam also, and Seth, and Cainan,
 together with their descendants--did not all these, also, walk with
 God? Why, then, does Moses ascribe this great honor to Enoch only? And
 is the fact that God took Enoch to be understood as if the other
 patriarchs are neither with God nor living? Yes, they all, like Enoch,
 now live with God, and we shall behold them all, at the last day,
 shining equally with Enoch, in the brightest glory!
 
 45. Why, then, does Moses discriminate in favor of Enoch? Why does he
 not bestow the same praise upon the other patriarchs? Although they
 died a natural death, and were not taken by God, yet, also they
 "walked with God." We have heard above concerning Enosh that in his
 times, likewise, mighty things were done. It was in his days that "men
 began to call upon the name of Jehovah," that is, that the Word and
 worship of God began to flourish; and as a result holy men once more
 "walked with God." Why is it then, we repeat, that Moses does not laud
 Enosh equally with Enoch? Why does he bestow such high praise on the
 latter only? For his words are these:
 
 Vs. 21-24. _And Enoch lived sixty and five years, and begat
 Methuselah. And Enoch walked with God after he begat Methuselah three
 hundred years, and begat sons and daughters. And all the days of Enoch
 were three hundred sixty and five years. And Enoch walked with God:
 and he was not; for God took him._
 
 46. When Moses says that Enoch "walked with God," we must beware of
 taking the monastic view in the premises, as if he had kept himself
 secluded in some private corner, and there lived a monastic life. No,
 so eminent a patriarch must be placed on a candlestick, or, as our
 Saviour Christ expresses it, set as a city on a hill, that he may
 shine forth in the public ministry.
 
 47. It is as a bearer of such public office the Apostle Jude extols
 him in his epistle, when he says: "To these also Enoch, the seventh
 from Adam, prophesied, saying, Behold, the Lord came with ten
 thousands of holy ones, to execute judgment upon all, and to convict
 all the ungodly of all their works of ungodliness, which they have
 ungodly wrought, and of all the hard things which ungodly sinners have
 spoken against him," Jude vs. 14, 15. From what source Jude obtained
 these facts I know not. Probably they remained in the memory of man
 from the primitive age of the world; or it may be that holy men
 committed to writing many of the sacred words and works of the
 patriarchs as they were handed down from age to age by tradition.
 
 48. It is this public ministry that Moses lauds, exalting the pious
 Enoch as a sun above all the other patriarchs and teachers of the
 primeval world. Wherefore, we may gather from all these circumstances
 that Enoch possessed a particular fullness of the Holy Spirit, and a
 preeminent greatness of mind, seeing that he opposed with a strength
 of faith excelling that of all the other patriarchs, Satan and the
 church of the Cainites. To walk with God, is not, as we have before
 observed, for a man to flee into a desert, or to conceal himself in
 some corner, but to go forth in his vocation, and to set himself
 against the iniquity and malice of Satan and the world, and to confess
 the seed of the woman; to condemn the religion and the pursuits of the
 world, and to preach, through Christ, another life after this.
 
 49. This is the manner of life led for three hundred years by the
 greatest prophet and high priest of his generation, Enoch, the man who
 had six patriarchs for his teachers. Most deservedly, therefore, does
 Moses extol him as a disciple of greatest eminence, taught and trained
 by many patriarchal masters, and those the greatest and most
 illustrious; and, moreover, so equipped with the Holy Spirit that he
 was the prophet of prophets and the saint of saints in that primeval
 world. The greatness of Enoch, then, consisted in the first place in
 his office and ministry.
 
 50. In the second place, he receives preeminent praise because it was
 the will of God that he should be an example to the whole world in
 verifying, and showing the comfort of, the faith in the future life.
 This text, therefore, is worthy of being written in letters of gold
 and of being deeply engraven in the inmost heart.
 
 51. Here we have another view of what it means to walk with God. It is
 to preach the life beyond this present life; to teach concerning the
 seed to come, concerning the serpent's head that is to be bruised and
 the kingdom of Satan that is to be destroyed. Such was the preaching
 of Enoch, who nevertheless was a husband, and the father of a family;
 who had a wife and children, who governed his household, and procured
 his subsistence by the labor of his own hands. Wherefore say or think
 no more about living in a monastery, which has merely the outward show
 of walking with God. When this godly man had lived, after the birth of
 Methuselah, 300 years in the truest religion, in faith, in patience
 and in the midst of a thousand crosses, all of which he endured and
 overcame by faith in the blessed seed to come, he appeared no more.
 
 52. Mark how pregnant these words are with power! He does not say, as
 he expresses himself concerning the other patriarchs, "and he died,"
 but "he was not," an expression that all scholars have come to regard
 as a pure proof of the resurrection of the dead. In the Hebrew this
 meaning is most strikingly brought out. And Enoch walked with God, and
 _veenenu_, "he was not." The original signifies that Enoch was lost or
 disappeared, contrary to the thought or expectation of all the other
 patriarchs, and at once ceased to be among men.
 
 53. Without doubt, at the severe loss of so great a man, both his
 father and his grandfather were filled with grief and consternation;
 for they well knew with what devotion he had taught the true religion,
 and how many things he had suffered. When they had thus suddenly lost
 such a man as Enoch, who had strong testimony of his godliness both
 from men and from God himself, what do you think must have been their
 feelings?
 
 54. Find me, if you can, a poet or a fluent orator to do justice to
 this text and to treat it with power! Enosh, Seth, and all the other
 patriarchs knew not by whom or whither Enoch was taken away; they
 sought him, but found him not. His son Methuselah sought him, and his
 other children and his grandchildren sought him, but they found him
 not. They suspected, no doubt, the malice of the Cainites, and they
 probably thought that he was killed, as Abel was, and secretly buried.
 
 At length, however, they learned, through a revelation made to them of
 God by an angel, that Enoch was taken away by God himself, into
 paradise. This fact they probably did not know the first or the second
 day after the translation, and perhaps not till many months, or it may
 be many years, afterwards. In the meantime the holy men bewailed his
 wretched lot, as if he had been slain by the Cainite hypocrites. It is
 always the divine rule that the cross and affliction should precede
 consolation. God never comforts any but the afflicted, just as he
 never quickens unto life any but the dead, nor ever justifies any but
 sinners! He always creates all things out of nothing.
 
 55. It was a severe cross and affliction to the patriarchs when they
 saw taken away from them, to appear nowhere among them, him who had
 governed the whole world by his doctrine, and who had done so many
 illustrious deeds in the course of his life. While these patriarchs
 were mourning and bewailing the misfortune of the holy man, behold!
 consolation was at hand, and it was revealed to them that the Lord had
 "translated" Enoch! Such an expression we have not concerning any
 other man than Enoch, except Elijah. God willed, therefore, to testify
 by an object lesson, that he has prepared for his saints another life
 after this life, in which they shall live forever with God.
 
 56. The Hebrew verb _lakak_ does not signify "translated" according to
 the impression conveyed by our use of the word, but "received to
 himself." These words are, accordingly, words of life, revealed by God
 through some angel to the patriarch Enoch, and to the whole of that
 generation of saints, that they might have the consolation and promise
 of eternal life, not only through a word, but also through an act, as
 before in the case of Abel. How delightful must have been to them this
 proclamation, when they heard that Enoch was not dead, nor slain by
 wicked men, nor taken away from them by the fraud or snares of Satan,
 but translated; that is, "received to himself" by the living and
 omnipotent God.
 
 57. This is that bright gem which Moses sought to display in the
 present chapter--that the omnipotent God did not take unto himself
 geese, or cows, or blocks of wood, or stones, but a man, even Enoch,
 to teach there was reserved for men another and better life than this
 present one, so filled with evils and calamities of every kind.
 Although Enoch was a sinner, yet the manner of his departure from this
 life proved that God had prepared for him and brought him to another
 and eternal life; for he entered upon the life with God, and God took
 him to himself.
 
 58. Accordingly, Enoch's walking with God signifies that he was in
 this life a faithful witness of eternal life to be gained after this
 life through the promised seed. This is what living with God means,
 not the mere animal life subject to corruption. Inasmuch as Enoch
 constantly preached this doctrine, God verified and fulfilled this
 preaching in the patriarch himself, that we might fully and surely
 believe it; in that Enoch, a man like unto ourselves, born of flesh
 and blood, as we also are, of the seed of Adam, was taken up into
 heaven by God, and now lives the life of God, that is, an eternal
 life.
 
 59. Before the generation of patriarchs knew the facts in the case, it
 was appalling to them to hear that so holy a man as Enoch had
 disappeared so completely that his whereabouts or manner of death was
 beyond everybody's ken. Great, therefore, was the grief of the pious
 parents and elders. But afterwards incredible joy and consolation were
 theirs when they heard that their son lived with God himself and had
 been translated by God to an angelic and eternal life.
 
 60. This consolation God made known to Seth, who was the greatest
 prophet and high priest after his father Adam had fallen asleep in the
 faith of the blessed seed fifty-seven years before, Seth having then
 arrived at about his eight hundred and sixtieth year. Seth, being now
 an old man and full of days and without doubt fully confirmed in the
 faith of the blessed seed to come, and anxiously awaiting deliverance
 from the body and earnestly desiring to be gathered to his people,
 died with greater joy about fifty-two years afterward, because of the
 translation of his son Enoch. Fifty-two years were indeed but a short
 time for an old man wherein to make his will and visit all his
 grandchildren, and preach to them and exhort them to persevere in the
 faith of the promised seed and to hope in that eternal life unto which
 his son and their father Enoch had been translated to live with God.
 In this manner, doubtless, the aged saint employed his time among his
 descendants, bidding farewell to and blessing each one. Full of years
 and full of joy, he no doubt thus taught and comforted both himself
 and them.
 
 61. If I knew that I were appointed to die in six months' time, I
 should scarcely find time enough wherein to make my will. I would
 remind men of what had been the testimony of my preaching, exhort and
 entreat them to continue and persevere therein, and warn and guard
 them as far as my powers of mind could do so, against the offense of
 false doctrine. All these things could not be done in one day, nor in
 one month. Those fifty years during which Seth lived after the
 translation of Enoch, formed but a very short period for him (for
 spiritual men have an altogether different method of calculating time
 than the children of this world) in which to instruct all his family
 in the nature of this glorious consolation--that another and eternal
 life is to be hoped for after this life, a hope which God revealed to
 his saints by the marvelous fact of his having taken to himself Enoch,
 who was of the same flesh and blood with ourselves.
 
 62. "Follow not," said he, "the evil inclinations of your nature, but
 despise this present life and look forward to a better. For what evil
 exists that is not found in this present life? To how many diseases,
 to what great dangers, to what dreadful calamities, is it not subject?
 to say nothing now of those evils which are the greatest of all
 afflictions, those spiritual distresses which burden with anguish the
 mind and conscience, such as the Law, sin, and death itself.
 
 63. "Why is it then, that ye so anxiously expect such great
 consolations from this present life as to seem incapable of ever being
 completely satisfied? Were it not for the fact that God wants us to
 live to proclaim him, to thank him, and to serve the brethren, life is
 such as to suggest its voluntary termination. This service, therefore,
 let us render unto God, with all diligence. Let us look forward with
 continual sighs to that true life to which, my children, your brother
 Enoch has been translated by the glorious God."
 
 These and like things the aged saint taught his people after his great
 consolation had been revealed. There is no doubt that after it was
 understood that Enoch was translated alive into immortality, they
 longed for the time when they also might be delivered out of this
 afflicted life, in the same manner, or at least by death.
 
 64. If, then, those godly patriarchs of old so anxiously looked
 forward to the eternal life and desired it to come, on account of Abel
 and Enoch, whom they knew to be living with God, how much greater
 ought to be our expectation and desire, who have Christ for our leader
 unto eternal life, who is gone before, as Peter says in Acts 3, 20-26.
 They believed in him as one to come; we know that he has become
 manifest, and has gone to the Father to prepare for us a home, and to
 sit at the right hand of the Father to intercede for us. Ought we not,
 therefore, to sigh for those future things, and to hate those of the
 present? It is not an Enoch or an Abel who sets before us, as those
 patriarchs did before their people, the hope of a better life to come;
 but Christ, the leader and author of life himself. It becomes us,
 therefore, firmly to despise this life and world, and with swelling
 breast to pant after the coming glory of eternal life.
 
 65. Herein we feel how great is the infirmity of our flesh which lusts
 after these present things with eager desire but fails to rejoice in
 the certainties of the life to come. How is it possible that a fact
 should not be most certain which has for witnesses not only Abel and
 Enoch and Elijah, but also Christ himself, the head and the first
 fruits of those that rise? Most worthy, therefore, the hatred of both
 God and men are the wicked Epicureans; and most worthy our hatred also
 is our own flesh, when we wholly plunge into temporal cares and
 securely disregard the eternal blessings.
 
 66. Worthy of note and carefully to be remembered is the statement
 that Enoch was taken up and received, not by some patriarch or angel,
 but by God himself. This was the very consolation which rendered the
 deaths of the patriarchs endurable; yea, which enabled them to depart
 from this life with joy. They saw that the seed which had been
 promised them warred, even before he was revealed, with Satan, and
 bruised, through Enoch, his head. Such was the hope entertained by
 them concerning themselves and all their believing descendants, and,
 in perfect security, they despised death as having ceased to be death,
 as having become a sleep from which they were to awaken into life
 eternal. "To them that believe," death is not really death, but a
 sleep. When the terror, the power, and the sting of death are taken
 away, it can no longer be considered death. The greater the faith of
 the dying man, the weaker is death. On the other hand, the weaker the
 faith of the dying man, the more bitter is death.
 
 67. In this text we are also reminded of the nature of sin. If Adam
 had not sinned, we should not have been dying men, but, like Enoch of
 old, we should have been translated, without fear or pain, from this
 animal life to that better and spiritual life. But although we have
 forfeited that life, the present history of the patriarch Enoch
 assures us that the restitution of paradise and of eternal life is not
 to be despaired of. Our flesh cannot be free from pain, but where
 conscience has obtained peace, death is no more than a swoon, by means
 of which we pass out of this life into eternal rest. Had our nature
 remained innocent, it would not have known such pain of the flesh. We
 should have been taken up as if asleep, presently to awaken in heaven,
 and to lead the life of the angels. Now, however, that the flesh is
 defiled by sin, it must first be destroyed by death. As to Enoch,
 perhaps he lay down in some grassy spot and fell asleep praying; and
 sleeping he was taken up by God, without pain; without death.
 
 68. Let us give proper attention to this text to which Moses attaches
 special importance as embodying an account of the most noteworthy
 event of the primitive world. What fact could possibly inspire more
 wonder and admiration than that a man, a corrupt sinner, born of flesh
 and blood, as we are, and defiled as we are by that sin and
 corruption, so obtained the victory over death as not to die at all!
 Christ himself is man, and righteous, yet our sins caused him to
 suffer the bitterest of all deaths; but he is delivered on the third
 day, and lifts himself up unto life eternal. In Enoch there was the
 singular fact that he died not at all, but was caught up, without
 death intervening, to the life spiritual and eternal.
 
 69. Emphatically deserving of aversion are the rabbins. The sublimest
 passages of the Scriptures they shamefully corrupt. As a case in
 point, they prate concerning Enoch that, while he was good and
 righteous, he very much inclined toward carnal desires. God,
 therefore, out of pity, prevented his sinning and perishing through
 death. Is not this, I pray you, a shocking corruption of the text
 before us? Why should they say concerning Enoch in particular, that he
 was subject to the evil desires of the flesh? As if all the other
 patriarchs did not experience the same. Why do they not notice the
 repeated testimony of Moses, that Enoch "walked with God"? That is
 certainly evidence that Enoch did not indulge those evil inclinations
 of his flesh, but bravely overcame them by faith. The Jews when
 speaking of the corrupt desires of the flesh have reference to lust,
 avarice, pride, and similar promptings. Enoch, however, without doubt,
 lived amid mightier temptations than these; like Paul, he felt that
 "thorn in the flesh"; day by day he wrestled with Satan; and when, at
 length, he was completely bruised and worn out with every kind of
 temptation, God commanded him to depart from this life to the blessed
 life to come.
 
 70. What that life is which Enoch now lives, we who still continue to
 be flesh and blood cannot possibly know. It is enough for us to know
 that Enoch was translated in his body. This the patriarchs must have
 clearly understood by revelation, and about to die, they needed this
 comfort. This much we know also. But what that holy patriarch is now
 doing, where he is, and how he lives, we know not. We know that he
 lives; and we also know that the life he lives is not like unto this
 animal life, but that he is with God. This the text before us
 distinctly declares.
 
 71. This fact, then, makes the narrative under consideration so
 memorable that God intended to use it for the purpose of setting
 before the old, primeval world the hope of a better life. Likewise, to
 the second world, which had the Law, God gave the example of Elijah,
 who also was taken up into heaven and translated by the Lord before
 the very eyes of his own servant Elisha. We are now in the New
 Covenant, in a third world, as it were. We have Christ himself, our
 great deliverer, as our glorious example, who ascended into the
 heavens, taking with him many of his saints.
 
 It was God's will to establish for every age a testimonial of the
 resurrection of the dead, that he might thereby allure our minds by
 all possible attractions from this corrupt and in many ways wretched
 life, in which, however, we will gladly serve God as long as it shall
 please him, by the faithful performance of all public and private
 duties, and especially by instructing others in holiness and in the
 knowledge of God. But, as the apostle says, we have here "no certain
 dwelling-place," 1 Cor 4, 11. Christ, our forerunner, is gone before
 us, that he might prepare for us, the eternal mansions, Jn 14, 2-3.
 
 72. Just as we find many among us by whom such things are considered
 absurd, and not sufficiently worthy of faith, so there is no doubt
 that this account was deemed ridiculous by most people. The world is
 ever the same. For that reason these things have by divine authority
 been committed to writing and recorded for the saints and the
 faithful, that these might read, understand, believe and heed them.
 They present to our sight a manifest triumph over death and sin, and
 afford us a sure comfort in Enoch's victory over the Law, and the
 wrath and judgment of God. To the godly nothing can yield more grace
 and joy than these antediluvian records.
 
 73. But the New Testament truly overflows with the mercy of God. While
 we do not discard records like these, we have others far superior. We
 have the Son of God himself ascending to the skies, and sitting at the
 right hand of God. In him we see the serpent's head completely
 bruised, and the life lost in paradise restored. This is more than the
 translation of Enoch and of Elijah; still, it was God's will in this
 manner to administer comfort to the original world and also to the
 succeeding one, which had the Law.
 
 74. The paramount doctrine contained in these five chapters is,
 accordingly, this: that men died and lived again. In Adam all men
 died. But believers lived again through the promised seed, as the
 history of Abel and Enoch testifies. In Adam, death was appointed for
 Seth and all others; hence it is written of every one: "And he died."
 But Abel and Enoch illustrate the resurrection from the dead and the
 life immortal. The purpose intended is that we should not despair in
 death but entertain the unwavering assurance that the believers in the
 promised seed shall live, and be taken by God, whether from the water
 or the fire or the gibbet, or the tomb. We desire to live, and we
 shall live, namely the eternal life through the promised seed, which
 remains when this is past.
 
 
 IV. LAMECH AND HIS SON NOAH.
 
    A. LAMECH.
 
       1. He lived at the time Enoch was taken to heaven 75.
 
        * To what end Enoch's ascension served the holy patriarchs 75.
 
       2. Why Lamech called his son Noah 76-77.
 
        * The erroneous comments of the rabbins taken by Lyra without
          any good reason 78-79.
 
       3. On what Lamech's heart was centered at Noah's birth 79-81.
 
       4. How and why Lamech erred in the case of his son as Eve did at
          Cain's birth 80.
 
        * The longing of the patriarchs for the Messiah was of the Holy
          Spirit 81.
 
        * Complaint of the world's ingratitude 82.
 
        * The patriarchs' greatest treasure and desire 82.
 
        * Comparison of the three worlds 83-85.
 
        * Why the present world so lightly esteems Christ, whom the
          patriarchs so highly revered 84.
 
        * The first world was the best, the last the worst 85.
 
 
 IV. LAMECH AND HIS SON NOAH.
 
 A. Lamech.
 
 Vs. 28-29. _And Lamech lived a hundred eighty and two years, and begat
 a son: and he called his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort us
 in our work and in the toil of our hands, which cometh because of the
 ground which Jehovah hath cursed._
 
 75. Only incidentally Moses adverts in this account to the name of
 Noah, which certainly deserves a somewhat careful examination. Lamech
 was living when Enoch was taken away by God out of this life into the
 other immortal life. When the great glory of God had become manifest
 in the extraordinary miracle of the rapture from a lowly estate into
 life eternal of Enoch who was a man like us, a husband, a man with
 family, having sons, daughters, household, fields and cattle, the holy
 fathers were filled and fired with such joy as to conclude that the
 glad day was near which should witness the fulfilment of the promise.
 That Enoch was taken up living, to be with the Lord, appeared as a
 salient display of divine mercy.
 
 76. As Adam and Eve, after the reception of the promise, were so
 absorbed in their hope that, in their joy to see a man like
 themselves, they identified Cain with the promised seed, so in my
 judgment Lamech committed a similar pious error when he gave his son
 the name Noah, and said: This same shall comfort us, and shall deliver
 us from the labors and sorrows of this life. Original sin, and the
 punishment thereof, shall now cease. We shall now be restored to our
 former innocent state. The curse shall now cease which rests on the
 earth on account of the sin of Adam; and all the other miseries
 inflicted on the human race on account of sin, shall also cease.
 
 77. Such considerations as these prompted Lamech to base upon the fact
 of his grandfather's rapture into paradise unaccompanied by pain,
 sickness and death, the hope that presently the whole of paradise was
 to be ushered in. He concludes that Noah was the promised seed by whom
 the earth was to be restored. This notion that the curse is about to
 be lifted is expressed in unmistakable terms. Not so; neither the
 curse of sin nor its penalty can be removed unless original sin itself
 shall have been removed first.
 
 78. The rabbins, those pestilent corrupters of the Scriptures, surely
 deserve aversion. This is their interpretation of the passage in
 question: He shall bring us rest from the toil and labor of our hands
 by showing us an easier way of cultivating the earth. With a
 plowshare, by a yoke of oxen, the earth shall be broken up; the
 present mode of digging it with man's hand shall cease.
 
 I wonder that Lyra is satisfied with this interpretation, and follows
 it. He ought to have been familiar with the unchanging practice of the
 Jews to pervert Scripture by substituting a material meaning for a
 spiritual one, in order to gain glory among men. Could anything more
 derogatory to the holy patriarch be said than that he gave such
 expression to his joy over the birth of his son Noah on account of an
 advantage pertaining to the belly?
 
 79. No; it was a much greater concern than this which filled his mind
 with anxiety. It was the wrath of God, and death, with all the other
 calamities of this life. His hope was that Noah, as the promised seed,
 would put an end to these evils. And therefore it was that he thus
 exulted with joy at the birth of this his son, predicted good things,
 and called upon others to join him in the same hope. His thoughts did
 not dwell upon the plow, nor upon oxen, nor upon other trivial things
 of the kind pertaining to this present life, as the blind Jews rave.
 He was really filled with the hope that this his son Noah was that
 seed to come which should restore the former blessed state of
 paradise, in which there was no curse. As if he had said: Now we feel
 the curse in the very labors of our hands. We toil and sweat in
 cultivating the earth, yet it yields us in return nothing but briers
 and thorns. But there shall arise a new and happy age. The curse on
 the earth which was inflicted on account of sin shall cease, because
 sin shall cease. This is the true meaning of the text before us.
 
 80. But the holy father was deceived. The glory of bringing about that
 renewal belonged, not to the son of a man but to the Son of God. The
 rabbins are silly. Although the earth is not dug by the hands of men,
 but by the use of oxen, yet the labor of man's hand has not ceased.
 Enoch, by his translation, does not disclose the solace of bodily
 easement, agreeable to the belly, but deliverance from sin and death.
 Lamech hoped, in addition, for the restoration of the former state. He
 believed to see the inauguration of this change in his grandfather
 Enoch, and felt assured that the deliverance, or the renewal of all
 things, was close at hand. Just so Eve, as we have already observed,
 when she brought forth her first-born son Cain, said, I have gotten a
 man with the help of Jehovah, one who shall take away all these
 punishments inflicted on sin, and bring about our restoration. But,
 like Eve, the good and holy Lamech was deceived in his ardent longing
 for the restoration of the world.
 
 81. All these anxieties plainly show how those holy patriarchs longed
 for, hoped for, and sighed for, that great "restitution of all
 things," Acts 3, 21. Although they herein erred, even as Eve erred and
 was deceived with respect to Cain, this desire for deliverance in
 itself, was of the Holy Spirit, and proved the truth and constancy of
 their faith in the promised seed. When Eve named her son Cain, and
 when Lamech called his son Noah, these names were but birth cries, as
 the apostle represents them, of the whole creation, groaning and
 travailing in pain together, and earnestly expecting the resurrection
 of the dead, deliverance from sin, the restoration of all things, and
 the manifestation of the sons of God, Rom 8, 19-23. The simplest and
 true meaning, accordingly, is that Lamech, after seeing the reality of
 the future life demonstrated by the translation of Enoch from the
 afflictions and toils caused by sin, has a son born to him, whom he
 calls Noah, which means rest, an expression of the hope that
 deliverance from the curse of sin and sin itself shall take place
 through him. This interpretation accords with the analogy of faith,
 and confirms the hope for a resurrection and a life eternal.
 
 82. Such longing for the future life on the part of the holy men whose
 shoes we are unworthy to clean, contrasts strangely with the horrible
 ingratitude of our time. How great the difference between having and
 wishing! Those patriarchs were men of transcendent holiness, equipped
 with the highest endowments, the heroes of the world! In them we
 behold the strongest desire for the seed which is to come; that is
 their greatest treasure; they thirst, they hunger, they yearn, they
 pant for Christ! And we, who have Christ among us, who know him as one
 revealed, offered, glorified, sitting at the right hand of God and
 making intercession for us--we despise him and hold him in greater
 contempt than any other creature! O, the wretchedness of it! O, the
 sin of it!
 
 83. Note the difference between the several ages of the world! The
 primeval age was the most excellent and holy. It contained the noblest
 jewels of the whole human race. After the flood there still existed
 many great and eminent men--patriarchs, and kings, and prophets; and
 although they were not the equals of the patriarchs before the flood,
 yet in them also there appeared a bright longing for Christ, as Christ
 says: "For I say unto you, that many prophets and kings desired to see
 the things which ye see, and saw them not; and to hear the things
 which ye hear, and heard them not," Lk 10, 24. And then there is our
 own age, the age of the New Testament; to this Christ has been
 revealed. This age is, as it were, the waste and dregs of the whole
 world. It holds nothing in greater contempt than Christ, than whom a
 previous age knew nothing more precious.
 
 84. What is the cause of this grave state of affairs? To be sure, our
 flesh, the world, and the devil. We altogether loathe what we have,
 according to the proverb:
 
    _Omne rarum carum; vilescit quotidianum._
    "All that's rare, is dear; vile is what is here."
 
 And apt is the poetic truism:
 
    _Minuit praesentia famam._
    "Sight levels what fancy has exalted."
 
 As far as the revelation is concerned, we are far richer than the
 patriarchs. But their devotion to a comparatively inferior revelation
 was greater; they were lovers of the bridegroom. We, on the other
 hand, are that fat, bloated, wanton servant, Deut 32, 15; for we have
 the Word and are overwhelmed by the abundance of it.
 
 85. In the same degree as the first world was excellent and holy, the
 latter-day world is evil and wicked. In view of the fact, then, that
 God did not spare the first, primitive world, and destroyed the second
 world by overturning kingdom after kingdom, and government after
 government, what shall we expect to be the end of this latter-day
 world which in security despises the Christ, the desire of nations, as
 he is called by Haggai, in spite of the fact that he urges himself
 upon us to the point of weariness!
 
 
 B. NOAH.
 
    1. Remarkableness of the fact that Noah refrained so long from
       wedlock 86.
 
    2. He was fit to marry, but had reasons for abstaining 87.
 
    3. What his reasons were 88.
 
    4. His chastity is highly praised by Moses in few words 89.
 
    5. The Jews' lies about the reasons for his chastity refuted 90-91.
 
     * The Jews' lies as to why Shem was called the first-born 91.
 
     * Papists without reason take offense at Moses relating so much
       about the birth of the children of the patriarchs 92-93.
 
    6. Noah shines like a bright star as an example of chastity among
       all the patriarchs 93.
 
    7. Noah remained single, not because he despised marriage; and why
       he finally married 94.
 
    8. How his sons were born one after the other 95-97.
 
     * Why Shem was preferred to Japheth 96.
 
     * How to meet the objections to the birth of Noah's sons 97.
 
    9. Noah an excellent example of chastity 98.
 
     * The threefold world.
 
       a. The first world a truly golden age and the most holy. How and
          why it was punished by God 99-100.
 
       b. The second world is full of idolatry, and will be severely
          punished by God 100.
 
       c. The third world is the worst, and hence can expect the
          hardest punishment 101.
 
       d. The punishment of these three worlds portrayed in the colors
          of the rainbow 101.
 
       e. How believing hearts act upon considering sin and the world's
          punishment 102.
 
 
 B. NOAH.
 
 V. 32. _And Noah was five hundred years old: and Noah begat Shem, Ham,
 and Japheth._
 
 86. Here again we meet with surprising brevity. As is his custom,
 Moses expresses in the fewest possible words the greatest and most
 important things, which the ignorant reader passes by unobserved. But
 you will say, perhaps, Of what import is it that Noah first begat sons
 when he was five hundred years old? Why, if Noah had no children all
 those 500 years, he either endured that length of time the severe
 trial of unfruitfulness or, as appears to me more likely, he abstained
 from marriage all those years, setting an example of most marvelous
 chastity. I do not speak here of the abominable chastity of the
 Papists; nor of our own. Look at the prophets and the apostles, and
 even at some of the other patriarchs, who doubtless were chaste and
 holy. But what are they in comparison with this man Noah, who,
 possessed of masculine vigor, managed to live a chaste life without
 marriage for five hundred years?
 
 87. Now you will scarcely find one in a thousand among the men of our
 age who, at the age of thirty, has not known woman. Moreover, Noah,
 after he had lived a single life for so many centuries, at length took
 to himself a wife, and begat children; which latter fact carries its
 own proof that he was in a state appropriate for marriage prior to
 this, and had a definite reason for practicing continence.
 
 88. In the first place, it is evident that such unequaled chastity
 must necessarily have been a peculiar gift of God. It evinced a nature
 almost angelic. It does not seem a thing possible in the nature of man
 to live 500 years without knowing a wife. In the next place these five
 centuries of chastity in Noah manifest some signal displeasure with
 the world. For what other reason are we to conclude that he abstained
 from marriage than because he had seen the descendants of his uncle
 and aunt degenerate into giants and tyrants, filling the world with
 violence? He thought in consequence, that he would rather have no
 children at all than such as those. And my belief is that he would
 never have taken to himself a wife at all if he had not been
 admonished and commanded so to do either by the patriarchs or by some
 angel. He who had refrained from marriage for 500 years might have
 refrained during all the rest of his life.
 
 89. In this manner Moses explains in brief words exceedingly weighty
 facts, and, what the ignorant reader would never observe owing to the
 failure of chastity being mentioned in express words, he commends the
 chastity of Noah above that of all the other inhabitants of the
 primeval world, setting him up as an example of all but angelic
 chastity.
 
 90. The Jews, according to their custom, play the fool, and fable that
 Noah for centuries denied himself a wife because he knew that God
 would destroy the world by the flood. If, therefore, Noah had married,
 like all the other patriarchs, in the earlier part of his life--that
 is, when he was about a hundred years old or less--he himself would
 have peopled the world in the space of 400 years; and then God would
 have been compelled to destroy both the father himself and the whole
 of his progeny. To this fable they add the other, that Shem was called
 the first-born for the reason that he was the first to receive
 circumcision.
 
 91. In a word, these Jews corrupt everything and twist it to suit
 their own carnal bent and ambition. If Noah abstained from marriage
 for the reason which they assign, why did not all the other
 patriarchs, for the same reason, abstain from marriage and fatherhood?
 These comments of the rabbins are accordingly frivolous and
 nonsensical. Why do they not rather urge the real cause, that it was a
 special gift that Noah, a vigorous man, abstained from marriage for
 five hundred years? Throughout the course of time no instance of such
 continence is found.
 
 92. The book of Genesis highly offends the Papists because it mentions
 so often that the fathers begat sons and daughters. They say of this
 book that it is a book in which little more is contained than the
 record that the patriarchs were men of extravagant love for their
 wives; and they consider it obscene that Moses should make mention of
 such things with such attention to detail. But, in the impurity of
 their hearts, they can not refrain from befouling the most exalted
 chastity.
 
 93. If you would really behold the brightest examples of chastity the
 whole world contains, read Moses as he relates that the patriarchs did
 not marry until they were of advanced age. Among them Noah shines
 forth a star of first magnitude, inasmuch as he did not marry until he
 had reached the five hundredth year of his life. Where will you find
 such eminent examples of chastity in the papacy? Although there are
 some among the Papists who do not actually sin with their bodies, yet
 how foul and filthy are their minds! And all this is judgment upon
 their contempt for marriage, which God himself has designed to be a
 remedy for the corruption of nature.
 
 94. Another reason why Noah refrained from marriage has been
 mentioned. He did not condemn marriage, nor did he consider it to be a
 profane or impure manner of life; but he saw that the descendants of
 the elder patriarchs had degenerated to the level of the ungodly
 generation of the Cainites. Such children as these he felt he could
 not endure; he rather waited, in the fear of God, the end of the
 world. When afterwards he did enter into marriage, and begat children,
 he no doubt did it by reason of some particular admonition and command
 of God.
 
 95. Here a question naturally arises concerning the order in which
 Noah's sons were born. It will be worth our while to inquire into this
 matter, so that our computation of the years of the world may have a
 reliable basis. The common opinion is that Shem was the first-born of
 Noah, because his name is mentioned first in order. The testimony of
 Scripture, however, compels us to conclude that Japheth was the
 first-born, Shem the second, and Ham the last. The truth of this is
 proved in the following manner: Shem begat his son Arpachshad two
 years after the flood, when he was 100 years old, Gen 11, 10. Hence
 Shem was 98 years old when the flood came, and Noah, when Shem was
 born, was 498 years old. But Japheth was evidently born before Shem,
 for he was the elder brother, Gen 10, 21. It plainly follows,
 therefore, that only Ham, the youngest brother, was born when Noah was
 500 years old.
 
 96. The reason why Shem is mentioned before Japheth is not because he
 was first circumcised, as the Jews, who always are hunting carnal
 glory, falsely claim, but because it was through him that Christ, the
 promised seed, was to come. For the same reason, Abraham, the
 youngest, is given precedence to his brothers, Haran and Nahor.
 
 97. But you will perhaps say, How does this agree with the text which
 positively says, "Noah was five hundred years old; and Noah begat
 Shem, Ham and Japheth"? Harmony is restored if you make out of the
 preterit a pluperfect, and read the passage thus:--When Noah was five
 hundred years old he had begotten Shem, Ham, and Japheth. Moses does
 not record the particular year in which each son was born, but merely
 mentions the year in which the number of sons born to Noah reached
 three. Thus the biblical record is reduced to harmony.
 
 98. As conclusion to the fifth chapter Moses presents the finest and
 most noteworthy example of chastity. Saintly and continent throughout
 his career, Noah had just rounded out his fifth century when he began
 married life. Thus far, he had renounced matrimony, repelled by the
 licentiousness of the young, who were drifting into the depravity of
 the Cainites. Notwithstanding, at the call of God, he obediently
 entered upon marriage, although it was quite possible for him to
 remain chaste, as a celibate.
 
 99. Such is the description given by Moses of the first, the original
 world, in five brief chapters. But it is readily seen that in the
 beginning was the real golden age of which poets have made mention,
 their information being doubtless the traditions and the utterances of
 the fathers.
 
 100. But as the sins of men increased, God spared not the old world,
 but destroyed it by a flood utterly, even as he did not spare it when
 under the dispensation of the Law. Because of its idolatry and the
 impiousness of its worship, he not only overturned one kingdom after
 another, but even his own people, the Jews, having been severely
 punished at his hands by various afflictions and captivities, were at
 length utterly destroyed by the Roman armies.
 
 101. Our age, which is the third age of the world, although it is the
 age of grace, is so filled with blasphemies and abominations that it
 is not possible either to express them in language or to form a mental
 image of them. This age therefore shall not be punished by temporal
 punishment, but by eternal death and eternal fire, or, if I may so
 express it, by a flood of fire. The very rainbow even, with its
 colors, contains a prophetic intimation of these things. The first
 color is sea-green, representing the destruction of the first world by
 the waters of the flood, because of violence and lust; the middle
 color of the bow is yellow, prefiguring the various calamities by
 which God avenged the idolatry and wickedness of the second age; the
 third and last color of the bow is fiery red, for fire shall at length
 consume the world, with all its iniquities and sins.
 
 102. Wherefore, let us constantly pray that God may so rule our hearts
 by his fear and may so fill us with confidence in his mercy, that we
 are able with joy to await our deliverance and the righteous
 punishment of this ungodly world. Amen. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VI.
 
 
 I. THE SINS OF THE FIRST WORLD, THE CAUSE OF ITS DESTRUCTION.
 
  * How this chapter and the preceding one are connected 1.
 
  * It is terrible that God destroyed by a flood the first world, which
    was the best 2.
 
  * Of pride and the proud.
 
       1. How God humbles what is high and grand in the eyes of the
          world and has the best gifts 3-4.
 
        * How man can meet the judgments of God 4.
 
       2. The more gifts man has the greater his pride 5.
 
       3. The most terrible examples of punishment God gives in the
          case of the proud and such examples should be diligently
          pondered 6-7.
 
        * The complaint that the world is hardened by reason of God's
          judgments 7-8.
 
       4. How the ancient world was misled into pride through its gifts
          9-10.
 
       5. Pride is the common weakness of human nature 11.
 
       6. In what ways man is moved to pride 12-13.
 
          a. The chief sin of the old world 14-15.
 
           * Pride is the spring of all vices 15.
 
          b. How the old world sinned against the first table of the
             law, and brought on the sins against the second table 16.
 
          c. How and why God punished the old world 17.
 
           * From the punishment of the first world we conclude that
             the last world will be also punished 18.
 
          d. Whether the first world was wicked before Noah's birth; on
             what occasion its wickedness increased 19.
 
           * Noah the martyr of martyrs 20.
 
           * Why Lamech called his son Noah 21.
 
          e. How sin greatly increased in the days of Noah 22.
 
           * Why Noah remained unmarried so long, which was his
             greatest cross 23.
 
          f. When the wickedness of the old world began 24.
 
           * Concerning unchastity.
 
             (1) It is the foundation of all want and misery 24.
 
             (2) It is the spring of many other sins 25.
 
             (3) How to remedy it 25.
 
             (4) Whether bearing children is in itself to be reckoned
                 as unchastity, and how far Moses denounces it 26.
 
             (5) Unchastity makes the bearing of children difficult 27.
 
          g. The reason the sons of God looked upon the daughters of
             men 28.
 
          h. Why the sin of the first world was not so terrible as the
             sin of the second 29-30.
 
          i. How the first world changed through the marriages of Adam
             and the other patriarchs 30-32.
 
           * The sons of God.
 
             (1) What is understood by them 32.
 
             (2) The rabbins' fables about the sons of God, how to
                 refute them 33-34.
 
               * What is to be held concerning the "Incubis" and
                 "Succubis" 34-35.
 
             (3) How the deluge came because of the sons of God 36.
 
             (4) To what end should the fall and punishment of the sons
                 of God serve us 37-38.
 
               * Should the Romish church be called holy 37.
 
               * How the children of God became the children of the
                 devil 38.
 
               * How Noah had to spend his life among a host of
                 villains 39.
 
               * The conduct of the world when God sends it righteous
                 servants 40.
 
 
 I. THE SINS OF THE PRIMEVAL WORLD IN GENERAL THE CAUSE OF ITS
 DESTRUCTION.
 
 1. In the first five chapters Moses describes the state of the human
 race in the primeval world and the wonderful glory of the holy
 patriarchs who governed it. In these five chapters the chronicles as
 in the first book, so to speak, the happiest period of the whole human
 race and of the world before the flood. Now we shall begin what may be
 termed the second book of Genesis, containing the history of the
 flood. It shows the destruction of all the offspring of Cain and the
 eternal preservation of the generation of the righteous; for while
 everything perishes in the flood, the generation of the righteous is
 saved as an eternal world.
 
 2. It is appalling that the whole human race except eight persons is
 destroyed, in view of the fact that this was truly the golden age; for
 succeeding ages do not equal the old world in glory, greatness and
 majesty. And if God visited with destruction his own perfect creation
 and the very glory of the human race, we have just cause for fear.
 
 3. In inflicting this punishment, God followed his own peculiar way.
 Whatever is most exalted he particularly overthrows and humiliates.
 Peter says in 2 Peter 2, 5: God "spared not the ancient world;" and he
 would imply that it was, in comparison with succeeding ages, a
 veritable paradise. Neither did he spare the sublimest creatures--the
 angels--nor the kings ruling his people, nor the first-born of all
 times. But the more highly they were blessed with gifts, the more
 sternly he punished them when they began to misuse his gifts.
 
 4. The Holy Spirit says in the ninth verse of the second psalm,
 concerning kings: "Thou shalt break them with a rod of iron; thou
 shalt dash them in pieces like a potter's vessel." But is it not the
 Lord himself who has ordained kings and wills that all men should
 honor and obey them? Here he condemns and spurns the wisdom of the
 prudent and the righteousness of the righteous. It is God's proper and
 incessant work to condemn what is most magnificent, to cast down the
 most exalted and to defeat the strongest, though they be his own
 creatures. He does this, however, that abundant evidence of his wrath
 may terrify the ungodly and may arouse us to despair of ourselves and
 to trust in his power alone. We must either live under the shadow of
 God's wing, in faith in his grace, or we must perish.
 
 5. After the fall it came to pass that the more one was blessed with
 gifts, the greater was his pride. This was the sin of the angels who
 fell. This was the sin of the primitive world, in which the grandest
 people of the race lived; but because they prided themselves in their
 wisdom and other gifts, they perished. This was the sin of the
 greatest kings. This was the sin of nearly all the first-born. But
 what is the need of so many words? This is original sin--that we fail
 to recognize and rightly use the great and precious gifts of God.
 
 6. That the greatest men must furnish the most abhorrent examples is
 not the fault of the gifts and blessings, but of those to whom they
 are intrusted. God is a dialectician and judges the person by the
 thing,[1] meting out destruction to the thing or gift as well as to
 its possessor.
 
 [Footnote 1: _ut arguat a conjugatis._]
 
 7. It is expedient to give heed to such examples. They are given that
 the proud may fear and be humbled, and that we may learn our utter
 dependence upon the guidance and will of God, who resisteth the proud
 but giveth grace to the humble. Lacking the understanding and practice
 of these truths, man falls continually--kings, nobles, saints, one
 after the other, filling the world with examples of the wrath and
 judgment of God. The Blessed Virgin sings: "He hath scattered the
 proud in the imagination of their heart. He hath put down the princes
 from their thrones, and hath exalted them of low degree." Lk 1, 51-53.
 
 8. Full of such examples are all ages, all princely courts, all lands.
 Yet, by the grace of Saint Diabolus, the prince of this world, our
 hearts are so hard that we are not moved by all this to fear; rather
 to disdain, though we feel and see that we also shall incur
 destruction. Blessed are they, therefore, who heed, and are moved by
 such examples of wrath to be humble and to live in the fear of God.
 
 9. Consider, then, the preeminence of the old world, that perished in
 the flood. It possessed apparently the best, holiest and noblest men,
 compared with whom we are as the dregs of the world. For the
 Scriptures do not say that they were wicked and unjust among
 themselves, but toward God. "He saw," says Moses, "that they were
 evil." The eyes of God perceive and judge quite differently from the
 eyes of men. He says in Isaiah 55, 8-9: "Neither are your ways my
 ways.... For as the heavens are higher than the earth, so are my ways
 higher than your ways, and my thoughts than your thoughts."
 
 10. These tyrants and giants were esteemed and honored among
 themselves as the wisest and most just of men. So in our day kings and
 princes, popes and bishops, theologians, physicians, jurists and
 noblemen occupy exalted places and receive honor as the very gems and
 luminaries of the human race. More deservedly did the children of God
 in the old world receive such honor, because they excelled in power
 and possessed many gifts. Nevertheless, falling into pride and
 contempt of God while enjoying his blessings, they were rejected by
 God and destroyed, together with their gifts, as if they had been the
 lowest and vilest of the human race.
 
 11. And this is a common failing of our human nature. It necessarily
 puffs itself up and prides itself on its gifts unless restrained by
 the Holy Spirit. I have often said that a man has no more dangerous
 enemy than himself. It is my own experience that I have not without me
 so great cause for fear as within me; for it is our inner gifts that
 incite our nature to pride.
 
 12. As God, who is by nature most kind, cannot refrain from gracing
 and showering us with various gifts: health, property, wisdom, skill,
 knowledge of Scripture, etc., so we cannot refrain from priding
 ourselves upon these gifts and flaunting them. Wretched is our life
 when we lack the gifts of God, but twice wretched is it when we have
 them; for they tend to make us doubly wicked. Such is the corruption
 of original sin, though all but believers are either unaware of its
 existence or regard it a trivial thing.
 
 13. Such corruption is perceptible not only in ourselves but in
 others. How property inflates pride though it occupies relatively the
 lowest place among blessings! The rich, be they noblemen,
 city-dwellers or peasants, deem other people as flies. To even a
 greater extent are the higher gifts abused--wisdom and righteousness.
 Possession of these gifts, then, makes inevitable this condition--God
 cannot suffer such pride and we cannot refrain from it.
 
 14. This was the sin of that primeval world. Among Cain's descendants
 were good and wise men, who, nevertheless, before God were most
 wicked, for they prided themselves upon their gifts and despised God,
 the author. Such offense the world does not perceive and condemn; God
 alone is its judge.
 
 15. Where these spiritual vices exist and flourish, the lapse into
 carnal ones is imminent. According to Sirach 10, 14, sin begins with
 falling from God. The devil's first fall is from heaven into hell;
 that is, from the first table of the Law into the second. When people
 begin to be godless--when they do not fear and trust God, but despise
 him, his Word and his servants--the result is that from the true
 doctrine they pass into heretical delusions and teach, defend and
 cultivate them. These sins in the eyes of the world are accounted the
 greatest holiness, and their authors alone are reputed religious,
 God-fearing and just, and held to constitute the Church, the family of
 God. People are unable to judge concerning the sins of the first
 table. Those who despise God sooner or later fall into abominable
 adultery, theft, murder and other gross sins against the second table.
 
 16. The purpose of my statements is to make plain that the old world
 was guilty, not only of sin against the second table, but most of all
 of sin against the first table by making a fine, but deceptive and
 false show of wisdom, godliness, devotion and religion. As a result of
 the ungodliness which flourished in opposition to the first table,
 there followed that moral corruption of which Moses speaks in this
 chapter, that the people polluted themselves with all sorts of lust
 and afterward filled the world with oppression, bloodshed and wrong.
 
 17. Because the ungodly world had trampled both tables under foot, God
 came to judge it, who is a consuming fire and a jealous God. He so
 punishes ungodliness that he turns everything into sheer desolation,
 and neither government nor the governed remain. We may, therefore,
 infer that the world was the better the nearer it was to Adam, but
 that it degenerated from day to day until our time, when the
 offscouring and lowest filth of humanity, as it were, are living.
 
 18. Now, if God did not spare a world endowed with so many and great
 gifts, what have we to hope for, who, offal that we are, are subject
 to far greater misfortune and wretchedness? But if it please God,
 spare the Roman pontiff and his holy bishops, who do not believe such
 things! I now come to my text.
 
 Vs. 1-2. _And it came to pass, when men began to multiply on the face
 of the ground, and daughters were born unto them, that the sons of God
 saw the daughters of men that they were fair; and they took them wives
 of all that they chose._
 
 19. This is a very brief but comprehensive account. The text must not
 be understood to mean that the world did not increase until the five
 hundredth year of Noah. The more ancient patriarchs are embraced in
 this statement. This is demonstrated by the fact that Noah had no
 daughters. The reference in the text to "daughters" certainly must be
 understood as referring to the by-gone age of Lamech, Methuselah,
 Enoch and others. The world, accordingly, was corrupt and evil before
 Noah was born, particularly when licentiousness began to prevail after
 the death of Adam, whose authority, as the first father, they feared.
 
 20. I have said that Noah was a virgin above all others; I may add he
 was the greatest of all martyrs. Our so-called martyrs, compared with
 him, have infinite advantage in strength received from the Holy
 Spirit, by which death is overcome and all trials and perils are
 escaped. Noah lived among the unrighteous for six hundred years, and
 like Lot at Sodom, not without numerous and dire perils and trials.
 
 21. This was, perhaps, one reason why Father Lamech gave his son the
 name Noah at his birth. When the holy patriarch saw evil abounding in
 the world, he entertained the hope concerning his son that he should
 comfort the righteous by opposing sin and its author, Satan, and
 restoring lost righteousness.
 
 22. However, the wickedness that began then, not only failed to cease
 under Noah, but rather grew greater. Hence Noah is the martyr of
 martyrs. For is it not much easier to be delivered from all danger and
 suffering in a single hour than to live for centuries amid colossal
 wickedness?
 
 23. The opinion before expressed I maintain, that Noah abstained from
 matrimony so long that he might not be compelled to witness and suffer
 in his own offspring what he saw in the descendants of the other
 saints. This sight of man's wickedness was his greatest cross, as
 Peter says of Lot in Sodom (2 Pet 2, 8): "That righteous man dwelling
 among them, in seeing and hearing, vexed his righteous soul from day
 to day with their lawless deeds."
 
 24. Accordingly, the increase of humanity of which Moses speaks has
 not reference alone to the time of Noah, but also to the age of the
 other patriarchs. It was there that the violation of the first table
 commenced--in the contempt manifested for Jehovah and his Word. This
 was followed later by such gross offenses as oppression, tyranny and
 lewdness, which Moses explicitly mentions and names first as the cause
 of evil. Consult all history, study the Greek tragedies and the
 affairs of barbarians and Romans of all times, and you find lust the
 mother of every kind of trouble. It can not be otherwise. Where God's
 Word remains unknown or unheeded, men will plunge into lust.
 
 25. Lust draws in its train endless other evils, as pride, oppression,
 perjury and the like. These sins can be attacked only as men, through
 the first table, learn to fear and to trust in God. Then it is that
 they follow the Word as a lamp going before in the dark, and they will
 not indulge in such scandalous deeds, but will rather beware of them.
 With violation of the first table, however, the spread of passions and
 sins of every description is inevitable.
 
 26. But it seems strange that Moses should enumerate in the catalog of
 sins the begetting of daughters. He had found it commendable in the
 case of the patriarchs. It is even enjoyed by the ungodly as a
 blessing of God. Why, therefore, does Moses call it a sin?
 
 I reply, he does not condemn the fact of procreation as such, but the
 abuse of it, resulting from original sin. To be endowed with royal
 majesty, wisdom, wealth and bodily strength is a goodly blessing. It
 is God who bestows these gifts. But when men, in possession of these
 blessings, fail to reverence the first table, and by means of these
 very gifts do violence to it, such wickedness merits punishment.
 Therein is the reason for Moses' peculiar words: "The sons of God saw
 the daughters of men that they were fair; and they took them wives of
 all that they chose," without consideration of God or of law, natural
 or statutory.
 
 27. The first table having been despised, the second shares the same
 fate. Desire occupies the principal place and in contempt for
 procreation it becomes purely bestial; whereas God has instituted
 matrimony as an aid to feeble nature and chiefly for the purpose of
 procreation. But when lust in this manner has gained the upper hand,
 all commandments, those that go before and that follow, are ruthlessly
 broken and dishonored. Parental honor becomes insecure; men do not
 shrink from doing murder; from alienating property, speaking false
 testimony, etc.
 
 28. The word _jiru_, "saw," does not merely signify "to view," but "to
 view with pleasure and enjoyment." This meaning often occurs in the
 psalms, for instance: "Mine eye also hath seen my desire on mine
 enemies," Ps 92, 11; that is, shall with pleasure see vengeance
 executed upon my enemies. The meaning here is that, after turning
 their eyes from God and his Word, they turned them, filled with lust,
 upon the daughters of men. The sequence is unerring that, from the
 violation of the first table, men rush to the violation of the second.
 After despising God they despised also the laws of nature and, as they
 pleased, they married whom they chose.
 
 29. These are rather harsh words, and yet it is my opinion that lust
 continued hitherto within certain limits, inasmuch as they neither
 committed incest with their mothers, as later the inhabitants of
 Canaan, nor polluted themselves with the vice of the Sodomites. Moses
 confines his charge to their casting aside the legal trammels set by
 the patriarchs and recognizing in their matrimonial alliances no law
 but that of lust, selecting only as passion directed and against the
 will of the parents.
 
 30. It seems the patriarchs had strictly forbidden to contract
 alliances with the offspring of Cain, just as, later, the Jews could
 not lawfully mingle with the Canaanites. Though there are not wanting
 those who write that incestuous marriages existed before the flood,
 blood-relationship being held to be no barrier, I yet infer from the
 fact that Peter has extolled the old world, that such incestuous
 atrocities did not exist at that time, but that the sin of the ancient
 world consisted rather in men marrying whom they pleased, and as many
 wives from the Cainites as they chose, ignoring parental authority and
 controlled alone by passion. It is, therefore, a harsh word--"All
 which they chose."
 
 31. I have shown, on various occasions, that the two generations, or
 churches, of Adam and Cain were separate. For, as Moses clearly
 states, Adam expelled the murderer from his association. Without
 doubt, therefore, Adam also exhorted his offspring to avoid the church
 of the evil-doers and not to mingle with the accursed generation of
 Cain. And for a while his counsel or command was obeyed.
 
 32. But when Adam died and the authority of the other patriarchs
 became an object of scorn, the sons of God who had the promise of the
 blessed seed and themselves belonged to the blessed seed, craved from
 the tribe of the ungodly, intercourse and espousal. He tersely calls
 the sons of the patriarchs the "sons of God," since to them was given
 the promise of the blessed seed and they constituted the true Church.
 Yielding to the corruptions of the Cainite church they indulged the
 flesh themselves and took from the tribe of Cain, as wives and
 mistresses, whom and as many as they chose. This Lamech and Noah saw
 with pain, and for that reason, perhaps, deferred entering upon
 marriage.
 
 33. In reference to this point the Jews fancy foolish things. They
 interpret the sons of God to signify demon-lechers by whom that
 impious generation was begotten, and that they were called the sons of
 God by reason of their spiritual nature. The more moderate ones,
 however, refute such folly and represent the sons of the mighty. This
 has been aptly disproved by Lyra; for the punishment of the deluge
 befell, not alone the mighty, but all flesh, as shall the doom at the
 last day.
 
 34. But as regards the demon-lechers and strumpets (incubi and
 succubi), I do not deny--nay, I believe--that a demon may be either a
 lecher or a strumpet, for I have heard men cite their own experience.
 Augustine says that he heard this from trustworthy people whom he was
 constrained to believe. Satan is pleased when he can deceive us in
 this manner, by assuming the form either of a young man or a young
 woman. But that anything may be begotten by a devil and a human being
 is simply false. We hear of monstrous births of demon-like features,
 and I have even seen some. I am of opinion, however, that they have
 been deformed by the devil, but not begotten: or that they are real
 devils with a human body either simulated or purloined. For if the
 devil, by divine permission, may take possession of the whole man and
 change his mind, is it strange that he may disfigure also his body,
 causing men to be born sightless or cripples?
 
 35. Hence, the devil may so deceive frivolous people and such as live
 without the fear of God that when the devil is in bed, a young man may
 think that he has a girl with him, and a girl that she has a youth
 with her; but that anything may be born from such concubinage I do not
 believe. Many sorceresses have at one time or another been subjected
 to death at the stake on account of their intercourse with demons. If
 the devil can deceive eyes and ears so that they fancy they see and
 hear things which do not exist, how much easier is it for him to
 deceive the sense of touch, which is in this nature exceedingly gross!
 But enough! These explanations have no bearing upon the present text,
 and we have been led to them merely by Jewish babbling.
 
 36. The true meaning is that Moses calls those men the sons of God,
 who had the promise of the blessed seed. This is a New Testament
 phrase and signifies the believers who call God, Father, and whom, God
 in turn, calls sons. The flood came not because the generation of Cain
 was corrupt, but because the generation of the righteous who had
 believed God, had obeyed his Word, and had possessed the true worship,
 now had lapsed into idolatry, disobedience to parents, sensuality,
 oppression. Even so the last day shall be hastened, not by the
 profligacy of Gentile, Turk and Jew, but by the filling of the Church
 with errors through the pope and fanatical spirits, so that those very
 ones who occupy the highest place in the Church exercise themselves in
 sensuality, lust and oppression.
 
 37. It is a cause of fear for us all, that even those who were
 descended from the best patriarchs, began to grow haughty and depart
 from the Word. They gloried in their wisdom and righteousness, as
 later the Jews did in circumcision and Father Abraham. So did the
 popes glory in the title of the Church only to replace gradually their
 spiritual glory by carnal indulgence after forfeiting the knowledge of
 God, his Word and his worship. The Roman Church was truly holy and
 adorned by the grandest martyrs. We, at this day, however, are
 witnesses how she has fallen.
 
 38. Let no one, therefore, glory in his gifts, however splendid! The
 greatest gift is to be a member of the true Church. But take care not
 to become proud on that account, for you may fall, just as Lucifer
 fell from heaven and, as we are here informed, as the sons of God fell
 into carnal pleasures. They are, therefore, no longer sons of God, but
 sons of Satan, having fallen alike from the first and the second table
 of the Law. So in the past, popes and bishops have been good and holy,
 but today they are of all men the worst and, so to speak, the dregs of
 all classes.
 
 39. Among this rabble of decadent men who had departed from the piety
 and virtues of their ancestors, godly Noah lived in the greatest
 contempt and hatred of everybody. How could he approve the corruption
 of such degenerate progeny? And they themselves were most impatient of
 reproof. While, therefore, his example shone and gleamed, and his
 holiness filled the whole earth, the world became worse from day to
 day, and the greater the sanctity and chastity of Noah, the more the
 world reveled in lust. This is the beginning; it invariably introduces
 ruin.
 
 40. When God arouses holy men, full of the Holy Spirit, to instruct
 and reprove the world, the world, impatient of sound doctrine, falls
 with much greater zeal into sin and plies it with much greater
 persistency. This was the situation at the beginning of the world, and
 now, at the end of the world, we realize it is still the case.
 
 
 II. GOD'S JUDGMENT AND GRIEF OVER THE FIRST WORLD; NOAH AND HIS
     PREACHING.
 
    A. GOD'S JUDGMENT AND LAMENTATION OVER THE OLD WORLD.
 
       1. The words of the lamentation.
 
          a. Interpreters have shamefully perverted these words 41.
 
          b. The Jewish interpretation, which Jerome follows 42.
 
          c. The Jews' interpretation refuted 42-43.
 
          d. The interpretation of Rabbi Solomon 44.
 
          e. The interpretation of others, especially of Origen 45.
 
           * Why Augustine was especially pleased with the doctrine of
             the Manicheans 45.
 
          f. Rabbi David's explanation 46.
 
           * The false idea of the Jews and some Christian interpreters
             that the true sense of Scripture is learned from grammar.
 
             (1) Thus ideas most foreign to the sense of Scripture are
                 defended 46-47.
 
             (2) This method is false and led the Jews into many
                 fantasies 47.
 
          g. The source of Rabbi David's awkward interpretation of
             these words 48.
 
           * Why Luther has so much to say about the false
             interpretation of Scripture 49.
 
           * What is necessary to interpret Scripture 50.
 
          h. The true sense of these words 51.
 
           * Scripture definition of "to judge" 51.
 
       2. The author of this judgment and lamentation 51-53.
 
        * Man's conduct upon hearing God's Word preached 54.
 
       3. From what kind of a heart does such judgment and lamentation
          spring 55.
 
        * What kind of grief is the grief of the Holy Spirit 56.
 
        * God's severest punishment 57-59.
 
        * What follows when man does not possess God's Word 57-58.
 
        * Why the heathen are so carnal 58.
 
       4. The nature of this judgment and lamentation 59.
 
        * The lamentation and judgment of Luther over Germany because
          it lightly esteemed God's Word 60.
 
        * The spirit of grace and of prayer 61.
 
        * The office of the ministry.
 
          a. It requires two things 62.
 
          b. It is the greatest blessing of God 63.
 
          c. To despise it is a great sin, and what follows when it is
             taken from a people 63.
 
          d. A complaint of its neglect 64.
 
          e. This office is explained by the expression "to judge" 65.
 
           * Every godly preacher is one who disputes and judges 65.
 
           * Luther's grief because of the stubbornness of the world
             66.
 
           * Why Ahab called Elijah a troubler of Israel 67.
 
           * Why the world resents being reproved by sound doctrine. It
             is a good sign if a minister is reviled by the world 68.
 
        * The glory of people who boast of being the Church.
 
          a. Such glory avails nothing before God 68-70.
 
          b. Papists wish by all means to have this glory 68-70.
 
          c. Papists need this glory to suppress the Protestants 71.
 
          d. Christ will decide at the judgment day to whom this glory
             belongs 71.
 
          e. Although the first world adorned itself with this glory,
             it did not save them 72.
 
       5. How and why this judgment and complaint are ascribed to God
          73-74.
 
       6. How they were published to the world by the holy patriarchs
          75.
 
       7. Why they were made 76.
 
       8. In what way they have been published to the world 77.
 
       9. How the world resented this judgment and complaint 78.
 
        * Time given to the first world for repentance.
 
          a. We are not to understand the 120 years as the period of a
             man's life 79.
 
          b. The 120 years the time given these people in which to
             repent 80-81.
 
      10. Whether and to what end this time was necessary 82.
 
      11. How the old world felt upon hearing this 83.
 
        * The complaint and judgment of the last world 84-86.
 
        * The nearer the world approaches its destruction the less it
          thinks of it 86.
 
        * How the time of the flood is to be compared with the time God
          gives man to repent 87.
 
 
 II. THE JUDGMENT AND LAMENTATION OF GOD OVER THE FIRST WORLD; NOAH AND
 HIS PREACHING.
 
 A. GOD'S JUDGMENT AND LAMENTATION OVER THE OLD WORLD.
 
 V. 3. _Jehovah said, "My Spirit shall not strive with man forever, for
 that he also is flesh: yet shall his days be a hundred and twenty
 years."_
 
 41. Moses here begins by describing Noah as the highest pontiff and
 priest, or, as Peter calls him, a preacher of righteousness. This text
 has been mangled in various ways, for the natural man cannot
 understand spiritual things. When, therefore, the interpreters, with
 unwashed feet and hands, rushed into the Holy Scriptures, taking with
 them a human bias and method, as they themselves acknowledge, they
 could not but fall into diverse and erroneous views. It has almost
 come to pass, that the more sublime and spiritual the utterances of
 Scripture, the more shamefully they have been distorted. This passage
 in particular they have managed so shamelessly that you would not know
 what to believe, if you followed the interpreters.
 
 42. The Jews are the first to crucify Moses here, for this is their
 exposition: My Spirit, that is my indignation and wrath, shall not
 always abide upon man. I will not be angry with men, but spare them,
 for they are flesh. That means, being spurred by sin, they incline to
 sin. This meaning Jerome also adopts, who is of the opinion that here
 only the sin of lust is spoken of, to which we are all prone by
 nature. But his first error is that he interprets Spirit as wrath. It
 is the Holy Spirit Moses here speaks of, as the contrast shows. "For
 man," he says, "is flesh." The meaning is, therefore, that the flesh
 is not only prone to sin, but also hostile toward God.
 
 43. Then the matter itself serves as refutation, for could anything
 more absurd have been devised? They see with their eyes the wrath of
 God swallowing the whole human race through the flood, and yet they
 expound that God does not wish to be influenced toward the human race
 by anger but by mercy, and this after a hundred and twenty years, the
 very time of the flood.
 
 44. Rabbi Solomon expounds it thus: The Spirit which is in God shall
 no more strive and wrangle. As if God in his majesty would have
 disputed and wrangled about what should be done with man, whether to
 destroy or to spare him, finally, wearied by man's wickedness,
 determining upon his destruction, nevertheless.
 
 45. Others understand this of the created spirit: My spirit that I
 breathed upon the face of man, that is the spirit of man, shall no
 longer strive and contend with the flesh, which is in subjection to
 its lusts, for I shall take away this spirit and free it from the
 flesh, so that when the latter has become extinct, it may create no
 more difficulties for the spirit. This is the understanding of Origen,
 and it does not differ much from the Manichean error which attributes
 sin not to the whole man, but only to a part. And Augustine says that
 this had pleased him most in the tenets of the Manicheans, to hear
 that his depravity was not altogether his, but only of that part of
 the body which is evil from the beginning. The Manicheans posited two
 principles, the good and the bad, just as certain philosophers have
 posited enmity and friendship. Thus do men not only miss the mark, but
 they also fall into ungodly delusions.
 
 46. Rabbi David cites Sanctes, and derives the word _jadon_ from
 _nadan_, which means sheath, or shell. But as the interpretation is
 very clumsy, so he clothes it also in a very clumsy word: My Spirit
 shall not be inclosed in man as in a sheath. Has anything more
 unnatural ever been heard? But the Jews make a laughing-stock of
 modern Hebraists when they convince them that the Holy Scriptures can
 not be understood except through grammatical rules and an exact
 science of vowel-points. No exposition is so absurd but that they
 defend and polish it with their stale grammatical rules.
 
 47. But tell me, what language has there ever been that men easily
 have learned to speak from grammatical rules? Is it not true that the
 very languages most thoroughly reduced to rules, like Greek and Latin,
 are learned rather by practice? What stupendous absurdity, therefore,
 it is to gather the sense of a sacred tongue, which is the repository
 of things theological and spiritual, from grammatical rules, and to
 pay no attention to the proper signification of things? And this is
 what the rabbis and their disciples do almost universally. Many words
 and verbs may be declined for which no use is seen in the language.
 While they make such things paramount and everywhere chase anxiously
 after etymology, they fall into strange fancies.
 
 48. So here. Because the word in this passage can be derived from
 _nadan_, they construct from that a prodigious meaning. My spirit,
 they say, shall not be held back as in a sheath. They mean the spirit
 of man contained in the body as in a sheath. I shall not leave it in a
 sheath, they say, but I shall remove him and destroy the sheath. Such
 absurdities originate in the stale grammatical rules, whereas usage
 rather should be considered; it is that which trains the grammarian.
 
 49. But I recite all this at length, in order to admonish you, when
 you come upon such silly commentators, not to follow them and admire
 such singular wisdom. For great men even have found delight in the
 folly of the rabbis. They are not unlike the Sacramentarians, who do
 not deny the words of Christ, This is my body, this is my blood; but
 explain it thus: Bread is bread, and yet the body of Christ, namely,
 his creature; this is my blood, namely my wine. This passion of
 distorting texts no sane man tolerates in the exposition of the fables
 of Terence, or of the eclogues of Virgil, and, forsooth, we should
 tolerate it in the Church!
 
 50. We need the Holy Spirit to understand the Holy Scriptures. For we
 know that the same Spirit shall exist to the end of the world who
 existed before all things. We glory in possessing this Spirit through
 the grace of God, and, through him, we have faith, a moderate
 knowledge of Scripture and an understanding of the other things
 necessary to godliness. Hence we do not invent a new interpretation;
 we are guided not only by an analogy of Holy Scripture but also by
 faith.
 
 51. Through the Holy Scriptures in its entirety, the verb judge,
 _dun_, signifies almost invariably a public office in the Church, or
 the office of the ministry, through which we are corrected, reproved,
 instructed and enabled to distinguish the evil from the good, etc.
 Thus, Psalm 110, 6: _Jadin bagojim_, "He will judge among the
 nations;" which means: He will preach among the nations. The word
 found in this passage is evidently the same. And in the New Testament
 this phrase, originally Hebrew, is very much in vogue, especially in
 Paul's writings, who uses the Hebrew idiom more than the others.
 
 52. I understand this passage therefore as words spoken by Lamech or
 Noah as a new message to the whole world. For it was a public message
 proclaimed at some public assembly. When Methuselah, Lamech and Noah
 saw that the world was hastening straight to destruction by its sins,
 they resorted to this proclamation: My Spirit shall no longer preach
 among men. That means: we teach in vain, we admonish in vain; the
 world has no desire to be better.
 
 53. It is as if one in the present perverse times should say: We teach
 and make ample effort to summon the world back to sobriety and
 godliness, but we are derided, persecuted, killed, and all men, in the
 end, rush to destruction with blind eyes and deaf ears; therefore we
 are constrained to desist. These are the words of a soul planning
 appropriate action and full of anxiety, because it is clear that the
 human race, at the height of its peril, cannot be healed.
 
 54. This exposition conforms to faith and Holy Scriptures. When the
 Word is revealed from heaven, we see that some are converted, who are
 freed from damnation. The remaining multitude despises it and securely
 indulges in avarice, lust and other vices, as Jeremiah says (ch 51,
 9): "We should have healed Babylon, but she is not healed: forsake
 her, and let us go everyone into his own country."
 
 The more diligently Moses and Aaron importuned and instructed, the
 more obstinate Pharaoh became. The Jews were not made better by even
 the preaching of Christ and the apostles. The same befalls us who
 teach in our day. What, in consequence, are we to do? Deplore the
 blindness and obstinacy of men we may, correct it we cannot. Who would
 rejoice in the eternal damnation of the popes and their followers? Who
 would not prefer that they should embrace the Word and recover their
 senses?
 
 55. A similar exhibition of obstinacy Methuselah, Lamech and Noah saw
 in their day. Therefore there bursts from them this voice of despair:
 My Spirit, namely the Word of healing truth, shall no longer bear
 witness among men. For inasmuch as you refuse to embrace the
 Word--will not yield to healing truth--you shall perish.
 
 These are the words of a heart filled with anxiety after the manner
 that the Scriptures say God is anxious; that is, the hearts of Noah,
 Lamech, Methuselah and other holy men who are filled with love toward
 all. Beholding this wickedness of men, they are troubled and pained.
 
 56. Such grief is really the grief of the Holy Spirit, as Paul says,
 "Grieve not the Holy Spirit of God, in whom ye were sealed unto the
 day of redemption," Eph 4, 30. This means that the Holy Spirit is
 grieved when we miserable men are distracted and tormented by the
 wickedness of the world, that despises the Word we preach by the Holy
 Spirit. Thus Lot was troubled in Sodom, and the pious Jews in Babylon
 under the godless king Belshazzar; also Jeremiah, when he preached to
 the ungodly Jews and exclaimed (Jer 15, 10): "Woe is me, my mother,
 that thou hast borne me." So in Micah 7, 1: "Woe is me! for I am as
 the grape gleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat."
 
 57. The wrath of God is most fearful as he recalls the Word. What man
 would not prefer pestilence, famine, war--these being mere bodily
 calamities--to a famine of the Word which is always joined to eternal
 damnation? An example of the horrible darkness into which Satan can
 lead men when God is silent and does not speak, is furnished by the
 Gentiles who have been bereft of the Word. Who is not horrified by the
 Romans, men of exemplary wisdom and famous before other nations by
 reason of their dignified discipline, who observed the custom of
 letting the worthy matrons worship and crown Priapus, the foul idol,
 and of leading bridal virgins before it? What is more ludicrous than
 that the Egyptians adored the calf Apis as the supreme godhead?
 
 58. The Tripartite History gives an account of Constantine the Great
 being the first to abolish in Phoenicia and other places the shameless
 custom of using virgins, before their nuptials, for purposes of
 prostitution. Such monstrous infamies were accounted religion and
 righteousness among the Gentiles. There is nothing, in fact, so
 ridiculous, so stupid, so obscene, nothing so remote from all
 propriety, that it cannot be foisted as the very essence of religion
 upon men who have been forsaken by the Word.
 
 59. This is, therefore, the greatest penalty, that God, through the
 mouths of the holy patriarchs, threatens no longer to reprove men by
 his Spirit; which means that henceforth he will not give his Word to
 men, since all teaching is vain.
 
 60. Like punishment our times will bring also upon Germany. For we see
 the haste, the unrest, of Satan, and his efforts to defraud whom he
 may of the Word. How many sects has he roused during our lifetime, and
 this while we bent all our energies toward the maintenance of pure
 doctrine! What is in store after our death? Surely, he will lead forth
 whole swarms of Sacramentarians, Anabaptists, Antinomians, Servetians,
 Campanistans and other heretics who at present, conquered by the pure
 Word and the constancy of faithful teachers, keep out of sight, but
 are ready for every opportunity to establish their doctrines.
 
 61. Those, therefore, who have the Word in its purity, should learn to
 embrace the same, to thank God for it and to call upon him while he
 may be found. For when the spirit of knowledge is taken away, the
 spirit of prayer is also gone. Zechariah says (Zech 12, 10): For the
 spirit of prayer is joined to the spirit of grace. It is the spirit of
 grace which reproves our sins and gives instruction concerning their
 remission, which condemns idolatry and instructs concerning the true
 worship of God, which condemns avarice, lust and oppression, and
 teaches chastity, patience and charity. This spirit, God here
 threatens, shall no longer continue his work of instruction, since men
 refuse to hear and are incorrigible. The spirit of grace having been
 taken away, the spirit of prayer has also been taken away. For it is
 impossible for him to pray who is without the Word.
 
 62. Accordingly, the office of a priest is twofold; first, that he
 turns to God and prays for himself and for his people; second, that he
 turns from God to men through instruction and the Word. Says Samuel:
 "Far be it from me that I should sin against Jehovah in ceasing to
 pray for you: but I will instruct you in the good and the right way,"
 1 Sam 12, 23. He is aware that this is his proper office.
 
 63. Therefore, the ministry is rightly praised and esteemed as the
 highest favor. When this has been lost or has been vitiated, not only
 prayer becomes impossible, but men are simply in the power of the
 devil, and do nothing but grieve the Holy Spirit with all their deeds,
 and thus fall into mortal sin, for which it is not lawful to pray.
 Such other lapses as occur among men are trivial, for return is open
 and the hope of pardon is left. But when the Holy Spirit is grieved
 and men refuse to receive the witness and reproof of the Holy Spirit,
 the disease is desperate and incurable.
 
 64. But how common is this sin today among all classes! Princes,
 noblemen, inhabitants of city and country, refuse to be reproved; they
 rather reprove and sit in judgment upon the Holy Spirit in his
 servants. They judge of the office of the ministry by the lowliness of
 the person. They reason thus: This minister is poor and despised; why
 then should he reprove me, a prince, a nobleman, a magistrate? Rather
 than endure this, they trample under foot the ministers, together with
 their office and their message. Should we not, then, fear the judgment
 of God, such as he here announces to the old world?
 
 65. These, therefore, are the words of a father who disinherits his
 son, or of a severe schoolmaster in wrath ejecting a pupil, when God
 simply fixes a hundred and twenty years as the time in which
 opportunity is granted for repentance. He threatens, should it not be
 improved, his Spirit shall no longer reprove and strive.
 
 This word pertains properly to the office of the ministry and, in a
 certain sense, describes it. For every preacher or servant of the Word
 is a man of strife and judgment, and is constrained, by reason of his
 office, to chide whatever is vicious, without considering the person
 or office of his hearer. When Jeremiah does this zealously, he incurs
 not only hate but also the gravest dangers. He is moved even to
 impatience, so that he wishes he had never been born, Jer 20, 14.
 
 66. And if I had not been particularly strengthened by God, I should
 have been wearied and broken down ere this by the contumacy of an
 impenitent world; for the ungodly so grieve the Holy Spirit in us,
 that, with Jeremiah, we wish often we had never made a beginning of
 anything. Hence I often pray to God to let the present generation die
 with us, because, after our death, the most perilous times are to
 come.
 
 67. For this reason Elijah is called by Ahab the godless king of
 Israel, the disturber of Israel; because he openly reproved the
 idolatry, violence and passions of his day. Likewise we today are
 deemed the disturbers of Germany.
 
 68. But it is a good sign when men condemn us and call us authors of
 strife, for the Spirit of God strives with men, reproves and condemns
 them. But men are so that they wish to be taught only what gives them
 pleasure, as they frankly admit in Micah 2, 6-7: "Prophesy not to us;
 for confusion has not seized us, says the house of Jacob." The latter
 they use as an argument; because they look upon themselves as the
 house of Jacob and the people of God, they decline chastening, and
 will not take to themselves penalties and threats. So today the pope
 and his accomplices plume themselves solely upon being the Church, and
 declare that the Church is incapable of error. But notice this text
 and it will appear how frivolous such an argument is.
 
 69. Are not those whom God threatens to no longer judge by his Spirit
 likewise the sons of God? What can be more splendid than this name?
 Beyond doubt they gloried in this name and rebelled against the
 patriarchs when they opposed, or at least despised, their preaching.
 For it does not seem likely that God should be thrown into a rage
 against the whole human race on account of a few sins. But the
 magnificent name did not save them, nor did it avail that they were
 strong and great in number. Six hundred thousand marched out of Egypt,
 and two only entered the land of Canaan; all the others were prevented
 by death on account of their sins.
 
 70. Evidently God will in no way inquire about the magnificent titles
 of the Church, pope and bishop. Other testimony will be needed when
 they desire to escape the wrath of God than to boast of being the
 Church. For it is written (Mt 7, 20): "By their fruits ye shall know
 them." And verse 21: "Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord,
 shall enter into the kingdom of heaven."
 
 71. If ever in the future a council shall be held--which I hardly
 believe--no one will be able to take from them the title of Church,
 but propped up by this alone they will condemn and oppress us.
 Different shall be the judgment, when the Son of man shall come in his
 glory. Then it shall appear that among the members of the holy Church
 have been John Huss and Jerome of Prague. The pope, however, and the
 cardinals, the bishops, doctors, monks and priestly mountebanks, shall
 appear as the church of evil-doers, enthroned in pestilence, and as
 veritable henchmen of Satan, rendering aid to their father in his
 lying and murdering.
 
 72. Such judgment of God we see also here. He does not deny that the
 offspring of the saints are sons of God. This magnificent title in
 which they took pride and securely sinned, God leaves to them. And yet
 these very sons of God who took in marriage the daughters of men, he
 warns that he not only will take the Word from their hearts and minds,
 but that he will take from their eyes and ears also the ministering
 Spirit who preaches, prays, reproves, teaches and sighs in holy
 servants, and because they refuse to be chastened and reproved;
 knowing themselves to be the sons of God they despise the Word and its
 teachers. But they do not escape punishment because of their name. The
 same shall likewise befall the papists and other enemies of the Word.
 
 73. In accordance with this I hold that the sentiments of pious men
 are here attributed to God himself, according to the usage of the Holy
 Scriptures; for instance in Malachi 3, 8, where the Lord says that he
 is pierced through, or, as the Hebrew has it, that violence is done to
 him because the people were unfaithful in rendering to the priests the
 first-fruits and the tenth.
 
 74. But why, you may say, should God need to complain thus? Can he not
 when it pleases him suddenly destroy the whole world? He surely can,
 but does not do so gladly. He says: "I have no pleasure in the death
 of the wicked; but that the wicked turn from his way and live," Ezk
 33, 11. Such a disposition proves that God is inclined to pardon, to
 endure and to remit the sins of men, if only they will come to their
 senses; but inasmuch as they continue in obduracy, and reject all
 help, he is, as it were, tormented by this wickedness of men.
 
 75. The words "And Jehovah said," I attribute to the holy fathers, who
 testified through a public decree that God should be compelled to
 exercise vengeance, for they taught by divine authority. When Noah and
 his ancestors had preached nearly a thousand years, and yet the world
 continued to degenerate more and more, they announced God's decision
 to an ungrateful world and disclosed this as his thought: Why should I
 preach forever and permit my heralds to cry in vain? The more
 messengers I send, the longer I defer my wrath,--the worse they
 become. It is therefore necessary for preaching to cease, and for
 retribution to begin. I shall not permit my Spirit, that is my Word,
 to sit in judgment and to bear witness forever, and to tolerate man's
 wickedness. I am constrained to punish their sins. Because man is
 flesh, he is opposed to me. He is earthly, I am spirit. Man continues
 in his carnal state, mocks at the Word, persecutes and hates my Spirit
 in the patriarchs, and the story is told to deaf ears. Hence it is
 necessary that I should cease and permit man to go his own way. This
 contrast he desires to indicate when he says: "For he is flesh."
 
 76. Noah, Lamech and Methuselah were very holy men, full of the Holy
 Spirit. Accordingly they performed their office by teaching,
 admonishing, urging and entreating, in season and out of season; as
 Paul says, 2 Tim 4, 2. But they reproved flesh and did unprofitable
 labor, for the flesh would not yield to sound teaching. Should I, says
 he, endure forever such contempt for my Word?
 
 77. This proclamation, therefore, contains a public complaint, made by
 the Holy Spirit through the holy patriarchs, Noah, Lamech, Methuselah
 and others, whom God took away before the flood that they might not be
 spectators of so widely diffused wrath. All these, with one voice and
 mouth, admonished the giants and tyrants to repent, and added the
 threat that God would not endure forever such contempt of his Word.
 
 78. But the flesh remained true to its nature; they despised faithful
 exhortations in their presumption and carnal security, and the holy
 patriarchs they treated as men in dotage and as simpletons because of
 their threat that God would move in wrath even upon his Church,
 namely, the heirs of the promise of the coming seed.
 
 79. The added clause, "yet shall his days be a hundred and twenty
 years," Jerome affirms must not be understood as referring to the
 years of human life, nor to the age of individual men; for it is
 certain that after the flood many exceeded the two hundredth year. If
 you refer it to the years allotted to individuals, the promise would
 be that individuals should complete so many years, which, however, is
 false. Therefore he speaks of the time conceded to the world for
 repentance until the flood should arrive.
 
 80. This interpretation agrees with what precedes. God shows that he
 is displeased with the perversity of men. He is full of solicitude and
 quite ready to forbear. Against his will, so to speak, he permits the
 flood to rage. Therefore, he decided upon a fixed and adequate time
 for them to come to their senses, and to escape punishment. All this
 time Noah admonished men to repent, making it clear that God could not
 longer endure such wickedness, while he was yet so kind as to grant
 adequate time for repentance.
 
 81. There is a beautiful cohesion between the words and their
 significance. A former proclamation threatens: I cannot endure longer
 contempt for my Word; my preachers and priests attain nothing with
 their infinite labor except derision. Nevertheless, as a father or
 good judge would gladly spare a son but is compelled by his wickedness
 to be severe, so, the Lord says, I do not destroy gladly the human
 race. I shall grant them one hundred and twenty years in which they
 may come to themselves, and during which I shall exercise mercy.
 
 82. Horrible was the disaster, because neither the brothers nor the
 sisters of Noah were saved. It was necessary that the most earnest
 warning should precede, that, perhaps, they might be called back to
 repentance. To the Ninevites Jonah announces destruction within forty
 days, and they repent and are saved.
 
 83. It is clear, therefore, that the heedlessness of the old world was
 very great, inasmuch as in the one hundred and twenty years of grace
 it obstinately persisted in its lusts, even deriding its pontiff Noah,
 the teacher of righteousness.
 
 84. In our times, at the approach of the day of the Lord, almost the
 same condition obtains; we exhort to penitence the papists and our
 noblemen; the inhabitants of city and country we admonish not to
 continue despising the Word, since God will not leave this unavenged.
 But in vain we exert ourselves, as the Scripture says. A few faithful
 folk are edified and these are, one by one, gathered away from the
 face of sin, and "no man layeth it to heart," as is spoken in Isaiah
 57, 1. But when God, in this way, has shaken out the wheat and
 gathered the grain in its place, what, think you, shall be the future
 of the chaff? Nothing else but to be burned with inextinguishable
 fire, Mt 13, 42. This shall be the lot of the world.
 
 85. But the world does not understand how it can be that through the
 preaching of the Gospel the wheat should be separated from the chaff,
 to be gathered into the barn, while the chaff, that is, the throng of
 unbelievers sunk in idolatry and darkness, shall be consigned to the
 fire. It is written: "In a day of salvation have I helped thee; and I
 will preserve thee," Is 49, 8. Those who will neglect this day of
 salvation, will find God as an avenger, for he will not do useless
 labor in threshing empty chaff.
 
 86. But the world is flesh; it does not obey. Yea, the nearer and more
 immediate the calamity, the more secure it is and the more readily it
 despises all faithful admonitions. Though this offense provokes the
 righteous, we should, notwithstanding, conclude that God does not
 reprove in vain the world through his Holy Spirit, nor that the Holy
 Spirit in the righteous is grieved in vain. Christ uses this as an
 example when he speaks of the wickedness and heedlessness of our age:
 "And as were the days of Noah, so shall be the coming of the Son of
 man," Mt 24, 37.
 
 87. It is to be observed here what has been an object of difficulty
 for Jerome, that the flood came a hundred years after the birth of
 Shem, Ham and Japheth, while here a hundred and twenty years are said
 to have been the time of the flood.
 
 
 B. NOAH AND HIS PREACHING.
 
    1. The time Noah began to preach 87.
 
    2. Why the world took occasion to despise Noah's preaching 88.
 
     * Jerome's reckoning of the 120 years 89.
 
    3. Why Noah married after living so long single, when the world was
       to be destroyed 90.
 
    4. How and why Noah was the prophet of prophets and his the
       greatest of prophecies 91.
 
    5. His preaching disregarded not only by the Cainites but by the
       sons of God 92.
 
     * To what end God's complaint of the first world should serve us
       93.
 
     * When was the judgment of God announced 94.
 
     * The generation of the Cainites.
 
       a. Whether it still existed in the days of Noah 95.
 
       b. Why Moses does not record the generations of the Cainites and
          of their patriarchs 95.
 
       c. How the holy patriarchs warned their children against the
          Cainites 96.
 
       d. How the Cainites tormented the holy patriarchs 96.
 
    6. Why God raised up Noah 97.
 
    7. Noah's faith exceptionally strong 97-98.
 
    8. What impelled Noah to continue his work, and not to turn to the
       world 99.
 
    9. How Noah's age was the wickedest and he had to oppose its
       wickedness all alone 100.
 
     * Who of the patriarchs were still living in Noah's time 100.
 
   10. What trials Noah had to experience 101.
 
 
 B. NOAH AND HIS PREACHING.
 
 87. But this passage shows that Noah began preaching about the
 impending punishment of the deluge before his marriage, having
 hitherto led the life of a celibate.
 
 88. Consider, therefore, what pastime he offered to a wicked world in
 its fancied security. He predicts destruction to the whole world
 through the flood, nevertheless, he himself marries. Why? Was it not
 sufficient for him to perish alone, that he must join to himself a
 companion for the disaster? Oh, foolish old man! Surely if he believed
 the world was to perish by a deluge, he would rather perish alone than
 marry and take the trouble to beget children. But if he himself will
 be saved, why, so shall also we.
 
 In this manner they commenced to despise the preaching concerning the
 flood with the greater assurance because of the marriage of Noah,
 ignorant of the counsel of God, who moves in a manner altogether
 unintelligible to the world. How absurd to promise Abraham posterity
 through Isaac, and yet to command Isaac to be sacrificed!
 
 89. The divine Jerome argues against the view that God had fixed the
 time for the flood at a hundred and twenty years, but saw himself
 compelled, later, when wickedness had waxed strong, to shorten the
 time.
 
 90. But we shall not make God a liar; we rather give it as our
 conviction that Noah had hitherto preached, while in a state of
 celibacy, that the world was to be destroyed through the flood, and
 later, by a divine command, had taken a maid as a little branch, so to
 speak, from the race of women, and begotten three sons. Below it is
 written that he had found grace with the Lord; otherwise he who had
 refrained from marriage so long, might have continued to do so still
 longer. But God, in order to restrain his wrath, wants to leave a
 nursery for the human race; therefore, he commands marriage. This the
 wicked believe to be a sign that the world shall not perish; they live
 accordingly in security and despise the preacher, Noah. But the
 counsel of God is different--to destroy the whole world and to leave
 through this righteous Noah a nursery for the future world.
 
 91. Noah was, therefore, the greatest prophet; his equal the world has
 not had. First he teaches the longest time; then he gives instruction
 concerning a universal punishment coming upon the world, and even
 fixes the year of its advent. Likewise Christ prophesies concerning
 the last judgment, when all flesh shall perish. "But of that day," he
 says in Mark 13, 32, "or that hour knoweth no one, ... but the
 father."
 
 Jonah foretells punishment for the Ninevites within forty days;
 Jeremiah foretells seventy years of captivity; Daniel, seventy weeks
 until the coming of Christ. These are remarkable prophecies, in which
 time, place and person are accurately described.
 
 But this prophecy of Noah surpasses all others, inasmuch as he
 foretells through the Holy Spirit that within a certain number of
 years the whole human race shall perish. He is worthy to be called the
 second Adam and the head of the human race, through whose mouth God
 speaks and calls the whole world to repentance.
 
 92. It is terrible, however, that his message was despised with such
 assurance that not only none of the Cainites, but not even any one of
 Adam's progeny underwent a change. Therefore Noah was compelled to
 witness the destruction of brothers, sisters, relatives and kindred
 without number, and all these made a mock of the pious old man and of
 his message as an old woman's tale.
 
 93. This awful example is held up to us lest we persist in sin. For if
 God did not spare the primitive world, which was so magnificent--the
 very flower and youth of the world--and in which had lived so many
 pious men, but, as he says in Psalm 81, 12, "gave them up unto their
 own hearts' lust," and cast them aside, as if they had no claim upon
 the promise made to the Church--if he did this, how much less will he
 spare us who do not possess such prerogatives?
 
 94. Therefore, the decree cited in this passage that God would grant
 men a hundred and twenty years for repentance, was rendered and
 promulgated before Noah had begotten children.
 
 95. With reference to the generation of the Cainites, no mention is
 made of their patriarchs at the time of the flood, nor does Moses even
 deem them worthy of being named. Previously he has brought down the
 generation of Cain as far as Lamech, but whether his sons or nephews
 lived at the time of Noah is uncertain. This much is certain, that the
 offspring of Cain existed to that time, and were so powerful as to
 mislead the very sons of God, since even the posterity of the holy
 patriarchs perished in the flood.
 
 96. Before this time the holy patriarchs--the rulers of the true
 Church, as it were--admonished their families to beware of the
 accursed generation. But the Cainites, incensed at being condemned,
 made the attempt to overturn the righteous with every kind of
 mischief; for the church of Satan wars perpetually against the Church
 of God.
 
 97. Therefore, as the righteous begin to waver and wickedness gains
 ground, God raises Noah to exhort to repentance and to be for his
 descendants a perpetual example, whose faith and diligent, patient
 devotion to teaching, his offspring might admire and imitate. A great
 miracle is it and a case of illustrious faith, that Noah, having heard
 through Methuselah and Lamech the decree that the world is to perish
 after a hundred and twenty years, through the flood, does not doubt
 its truth, and yet, when the hundred and twenty years have almost
 expired, marries and begets children. He might rather have thought: If
 the human race is to perish, why should I marry? Why should I beget
 sons? If I have refrained these many years, I shall do so henceforth.
 But Noah does not do this; rather, after making known God's purpose
 respecting the world's destruction, he obeys God, who calls him to
 matrimony, and believes God that, though the whole world may perish,
 yet he with his children shall be saved. An illustrious faith is this
 and worthy of our consideration.
 
 98. There was in him first that general faith, in common with the
 patriarchs, concerning the seed which was to bruise the head of the
 serpent. He possessed also the singular virtue of holding fast to this
 faith in the midst of such a multitude of offenses, and not departing
 from Jehovah. Then, to this general faith he added the other, special
 faith, that he believed God as regards both the threatened destruction
 of the rest of the world and the salvation promised to Noah himself
 and his sons. Beyond a doubt, to this faith his grandfather Methuselah
 and his father Lamech earnestly incited him; for it was as difficult
 to so believe as it was for the Virgin Mary to believe that none but
 herself was to be the mother of the Son of God.
 
 99. This faith taught him to despise the presumption of the world
 which derided him as a man in his dotage. This faith prompted him
 diligently to continue the building of the ark, a work those giants
 probably ridiculed as extreme folly. This faith made Noah strong to
 stand alone against the many evil examples of the world, and to
 despise most vehemently the united judgment of all others.
 
 100. But almost unutterable and miraculous is this faith, burdened as
 it is with strange and most weighty obstacles, which the Holy Spirit
 shows in passing, without going into great detail, that we may be
 induced to meditate the more diligently upon its circumstances.
 Consider first the great corruption of the age. While the Church had
 before this time many and most holy patriarchs, it was now deprived of
 such rulers; Adam, Seth, Enos, Cainan, Mahalalel, Jared, Enoch are all
 dead, and the number of patriarchs is reduced to three--Methuselah,
 Lamech and Noah. These alone are left at the time the decree
 concerning the destruction of the world is published. These three are
 compelled to witness and suffer the incredible malice of men, their
 idolatry, blasphemy, violent acts, foul passions, until finally
 Methuselah and Lamech are also called out of this life. There Noah was
 the only one to oppose the world rushing to destruction, and to make
 an effort to preserve righteousness and to repress unrighteousness.
 But far from meeting with success, he had to see even the sons of God
 lapse into wickedness.
 
 101. This ruin and havoc of the Church troubled the righteous man and
 all but broke his heart, as Peter says of Lot in Sodom, 2 Pet 2, 8.
 Now, if Lot was so distracted and vexed by the wickedness of one
 community, how must it have been with Noah, against whom not only the
 generation of Cain raged, but who was opposed also by the decadent
 generation of the patriarchs, and then even by his own father's house,
 his brothers, sisters, and the descendants of his uncles and aunts?
 For all these were corrupted and estranged from the faith by the
 daughters of men. As the text says, they "saw the daughters of men."
 
 
 III. THE SINS OF THE ANCIENT WORLD IN PARTICULAR.
 
    A. THE FORBIDDEN MARRIAGES ENTERED INTO.
 
       1. Why this is said of the sons and not of the daughters of the
          holy patriarchs 102.
 
       2. Why were the holy fathers so emphatically forbidden to let
          their sons marry the ungodly 103-104.
 
       3. How this was the beginning of all evils 105.
 
        * What evils have in all times come through woman 106.
 
       4. The sins here sprang from despising the first table of the
          law 107-108.
 
        * The sins of the second table follow when the first table is
          not kept 108.
 
       5. Everything that is called sin is embraced in this sin
          109-110.
 
       6. How marriage with the children of the true Church was
          despised 111.
 
       7. Their desire to marry thus resembled Eve's desire to take the
          forbidden apple 112.
 
       8. Why the patriarchs' children took this step 113.
 
       9. How these marriage alliances were formed 114-116.
 
      10. Berosus' testimony concerning these forbidden marriages 116.
 
    B. DISORDER IN ALL BRANCHES OF SOCIETY 116-117.
 
    C. THE TYRANNY EXERCISED.
 
       1. By the "giants" or tyrants.
 
          a. What is to be understood by tyrants 117.
 
           * The pope resembles the tyrants before the flood 118.
 
          b. The nature of these tyrants 119.
 
          c. Why called Nephilim 120-122.
 
          d. Whether they received their name from their size or from
             their cruelty 123.
 
           * How the Scriptures designate true rulers 123.
 
          e. These tyrants types of Antichrist 123.
 
          f. They were raging, powerful and criminal characters 124.
 
           * Of authorities.
 
             (1) How God wants us to honor the authorities though he
                 terribly threatens them 125-126.
 
             (2) Why God wants them to be honored, when he himself does
                 not honor them 127.
 
             (3) Godless rulers are God's swine and are rare birds in
                 heaven 128.
 
          g. Whether these tyrants were rulers and why God called them
             by such a shameful name 129.
 
          h. Moses chose the word Nephilim, which in his day designated
             a wicked people, to express the tyrants of the first World
             130.
 
       2. By "the mighty men."
 
          a. How Jerome perverts this text 131.
 
          b. What is to be understood by "the mighty men that were of
             old" 131.
 
           * The meaning of "Olam" 132.
 
          c. Whence did they receive their power 133.
 
          d. Why called "mighty men" 134.
 
           * The character of the true church 134.
 
       3. By "the men of renown."
 
          a. Why they were thus named 135.
 
          b. Who they were 136.
 
           * They resembled the pope and bishops 136.
 
          c. Lyra's false explanation of it refuted 137.
 
           * How Antichrist is restrained from the world, and true
             doctrine maintained 137.
 
    D. THE SIN AGAINST THE HOLY SPIRIT 138.
 
     * That one sin follows another until man reaches the highest
       degree of sin 139.
 
 
 III. THE SINS OF THE OLD WORLD IN PARTICULAR.
 
 A. THE FORBIDDEN MARRIAGES ENTERED INTO.
 
 102. But, I ask, why is not complaint made also of the men, or why are
 not the daughters of God included in this complaint? He says merely
 that they "saw the daughters of men." It was surely for this reason,
 that the holy generation of Seth had received the peculiar injunction
 to beware of fellowship with the Cainites, inasmuch as they had been
 excluded from the true Church, and to mingle with them neither
 socially through marriage, nor ecclesiastically through worship, for
 the righteous should avoid every occasion of offense.
 
 103. In prohibiting marriage with the Cainites it was the chief
 purpose of the pious fathers to maintain their generation pure; for
 daughters bring into the houses of their husbands the views and
 manners of the fathers. Thus, we read of Solomon in the Book of the
 Kings that he was led astray through a woman who was a stranger; and
 thus Jezebel introduced the wickedness of the Syrians into the kingdom
 of Israel.
 
 104. The holy fathers saw the same would come to pass in their
 generation; therefore, after they were separated from the Cainites
 through the divine command, they resolved that the sons of the holy
 generation should not marry the daughters of men. The daughters of the
 race of the righteous could more readily be restrained from marriage
 with the Cainites, while the sons were independent and headstrong.
 
 105. In this way Moses wishes to show the trouble began from the time
 the sons of God joined themselves to the daughters of men, seeing that
 they were fair. The sons of men who were proud and strong and
 passionately given to pleasure, without doubt despised the plain
 maidens of the pious race who had been reared by the holy patriarchs
 not delicately, but simply and modestly, being arrayed in homely garb.
 There was hence no necessity of making a law also for the maidens,
 inasmuch as they were in any case neglected by the noble Cainites.
 
 106. If you study the history of nations you will find that women have
 been the occasion for the overthrow of the strongest kingdoms. Well
 known is the disgrace of Helen. The sacred writings demonstrate also
 that woman occasioned the fall of the whole human race. This, however,
 should be mentioned without reflection upon the sex, for we have a
 command, "Honor thy father and thy mother," Ex 20, 12. Likewise,
 "Husbands, love your wives," Col 3, 19. It is true that Eve was the
 first to pluck the apple; however, she first sinned by idolatry and
 fell from the faith, which faith, as long as it is in the heart,
 controls also the body; but when it has departed from the heart, the
 body serves sin. Guilt is not peculiar to sex but to sin, which man
 has in common with woman.
 
 107. Thus Moses gives an account of the prevailing unrighteousness and
 lust. But he gives the reader to understand that, before sin was
 committed against the second table of the Law, the first had been
 violated, and the Word of God treated with contempt. Otherwise the
 sons of God would have obeyed the will of their pious parents
 forbidding marriage with those outside the Church.
 
 108. Moses, therefore, concludes that, because the sons of God had
 forsaken the worship and Word of God and departed from the precepts of
 their parents, thereupon to fall into sensuality and lust, and to take
 to wife whom they pleased, they also became violent and appropriated
 the goods of others. The world cannot do otherwise. When it has
 forsaken God, it worships the devil; when it has despised the Word and
 fallen into idolatry, it rushes forth into all sins of passion, in
 which fierceness of anger and fierceness of desire by turns are
 aroused, and thus all the appetites are thrown into a state of the
 greatest disorder. When the righteous reprove this, the result is
 resentment and violence against them.
 
 109. The sin of the flood, then, embraces everything that may be
 called sin, by the first as well as the second table. Wicked men first
 depart from God through unbelief; then they disregard obedience to
 parents, and finally become murderers, adulterers, etc.
 
 110. I mention this to the end that no one may believe that sex or the
 marriage estate in themselves are to blame. It is chiefly
 transgression of God's commandments and disobedience to parents which
 are condemned. Owing to absence of fellowship between the Cainites and
 the true Church, pious parents desired also social separation from the
 Cainites, for fear they might be perverted by the manners of ungodly
 wives. But God's command being neglected, and the authority of parents
 despised, the younger generation lapsed into the passions of
 concupiscence and vehemence. In this way the honor of sex and the
 dignity of matrimony are conserved: accusation is brought solely
 against the unrighteousness which first departs from God and then
 manifests itself in injuring the saints.
 
 111. This is the teaching of the words: "The sons of God saw the
 daughters of men that they were fair." Why did they not see the
 daughters of God and desire those in the Church and possess the
 promise of the seed? Are they not convicted of contempt for the
 sisters of their own generation, that is the true Church, and of
 mingling with the carnal and impious generation of Cain? They despise
 the simplicity and reserve of their sisters and prefer the smiles, the
 dress, the wiles of the daughters of Cain; the latter they crave and
 cultivate, the former they treat either with neglect or dishonor.
 
 112. With such eyes as Eve viewed the apples when she fell into sin,
 the sons of God viewed the daughters of men. Eve had seen the
 forbidden tree before that, but with eyes of faith looking back to
 God's commandment; for that reason she did not crave, but rather she
 fled from the same. When, however, the eyes of faith were dimmed and
 she beheld the tree solely with carnal eyes, she stretched out her
 hand with desire and invited also Adam, her husband.
 
 113. Likewise the sons of the patriarchs had seen long before that the
 daughters of the Cainites excelled in form, dress and elegance of
 manners. Nevertheless, they did not mingle with them, for the eye of
 faith looked back to the commandment of God and to the promise of the
 seed to be born from the generation of the righteous. But the eyes of
 faith having been lost, they saw no longer either the command or the
 promise of God, but followed merely the desire of the flesh. The
 simple, good and virtuous girls of their own generation they despised;
 the Cainites they married, seeing they were polished, charming and
 pleasant.
 
 114. It is not a sin, therefore, that they marry, nor is the sex in
 itself condemned. Condemnation lies in this, that with contempt of the
 divine commandment they marry unlawfully; that they permit themselves
 to be led astray by their wives from the true worship to the wicked
 worship of a false church; that, after the fashion of the Cainites,
 they pay no heed to parental authority and become guilty of violence,
 oppression and other sins.
 
 Moses clearly reveals their sin when he says: "They took them wives of
 all that they chose," as if he said: To marry a wife is not an evil
 but a blessing, if it be done lawfully. But they sinned in that they
 married without judgment, against the will and purpose of the parents,
 marrying whom and as many as they pleased, regardless of their own
 estate, whether married or single.
 
 115. This is a stern word, by which Moses characterizes it as a great
 sin that they arbitrarily married two wives or more, exchanged them,
 or snatched them from others, after the manner of Herod, who possessed
 himself of his brother's wife. It is this unbridled reign of evil lust
 that Moses discloses and condemns.
 
 116. Berosus writes that incestuous marriages also took place among
 them, so that they married even their mothers and sisters. But I doubt
 whether they were so wicked as that. It is a sin sufficiently grave
 that in marrying they dispensed with judgment, the authority of their
 parents and even with the Word of God, following altogether the
 guidance of lust and desire. They took whom they pleased and whom they
 could, and by such license they brought chaos into domestic, public
 and churchly relations.
 
 B. DISORDER IN ALL BRANCHES OF SOCIETY
 
 The sin of the primeval world was, therefore, an upheaval of all
 established order, inasmuch as the Church was demoralized by idolatry
 and false modes of worship. This condition was aggravated by those
 oppressors who cruelly persecuted the righteous teachers and holy men.
 Public discipline was destroyed by oppression and violent deeds, and
 domestic discipline by uncurbed lust. Upon such overturning of piety
 and integrity followed universal depravity; men were not merely evil
 but plainly incorrigible.
 
 C. THE TYRANNY EXERCISED.
 
 V. 4a. _The Nephilim_ (giants) _were in the earth in those days,_
 
 117. Moses continues the description of the sin and offense which
 provoked the deluge. The first point was that the sons of God had
 fallen from the fear of God, and the Word had become altogether
 carnal, perverting not only the Church but also the State and home.
 Now he adds that wickedness had grown to the extent of giants arising
 upon earth. He clearly states that there were born from the
 concubinage of the sons of God with the daughters of men, not sons of
 God, but giants; that is, bold men who arrogated to themselves at the
 same time both government and priesthood.
 
 118. Just so the pope arrogates to himself at the same time the
 spiritual and the temporal sword. This would not be the height of
 evil, if he would only make use of his power for the preservation of
 State and Church; but the greatest sin is that he abuses his power for
 the establishment of idolatry, for a warfare against sound doctrine,
 and for purposes of oppression even in the State. When the Papists are
 reproved with the Word of God, they spurn such reproof, claiming that
 they are the Church and incapable of error. This class of people Moses
 calls "giants," men who arrogate to themselves power both political
 and ecclesiastical, and who sin most licentiously.
 
 119. Such men are described in the Book of Wisdom who say: "Let
 unrighteousness be our law," 2, 11. Also in Psalms, 12, 4: "Who have
 said, With our tongue will we prevail; our lips are our own: who is
 lord over us?" Again in Psalm 73. "They scoff, and in wickedness utter
 oppression: they speak loftily," etc. Such were the giants who
 withstood the Holy Spirit to his face, who, through the mouth of
 Lamech, Noah and the sons of Noah, exhorted, implored, taught and
 reproved.
 
 120. There are those who dispute the meaning of the noun Nephilim and
 derive it from _Naphal_, which signifies "to fall." They commonly take
 it in a passive sense, meaning that other men, seeing the uncouth
 forms and extraordinary size, fell down from fear. Let the rabbis
 vouch for the correctness of this; it is ridiculous to call them
 "_Nephilim_" because others fell. Some, however, suggest the etymology
 that they were thus called because they had fallen from the common
 stature of men, and allege as proof-passage Numbers 13, 33, from which
 it appears that giants possessed huge bodies like the Anakim and
 Rephaim. Which of these are right, I do not decide, especially since
 it is certain that a theory of all words can not be given, nor their
 origin demonstrated.
 
 121. But here another question obtrudes itself: Why should those born
 from the sons of God and the daughters of men alone have differed from
 the ordinary stature of man? I have no other answer than that the text
 says nothing of stature in this place. In Numbers 13, 33 it is said:
 "There we saw the giants, the sons of Anak, who come of the giants:
 and we were in our sight as grasshoppers, and so we were in their
 sight." There hugeness of body is shown, but not here; therefore they
 may be called giants for some other reason than massive stature.
 
 122. To give my opinion of the word, I hold it is to be taken neither
 in the sense of the neuter nor of the passive, but of the active,
 inasmuch as the word "_naphal_" is often used in the sense of the
 active, though it does not belong to the third conjugation, in which
 almost all transitive verbs are found. Thus in Joshua 11, 7: "So
 Joshua came, and all the people of war with him, against them by the
 waters of Merom suddenly, and fell upon them." If the verb is
 construed as neuter, as if Joshua and his men had fallen before the
 enemies, history will object; for the meaning is that they fell upon
 the enemies and suddenly overpowered them.
 
 123. Therefore, this passage and other, similar ones prompt me to
 understand "_nephilim_" to designate not bulk of body, but tyranny and
 oppression, inasmuch as they domineered by force, making no account of
 law and honor, but merely indulging their pleasure and desire.
 Rightful rulers the Scripture calls shepherds and princes, but those
 who rule by wrong and violence are rightly called "_Nephilim_,"
 because they fall and prey upon those beneath them.
 
 Thus in Psalm 10: "He croucheth and humbleth himself and _Venaphal Baa
 Zumaf Helkaim_ (falls with his strong ones upon the poor)". The Holy
 Spirit speaks there of the reign of the Antichrist, whom he describes
 as raging so furiously as to crush what he can, and, at all events, to
 bend what he cannot crush, so that afterward he may suppress with all
 his strength what has been bent. For _baazuma_ can be indifferently
 rendered by "with his strength," or "with his strong ones." This
 power, he says, he uses only against those who are _Hilkaim_, that is
 the poor, such as have previously been in some state of affliction.
 Others who excel in power, he worships so as to draw them over to his
 side.
 
 124. Accordingly I interpret "giants" in this passage not as men of
 huge stature, as in Numbers 13, 33, but as violent and oppressive; as
 the poets depict the Cyclopeans, who fear neither God nor men, but
 follow only their desires, relying upon their strength and power. For
 the oppressors sit enthroned in majesty, sway empires and kingdoms,
 and arrogate to themselves even spiritual power, but use such power
 against the Church and the Word of God for the gratification of their
 lust.
 
 125. Observe here the strange counsel of God, commanding us to fear
 the authorities, to obey, serve and honor them, while at the same time
 the threats and dreadful reproofs which he administers are almost
 invariably directed against those in authority, against kings and
 princes, as if God proceeded against them with a peculiar hatred.
 Scripture enjoins upon us to honor authority, but itself does not
 honor it; rather it destroys it with a threat of the gravest
 penalties. Scripture enjoins us to fear authority, but itself appears
 to despise authorities, inasmuch as it does not commend but threatens.
 
 126. Does not Mary earnestly declaim in her song against princes, Luke
 1, 51-53: "He hath scattered the proud in the imagination of their
 heart. He hath put down princes from their thrones, and hath exalted
 them of low degree. The hungry he hath filled with good things; and
 the rich he hath sent empty away"? If we believe this to be true, who
 would wish to be found among authorities, for whom so certain
 perdition is prepared and imminent? Who would not prefer to live on a
 lowly plane and suffer hunger? The second psalm accuses the
 authorities of the gravest crime when it says that they place
 themselves with united strength and efforts in opposition to God and
 his anointed and render violence to his kingdom. "Thou hast made of a
 city a heap, of a fortified city a ruin," Is 25, 2. The whole Bible
 abounds with like sentiments.
 
 127. Thus, the Bible does not honor the authorities, but threatens
 them with danger, and drags them into manifest contempt; and still
 with consummate care it commands us to reverence and fear them, and to
 render them all manner of service. Why is this? Surely because God
 himself desires to punish them, and has reserved vengeance for himself
 instead of surrendering it to their subjects. Jeremiah argues in
 chapter 12, 1, concerning the prosperity of the way of the ungodly,
 and yet the Lord is righteous. But he concludes: "Thou, O Lord,
 fattenest them and preparest them for the sacrifice."
 
 128. So might it be said that the authorities are God's swine, as it
 were; he fattens them, gives them wealth, power, fame and the
 obedience of their subjects. They are not pursued, while they
 themselves pursue and oppress others; they suffer no injury, but they
 inflict it upon others; they do not give to others, but rob them until
 the hour comes when, like fattened swine, they are slaughtered. Hence
 the German proverb: A prince is a rare bird in the kingdom of heaven
 or, princes are wild game in heaven.
 
 129. Accordingly, those whom Moses calls here "_Nephilim_," which is
 an odious and disgraceful name, were without doubt the lawful
 administrators of Church and State. But because they did not use their
 office as they should, God marks and brands them with this opprobious
 name. As we, in this corrupt state of nature, are unable to use the
 least gift without pride, so God, most intolerant of pride, thrusts
 the mighty from their throne, and leaves the rich empty.
 
 130. I accept, then, the word "_Nephilim_" as having an active
 signification, being equivalent to tyrants, oppressors, revelers. I
 believe, furthermore, as has been the case with other languages also,
 that Moses has transferred the usage of this word from his own times
 to those before the deluge, after changing somewhat its meaning,
 inasmuch as these degenerate descendants of the sons of God abused
 their power and position for the oppression of the good, just as those
 Anakim were tyrants relying upon bodily strength, and so Moses will
 presently show.
 
 V. 4b. _And also after that, when the sons of God came in unto the
 daughters of men, and they bare children to them; the same were the
 men that were of old, the men of renown._
 
 131. Jerome[1] renders: _Isti sunt potentes a seculo_ (these are
 mighty men from the beginning). But the word _seculum_ (olam) does not
 here signify duration of time, nor does it predicate extent. These
 giants did not exist from the beginning, they were not born until the
 sons of God had degenerated. But _seculum_ (olam) connotes a second
 predicate, that of substance, so that Moses explains the nature of the
 power in which they trusted to have been secular or worldly. They
 despised the ministry of the Word as a vile office; therefore they
 seized upon another office, a secular one. The very same thing our
 Papists have done. It has pleased them better to hold ample revenues
 and worldly kingdoms than to be hated of all men for the sake of the
 Gospel.
 
 [Footnote 1: So also the A. V. and the R. V., while Luther has by no
 means the philological science against him. Mundus, seculum, aion, and
 olam are used to express the same conception. Translator.]
 
 132. As far as Moses is concerned, the noun _olam_ designates the
 world itself, and also age or time. Hence it is to be carefully noted
 when _olam_ (_seculum_) signifies duration of time, and when it
 signifies "world" in the Scriptures. Here it signifies of necessity
 "world," for they did not exist from the beginning.
 
 133. This clause, then, aptly describes the power they had received,
 not from the Church, nor from the Holy Spirit, but from the devil and
 the world. It is, as it were, the counterpart of what Christ says
 before Pontius Pilate, John 18, 36: "My kingdom is not of this world."
 The servants of the Word struggle with hunger, and they labor under
 the hate of all classes. In consequence, they cannot exercise tyranny;
 but those who possess kingdoms, who govern states, who possess castles
 and domains, are equipped for exercising tyranny.
 
 134. This clause contains also a suggestive reference to the small
 Church with her few souls. These are cross-bearers without wealth; but
 they possess the Word. Their only wealth is what the world despises
 and persecutes. The Nephilim, on the other hand, or giants, usurp as
 the descendants of the patriarchs the splendid name of the Church, and
 possess also kingdoms. They exercise dominion, and pursue the
 miserable Church in their power. In accordance therewith Moses calls
 them mighty before, or in, the world; or worldlings and temporal
 potentates.
 
 135. What Jerome renders _viri famosi_ (famous men) is, in Hebrew,
 "men of name," that is, renowned or famous in the world. Moses touches
 here also upon the sin of the Cyclopeans, who, possessing everything
 in the world, possessed also a famous name and were renowned
 throughout the world; while, on the contrary, the true sons of God,
 namely Noah and his sons, were held in the greatest scorn and regarded
 as heretics, as sons of the devil, as a blot upon the grandeur of
 Church and State. So is it now with us. Christ testifies in Matthew
 24, 37, that the last times resemble the times of Noah.
 
 136. Moses had before testified that the Holy Spirit would be taken
 from the wicked and they would be sent in the ways of their own
 desire. They were, accordingly, such rascals as the pope today with
 his cardinals and bishops, who are not only styled princes and possess
 kingdoms, but also take to themselves the name of Church, so as to
 subject us as heretics to the ban, and securely to condemn us. They do
 not permit themselves to be called tyrants, nor wicked, nor
 temple-robbers. They wish to be styled most kind, holy and reverend
 gentlemen.
 
 137. The meaning, therefore, is not that which Lyra follows when he
 understands "famous" as "notorious." As the world does not call the
 pope Antichrist, but ascribes to him the name of the greatest saint
 and admires him as if he and his carnal creatures were filled with the
 Holy Spirit and incapable of error, and therefore humbly worships
 whatever he commands or advises--exactly so those giants had a noble
 name and were held in admiration by the whole world. On the contrary,
 Noah with his followers was condemned as a rebel, as a heretic, as a
 traducer of the dignity of State and Church. So today do bishops
 regard us who profess the Gospel.
 
 D. THE SIN AGAINST THE HOLY SPIRIT.
 
 138. This passage furnishes a description of the sins with which that
 age was burdened: Men were averse to the Word; they were given over to
 their own lusts and reprobate minds; they sinned against the Holy
 Spirit by persistent impenitence, by defending their ungodly behavior
 and by warring upon the recognized truth. Yet with all these
 blasphemies they retained the name and authority, not only of the
 State, but also of the Church, as if God had exalted them to the place
 of the angels. When this was the state of things, and Noah and Lamech
 with their pious ancestor Methuselah taught in vain, God turned them
 over to the desires of their hearts (Ps 81, 12) and maintained silence
 until they should experience the flood, the prophecy of which they
 refused to believe.
 
 139. This is falling away from God and Church and entering upon
 illicit marriage. One sin, unless corrected at once, will lead to
 another, and so on indefinitely until the state is reached which
 Solomon describes in Proverbs 18, 3, "When the wicked cometh, there
 cometh also contempt, and with ignominy Cometh reproach." They who
 thus sin, even if afterward rebuked, do not heed. They imagine they
 stand in need of no instructor, and think they represent a just cause.
 They do not believe in a life after this, or even hope for salvation,
 while living in open sin. Notwithstanding, scorn and shame shall
 overwhelm them. It was this persistent impenitence and consummate
 contempt for the Word that impelled God to visit all flesh with a
 universal flood.
 
 
 IV. GOD'S REPENTANCE AND GRIEF THAT HE MADE MAN.
 
    A. THE REPENTANCE OF GOD.
 
       1. The Words, "The wickedness of man was great."
 
          a. How Luther used these words against the doctrine of free
             will; how the advocates of free will falsely interpreted
             them, and how they are refuted 140-141.
 
           * Concerning free will.
 
             (1) Augustine's doctrine of free will misinterpreted by
                 the schools 140.
 
             (2) The schools unreasonably defend it 141.
 
             (3) Man has no free will and without the grace of the Holy
                 Spirit can do nothing 142-143.
 
             (4) The reproving office of the Holy Spirit makes it clear
                 that man has no free will 144.
 
             (5) Whether there is hope, if a council be held, that the
                 Papists will abandon their false doctrine of free will
                 145.
 
             (6) How the true doctrine of free will leads us to a
                 knowledge of sin and what we are to hold in reference
                 to it 146.
 
             (7) Why we should guard against the false doctrine
                 concerning free will 147.
 
               * The comfort for one who commits sins of infirmities
                 147.
 
               * All endeavors without the Holy Spirit are evil 148.
 
             (8) We are to distinguish in the doctrine of free will
                 what is good politically from what is good
                 theologically 149-150.
 
          b. These words are wrongly understood by the Jews and
             sophists 151.
 
           * How we should view the discussions of philosophers in
             regard to God and divine things 152.
 
          c. These words should be understood as spoken not only of the
             people before the flood, but of all men 153.
 
       2. The Words, "It Repented Jehovah."
 
          a. How the repentance of God is to be reconciled with the
             wisdom and omniscience of God.
 
             (1) The way sophists answer this question 154.
 
             (2) Luther's answer 155-157.
 
               * How man should treat questions which lead us into the
                 throne of the divine majesty 158.
 
               * How the passages of Scripture are to be understood
                 which attribute to God the members of a human body
                 159.
 
               * Whether the Anthropomorphites were justly condemned
                 159.
 
               * Why God is represented to us as if he sprang from the
                 temporal and the visible 161-163.
 
               * We cannot explore God's nature 163.
 
               * In what pictures God reveals himself in the Old
                 Testament, and in the New 164.
 
               * The will of God in signs and the will of God's good
                 pleasure, "signs" and "Beneplaciti."
 
                 (a) How we can know God's will in signs 165-166.
 
                 (b) Why we cannot know the will of God's pleasure, nor
                     fathom it 165-166.
 
                 (c) What is really to be understood by the will in
                     signs 167.
 
          b. The way the schools explain these words 168.
 
          c. How they are to be rightly understood 169.
 
           * Disputing about God's majesty and omnipotence places man
             in a dangerous position 169-171.
 
           * How man should hold to the signs by which God revealed
             himself 171.
 
           * What the will of God's pleasure is, to what it serves and
             how it is revealed in Christ 172-176.
 
           * The will of good pleasure of which the fathers speak
             cannot comfort the heart 175.
 
           * The only view of the Godhead possible in this life 176.
 
          d. In what sense it can be said that "it repented Jehovah
             that he had made man" 177.
 
 
 IV. THE REPENTANCE AND GRIEF OF GOD BECAUSE HE HAD MADE MAN.
 
 A. The Repentance of God.
 
 Vs. 5-6. _And Jehovah saw that the wickedness of man was great in the
 earth, and that every imagination of the thoughts of his heart was
 only evil continually. And it repented Jehovah that he had made man on
 the earth, and it grieved him at his heart._
 
 140. This is the passage which we have used against "free will," of
 which Augustine writes that without the grace of the Holy Spirit it
 can do nothing but sin. The scholastics, however, the champions of
 free will, are not only hard beset by this clear passage, but also by
 the authority of Augustine, and they sweat. Of Augustine they say that
 his language is hyperbolical, as Basil writes of one who in refuting
 the other side had gone too far, that he did like the farmers; they
 when trying to straighten out crooked branches bend them a little too
 far on the other side; and so Augustine, in beating back the
 Pelagians, is asserted to have spoken more severely against free will
 in the defense of grace than the merits of the case warranted.
 
 141. As far as this passage is concerned, it is slandered when it is
 held that it speaks only of the evil generation before the flood, and
 that now men are better, at least some who make good use of their
 freedom of will. Such wretched interpreters do not see that the
 passage speaks of the human heart in general, and that a particle is
 plainly added, _Rak_, which signifies "only." In the third place, they
 fail to see that after the flood the same declaration is repeated in
 the eighth chapter in almost precisely the same terms. For God says,
 "The imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth," Gen 8, 21.
 Here evidently he does not speak only of the antediluvians. He rather
 speaks of those to whom he makes the promise that henceforth another
 general flood of water shall never come, that is, of all the offspring
 of Noah. These are words of universal application: "The imagination of
 man's heart is evil."
 
 142. We draw, therefore, the general conclusion that man without the
 Holy Spirit and without grace can do nothing but sin, and thus he
 unhaltingly goes forward from sin to sin. When in addition, he will
 not endure sound doctrine but rejects the word of salvation and
 resists the Holy Spirit, he becomes an enemy of God, blasphemes the
 Holy Spirit and simply follows the evil desires of his heart.
 Witnesses of this are the examples of the prophets, Christ and the
 Apostles, the primeval world under Noah as teacher, and also the
 example of our adversaries today, who cannot be convinced by anything
 that they are in error, that they sin, that their worship is ungodly.
 
 143. Other declarations of Holy Scripture prove the same thing. Is not
 the statement of the fourteenth Psalm, verse 3, sweeping enough when
 it says: "Jehovah looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to
 see if there was any that did understand, and did seek after God. They
 are all gone aside?" Thus, Ps 116, 11, "All men are liars;" and Paul,
 "God hath shut up all unto disobedience," Rom 11, 32. These passages
 are most sweeping, and emphatically force the conclusion that we all,
 without the Holy Spirit, whose dispenser is Christ, can do nothing but
 err and sin. Therefore, Christ says in the Gospel, "I am the vine, ye
 are the branches: ... apart from me ye can do nothing," Jn 15, 5.
 Without me you are a branch cut off, dry, dead and ready for the
 burning.
 
 144. And the very reason the Holy Spirit performs the office of
 reproving the world is that he may call the world back to penitence
 and the recognition of its derangement. But the world remains
 consistent with itself; it hears not and believes it can please God
 with forms of worship of its own choosing and without the sanction of
 the divine Word, and does not permit itself to be undeceived.
 
 145. If ever a council should be held, the final declaration and
 conclusion with reference to this very point, the freedom of will,
 will be that we should abide by the decisions of the pope and the
 fathers. We may clamor until we are hoarse that man in himself without
 the Holy Spirit is evil, that everything he does without the Holy
 Spirit or without faith is condemned before God, that his heart is
 depraved and all his thought; we shall effect nothing.
 
 146. Therefore, the mind is to be grounded in this, and we are to hold
 fast the doctrine which lays before us our sin and condemnation. This
 knowledge of our sin is the beginning of salvation; we must absolutely
 despair of ourselves and give glory for righteousness to God alone.
 Why does Paul elsewhere complain, and in Romans 7, 18 freely confess
 that there is nothing good in him? He says plainly, "in my flesh;" so
 that we understand that the Holy Spirit alone can heal our infirmity.
 When this has been fixed in our hearts, the foundation of our
 salvation is largely laid, inasmuch as subsequently clear testimonies
 are given that God will not cast away the sinner, that is, one who
 recognizes his sin and desires to come to his senses and thirsts after
 righteousness and the remission of sin through Christ.
 
 147. Let us, therefore, take care not to be found among those
 Cyclopeans who oppose the Word of God and proclaim their freedom of
 will and their own powers. Though we often err, though we fall and
 sin, still, upon yielding to reproof on the part of the Holy Spirit
 with an humble confession of our depravity, the Holy Spirit himself
 will be present, and not only not impute to us the sin we acknowledge,
 but the grace of Christ shall cover it and he will shower upon us
 other gifts necessary to this life as well as the future one.
 
 148. But the words of Moses are to be more closely considered, for
 with a definite purpose he has used here a peculiar expression; he has
 not merely said, "The thoughts of man's heart are evil," but "the
 imagination of the thoughts of his heart." Thus he expresses the
 highest that man can achieve with his thoughts or with his reason and
 free will. "Imagination" he calls that which man with his strongest
 effort devises, selects, creates like a potter, and believes to be
 most beautiful.
 
 But such imagination is evil, he says, and that not once, but always.
 For our reason without the Holy Spirit is altogether without knowledge
 of God. Now, to be without knowledge of God means to be entirely base,
 to dwell in darkness and to deem that very good which, in reality, is
 very bad.
 
 149. But when I speak of good, I do so from the standpoint of
 theology, for we must distinguish between the theological and the
 civil standpoints. God approves also the rule of the ungodly; he
 honors and rewards virtue also among the ungodly: but only in regard
 to the things of this life and in things grasped by a reason which is
 upright from the civil standpoint; whereas the future life is not
 embraced in such reward. His approval is not with regard to the future
 life.
 
 150. When we dispute about the freedom of the will, the question with
 us is what it may do from the theological standpoint, not in civil
 affairs and in those subjects to reason. We believe that man, without
 the Holy Spirit, is altogether corrupt before God, though he may stand
 adorned with all heathen virtues, inasmuch as there are certainly
 distinguished examples of moderation, of liberality, of love of
 country, parents and children, of courage and humanity, even in the
 history of the Gentiles. We maintain that man's best thoughts
 concerning God, the worship of God, the will of God, are worse than
 Cimmerian darkness; for the light of reason, which has been given to
 man alone, understands only bodily blessings. Such is the wicked
 infatuation of our evil desires.
 
 151. This declaration, therefore, should not be construed frivolously,
 as the Jews and sophists do, who believe that the lower part of man
 only is here meant, which is bestial, and that the reason longs for
 better things. "The imagination of the thoughts" they apply
 accordingly to the second table, like the Pharisee who condemns the
 publican and says that he is not like the other persons. The words the
 Pharisee uses are very fine, for to give thanks to God for his gifts
 is not a sin; and yet we declare this same thing to be ungodly and
 wicked, because it proceeded from gross ignorance of God, and it is
 truly prayer turned into sin, tending neither to the glory of God nor
 to the welfare of men.
 
 152. You may observe that philosophers have at various times quite
 cleverly discussed God and the providence with which he rules all
 things. To some, such words have seemed so pious that they almost have
 placed Socrates, Xenophon and Plato in the same rank with the
 prophets; yet, because in these discussions the philosophers are
 ignorant of the fact that God has sent his only Son into the world to
 save sinners, these beautiful utterances are, according to the
 declaration of this passage, consummate ignorance of God and mere
 blasphemies, for the passage states unequivocally that all imagination
 and effort of the human heart is only evil.
 
 153. The text speaks, accordingly, not only of the sins before the
 flood, but it speaks of the whole nature of man, his heart, his reason
 and his intellect, even when man pretends to righteousness and desires
 to be very holy, as do today the Anabaptists when they purpose in
 their heart so to excel as to fail in nothing, when for a show they
 attempt to attain the fairest virtues. The truth is that hearts
 without the Holy Spirit are not only ignorant of God, but naturally
 even hate him. How, then, can anything be aught but evil that proceeds
 from ignorance and hatred of God?
 
 154. Another question is here raised. Moses speaks thus: "When Jehovah
 saw that every imagination of the thoughts of man's heart was only
 evil continually, it repented him that he had made man on the earth."
 If God foresees everything, why does the text say that he now first
 sees? If God is wise, how can regret for having created anything
 befall him? Why did he not see this sin or depraved nature of man from
 the beginning of the world? Why does Scripture thus attribute to God
 such things as a temporary will, vision and purpose? Are not the
 purposes of God eternal and unalterable, incapable of being regretted?
 Similar instances are found also in the prophets, where God threatens
 penalties, as for instance to the Ninevites, and yet pardons the
 penitent.
 
 To this question the sophists have no other reply than this, that the
 Scripture speaks after the manner of men, that such things are
 ascribed to God accordingly through the use of a figure of speech.
 Hence they contend concerning a double will of God, the will expressed
 by signs (_voluntas signi_) and the will of his good pleasure
 (_voluntas beneplaciti_). The will of his good pleasure, they say, is
 constant and unchangeable, while the expressed will is subject to
 change. For the signs through which he expresses himself, he changes
 when he pleases. Thus he has abolished circumcision and instituted
 baptism, whereas the will of his good pleasure, fixed from eternity,
 abides.
 
 155. While I do not condemn this interpretation, a simpler meaning of
 the Scripture seems to be that the Holy Scriptures express the thought
 of men in the ministry. For when Moses says that God sees and regrets,
 this is really done in the hearts of those who have the ministry of
 the Word. Thus he said above: "My Spirit shall not strive with man,"
 but he does not say this simply of the Holy Spirit as existing in his
 own nature, or of the divine majesty, but of the Holy Spirit in the
 hearts of Noah and Methuselah, that is, the Holy Spirit as officiating
 and administering the Word through the saints.
 
 156. In this manner God saw the wickedness of man and repented; that
 is, Noah, who had the Holy Spirit and was a minister of the Word, saw
 the wickedness of men and, seeing such things, he was moved by the
 Holy Spirit to grief. So Paul says in Ephesians 4, 30, that the Holy
 Spirit in the righteous is grieved by the ungodliness and malice of
 the wicked. Inasmuch as Noah is a faithful minister of the Word and an
 organ of the Holy Spirit, the Holy Spirit is said to grieve when Noah
 grieves and wishes that man rather did not exist than to be thus
 iniquitous.
 
 157. The meaning, therefore, is not that God did not see these things
 from eternity; he saw everything from eternity; but inasmuch as this
 wickedness now manifests itself in all its fierceness, God now first
 reveals the same in the hearts of his ministers and prophets.
 
 From eternity, therefore, God is firm and constant in his purpose. He
 sees and knows everything. But only in his own time does God reveal
 this to the righteous so that they, also, may see it. This seems to me
 the simplest meaning of this passage, nor does Augustine differ from
 it much.
 
 158. However, I constantly follow the rule to avoid, whenever
 possible, such questions as draw us before the throne of the highest
 majesty. It is better and safer to stand at the manger of Christ, the
 man. To lose one's self in the labyrinths of divinity is fraught with
 greatest danger.
 
 159. To this passage belong also other similar ones in which God is
 pictured as having eyes, ears, mouth, nose, hands and feet, as Isaiah,
 Daniel and other prophets saw him in their visions. In such passages
 the Bible speaks of God in the same manner as of a man. In
 consequence, the Anthropomorphites stood condemned of heresy because
 they attributed to the divine essence a human form.
 
 160. Because the Anthropomorphites fancied such gross things, they
 have rightly been condemned. Their fancy is manifestly erroneous, for
 a spirit, as Christ says (Lk 24, 39), has not flesh and bone. I am
 rather of the opinion that the Anthropomorphites intended to adapt the
 form of their doctrine to the plainest people. For in his substance,
 God is unknowable, indefinable, inexpressible, though we may tear
 ourselves to pieces in our efforts to discern or portray him.
 
 161. Hence, God himself condescends to the low plane of our
 understanding and presents himself to us with childlike simplicity in
 representations, as in a guise, so that he may be made known to us in
 some way. Thus the Holy Spirit appeared in the form of a dove; not
 because he is a dove, but in this crude form he desired to be
 recognized, received and worshiped, for it was really the Holy Spirit.
 No one, to be sure, will say that the same passage defines God as a
 voice speaking from heaven, yet under this crude image, a human voice
 from heaven, he was received and worshiped.
 
 162. When Scripture thus ascribes to God human form, voice, actions
 and state of mind, it is intended as an aid only for the uncultivated
 and feeble; we who are great and learned and of discernment in
 reference to Scripture, should likewise lay hold of these
 representations, because God has put them forth and revealed himself
 to us through them. The angels likewise, appear in human form, though
 it is certain that they are only spirits; spirits we cannot recognize
 when they present themselves as such, but likenesses we do recognize.
 
 163. This is the simplest way of treating such passages, for the
 nature of God we cannot define; what he is not we can well define--he
 is not a voice, a dove, water, bread, wine. And yet in these visible
 forms he presents himself to us and deals with us. These forms he
 shows to us that we should not become wandering and unsettled spirits
 which dispute concerning God, but are completely ignorant concerning
 him, since in his unveiled majesty he can not be apprehended. He sees
 it to be impossible for us to know him in his own nature. For he
 lives, as the Scripture says in 1 Timothy 6, 16, in an inaccessible
 light, and what we can apprehend and understand he has declared. They
 who abide in these things will truly lay hold of him, while those who
 vaunt and follow visions, revelations and illuminations will either be
 overwhelmed by his majesty or remain in densest ignorance of God.
 
 164. Thus the Jews also had their representations in which God
 manifested himself to them, as the mercy-seat, the ark of the
 covenant, the tabernacle, the pillars of smoke and fire. God says in
 Exodus 33, 20, "Man shall not see me and live," therefore he gives a
 representation of himself in which he so manifests himself to us that
 we may lay hold of him. In the new covenant we have Baptism, the
 Lord's Supper, absolution and the ministry of the Word.
 
 165. These are what the scholastics call _voluntas signi_, the will
 expressed through signs, which we must view when we desire to know the
 will of God. Another is the _voluntas beneplaciti_, the will of his
 good pleasure, the essential will of God, or his unveiled majesty,
 which is God himself. From this our eyes are to be turned away. It
 cannot be laid hold of; for in God is nothing but divinity, and the
 essence of God is his infinite wisdom and almighty power. These are
 absolutely inaccessible to reason: what he has willed according to the
 will of his good pleasure, that he has seen from eternity.
 
 166. Into this essential and divine will we should not pry, but should
 absolutely refrain from it as from the divine majesty, for it is
 inscrutable, and God has had no desire to declare it in this life. He
 desires to show it under certain tokens or coverings, as Baptism, the
 Word and the Lord's Supper. These are the images of the deity and are
 his will as expressed through signs, by which he deals with us on the
 plane of our intelligence. Hence, we should look to these alone. The
 will of his good pleasure is to be left entirely out of contemplation,
 unless you happen to be Moses, or David, or some similarly perfect
 man, although even they so looked to the will of the divine good
 pleasure as never to turn their eyes from the will expressed by signs.
 
 167. This will of God is called his activity (_effectus Dei_), wherein
 he comes out to us and deals with us garbed in the drapery of things
 extraneous to himself; these we can lay hold of--the Word of God and
 the ceremonies instituted by himself. This will of God is not that of
 his omnipotence, for though God in the ten commandments enjoins what
 ought to be done it is yet not done. Thus, Christ has instituted the
 Lord's Supper to strengthen in us faith in his mercy, and yet many
 receive it to their condemnation, that is, without faith.
 
 168. But I return to Moses. He says that God sees man's wickedness and
 repents. The scholastics explain this: He sees and repents, namely,
 according to the expressed will, not that of his good pleasure, or the
 essential will.
 
 169. We say that Noah's heart is moved by the Holy Spirit to
 understand that God is wroth with man and desires his destruction.
 This interpretation commends itself to our intelligence and does not
 draw us into discussions concerning the absolute will or majesty of
 God, which are very dangerous, as I have seen in many. Such spirits
 are first puffed up by the devil so that they believe themselves to be
 in possession of the Holy Spirit, neglect the Word to the point of
 blaspheming it and vaunt nothing but the Spirit and visions.
 
 170. This is the first degree of error--that men, paying no heed to
 the Deity as imaged and incarnate, seek after the unveiled God.
 Afterward, when the hour of judgment comes, and they feel the wrath of
 God, God himself judging and searching their hearts, the devil ceases
 to puff them up and they despair and die. They go about in the
 untempered sunlight and forsake the shade that delivers from the heat,
 Is 4, 6.
 
 171. Let no one therefore meditate upon divinity unveiled, but flee
 from such thoughts as from the infernal regions and the very
 temptations of Satan. But let us take care to abide in these symbols
 through which God has revealed himself to us--the Son, born of the
 Virgin Mary, lying among beasts in the manger, and the Word, Baptism,
 the Lord's Supper and absolution. In these images we see and find God
 in a way wherein we can endure him; he comforts us, lifts us up into
 hope and saves. Other thoughts about the will of the good pleasure, or
 the essential and eternal will, kill and damn.
 
 172. However, to name this the will of "good pleasure" is a misnomer.
 For that deserves to be called the will of good pleasure which the
 Gospel discloses, concerning which Paul says, "that ye may prove what
 is the good will of God," Rom 12, 2. And Christ says, "This is the
 will of my Father, that every one that beholdeth the Son should have
 eternal life," Jn 6, 40. Also, "Whosoever shall do the will of my
 Father who is in heaven, he is my brother," Mt 12, 50. Again, "This is
 my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased," Mt 3, 17. This will of
 grace is correctly and properly called the will "of the divine good
 pleasure" and it is our only remedy and safeguard against that other
 will, be it called the "expressed will" or the "will of good
 pleasure," about the display of which at the flood and the destruction
 of Sodom the scholastics dispute.
 
 173. On both occasions a terrible wrath is in evidence, against which
 no soul could find protection, except in that gracious will, keeping
 in mind that the Son of God was sent into the flesh to deliver us from
 sin, death and the power of the devil.
 
 174. This will of the divine good pleasure has been determined from
 eternity, and revealed and published in Christ. It is a quickening,
 gracious and lovable will, and consequently it alone merits to be
 called "the will of good pleasure." But the good fathers almost pass
 the promises by; they do not press them, though they could properly be
 called "the will of the good pleasure."
 
 175. Therefore, as they enjoin looking to the will expressed by signs,
 they do well, but this is in no wise sufficient; when we consider the
 ten commandments, are we not frightened by the sight of our sins? When
 those terrible examples of wrath are added which are also divine will
 as expressed by signs, it is impossible for the soul to be lifted up
 except by looking back to the will of the good pleasure, as we call
 it, that is, the Son of God, who portrays for us the spirit and the
 will of his Father, who does not hate sinners but desires to have
 compassion upon them through his Son. Christ says to Philip, "He that
 hath seen me hath seen the Father," Jn 14, 9.
 
 176. The Son of God, therefore, who became incarnate, is that sign or
 veil of God in which the divine majesty with all its gifts so offers
 itself to us that no sinner is so wretched but he dare approach him in
 certain confidence of obtaining forgiveness. This is the only vision
 of Deity which in this life is expedient and possible. However, those
 who have died in this faith shall on the last day be so illumined by
 power from on high as to behold the majesty itself. In the meantime,
 it behooves us to approach the Father through the way, which is Christ
 himself. He will lead us safely and we shall not be deceived.
 
 177. The additional statement of the text, "It repented Jehovah that
 he had made man on the earth," I believe to be meant to bring out the
 antithesis, that God has in mind not the earthly man, who is subject
 to sin and death, but the heavenly man, who is lord over them. He
 expresses his love for the latter, while he hates the former and plans
 his destruction.
 
 
 B. THE GRIEF OF GOD.
 
    1. This is not to be understood of the divine nature, but of the
       hearts of the patriarchs 178-179.
 
    2. Abraham, Samuel and Christ grieved in like manner 180.
 
    3. By whom such grief is awakened in the heart 181.
 
    4. The cause of this grief 182.
 
     * The character of the children of God and of the world in the
       face of the approaching calamity 183-184.
 
     * How the patriarchs and the Church were walls of defense 185.
 
    5. What made the grief of the holy patriarchs greater 185.
 
    6. Moses describes this grief very carefully 186.
 
     * How we see the grief of God in his saints 187.
 
     * How all is ruined on account of sin 187.
 
     * Why Noah did not dare to reveal the great wrath of God to the
       world 188.
 
     * What prevents the world from believing God's threatenings
       188-189.
 
     * To whom God's promises do and do not apply 190.
 
     * Why the old world did not believe the threat of the deluge 191.
 
     * The fate of true doctrine in our day is the same as it was in
       Noah's 192.
 
 
 B. THE GRIEF OF GOD.
 
 V. 6b. _And it grieved him at his heart._
 
 178. Such was the regret of God that he was pained in his heart. The
 word here is _azab_, which was used before when he said (Gen 3, 16),
 "In pain shalt thou bring forth children"; also in Psalm 127, 2, "the
 bread of toil." This expression must be understood according to the
 usage of Scripture. We must not think that God has a heart or that he
 can suffer pain, but when the spirit of Noah, Lamech or Methuselah is
 grieved, God himself is said to be grieved. We may understand such
 grief not of his divine nature, but of his conduct. Noah, with his
 father and grandfather, feels in his heart, through a revelation of
 the Holy Spirit, that God hates the world because of sin and desires
 its destruction; therefore they are grieved by this impenitence.
 
 179. This is the simple and true meaning. If you refer these words to
 the will of the divine essence and hold that God has resolved this
 from eternity, a perilous argument is employed to which are equal only
 men who are spiritual and tested by trial, like Paul, for instance,
 who has ventured to argue concerning predestination. Let us take our
 stand on an humbler plane, one less open to danger, and hold that Noah
 and the other fathers were most grievously pained when the Spirit
 disclosed to them such wrath. These inexpressible groanings of the
 best of men are accordingly attributed to God himself, because they
 emanate from his Spirit.
 
 180. An example of such groanings we see later in the case of Abraham,
 who interposed himself like a wall in behalf of the safety of the
 Sodomites and did not abandon the cause until they came down to five
 righteous ones. Without a doubt the Holy Spirit filled the breast of
 Abraham with infinite and frequent groanings in his attempts to effect
 the salvation of the wretched. Likewise Samuel--what does he not do
 for Saul? He cries and implores with such vehemence that God is
 compelled to restrain him: "How long wilt thou mourn for Saul, seeing
 I have rejected him from being king over Israel?" 1 Sam 16, 1. So
 Christ, foreseeing the destruction of Jerusalem within a few years by
 reason of its sins, is most violently moved and pained in his soul.
 
 181. Such promptings the Spirit of prayer arouses in pious souls.
 Present everywhere, he is moved by the adversities of others, teaches,
 informs, spares no pains, prays, complains, groans. Thus Moses and
 Paul are willing to be accursed for the sake of their people.
 
 182. In this manner Noah, the most holy man, and his father and
 grandfather are consumed with pain at the sight of such terrible wrath
 of God. He is not delighted at this overthrow of the whole human race,
 but is filled with anxiety and the most grievous pain, while at the
 same time the sons of men live in the greatest security, mocking,
 boasting and taunting. Thus Psalms 109, 4, "For my love they are my
 adversaries: but I give myself unto prayer." Thus Paul, "I tell you
 even weeping." Phil 3, 18. And what else could holy men do but weep
 when the world would in no wise permit itself to be corrected?
 
 183. It is always the appearance of the true Church that she not only
 suffers, not only is humiliated and trampled under foot, but also
 prays for her tormentors, is seriously disturbed by their dangers; on
 the contrary, others play and frolic in proportion as they approach
 their doom. But when the hour of judgment comes, God in turn closes
 his ears so completely that he does not even hear his own beloved
 children as they pray and intercede for the wicked. So Ezekiel laments
 that no one is found who will stand for Israel as a protecting wall,
 saying that this is the office of the prophets, Ezek 13, 5.
 
 184. It is impossible for the ungodly to pray; let no one, therefore,
 entertain the hope concerning the papists, our adversaries, that they
 pray. We pray for them and plant ourselves like a wall against the
 wrath of God and, without doubt, it is by our tears and groanings that
 they are saved, if, perchance, they will repent.
 
 185. It is a terrible example, that God has spared not the first
 world, for which Noah, Lamech and Methuselah set themselves like a
 wall. What, then, shall we expect where such walls do not exist, where
 there is no Church at all? The Church is always a wall against the
 wrath of God. She feels pain, is tormented in her soul, prays,
 intercedes, instructs, teaches, exhorts, as long as the judgment hour
 is not here but coming. When she sees these ministrations to be
 unavailing, what else can she do but feel grievous pain at the
 destruction of the impenitent? The pain of the godly fathers was
 augmented by the sight of so many relatives and kindred at one time
 going to destruction.
 
 186. This pain Moses could not express in a better and more graphic
 description than to say that God repented of having made man. Before,
 when he describes man's nature as having been formed in God's image,
 he says that God beheld all that he had made and it was very good.
 God, then, is delighted with his creatures and has joy in them. Here
 he absolutely alters that statement by one altogether at variance with
 it--that God is grieved at heart and even repents of having created
 man.
 
 187. It was Noah and the other fathers who felt this through the
 revelation of the Holy Spirit; otherwise, they would have shared those
 thoughts of joy and would have judged according to the earlier
 prophecy that God had delight in all his works. Never would they have
 thought that the wrath of God was such as to destroy not only the
 whole human race, but also all living flesh of sky and earth, which
 surely had not offended, yea, the very earth also; for the earth,
 because of man's sin, had not retained after the flood its pristine
 excellence. Some have written, as Lyra reminds us, that by the flood
 the surface of the earth was washed away three hands deep. Certain it
 is that paradise has been utterly destroyed through the flood.
 Therefore, we possess today an earth more deeply cursed than before
 the flood and after the fall of Adam; though the state of the earth
 after the fall could not compare with the grandeur of its primeval
 state before sin.
 
 188. These disasters, therefore, the holy fathers saw through the
 revelation of the Holy Spirit a hundred and twenty years before. But
 such was the wickedness of the world that it put the Holy Spirit to
 silence. Noah could not venture to reveal such threats without risk of
 the gravest dangers. With his father and grandfather, with his
 children and wife, he would discuss this great wrath of God. The sons
 of men, however, had no more inclination to hear these things than the
 papists today have to hear themselves called the church of Satan and
 not of Christ. Accordingly, they would vaunt their ancestors and over
 against Noah's proclamations they would plead the promise of the seed,
 believing it to be impossible for God, in this manner, to destroy all
 mankind.
 
 189. For the same reason, the Jews did not believe the prophets nor
 even Christ himself when called to repentance, but maintained that
 they were the people of God, inasmuch as they had the temple and
 worship. The Turks today are inflated with victories which they
 believe to be the reward for their faith and religion because they
 believe in one God. We, however, are viewed as heathen and reputed to
 believe in three Gods. God would not give us such victories and
 dominions, they say, if he did not favor us and approve our religion.
 This same reasoning blinds also the papist. Occupying an exalted
 position, they maintain they are the Church and hence they have no
 fear of divine punishment. Devilish, therefore, is that argument
 whereby men take the name of God to palliate their sins.
 
 190. But if God did not spare the first world, the generation of the
 holy patriarchs, which had the promise of the seed as its very own--if
 he saved only a very small remnant--the Turks, Jews and Papists shall
 boast in vain of the name of God. According to Micah 2, 7, the Word of
 God promises blessings to those who walk in uprightness. But those who
 do not walk in uprightness are cursed. Those he threatens, those he
 destroys. Neither does he take account of the name "Church", nor of
 their number, whereas he saves the remnant which walks in uprightness.
 But never will you convince the world of this.
 
 191. In all probability the descendants of the patriarchs who perished
 in the flood abused quite shamefully the argument of the dignity of
 the Church, and condemned Noah for blasphemy and falsehood. To say,
 they argued, that God was about to destroy the whole world by a flood
 is equal to saying that God is not merciful, nor a Father, but a cruel
 tyrant. You proclaim the wrath of God, O Noah! Then God is not such a
 being as to promise deliverance from sin and death through the seed of
 woman? The wrath of God, therefore, will not swallow the whole earth.
 We are the people of God. We have from God magnificent gifts; never
 would God have given these to us if he had resolved to act against us
 with such hostility. In this fashion the wicked are in the habit of
 applying to themselves the promises and trusting to the same. All
 warnings, however, they neglect and deride.
 
 192. It is profitable to contemplate this diligently so that we may be
 safeguarded against such vicious heedlessness of the wicked. For what
 happened to Moses, now happens also to us. Our adversaries ascribe to
 themselves the name of God's people, true worship, grace and
 everything holy; to us, everything devilish. Now, when we reprove them
 for blasphemy and say that they are the church of Satan, they rage
 against us with every kind of cruelty. Hence we mourn with Noah, and
 commend the cause to God, as Christ did on the cross--what else could
 we do?--and wait till God shall judge the earth and show that he loves
 the remnant of those that fear him and that he hates the multitude of
 impenitent sinners in spite of their boast of being the Church, of
 having the promises, of having the worship of God. When God destroyed
 the whole original world, he manifested the promise of the seed to
 that wretched and tiny remnant, Noah and his sons.
 
 
 V. NOAH ALONE WAS RIGHTEOUS; THE WORLD DESTROYED.
 
    A. NOAH ALONE WAS FOUND RIGHTEOUS.
 
       1. What comfort was offered Noah by his righteousness in the
          midst of his suffering 193.
 
        * To find grace before God leads to faith and excludes works
          194.
 
       2. For what was righteous Noah especially praised by God 195.
 
        * Many great men lived in the days of Noah 196.
 
       3. How righteous Noah had to contend against so much all alone
          197.
 
        * By what means the Papists contend against the Evangelicals
          198.
 
       4. With what the world especially upbraided righteous Noah 199.
 
        * People then were wiser and more ingenious than now 200.
 
       5. Noah may be called both just and pious 201.
 
       6. Righteous Noah led a godly life, possessed great courage and
          was a marvelous character 202.
 
       7. By his piety Noah was a confessor of the truth 203-204.
 
        * It is very difficult for one man to withstand the united
          opposition of many 204.
 
       8. Being a preacher of righteousness Noah was in greater danger
          205.
 
       9. Noah an example of patience and of all virtues 206.
 
      10. How he traveled and preached everywhere in the world, and
          preserved the human race temporally and spiritually 207-208.
 
      11. The world takes offense at righteous Noah's marrying, and
          adds sin to sin 209.
 
      12. The order of the birth of Noah's sons 210.
 
    B. THE WHOLE WORLD DESTROYED.
 
       1. Whether, as Lyra teaches, birds and animals were destroyed
          211.
 
        * Why the punishment of sin was visited also upon the animals
          212-213.
 
       2. The meaning of "the earth was corrupt before God" 214-216.
 
        * The sins against the first table of the law can easier be
          concealed than those against the second table 214.
 
        * Where false doctrine is taught, godless living follows 215.
 
       3. How the earth was corrupt in the light of the first table of
          the law 215-216.
 
       4. How the earth was corrupt in the light of the second table
          217-218.
 
        * The meaning of "violence" in Scripture 218.
 
        * The greatest violence can obtain under the appearance of
          holiness, as among the Papists and Turks 219-221.
 
        * Moses beautifully traces the course God takes in his
          judgments 222.
 
        * Who can pass the right judgment upon the pope that he is
          Antichrist 223.
 
        * How Antichrist strengthens the courage of the godly, and
          whether they can check him 223.
 
       5. Noah laments this corruption 224.
 
        * Godlessness cannot be remedied when it adorns itself with the
          appearance of holiness 225.
 
       6. How God views this corruption 226.
 
        * Luther laments the wickedness of the enemies of the Gospel
          227.
 
        * How we should view God's delay in punishing the wickedness of
          his enemies 228.
 
        * God's delay is very hard for believers 229.
 
       7. The first world, although corrupt, was much better than the
          present world 230.
 
 
 V. HOW NOAH ALONE WAS FOUND RIGHTEOUS, AND HOW THE WHOLE WORLD WAS
 DESTROYED.
 
 A. Noah Alone Was found Righteous.
 
 V. 8. _But Noah found grace in the eyes of Jehovah._
 
 193. These are the words through which Noah was lifted up and
 quickened again. For such wrath of the divine majesty would have
 killed him, had not God added the promise of saving him. It is likely,
 however, that his faith had a struggle and was weak. We cannot imagine
 how such contemplation of God's wrath weakens courage.
 
 194. This novel expression of the Holy Spirit the heavenly messenger
 Gabriel also uses when speaking to the Blessed Virgin Lk 1, 30, "Thou
 hast found favor (grace) with God." The expression most palpably
 excludes merit and commends faith, through which alone we are
 justified before God, made acceptable and well pleasing in his sight.
 
 V. 9. _These are the generations of Noah. Noah was a righteous man,
 and perfect in his generations; Noah walked with God._
 
 195. With this passage the Jews commence not only a new chapter, but
 also a new lesson. This is a very brief history, but it greatly extols
 our patriarch Noah; he alone remained just and upright while the other
 sons of God degenerated.
 
 196. Let us remember many most excellent men were among the sons of
 God, of whom some lived with Noah well nigh five hundred years. Man in
 that age before the flood was very long-lived; not only the sons of
 God, but also the sons of men. A very wide and rich experience had
 been gathered by these people during so many years. Much they learned
 from their progenitors and much they saw and experienced.
 
 197. Amid the corruption of all these stands Noah, a truly marvelous
 man. He swerves neither to the left nor to the right. He retains the
 true worship of God. He retains the pure doctrine, and lives in the
 fear of God. There is no doubt that a depraved generation hated him
 inordinately, tantalized him in various ways and thus insulted him:
 "Art thou alone wise? Dost thou alone please God? Are the rest of us
 all in error? Shall we all be damned? Thou alone dost not err. Thou
 alone shalt not be condemned." And thus the just and holy man must
 have concluded in his mind that all others were in error and about to
 be condemned, while he and his offspring alone were to be saved.
 Although his conviction was right in the matter, his lot was a hard
 one. The holy man was in various ways troubled by such reflections.
 
 198. The wretched Papists press us today with this one argument: Do
 you believe that all the fathers have been in error? It seems hard so
 to believe, especially of the worthier ones, such as Augustine,
 Ambrose, Bernard and that whole throng of the best men who have
 governed Churches with the Word and have been adorned with the august
 name of the Church. The labors of such we both laud and admire.
 
 199. But surely no less a difficulty confronted Noah himself, who
 alone is called just and upright, at a time when the very sons of men
 paraded the name of the Church. When the sons of the fathers allied
 themselves with these they, forsooth, believed that Noah with his
 people raved, because he followed another doctrine and another
 worship.
 
 200. Today our life is very brief, still to what lengths human nature
 will go is sufficiently in evidence. What may we imagine the condition
 to have been in such a long existence, in which the bitterness and
 vehemence of human nature were even stronger? Today we are naturally
 much more dull and stupid, and yet men singularly gifted rush into
 wickedness. It is afterward said that all flesh had corrupted its way
 upon the earth, only Noah was just and upright.
 
 201. From these two words we may gather the thought that Noah is held
 to be "just" as he honored the first table and "upright" as he honored
 the second. "Just" he is called, because of his faith in God, because
 he first believed the general promise with respect to the seed of
 woman and then also the particular one respecting the destruction of
 the world through the flood and the salvation of his own offspring. On
 the other hand he is called "upright" because he walked in the fear of
 God and conscientiously avoided murder and other sins with which the
 wicked polluted themselves in defiance of conscience. Nor did he
 permit himself to be moved by the frequent offenses of men most
 illustrious, wise and apparently holy.
 
 202. Great was his courage. Today it appears to us impossible that one
 man should oppose himself to all mankind, condemning them as evil,
 while they vaunt the Church and God's Word and worship, and to
 maintain that he alone is a son of God and acceptable before him.
 Noah, accordingly, is a marvelous man, and Moses commends this same
 greatness of mind when he plainly adds "in his generation," or "in his
 age," as if he desired to say that his age was indeed the most wicked
 and corrupt.
 
 203. Above, in the history of Enoch, we explained what it means to
 walk with God, namely, to advocate the cause of God in public. To be
 just and upright bespeaks private virtue, but to walk with God is
 something public--to advocate the cause of God before the world, to
 wield his Word, to teach his worship. Noah was not simply just and
 holy for himself but he was also a confessor; he taught others the
 promises and threats of God, and performed and suffered all that
 behooves a public personage in an age so exceedingly wicked and
 corrupt.
 
 204. If it were I who had seen that so great men in the generation of
 the ungodly were opposed to me, I surely in desperation should have
 cast aside my ministry. For one cannot conceive how difficult it is
 for one man to oppose himself alone to the unanimity of all churches;
 to impugn the judgment of the best and most amicable of men; to
 condemn them; to teach, to live, and to do everything, in opposition
 to them. This is what Noah did. He was inspired with admirable
 constancy of purpose, inasmuch as he, innocent before men, not only
 regarded the cause of God, but most earnestly pressed it among the
 most nefarious men, until he was told: "My spirit shall not further
 strive with man." And the word "strive" finely portrays the spirit
 with which the ungodly heard Noah instruct them.
 
 205. Peter also beautifully sets forth what it means to walk with God
 when he calls Noah a preacher, not of the righteousness of man, but of
 God; that is, that of faith in the promised seed. But what reward Noah
 received from the ungodly for his message Moses does not indicate. The
 statement is sufficient, that he preached righteousness, that he
 taught the true worship of God while the whole earth opposed him. That
 means the best, most religious and wisest of men were against him.
 More than one miracle, in consequence, was necessary to prevent his
 being waylaid and killed by the ungodly. We see today how much wrath,
 hate, and envy one sermon to the people may create. What shall we
 believe Noah may have suffered who taught not a hundred, not two
 hundred, but even more years, down to the last century, when God did
 not desire the wicked to receive instruction any longer lest they
 become still fiercer and more depraved.
 
 206. Therefore we may conjecture from the condition and nature of the
 world itself, and of the devil, from the experience of the apostles
 and the prophets, and likewise from our own, what a noble example of
 patience and other virtues Noah has been, who was just and
 irreproachable in that ungodly generation and walked with God--that
 is, governed the churches with the Word--and who, when the one hundred
 and twenty years were determined upon, after the lapse of which the
 world was to be destroyed by a flood, in face of such a terrible
 threat, entered into matrimony and begot children.
 
 207. It is very probable that he traveled up and down the earth; that
 he taught everywhere; that everywhere he exhorted to worship God in
 truth; that he, hindered by many labors, refrained from matrimony on
 account of abundance of tribulations and in the expectation of the
 advent of a better and more religious age. But when he recognized this
 hope as unfounded and by a voice divine was warned that a time had
 been set for the world's destruction, then and not before, prompted by
 the Spirit, did he make up his mind to marry, in order to transmit to
 the new age seed out of himself. And thus the holy man preserved the
 human race, not only spiritually, in the true Word and worship, but
 also bodily, by begetting children.
 
 208. As in paradise a new Church had its beginning, before the flood,
 through Adam and Eve's faith in the promise, so also here a new world
 and a new Church arise from the marriage of Noah--a nursery of that
 world which shall endure to the end.
 
 209. I stated above (para 88) that this marriage was an occasion of
 great offense to the ungodly and that they made the most extraordinary
 sport of it. How inconsistent that the world is to perish so soon,
 when Noah, five hundred years old, becomes a father! They deemed his
 act the surest evidence that the world was not to perish by a flood.
 Hence, they began to live even more licentiously, and in the greatest
 security to despise all threats. Christ says in Matthew 24, 38, that
 in the days of Noah they ate, they drank, etc. The world does not
 understand the plans of God.
 
 210. Concerning the order of the sons of Noah, I said above that
 Japheth was first, that Shem was born two years afterward when Noah
 commenced to build the ark, and Ham two years later. This has not been
 clearly explained by Moses, but still it has been carefully noted.
 
 B. Destruction of the Whole World.
 
 V. 11. _And the earth was corrupt before God, and the earth was filled
 with violence._
 
 211. Lyra, perhaps under the influence of rabbinic interpretation,
 contends here that even the birds and other animals forsook their
 nature and mixed with those of another species. But I do not believe
 it, for the creation or nature of animals remains as it was fashioned.
 They have not fallen through sin, like man, but are, on the contrary,
 fashioned for this bodily life alone. In consequence they neither hear
 the Word, nor does the Word concern them. They are absolutely without
 the Law of the first and the second tables. Accordingly, this passage
 refers only to man.
 
 212. But that the beasts bore the penalty of sin and perished at the
 same time with man through the flood was the result of God's purpose
 to destroy man altogether; not alone in body and soul, but with the
 possessions and dominion which were his at creation. Instances of
 similar retribution occur in the Old Testament. In the sixth chapter
 of Daniel we see the enemies of Daniel cast into the lions' den,
 together with their wives, children and whole families. In the
 sixteenth chapter of Numbers a like incident is narrated in connection
 with the destruction of Korah, Dathan and Abiram. Similar is also an
 instance spoken of by Christ when the king commands to sell the
 servant together with wife, children and all his substance.
 
 213. In this manner, evidently, not only men but all their goods were
 destroyed, so that punishment might be full and complete. Beasts,
 fields and the birds of heaven were created for man. They are man's
 property and chattels. Therefore, the animals perished, not because
 they had sinned, but because God wanted man to perish amid all his
 earthly possessions.
 
 214. In this passage Moses' specific statement that "the earth was
 corrupt before God," is made to show that Noah was treated and
 esteemed in the eyes of his age as a stupid and good for nothing
 character. The world, on the contrary, appeared in its own eyes
 perfectly holy and righteous, believing it had just cause for the
 persecution of Noah, especially in regard to the first table of the
 Law and the worship of God. The second table is not without its
 disguise of hypocrisy, but in this respect it bears no comparison to
 the former. The adulterer, the thief, the murderer can remain hidden
 for a while, though not forever. But the sins of the first table
 generally remain hidden under the cloak of sanctity until God brings
 them to light. Godlessness never wishes to be godlessness, but chases
 after a reputation for piety and religion; and trims its cult so
 finely that in comparison with it the true cult and the true religion
 appear coarse.
 
 215. The verb _shiheth_ is very frequent and conspicuous in Holy
 Scripture. Moses uses it in the thirty-first chapter of Deuteronomy,
 verse 29: "For I know that after my death ye will utterly corrupt
 yourselves, and turn aside from the way which I have commanded you."
 And David says, "They are all gone aside; they are together become
 filthy," Ps 14, 3. Both passages speak particularly of the sins
 against the first table; that is, they accuse the apparently devoutest
 saints of false worship and false doctrine, for it is impossible for a
 righteous life to follow teaching that is false.
 
 216. When Moses says the earth was corrupt before God, he clearly
 points out the contrast--the hypocrites and oppressors judged Noah's
 teaching and practise as wholly wrong, and their own as altogether
 holy. The reverse, Moses says, was true. Mankind was assuredly corrupt
 measured by the first table. They lacked the true Word and the true
 worship. This distinction between the first and the second tables
 commends itself strongly to my judgment and was doubtless suggested by
 the Holy Spirit.
 
 217. The additional statement--"and the earth was filled with
 violence"--points to this unfailing sequence. With the Word lost, with
 faith extinct, with traditions and will-worship--to use St. Paul's
 phraseology (Col 2, 8)--having replaced the true cult, there results
 violence and shameful living.
 
 218. The correct significance of the word _hamas_ is violence force,
 wrong, with the suspension of all law and equity, a condition where
 pleasure is law and everything is done not by right, but by might. But
 if such was their life, you may say, how could they maintain the
 appearance and reputation of holiness and righteousness? As if we did
 not really have similar instances before our eyes today. Has the world
 ever seen anything more cruel than the Turks? And they adorn all their
 fierceness with the name of God and religion.
 
 219. The popes have not only seized for themselves the riches of the
 earth, but have filled the Church itself with stupendous errors and
 blasphemous doctrines. They live in shocking licentiousness. They
 alienate at pleasure the hearts of kings. Much is done by them to
 bring on bloodshed and war. And yet, with all such blasphemies and
 outrages, they arrogate to themselves the name and title of the
 greatest saints and boast of being vicars of Christ and successors of
 Peter.
 
 220. Thus the greatest wrong is allied to the names of Church and true
 religion. Should any one offer objection, immediately is he put under
 the ban and condemned as a heretic and an enemy of God and man.
 Barring the Romans and their accomplices, there is no people which
 plumes itself more upon religion and righteousness than the Turks. The
 Christians they despise as idolaters; themselves they esteem as most
 holy and wise. Notwithstanding, what is their life and religion but
 incessant murder, robbery, rapine and other horrible outrages?
 
 221. The present times, therefore, illustrate how those two
 incompatible things may be found in union--the greatest religiousness
 with abominations, the greatest wrong with a show of right. And this
 is the very cause for men becoming hardened and secure without
 apprehending the punishment they merit by their sins.
 
 V. 12. _And God saw the earth, and, behold, it was corrupt; for all
 flesh had corrupted their way upon the earth._
 
 222. Inasmuch as the wrath of God is appalling and destruction is
 imminent for all flesh except eight souls, Moses is somewhat redundant
 in this passage, and uses repetitions, which are not superfluous but
 express an emphasis of their own. Above he said the earth was corrupt;
 now he says that God, as if following the customary judicial method,
 saw this and meditated punishment. In this manner he pictures, as it
 were, the order in which God proceeds.
 
 223. The judgment of spiritual people concerning the pope at the
 present day is that he is the Antichrist, raging against the Word and
 the kingdom of Christ. But they who censure it are unable to correct
 this wickedness. Wickedness is growing daily and contempt for
 godliness is becoming greater every day. Now comes the thought: What
 is God doing? Why does he not punish his enemy? Does he sleep and care
 no longer for human affairs? The delay of judgment causes the
 righteous anguish. They themselves cannot come to the succor of a
 stricken religion and they see God who could help, connive at the fury
 of the popes, who securely sin against the first and the second tables
 of the Law.
 
 224. Just so Noah sees the earth filled with wrongs. Therefore, he
 groans and sighs to heaven in order to arouse God from the highest
 heaven to judgment. Such voices occur here and there in the Psalms
 (10, 1): "Why standest thou afar off?"; (13, 1): "How long, O
 Jehovah?"; (9, 13): "Have mercy upon me, O Jehovah; consider my
 trouble"; (7, 6-9): "Arise, judge my cause, etc."
 
 225. What Moses here describes comes at length to pass, that God also
 sees these things and hears the cry of the righteous who are able to
 judge the world; for they who are spiritual judge all things (1 Cor 2,
 15), though they cannot alter anything. Wickedness is incorrigible
 when adorned with a show of piety, and so is oppression when it
 assumes the disguise of justice and foresight. It is nothing new that
 they who seize the wives, daughters, houses, lands and goods of others
 desire to be just and holy, as we showed above in respect of the
 papacy.
 
 226. This is the second stage then: When the saints have seen and
 judged the wickedness of the world, God also sees it. He says of the
 Sodomites: "The cry of them is waxed great before Jehovah" (Gen 19,
 13); and above (ch 4, 10): "The voice of thy brother's blood crieth
 unto me." But always before the Lord takes note, the sobs and groans
 of the righteous precede, arousing, as it were, the Lord from slumber.
 
 What Moses desires to show in this passage through the word, "saw" is
 that God finally perceived the afflictions and heard the cries of the
 righteous, filling at last all heaven. He who hitherto had winked at
 everything and seemed to favor the success of the wicked, was awakened
 as from slumber. The fact is he saw everything much sooner than Noah;
 for he is the searcher of hearts and cannot be deceived by simulated
 piety as we can. But not until now, when he meditates punishment, does
 Noah perceive that he sees.
 
 227. Thus we are afflicted today by extreme and unheard of wickedness,
 for our adversaries condemn from sheer caprice the truth they know and
 profess. They try to get at our throats and shed the blood of the
 righteous with a satanic fury. Such blasphemous, sacrilegious and
 parricidal doings against the kingdom and name of God, manifest as
 such beyond possibility of denial, they defend as the acme of justice.
 While contending for the maintenance of their tyrannical position they
 go so far as to arrogate to themselves the name of the Church. What
 else can we do here but cry to Jehovah to make his name sacred and not
 to permit the overthrow of his kingdom nor resistance to his paternal
 will?
 
 228. But so far the Lord sleeps. He apparently does not observe such
 wickedness, because he gives no sign as yet of observing it. Rather he
 permits us to be tormented by such woeful sights. We are, therefore,
 thus far in the first stage and this verse, stating that the whole
 earth is corrupt, applies to our age. But at the proper time the
 second stage will be reached, when we can declare in certainty of
 faith that not only we but God also sees and hates such wickedness.
 Though God, in his long-suffering, has continued to wink at many
 things, he shall retain the name of One who in righteousness shall
 judge the earth.
 
 229. How bitter and hard such delay is for the righteous, the
 lamentations of Jeremiah in Jeremiah 12, 1ff., and 20, 7ff, show.
 There the holy man almost verges on blasphemy until he is told that
 the Babylonian king should come and inflict punishment upon the
 unbelieving scoffers. Thereupon Jeremiah recognizes that God looks
 down on the earth and is Judge upon the earth.
 
 230. The universal judgment which follows is terrible in the extreme,
 namely that all flesh upon the earth had corrupted its way and that
 God, when he had begun to examine the sons of men, did not, from the
 oldest to the youngest of the fathers, find any he could save from
 destruction.
 
 This strikes our ears as still more awful when we take into
 consideration the condition of the primitive world, not judging by the
 miserable fragments we have today. As the physical condition of the
 world at that time was infinitely ahead of this age, so we may
 conclude that the majesty and pomp of our rulers and the show of
 sanctity and wisdom on the part of the popes are not to be compared to
 the show of religion, righteousness and wisdom found among those
 renowned men of the primitive world.
 
 And yet the text says that all flesh had corrupted its way, save Noah
 and his offspring. That means all men were wicked, lived in idolatry
 and false religion and hated the true worship of God. They despised
 the promise of the seed, and persecuted Noah, who proclaimed
 forgiveness through the seed and threatened to those, who should fail
 to believe his forgiveness, eternal doom.
 
 
 VI. GOD DECIDES TO PUNISH THE FIRST WORLD; COMMANDS NOAH TO BUILD AN
     ARK; THE COVENANT.
 
    A. HOW GOD DECREED TO PUNISH THE OLD WORLD IN HIS WRATH.
 
       1. How punishment finally comes when God has suffered sin long
       enough 231.
 
        * Luther's hope that God's judgment may soon break upon the
          last world 231.
 
       2. Whether reason can grasp the wrath and punishment of God 232.
 
       3. How God's promises stand in the midst of his wrath and
          punishment 232.
 
       4. The first world thought itself secure against God's wrath
          233.
 
        * The Papal security and boldness against the Evangelicals 234.
 
       5. By what means God punished the first world 235.
 
        * The Holy Spirit must reveal that God's wrath and punishment
          do not violate his promises 236.
 
       6. The causes of this wrath and punishment 237.
 
        * By what may it be known that God will visit Germany with
          punishment 238.
 
        * God complains more of the violence shown to the neighbor than
          to himself 239.
 
        * The damages of the deluge 240.
 
        * The ground of the earth was in a better state before the
          flood than now 240.
 
        * The colors in the rainbow signs of the punishment of the
          first and the last world 241.
 
 
 VI. GOD DECIDES TO PUNISH THE FIRST WORLD; COMMANDS NOAH TO BUILD AN
 ARK; THE COVENANT.
 
 A. God Decides to Punish the Old World.
 
 V. 13. _And God said unto Noah, The end of all flesh is come before
 me; for the earth is filled with violence through them; and, behold, I
 will destroy them with the earth._
 
 231. After Noah and his people had for a long time raised their
 accusing cry against the depravity of the world, the Lord gave
 evidence that he saw the depravity and intended to avenge it. This,
 the second stage, we also look for today, nor is there any doubt that
 men shall exist, to whom this coming destruction of the world is to be
 revealed, unless the destruction be the last day and the final
 judgment, which I truly wish. We have seen enough wickedness in these
 brief and evil days of ours. Godless men, as in Noah's time, adorn
 their vices with the name of holiness and righteousness. Hence, no
 penitence or reformation is to be hoped for. This stage having been
 reached in the times of Noah, sentence is finally passed, having been
 previously announced by the Lord when he gave command that striving
 should cease and issued the declaration that he regretted having made
 man.
 
 232. Reason is incapable of believing and perfectly understanding such
 wrath. Just consider how different this is from what had been. Above
 we have read (ch 1, 31) that God saw everything he had made and
 behold, it was very good; that he gave man and beast the additional
 blessing of propagation; that he subjected to man's rule the earth and
 all the treasures of the earth; that as the highest blessing, he added
 the promise of the woman's seed and life eternal and instituted not
 only the home and the State, but also the Church. How, then, is it
 that the first world, called into being in this way through the Word,
 should, to use Peter's expression, perish by water?
 
 233. There is no doubt that the sons of the world threw all this up to
 Noah as he preached the coming universal destruction, and publicly
 charged him with lying, on the ground that home, State and Church had
 been instituted by God; that God surely would not overturn his own
 establishment by a final destruction; that man had been created for
 propagation and dominion upon the earth, not for the rule of water
 over him to his destruction.
 
 234. Just so the Papists press us with the one argument that Christ
 will be with the Church to the end of the world (Mt 28, 20); that the
 gates of hell will not prevail against it (Mt 16, 18). This they vaunt
 in a loud-voiced manner, believing their destruction to be an
 impossibility. Swept by the waves Peter's ship may be, they say, but
 the waters cannot overwhelm it.
 
 235. Quite similar was the security and assurance before the flood;
 notwithstanding, we see that the whole earth perished. The scoffers
 boasted that God's regulations are perpetual, and that God had never
 completely abolished or altered his creation. But consider the outcome
 and you will see that they were wrong, while Noah alone was right.
 
 236. Unless the additional light of the Holy Spirit is vouchsafed, man
 will surely be convinced by such argument; for is it not equivalent to
 making God inconstant and changeable, to maintain that he will
 completely destroy his creature? Yet God gives Noah the revelation
 that he will make an end of flesh and earth, not in part, but of all
 flesh and all the earth. Would it not be awful enough to partition the
 earth into three parts and to threaten destruction to one? But to rage
 against the whole earth and against all mankind seems to be in
 conflict with God's government and the declaration that everything is
 very good. These things are too sublime to be understood or
 comprehended by human reason.
 
 237. What is the cause of wrath so great? Surely, the fact that the
 earth is filled with violence, as he here says. Astonishing reason! He
 says nothing here concerning the first table; he mentions only the
 second. It is, as if he said: I shall say nothing of myself that they
 hate, blaspheme and persecute my Word. Among themselves how shamefully
 do they live! Neither home nor State are properly administered;
 everything is conducted by force, nothing by reason and law.
 Therefore, I shall destroy at the same time both mankind and the
 earth.
 
 238. We see also in our age that God winks at the profanation of the
 mass, a horrible abomination that fills the whole earth, and at
 ungodly teachings and other offenses which have hitherto been in vogue
 in religion. But when men live so together that they disregard both
 State and home, when huge covetousness, graft of every description and
 manifold iniquity have waxed strong, does it not become clear to every
 man that God is compelled, as it were, to punish, yea to overturn
 Germany?
 
 239. It is the fullness of his mercy and love that prompts God rather
 to make complaint concerning the wrongs inflicted upon his members
 than those inflicted upon himself. We observe he maintains silence
 respecting the latter, while he threatens punishment, not to man
 alone, but even to the very earth itself.
 
 240. A twofold effect is traceable to the flood; a weakening of man's
 powers and an impairment of his wealth and that of the earth. The
 latter-day fruit of trees is in nowise to be compared with that in the
 days before the flood. The antediluvian turnips were better than
 afterward the melons, oranges or pomegranates. The pear was finer than
 the spices of today. So it is likely that a man's finger possessed
 more strength than today his whole arm. Likewise man's reason and
 understanding were far superior. But God, because of sin, has brought
 punishment to bear, not alone upon man, but also upon his property and
 domain, as witness to posterity also of his wrath.
 
 But how is the destruction to be effected? Assuredly, by his seizing
 the watery element and blotting out everything. The force with which
 this element is wont to rage is common knowledge. Though the
 atmosphere be pestilential, it does not always infect trees and roots.
 But water not only overturns everything, not only does it tear out
 trees and roots, but it also lifts the very surface of the earth. It
 alters the soil, so that the most fertile fields are marred by the
 overflow of salty earth and sand (Ps 107, 34). This was therefore
 equal to the downfall of the primitive world.
 
 241. The penalty of the present world, however, will be different, as
 the color of the rainbow shows. The lowest color the extent of which
 is well defined, is that of water. For the fury of the water in the
 deluge was so great that limits were set to its havoc, and the earth
 was restored to the remnant of the godly after the destruction of the
 evil-doers. But the other arch of the rainbow, the outer, which has no
 clearly defined bounds, is of the color of fire, the element which
 shall consume the whole world. This destruction shall be succeeded by
 a better world, which shall last forever and serve the righteous. This
 the Lord seems to have written in the color of the rainbow.
 
 
 B. GOD COMMANDS NOAH TO BUILD AN ARK.
 
  * That Noah had only three children is a sign of God's mercy 242.
 
    1. The kind of wood used in building the ark 243.
 
    2. Its various rooms 244.
 
    3. The pitch by which it was protected 245.
 
    4. Why God instructed Noah so particularly how each part was to be
       constructed 246.
 
    5. The form of the ark, and how teachers differ on this point 247.
 
    6. The place Noah occupied in the ark, and that of the animals 248.
 
    7. Whether the ark had the proportions of a human body 249.
 
    8. How the ark was a type of the body of Christ--of the Church 250.
 
    9. The windows of the ark:
 
       a. Whether it had more than one window 251.
 
        * The Latin version is not clear here 252.
 
       b. What kind of a window it was, and how it could stand the rain
          253.
 
       c. Luther's opinion of the Jews' ideas about the window 253.
 
   10. The door of the ark 254.
 
   11. How to meet the various questions about the ark 255-256.
 
     * The deluge was a new method of punishment, hence the non
       incredible 257-258.
 
     * God was in earnest in the threatening of this flood 259.
 
 
 B. GOD COMMANDS NOAH TO BUILD AN ARK.
 
 V. 14. _Make thee an ark of gopher wood; rooms shalt thou make in the
 ark, and shalt pitch it within and without with pitch (bitumen)._
 
 242. God's first thought was to save a remnant through that tiny seed,
 the three sons of Noah, for Noah ceased henceforth to beget children.
 This strongly attests the mercy of God toward those who walk in his
 ways.
 
 243. _Gopher_ some make out to be pine, others hemlock, still others
 cedar; hence, a guess is rather difficult. The choice appears to have
 been made owing to its lightness or its resinous quality, so that it
 might float more easily upon the water and be impervious to it.
 
 244. _Kinnim_ signifies "nests" or "chambers"; that is separate spaces
 for the various animals. Bears, sheep, deer and horses did not dwell
 in one and the same place, but the several species had their
 respective quarters.
 
 245. But what is meant by _bitumen_, I do not know. With us vessels
 are made water tight with pitch and tow. Pitch, it is true, withstands
 water, but it also invites the flame. There is no bitumen with us
 which resists water, hence we raise no objection to "bitumen" being
 rendered "pitch."
 
 246. You may ask: Why does God prescribe everything so accurately? The
 injunction to build the ark should have been sufficient. Reason could
 determine for itself the rules concerning dimensions and mode of
 construction. Why, then, does God give such careful instruction with
 reference to dimensions and materials? Certainly that Noah, after
 undertaking all things according to the Lord's direction (as Moses
 built the tabernacle according to the model received on the mount),
 should with the greater faith trust that he and his people were to be
 saved, nor entertain any doubt concerning a work ordered by the Lord
 himself, even how it should be made. This is the reason the Lord gives
 his directions with such attention to detail.
 
 V. 15. _And this is how thou shalt make it: the length of the ark
 three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty cubits, and the height
 of it thirty cubits._
 
 247. A nice geometrical and mathematical exercise concerning the form
 and dimensions of the ark is here presented. The views of writers
 vary. Some claim it was four-cornered, others that it was gabled like
 nearly all our structures in Europe. As for myself, I hold it was
 four-cornered. Eastern people's were not acquainted with gabled
 buildings. Theirs were evidently of four-cornered form, as the Bible
 mentions people walking on roofs. Similar was the shape of the temple.
 
 248. There is a difference of opinion also concerning the arrangement
 of the animals in their quarters, which occupied the upper, which the
 central and which the lower places, this being the distinction
 warranted by the text. No certainty, however, can be arrived at. It is
 likely that Noah himself and the birds occupied the upper part, the
 clean animals the central and the unclean animals the lower one. The
 rabbis assert the lower part served the purpose of storing dung. But I
 think the dung was thrown out of the window, for its removal was
 necessitated by such a multitude of beasts abiding in the ark for over
 a year.
 
 249. Augustine quotes Philo against Faustus in stating that on
 geometrical principles, the ark had the proportions of the human body,
 for when a man lies on the ground his body is ten times as long as it
 is high and six times as long as broad. So three hundred cubits are
 six times fifty and ten times thirty.
 
 250. An application is made of this to the body of Christ, the Church,
 which has baptism as the door, through which clean and unclean enter
 without distinction. Although the Church is small, she rules the earth
 notwithstanding, and it is due to her that the world is preserved,
 just as the unclean animals were preserved in the ark. Others stretch
 the application so far as to point to the wound in the side of Jesus'
 body as prefigured by the windows in the ark. These are allegories
 which are not exactly profound, but still harmless because they harbor
 no error and serve a purpose other than that of wrangling, namely,
 that of rhetorical ornamentation.
 
 V. 16. _A light shalt thou make to the ark, and to a cubit shalt thou
 finish it upward; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side
 thereof; with lower, second, and third stories shalt thou make it._
 
 251. Behold, how diligent an architect God is! With what care he
 interests himself in all the parts of the structure and their
 arrangement. Furthermore, the word _Zohar_ does not properly signify
 window, but southern light. The question may be raised here whether
 the ark had only one window or several. For the Hebrew language
 permits the use of the singular for the plural, or of the collective
 for the distributive term, as for instance: "I will destroy man from
 the face of the ground." Here evidently not one man but many are
 spoken of. But to me it seems there was only one window that shed
 light upon man's domicile.
 
 252. The Latin interpreter is so strangely obscure as to fail to make
 himself understood. My unqualified opinion is that he was unable to
 divest himself of the image of a modern ship, in which men are
 commonly carried in the lower part. Nor is it quite intelligible what
 he says about the door, inasmuch as it is certain that the ell-long
 window was in the upper part, and the door in the center of the side
 or in the navel of the ark. Thus, also, Eve was framed from the middle
 portion of man's body. The whole structure was divided into three
 partitions, a higher, a central and a lower one, and it was the upper
 one which, according to my view, was illuminated by the light of day
 through the window.
 
 253. You may say, however: What kind of a window was it, or how could
 it exist in those frequent and violent rains? For rain did not fall
 then as it does ordinarily, since the water in forty days rose to such
 proportions as to submerge the highest mountains by fifteen
 arm-lengths. The Jews claim that the window was closed by a crystal
 which transmitted the light. But too curious a research into these
 matters appears to me useless, since neither godliness nor Christ's
 kingdom are put in jeopardy from the fact of our remaining in
 ignorance concerning some features of this structure of which God was
 the architect. It seems to me sufficiently satisfactory to assume that
 the window was on the side of the upper partition.
 
 254. As to the door, it is certain that it was about thirteen or
 fourteen cubits from the earth. The ark, when it floated, sank about
 ten feet into the water with its great weight of animals of every kind
 and provender for more than a year. This may suffice as a crude
 conception of the ark; for, besides height and length, Moses merely
 indicates that it had three partitions, a door and a window.
 
 255. We will dismiss innumerable other questions such as: What kind of
 air was used in the ark? for such a stupendous mass of water,
 particularly falling water, must have produced a violent and
 pestilential stench; whence did they draw their drinking-water? for
 water cannot be preserved a whole year, hence mariners often call at
 ports in their vicinity for the purpose of drawing water; again, how
 could the bilge-water with its obnoxious odor be drawn up?
 
 256. Such questions and other subordinate points related to the
 experience of the mariner we may pass by. Otherwise there will be no
 end of questions. We will be content with the simple supposition that
 the lower part probably served the purpose of securing the bears,
 lions, tigers and other savage animals; the middle part, that of
 housing the gentle and tractable animals, together with the provender,
 which cannot be kept in a place devoid of all air-currents; the upper
 that of accommodating human beings themselves, together with the
 domestic animals and the birds. This should be enough for us.
 
 V. 17. _And I, behold, I do bring the flood of waters upon the earth,
 to destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under
 heaven; everything that is in the earth shall die._
 
 257. Above God has threatened in general the human race with
 destruction. Here he points out the method; namely, that he intends to
 destroy everything by a new disaster, a flood. Such a punishment the
 world hitherto had not known. The customary punishments, as we see
 from the prophets, are pestilence, famine, the sword and fierce
 beasts. Men and beasts perish of pestilence. The earth is laid waste
 by war, for it is deprived of those who till it. The sufferings of
 famine, though they seem to be less cruel, are by far the most
 terrible. With the fourth class of penalties, our regions have almost
 no experience at all. Although these are severally sufficient for the
 chastisement of the human race, the Lord desired to employ a novel
 kind of punishment against the primeval world, through which all flesh
 having the breath of life was to perish.
 
 258. Because this punishment was unheard of in former ages, the wicked
 were slower to believe it. They reasoned thus: If God is at all angry,
 can he not correct the disobedient by the sword, by pestilence? A
 flood would destroy also the other creatures which are without sin;
 surely God will not plan anything like this for the world.
 
 259. But in order to remove such unbelief from the mind of Noah and
 the righteous, he repeats with stress the pronoun, "And I, behold, I
 do bring." Afterward he clearly adds that he will destroy all flesh
 that is under heaven and in the earth; for he excludes here the fishes
 whose realm is widened by the waters. This passage tends to show the
 magnitude of the wrath of God, through which men lose, not only body
 and life, but also universal dominion over the earth.
 
 
 C. GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH.
 
  * The way God comforted Noah in announcing the flood, and why such
    comfort was needed 260.
 
    1. The nature of this covenant.
 
       a. The views of Lyra, Burgensis and others 261.
 
       b. Luther's views 262-263.
 
    2. Whether the giants or tyrants were embraced in this covenant and
       how received by them 262-263.
 
    3. Why it was made only with Noah 264.
 
    4. How this covenant was made clearer from time to time, and why it
       was needed at this time 265.
 
    5. How a special call was added to this covenant 266.
 
     * God's judgment upon the first world terrible 267.
 
     * Why Ham was taken into the ark, who was later rejected 267.
 
     * Foreknowledge and election.
 
       a. Why we should avoid thinking and disputing on this subject
          268.
 
       b. To what end should the examples of Scripture on this theme
          serve 269.
 
       c. How consideration of the same may help and harm us 270.
 
 
 C. GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH.
 
 V. 18. _But I will establish my covenant with thee; and thou shalt
 come into the ark, thou, and thy sons, and thy wife, and thy sons'
 wives with thee._
 
 260. To this comfort Moses before pointed when he declared that Noah
 had found grace. Noah stood in need of it, not only to escape despair
 amid such wrath, but also for the strengthening of his faith in view
 of the raging retribution. For it was no easy matter to believe the
 whole human race was to perish. The world consequently judged Noah to
 be a dolt for believing such things, ridiculed him and, undoubtedly,
 made his ship an object of satire. In order to strengthen his mind
 amid such offenses, God speaks with him often, and now even reminds
 him of his covenant.
 
 261. Interpreters discuss the question, what that covenant was. Lyra
 explains it as the promise to defend him against the evil men who had
 threatened to murder him. Burgensis claims this covenant refers to the
 perils amid the waters, which were to be warded off. Still others
 believe it was the covenant of the rainbow, which the Lord afterward
 made with Noah.
 
 262. In my opinion, he speaks of a spiritual covenant, or of the
 promise of the seed, which was to bruise the serpent's head. The
 giants had this covenant, but when its abuse resulted in pride and
 wickedness, they fell from it. So it was afterward with the Jews,
 whose carnal presumption in reference to God, the Law, worship and
 temple led to their loss of these gifts and they perished. To Noah,
 however, God confirms this covenant by certainly declaring that Christ
 was to be born from his posterity and that God would leave, amid such
 great wrath, a nursery for the Church. This covenant includes not only
 protection of Noah's body, the view advocated by Lyra and Burgensis,
 but also eternal life.
 
 263. The sentiment, therefore, of the promise is this: Those insolent
 despisers of my promises and threats will compel me to punish them. I
 shall first withdraw from them the protection and assurance which are
 theirs by reason of their covenant with me, that they may perish
 without covenant and without mercy. But that covenant I shall transfer
 to you so that you shall be saved, not alone from such power of the
 waters, but also from eternal death and condemnation.
 
 264. The plain statement is, "With thee." Not the sons, not the wives,
 does he mention, whom he was also to save; but Noah alone he mentions,
 from whom the promise was transmitted to his son Shem. This is the
 second promise of Christ, which is taken from all other descendants of
 Adam and committed alone to Noah.
 
 265. Afterward this promise is made clearer from time to time. It
 proceeded from the race to the family, and from the family to the
 individual. From the whole race of Abraham it was carried forward to
 David alone; from David to Nathan; from Nathan down to one virgin,
 Mary, who was the dead branch or root of Jesse, and in whom this
 covenant finds its termination and fulfilment. The establishment of
 such a covenant was most necessary in view of the imminence of the
 incredible and incalculable wrath of God.
 
 266. You will observe here, however, a special call when he says:
 "Thou shalt come into the ark, thou, and thy sons, etc." If Noah had
 not received this special call, he would not have ventured to enter
 the ark.
 
 267. How terrible is it that from the whole human race only eight
 persons should be selected for salvation and yet from among them, Ham,
 the third son of Noah, be rejected! By the mouth of God he is numbered
 here among the elect and saints. Yea, with them he is protected and
 saved. Nor is he distinguished from Noah. If he had not believed and
 prayed for the same things, if he had not feared God, he would in
 nowise have been saved in the ark; and yet, afterward he is rejected!
 
 268. The sophists wrangle here concerning an election that takes place
 according to the purpose of God. But often have I exhorted to beware
 of speculations about the unveiled majesty, for besides being anything
 but true, they are far from being profitable. Let us rather think of
 God as he offers himself to us in his Word and sacraments. Let us not
 trace these instances back to a hidden election, in which God arranged
 everything with himself from eternity. Such doctrine we cannot
 apprehend with our minds, and we see it conflicts with the revealed
 will of God.
 
 269. What, then, you will ask, shall we declare with reference to
 these examples? Nothing but that they are pointed out to inspire us
 with the fear of God, so that we believe it is possible to fall from
 grace after once receiving grace. Paul warns, "Let him that thinketh
 he standeth take heed lest he fall." 1 Cor 10, 12. We should heed such
 examples to teach us humility, that we may not exalt ourselves with
 our gifts nor become slothful in our use of blessings received, but
 may reach forth to the things which are before, as Paul says in
 Philippians 3, 13. They teach us not to believe that we have
 apprehended everything.
 
 270. Malignant and most bitter is our enemy, but we are feeble,
 bearing this great treasure in earthen vessels. 2 Cor 4, 7. Therefore,
 we must not glory as if we were secure, but seeing that men so holy
 fell from grace, which they had accepted and for a long time enjoyed,
 we should look anxiously to God as if in peril at this very moment. In
 this manner these examples are discussed to our profit; but those who
 give no attention to them and chase after complex high thoughts on an
 election according to the purpose of God, drive and thrust their souls
 into despair, to which they naturally incline.
 
 
 VII. ANIMALS AND FOOD IN THE ARK; NOAH'S OBEDIENCE.
 
    A. THE ANIMALS NOAH TOOK INTO THE ARK.
 
       1. The number and kinds of animals 271-272.
 
       2. The differences in the animals 273.
 
          a. What is understood by the "Behemoth" 274.
 
          b. By the "Remes" 275.
 
          c. Whether this difference is observed in all places 276.
 
       3. Whether wild and ferocious animals were in paradise, and if
          created from the beginning 276-277.
 
       4. How Noah could bring the animals, especially the wild ones,
          into the ark 278-279.
 
        * The animals at the time felt danger was near 278-279.
 
       5. The animals came of themselves to Noah in the ark 280.
 
    B. THE FOOD NOAH TOOK INTO THE ARK.
 
       1. Why necessary to take with them food 281.
 
        * The kind of food man then had, and if he ate flesh 282.
 
       2. God's foreknowledge shines forth here 283.
 
       3. Why God did not maintain man and the animals in the ark by a
          miracle 284.
 
        * The extraordinary ways and miracles of God.
 
          a. Why man should not seek miracles, where ordinary ways and
             means are at hand 285.
 
          b. The monks seek extraordinary ways and thus tempt God 286.
 
           * Whether we should use medicine, and if we should learn the
             arts and languages 286.
 
          c. Why God did not save Noah in the water without the ark,
             when he could have done so 287.
 
          d. When does God use extraordinary means with man 288.
 
    C. NOAH'S OBEDIENCE.
 
       1. In what respect it was especially praised 289.
 
        * Obedience to God.
 
          a. How one is to keep the golden mean, and not turn to the
             right or left 290.
 
          b. How man can by obedience or disobedience mark out his own
             course 290-291.
 
          c. Why most people shun obedience 291.
 
          d. How we are here not to look to the thing commanded, but to
             the person commanding 292-296.
 
          e. How sadly they fail who look at the thing commanded 293.
 
           * How the Papists neither understand nor keep God's
             commandments 294.
 
           * What we are to think of the holiness of the Papists 295.
 
          f. All God commands is good, even if it seems different to
             reason 296.
 
           * How the Papists do harm by the works of their wisdom, and
             only provoke God to anger, as king Saul did 297.
 
          g. How in his obedience Noah held simply to God's Word and
             overcame all difficulties 298.
 
 
 VII. THE ANIMALS AND THEIR FOOD, AND NOAH'S OBEDIENCE.
 
 A. THE ANIMALS NOAH TOOK INTO THE ARK.
 
 Vs. 19-20. _And every living thing of all flesh, two of every sort
 shalt thou bring into the ark, to keep them alive with thee; they
 shall be male and female. Of the birds after their kind, and of the
 cattle after their kind, of every creeping thing of the ground after
 its kind, two of every sort shall come unto thee, to keep them alive._
 
 271. Here again a dispute arises, as is the case when in historical
 narratives one proceeds to the application and incidental features.
 Our text appears to vindicate the view that here two and two are
 spoken of; but in the beginning of the seventh chapter seven and
 seven. Hence, Lyra quarrels with one Andrea, who believed fourteen
 specimens were included in the ark, because it is written: "Of every
 clean beast thou shalt take to thee seven and seven." But I approve
 Lyra's interpretation, who says seven specimens of every class were
 inclosed in the ark, three male and three female, and the seventh also
 male, to be used by Noah for purposes of sacrifice.
 
 272. When Moses says here that two and two of the several species were
 brought into the ark, we must necessarily understand the seventh
 chapter as speaking only of the unclean animals, for the number of
 clean animals was the greater. Of the unclean seven of every species
 were inclosed in the ark.
 
 273. It is also necessary that we here discuss the signification of
 terms as "all life," "beasts," "cattle." Though these are often used
 without discrimination, still at various places the Scripture employs
 them discriminatingly; for instance, when it says, "Let the earth
 bring forth living creatures." Gen 1, 24. "Let the waters swarm with
 swarms of living creatures." Gen 1, 20. In those places the words of
 the genus stand for all living beings on the earth and in the waters.
 Here the constituent species are named--_chayah_, _remes_, and
 _behemah_--though frequently used without discrimination.
 
 274. The cattle he calls here _behemoth_, though in Ezekiel, first
 chapter, those four animals are called by the common name,
 _hachayoth_, a word by which we commonly designate not so much animals
 as beasts, subsisting not on hay or anything else growing out of the
 earth, but flesh; as lion, bear, wolf and fox. _Behemoth_ are cattle
 or brutes which live on hay and herbs growing from the earth; as
 sheep, cows, deer and roe.
 
 275. _Remes_ means reptile. The word is derived from _ramas_, which
 means to tread. When we compare ourselves with the birds, we are
 _remasian_, for we creep and tread upon the earth with our feet like
 the dogs and other beasts. But the proper meaning is, animals which do
 not walk with face erect. The animals which creep and which we term
 reptiles have a specific name, being called _sherazim_, as we see in
 Leviticus from the word _sharaz_, which means to move, hereafter used
 in the seventh chapter. The word _oph_ is known, meaning bird.
 
 276. Such are the differences among these terms, although, as I said
 before, they are not observed in some places. The interpretation must
 be confined, however, to the time after the flood; otherwise the
 inference would be drawn that such savage beasts existed also in
 paradise. Who will doubt that before sin, dominion having been given
 to man over all animals of earth, there was concord not only among men
 but also between animals and man?
 
 277. Though the first chapter clearly proves that these wild beasts
 were created with the others, on account of sin their nature was
 altered. Those created gentle and harmless, after the fall became wild
 and harmful. This is my view, though since our loss of that state of
 innocent existence it is easier to venture a guess than to reach a
 definition of that life.
 
 278. But, you ask, if because of sin the nature of animals became
 completely altered, how could Noah control them, especially the savage
 and fierce ones? The lion surely could not be controlled, nor tigers,
 panthers and the like. The answer is: Such wild animals went into the
 ark miraculously. To me this appears reasonable. If they had not been
 forced by a divine injunction to go into the ark, Noah would not have
 had it within his power to control such fierce animals. Undoubtedly he
 had to exercise his own human power, but this alone was insufficient.
 And the text implies both conditions, for at first it says: "Thou
 shalt bring into the ark," and then adds: "Two of every sort shall
 come unto thee." If they had not been miraculously guided, they would
 not have come by twos and sevens.
 
 279. That two by two and seven by seven came of their own accord is a
 miracle and a sign that they had a premonition of the wrath of God and
 the coming terrible disaster. Even brute natures have premonitions and
 forebodings of impending calamities, and often as if prompted by a
 certain sense of compassion, they will manifest distress for a man in
 evident peril. We see dogs and horses understand the perils of their
 masters and show themselves affected by such intelligence, the dogs by
 howling, the horses by trembling and the emission of copious sweat. As
 a matter of fact it is not rare that wild beasts in danger seek refuge
 with man.
 
 280. When, therefore, there is elsewhere in brute natures such an
 intelligence, is it a wonder that, after having been divinely aroused
 to a sense of coming danger, they joined themselves voluntarily to
 Noah? For the text shows they came voluntarily. In the same manner
 history bears witness, and our experience confirms it, that, when a
 terrible pestilence rages or a great slaughter is imminent, wolves,
 the most ferocious of animals, flee not only into villages, but, on
 occasion, even into cities, taking refuge among men and humbly asking,
 as it were, their help.
 
 B. THE FOOD NOAH TOOK INTO THE ARK.
 
 V. 21. _And take thou unto thee of all food that is eaten, and gather
 it to thee; and it shall be for food for thee, and for them._
 
 281. Inasmuch as the flood was to last a whole year, it was necessary
 to remind Noah of the food to be collected from the herbs and the
 fruits of trees in order to preserve the life of man and of animals.
 Though the wrath of God was terrible, to the destruction of everything
 born on earth, the goodness of the Lord shines forth, notwithstanding,
 in this an awful calamity. He looks to the preservation of man and the
 animals, and through their preservation to that of the species. The
 animals chosen for preservation in the ark were sound and of
 unblemished body, and through divine foresight, they received food
 suitable to their nature.
 
 282. As for man, it is established that, as yet, he did not use flesh
 for food. He ate only of the vegetation of the earth, which was far
 more desirable before the flood than at present, after the remarkable
 corruption of the earth through the brackish waters.
 
 283. We observe here the providence of God, by whose counsel the evil
 are punished and the good saved. By a miracle God preserves a portion
 of his creatures when he punishes the wicked and graciously makes
 provision for their posterity.
 
 284. It would have been an easy matter for God to preserve Noah and
 the animals for the space of a full year without food, as he preserved
 Moses, Elijah and Christ, the latter for forty days, without food. He
 made everything out of nothing, which is even more marvelous. Yet God,
 in his government of the things created, as Augustine learnedly
 observes, allows them to perform their appropriate functions. In other
 words, to apply Augustine's view to the matter in hand, God performs
 his miracles along the lines of natural law.
 
 285. God also requires that we do not discard the provisions of
 nature, which would mean to tempt God; but that we use with
 thanksgiving the things God has prepared for us. A hungry man who
 looks for bread from heaven rather than tries to obtain it by human
 means, commits sin. Christ gives the apostles command to eat what is
 set before them, Lk 10, 7. So Noah is here enjoined to employ the
 ordinary methods of gathering food. God did not command him to expect
 in the ark a miraculous supply of food from heaven.
 
 286. The life of the monks is all a temptation of God. They cannot be
 continent and still they refrain from matrimony; likewise they abstain
 from certain meats, though God has created them to be received with
 thanksgiving by them that believe, and by those who know the truth,
 that every creature of God is good, and nothing to be rejected, if it
 be received with thanksgiving, 1 Tim 4, 3-4. The use of medicine is
 legitimate; yea, it has been created as a necessary means to conserve
 health. The study of the arts and of language is to be cultivated and,
 as Paul says, "Every creature of God is good, and nothing is to be
 rejected, if it be received with thanksgiving; for it is sanctified
 through prayer." 1 Tim 4, 4-5.
 
 287. God was able to preserve Noah in the midst of the waters. They
 fable of Clement that he had a cell in the middle of the sea. Yea, the
 people of Israel were preserved in the midst of the Red Sea and Jonah
 in the belly of the whale. But this was not God's desire. He rather
 willed that Noah should use the aid of wood and trees, so that human
 skill might thereby have a sphere for its exercise.
 
 288. When, however, human means fail, then it is for you either to
 suffer or to expect help from the Lord. No human effort could support
 the Jews when they stood by the sea and were surrounded in the rear by
 the enemy. Hence, a miraculous deliverance was to be hoped for, or a
 sure death to be suffered.
 
 C. NOAH'S OBEDIENCE.
 
 V. 22. _Thus did Noah; according to all that God commanded him, so did
 he._
 
 289. This phrase is very frequent in Scripture. This is the first
 passage in which praise for obedience to God is clothed in such a form
 of words. Later we find it stated repeatedly that Moses, the people,
 did according to all that God commanded them. But Noah received
 commendation as an example for us. His was not a dead faith, which is
 no faith at all, but a living and active faith. He renders obedience
 to God's commands, and because he believes both God's promises and
 threats, he carefully carries out what God commanded with reference to
 the ark and the gathering of animals and food. This is unique praise
 for Noah's faith, that he remains on the royal way--adds nothing,
 changes nothing and takes nothing from the divine command, but abides
 absolutely in the precept he has heard.
 
 290. It is the most common and at the same time most noxious sin in
 the Church, that people either altogether change God's commands or
 render something else paramount to them. There is only one royal road
 to which we must keep. They sin who swerve too much to the left by
 failing to perform the divine commands. Those who swerve to the right
 and do more than God has commanded, like Saul when he spared the
 Amalekites, also sin even more grievously than those who turn to the
 left. They add a sham piety; for, while those who err on the left
 cannot excuse their error, these do not hesitate to ascribe to
 themselves remarkable merit.
 
 291. And such error is exceedingly common. God is wont sometimes to
 command common, paltry, ridiculous and even offensive things, but
 reason takes delight in splendid things. From the common ones it
 either shrinks or undertakes them under protest. Thus the monks shrank
 from home duties and chose for themselves others apparently of greater
 glamour. Today the great throng, hearing that common tasks are
 preached in the Gospel, despises the Gospel as a vulgar teaching,
 lacking in elegance. What noteworthy thing is it to teach that
 servants should obey their master and children their parents? Such a
 common and oft-taught doctrine the learned papists not only neglect
 but even ridicule. They desire rather something unique, something
 remarkable either for its reputed wisdom or for its apparent difficult
 character. Such is the madness of man's wisdom.
 
 292. In general it is wisdom to observe not so much the person that
 speaks as that which he says, because the teacher's faults are always
 in evidence. But when we consider precepts of God and true obedience,
 this axiom should be reversed. Then we should observe not so much that
 which is said, but the person of him who speaks. In respect to divine
 precepts, if you observe that which is said and not him who speaks,
 you will easily stumble. This is illustrated by the example of Eve,
 whose mind did not dwell upon the person who issued the command. She
 regarded only the command and concluded it to be a matter of small
 moment to taste the apple. But what injury was thereby wrought to the
 whole human race!
 
 293. He who observes him that gives the command will conclude that
 what is very paltry in appearance is very great. The Papists estimate
 it a slight thing to govern the State, to be a spouse, to train
 children. But experience teaches that these are very important
 matters, for which the wisdom of men is incompetent. We see that at
 times the most spiritual men have here shamefully fallen. When we,
 therefore, remember him who gives the command, that which is paltry
 and common becomes a responsibility too great to discharge without
 divine aid.
 
 294. The Papists, therefore, who look only at the outward mask, like
 the cow at the gate, can make light of duties toward home and State,
 and imagine they perform others of greater excellence. In the very
 fact that they are shameless adulterers, blasphemers of God, defilers
 of the sanctuary and brazen squanderers of the Church's property, they
 powerfully testify against themselves that they can in no wise
 appreciate the paltry, common and vulgar domestic and public duties.
 
 295. In what, therefore, consists the holiness they vaunt? Forsooth,
 in that on certain days they abstain from meat, that they bind
 themselves to certain vows, that they have a liking for certain kinds
 of work. But, I ask you, who has given command to do those things? No
 one. That which God has enjoined or commanded, they do not respect.
 They render paramount something else concerning which God has given no
 command.
 
 296. Hence, the vital importance of this rule, that we observe not the
 contents of the command but its author. He who fails to do this will
 often be offended, as I said, by the insignificance or absurdity of a
 task. God should receive credit for wisdom and goodness. Assuredly
 that which he himself enjoins is well and wisely enjoined, though
 human reason judge differently.
 
 297. From the wisdom of God the Papists detract when they consider
 divinely enjoined tasks as paltry and attempt to undertake something
 better or more difficult. God is not propitiated by such works, but
 rather provoked, as Saul's example shows. As if God were stupid,
 dastardly, and cruel in that he commanded to destroy the Amalekites
 and all their belongings, Saul conceived a kinder plan and reserved
 the cattle for the purpose of sacrifice. What else was such action but
 to deem himself wise and God foolish.
 
 298. Hence Moses rightly commends in this passage Noah's obedience
 when he says that he did everything the Lord had enjoined. That means
 to give God credit for wisdom and goodness. He did not discuss the
 task, as Adam, Eve and Saul did to their great hurt. He kept his eye
 on the majesty of him who gave the command. That was enough for him,
 even though the command be absurd, impossible, inexpedient. All such
 objections he passes by with closed eyes, as it were, and takes his
 stand upon the one thing commanded by God. This text therefore is
 familiar as far as hearing it is concerned, but even as to the
 performance and practice of it, it is known to very few and is
 extremely difficult.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VII.
 
 
 I. NOAH OBEYS COMMAND TO ENTER THE ARK.
 
    1. Noah saw God's favor in his command 1.
 
     * Noah experienced severe temptations and needed comfort 1-2.
 
    2. What God wished to teach Noah by calling him to enter the ark 3.
 
    3. Whether God spoke this commandment directly to Noah 4-5.
 
     * When God speaks to us through men it is to be viewed as God's
       Word 4-5.
 
     * The thoughts of the Jews on the seven days 6.
 
     * The office of the ministry.
 
       a. Through it God deals with mankind 7.
 
       b. Why we should not despise the office and expect revelations
          direct from God 8-9.
 
        * God speaks with man in various ways 9.
 
     * Corruption and destruction of the first world.
 
       a. The ruin of the first compared with that of the last world
          10-13.
 
        * The need of posterity to pray that they retain pure doctrine
          12.
 
       b. Why so few righteous persons were found in Noah's day 12.
 
        * The efforts of the pope and bishops to crush the Gospel 13.
 
       c. First world severely punished, neither old nor young were
          spared 14-15.
 
       d. Punishment of first world greatly moved Peter when he wrote
          about it 16-17.
 
     * Peter's record of sermon Christ delivered to the spirits of the
       first world in prison 16-17.
 
       a. Who are to be understood here by the unbelieving world 18.
 
       b. Peter here shows the wrath and long suffering of God 19.
 
       c. Nature and manner of this sermon 20.
 
        * Apostles had special revelations we cannot grasp 20-21.
 
    4. How Noah was righteous before God 22.
 
    5. How the world laughed at him while executing God's command, God
       then comforted him 23-24.
 
    6. Greatness of Noah's faith and steadfastness in executing this
       command 25-26.
 
     * Luther's confession he would have been too weak for such a work
       25-26.
 
     * The great firmness of John Huss and Jerome of Prague 27.
 
     * We are to comfort ourselves when all the world forsakes and
       condemns us 28.
 
    7. God commands Noah to take the animals he names along into the
       ark 29.
 
     * Why God so often repeats the same thing 29.
 
       a. What is to be understood by Behemoth 30.
 
       b. How many of each kind entered the ark 31.
 
        * The rain at the flood was exceptional 32.
 
        * The flood is a token of God's righteousness and from it we
          conclude God will punish the sins of the last world 33.
 
    8. By what may we learn Noah's faith and obedience to God 34.
 
     * Why God did not save Noah in some other way 34.
 
 
 I. NOAH OBEYS COMMAND TO ENTER THE ARK.
 
 V. 2a. _And Jehovah said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into
 the ark._
 
 1. As soon as that extraordinary structure, the ark, was built, the
 Lord commanded Noah to enter it, because the time of the deluge, which
 the Lord announced one hundred and twenty years before, was now at
 hand. All this convinced Noah that God was taking care of him; and not
 only this, but also, as Peter says (2 Pet 1, 19), gave him an ample
 and abundant word to support and confirm his faith in such great
 straits. Having foretold the deluge for more than a century, he
 doubtless was bitterly mocked by the world in many ways.
 
 2. As I have said repeatedly, God's wrath was incredible. It could not
 be grasped by the human mind, in that original age of superior men,
 that God was about to destroy the whole human race, except eight
 souls. Noah, being holy and just, a kindly and merciful man, often
 struggled with his own heart, hearing with the greatest agitation of
 mind the voice of the Lord, threatening certain destruction to all
 flesh. It was needful, then, that repeated declaration should confirm
 his agitated faith, lest he might doubt.
 
 3. God's command to enter the ark amounted to this: "Doubt not, the
 time of punishment for the unbelieving world is close at hand. But
 tremble not, do not fear, for faith is at times very weak in the
 saints. I shall take care of you and your house." To us such promise
 would have been incredible, but we must admit that all things are
 possible with God.
 
 4. Notice Moses' peculiar expression again: "Jehovah said." It gives
 me particular pleasure that these words of God did not sound from
 heaven, but were spoken to Noah through the ministry of man. Although
 I would not deny that these revelations may have been made by an
 angel, or by the Holy Spirit himself, yet where it can plausibly be
 said that God spoke through men, there the ministry must be honored.
 We have shown above that many of God's words according to Moses, were
 spoken through Adam; for the Word of God, even when spoken by man, is
 truly the Word of God.
 
 5. Now, as Methuselah, Noah's grandfather, died in the very year of
 the deluge, it would not be inapt to infer that (since Lamech, Noah's
 father, had died five years before the flood,) this was, so to speak,
 Methuselah's last word and testament to his grandson, a dying
 farewell. Perhaps he added some remarks as these: My son, as thou hast
 obeyed the Lord heretofore, and hast awaited this wrath in faith, and
 hast experienced God's faithful protection from the wicked, henceforth
 firmly believe that God will take care of thee. The end is now at
 hand, not mine alone, which is one of grace, but the end of all
 mankind, which is one of wrath. For after seven days the flood will
 begin, concerning which thou hast long and vainly warned the world.
 After this manner, I think, spoke Methuselah, but the words are
 attributed to God, because the Spirit of God spoke through the man.
 
 Thus I like to interpret these instances to the honor of the ministry
 wherever, as in this case, it can appropriately be done. Since it is
 certain that Methuselah died in the very year of the flood, the
 supposition is harmless that these were his last words to Noah, his
 grandson, who heard his words and accepted them as the Word of God.
 
 6. The Jews' peculiar idea concerning these seven days is that they
 were added to the one hundred and twenty years in honor of Methuselah,
 that therein his posterity might bewail his death. This is a harmless
 interpretation, for the patriarch's descendants did not fail to do
 their duty, particularly his pious children.
 
 7. But the first view concerning the ministry of the Word, is not only
 plausible, but also practical. God does not habitually speak
 miraculously and by revelation, particularly where, he has instituted
 the ministry for this very purpose of speaking to men, teaching,
 instructing, consoling and entreating them.
 
 8. In the first place, God entrusts the Word to parents. Moses often
 says: "Thou shalt tell it to thy children." Then to the teachers of
 the Church is it entrusted. Abraham says (Lk 16, 29): "They have Moses
 and the prophets; let them hear them." We must expect no revelation,
 be it inward or outward, where the ministry is established; otherwise
 all ranks of human society would be disturbed. Let the pastor preach
 in Church; let the magistrate rule the State; let parents control the
 house or family. Such are the ministries of men instituted by God. We
 should make use of them and not look for new revelations.
 
 9. Still I do not deny that Noah heard God speak after Methuselah's
 death. God speaks ordinarily through the public ministry--through
 parents and the teachers of the Church--and in rare cases by inward
 revelation, through the Holy Spirit. It is well that we remember not
 to overlook the Word in vain expectation of new revelations, as the
 fanatics do. Such a course gives rise to spirits of error, a source of
 disturbance to the whole world, as the example of the Anabaptists
 proves.
 
 V. 1b. _For thee have I seen righteous before me in this generation._
 
 10. This is truly a picture of the primitive, ancient world, as Peter
 calls it. 2 Pet 2, 5. His appellation carries the thought of a
 peculiarity of that particular age, which is foreign to the people of
 our own. Could words be more appalling than these, that Noah alone was
 righteous before the Lord? The world is similarly pictured in Ps 14,
 2-3, where we read that the Lord looked down from heaven to see if
 there were any that did understand, that did seek God. But he says:
 "They are all gone aside; they are together become filthy; there is
 none that doeth good, no, not one."
 
 11. Similar to this judgment upon the world was Christ's declaration
 as to the last days. He says: "When the Son of man cometh, shall he
 find faith on the earth?" Lk 18, 8. It is a fearful thing to live in
 such an evil and godless world. By the goodness of God, since we have
 the light of his Word, we are still in the golden age. The sacraments
 are rightfully administered in our Churches, pious teachers proclaim
 the Word purely, and, though magistrates be weak, wickedness is not
 desperately rampant. But Christ's prophecy shows that there will be
 evil times when the Lord's day approaches. Wholesome teaching nowhere
 will be found, the Church being dominated by the wicked, as today the
 plans of our adversaries are a menace. The pope and the wicked princes
 zealously strive totally to destroy the ministry of the Word,
 oppressing or corrupting the true ministries, that everyone may
 believe whatever pleases him.
 
 12. So much the more diligently should we pray for our posterity, and
 take earnest heed that a more wholesome doctrine be transmitted to
 them. If there had been more godly teachers in the days of Noah, there
 might have been more righteous people. The fact that Noah alone was
 proclaimed a righteous man makes it evident that the godly teachers
 had been either destroyed or corrupted, leaving Noah the sole preacher
 of righteousness, as Peter calls him, 2 Pet 2, 5. Since government had
 been turned into tyranny and the home vitiated by adultery and
 whoredom, how could punishment be delayed any longer?
 
 13. Such danger awaits us also if the last days are to be like the
 days of Noah. Truly, the popes and bishops strenuously endeavor to
 suppress the Gospel and to ruin the Churches which have been
 rightfully established. Thus does the world assiduously press onward
 to a period similar to the age of Noah, when, with the light of the
 Word extinguished, all shall go astray in the darkness of wickedness.
 For without the preaching of the Word, faith cannot endure nor prayer,
 nor the purity of the sacraments.
 
 14. Such, according to Moses, was the condition of the ancient world
 in Noah's day, when the world was young and at its best. The greatest
 geniuses flourished everywhere and people were well educated by
 experience because they lived so long. What will be our fate in the
 frenzy, so to speak, that shall befall the world in its dotage? We
 should remember to care for our posterity and continually pray for it.
 
 15. As the first world was most corrupt, it was thus subject to
 terrible punishment. Adults perished who provoked God to anger by
 their wicked deeds, also those of an innocent age, who had knowledge
 and were unable to distinguish between their right hand and their
 left. Many, doubtless, were deceived by their own guilelessness; but
 God's wrath does not discriminate, it falls upon and destroys alike
 adults and infants, the crafty and the guileless.
 
 16. This awful punishment appears to have moved even the Apostle
 Peter. Like one besides himself, he uses words which we today are not
 able to understand. He says: Christ, having been made alive in the
 Spirit, also "went and preached unto the spirits in prison, that
 aforetime were disobedient, when the long suffering of God waited in
 the days of Noah, while the ark was a preparing, wherein few, that is,
 eight souls, were saved through water," etc. (1 Pet 3, 19-20).
 
 17. A strange declaration, and an almost fanatical saying, by which
 the Apostle describes this event! By these words, Peter assures us
 that there was a certain unbelieving world to whom the dead Christ
 preached after their death. If this is true, who would doubt that
 Christ took Moses and the prophets with him to those who were fettered
 in prison, in order to change the unbelieving world into a new and
 believing one? This seems to be intimated by Peter's words, though I
 should not like to make this assertion authoritatively.
 
 18. But doubtless those whom he calls an unbelieving world were not
 the wicked despisers of his Word nor the tyrants. If they were
 overwhelmed in their sins, these were certainly condemned. The
 unbelieving world of which he speaks seems rather to be the children
 and those whose lack of judgment precluded belief. These were at that
 time, seized and carried away headlong to their destruction, by the
 offenses of the world, as if in the power of a rapid stream, only
 eight souls being saved.
 
 19. In this way does Peter magnify the awful intensity of God's wrath.
 At the same time he praises his long-suffering in that he did not
 deprive those of the Word of salvation who at the time did not or
 could not believe because they hoped in the patience of God and would
 not be convinced that he would visit such fearful and universal
 punishment upon the world.
 
 20. How this came to pass is beyond our understanding. We know and
 believe that God is wonderful in all his works and has all power.
 Therefore he who in life preached to the living, could also in death
 preach to the dead. All things hear, feel and touch him, though our
 human minds can not understand the process. Nor is it to our discredit
 when we are ignorant of some of the mysteries of Holy Writ. The
 apostles had each his own revelation, and contention concerning them
 would be presumptuous and foolish.
 
 21. Such was the revelation of Christ given to the spirits that
 evidently perished in the flood, and we may perhaps, not
 inappropriately connect it with that article of our creed which speaks
 of the descent of Christ into hell. Such was also Paul's revelation
 concerning paradise, the third heaven (2 Cor 12, 2-4), and certain
 other matters of which we may be ignorant without shame. It is false
 pride to profess to understand these things. St. Augustine and other
 teachers give their fancy loose rein when they discuss these passages.
 May it not be that the apostles had revelations which St. Augustine
 and others did not have? But let us return to Moses.
 
 22. A truly fearful description of the world is vouchsafed in this
 declaration of God that he saw Noah alone to be righteous before him,
 in spite of the small children and those others who had innocently
 been misled. Let us particularly note the term, "Before me." It
 signifies that Noah was blameless not only as regards the second table
 of the Law, but also as regards the first. He believed in God, and
 hallowed, preached and called upon his name; he gave thanks to God; he
 condemned godless teachings. For, to be righteous before God means to
 believe God and to fear him, and not, as they taught in popedom, to
 read masses, to free souls from purgatory, to become a monk, and like
 things.
 
 23. This term "Before me" has reference also to the condemnation of
 the ancient world. Having neglected the worship demanded by the first
 table, they criminally transgressed also the second. Not only did they
 mock Noah as a fool, but they went so far as to condemn his teaching
 as heresy. Meanwhile they ate, drank, and celebrated festivals in
 security. Before the world, accordingly, Noah was not righteous;
 measured by her code he was a sinner.
 
 24. Hence God, or the grandfather, Methuselah, consoles Noah with the
 Word of counsel to disregard the blind and wicked verdict of the
 world, neither to care for her views and utterances, but to close eyes
 and ears while heeding alone the Word and verdict of God, believing
 himself to be righteous before God, or approved and acceptable to him.
 
 25. And Noah's faith was truly great; he could rely upon God's
 utterance. I, forsooth, should not have believed. I realize what
 weight the whole world's hostile and condemnatory judgment must carry.
 We are condemned in the judgment of the Pope, the Sacramentarians, and
 the Anabaptists, but this is mere play and pleasure, compared to what
 the righteous Noah had to bear, who found not a single person in the
 whole world to approve of his religion or life, except his own sons
 and his pious grandfather. We have, the endorsement of many Churches,
 by God's grace, and our princes fear no danger in defense of their
 doctrine and religion. Noah had no such protectors, and he saw his
 enemies living in peaceful leisure and enjoyment. If I had been he, I
 surely should have said: Lord, if I am righteous, if I am well
 pleasing to thee and if those people are wicked and displeasing to
 thee, why, then, dost thou enrich them? Why dost thou heap upon them
 all manner of favors, while I, with my family, am greatly harassed and
 almost without assistance? In short, I should have despaired in such
 great afflictions unless the Lord had given me that spirit which Noah
 had.
 
 26. Therefore, Noah is a brilliant and admirable example of faith, who
 opposed the judgments of the world with an heroic steadfastness of
 mind in the assurance that he was righteous while all the rest of the
 world was wicked.
 
 27. Often when I think of those most holy men, John Huss and Jerome of
 Prague, I view with astonishment the courage of their souls, as they,
 only two in number, set themselves against the judgment of the whole
 world, of pope, emperor, bishops, princes, universities and all the
 schools throughout the empire.
 
 28. It is helpful often to reflect upon such examples. Since the
 prince of the world battles against us, endeavoring to kindle despair
 in us with his fiery darts, it behooves us to be well armed, lest we
 succumb to the enemy. Let us say with Noah: I know that I am righteous
 before God, even though the whole world condemn me as heretical and
 wicked, yea, even desert me. Thus did the apostles desert Christ,
 leaving him alone; but he said (Jn 16, 32): "I am not alone." Thus did
 the false brethren desert Paul. Hence, this is no uncommon danger, and
 it is not for us to despair; but with courage to uphold the true
 doctrine, in spite of the world's condemnation and curse.
 
 Vs. 2-3. _Of every clean beast thou shalt take to thee seven and
 seven, the male and his female; and of the beasts that are not clean
 two, the male and his female. Of the birds also of the heavens, seven
 and seven, male and female; to keep seed alive upon the face of all
 the earth._
 
 29. It is evident that God takes pleasure in speaking to Noah. Hence,
 he does not confine himself to a single command, but repeats the same
 things in the same words. To human reason such repetition appears to
 be absurd talkativeness, but to a soul struggling against despair the
 will of God cannot be repeated too often, nor can too exhaustive
 instruction be given relative to the will of God. God recognizes the
 state of a soul that is tempted, and hence makes the same statements
 again and again, so that Noah may learn from frequent conversations
 and conferences that he is not only not forsaken though the whole
 world forsake him, but that he has a friend and protector in God who
 so loves him that he never seems to weary of conversing with him. This
 is the cause of the statements being repeated. However, as has been
 explained, God spoke with Noah not from heaven but through men.
 
 30. In respect to the language, this passage shows that _ha-behemah_
 signifies not only cattle, the larger animals, but also the smaller
 ones which were commonly used for sacrifice, as sheep, goats and the
 like. The custom of offering sacrifices was not first instituted by
 Moses, but was in the world from the beginning, being handed down, as
 it were, by the patriarchs to their posterity; as shown by the example
 of Abel, who brought of his first fruits an offering to God.
 
 31. As to the remainder of the passage, we explained at the end of the
 sixth chapter how to harmonize the discrepancies apparent in the fact
 that here seven beasts of each kind are ordered to be taken into the
 ark while only two of each kind are mentioned there. To repeat is not
 necessary. Since Noah was saved by a miracle, he thought that a
 seventh animal should be added to the three pairs of clean beasts as a
 thank-offering to God, after the flood, for his deliverance.
 
 V. 4. _For yet seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth
 forty days and forty nights; and every living thing that I have made
 will I destroy from off the face of the ground._
 
 32. Here you see God's care to give Noah complete assurance. He sets a
 limit of seven days, after which will follow a rain of forty days and
 forty nights. God speaks with peculiar significance when he says that
 it shall rain. It was not a common rain, but fountains of the deep as
 well as the windows of heaven were opened; that is, not only did a
 great mass of rain fall from heaven, but also an immense amount of
 water streamed forth from the earth itself. And an immense amount of
 water was necessary to cover the highest mountain tops to a depth of
 fifteen cubits. It was no ordinary rain, but the rain of God's wrath,
 by which he set out to destroy all life upon the face of the earth.
 Because the earth was depraved, God despoiled it, and because the
 godless people raged against the first and second tables of the
 commandments, therefore God also raged against them, using heaven and
 earth as his weapons.
 
 33. This story is certain proof that God, though long-suffering and
 patient, will not allow the wicked to go unpunished. As Peter says (2
 Pet 2, 5), if he "spared not the ancient world," how much less will he
 spare the popes or the emperors who rage against his Word? How much
 less will he spare us who blaspheme his name when our life is unworthy
 of our calling and profession, when we freely and daily sin against
 our consciences? Let us, then, learn to fear the Lord, humbly to
 accept his Word and obey it; otherwise punishment will overtake also
 us, as Peter threatens.
 
 Vs. 5-10. _And Noah did according unto all that Jehovah commanded him.
 And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was upon
 the earth. And Noah went in, and his sons and his wife, and his sons'
 wives with him, into the ark, because of the waters of the flood. Of
 clean beasts, and of beasts that are not clean, and of birds, and of
 everything that creepeth upon the ground, there went in two and two
 unto Noah into the ark, male and female, as God commanded Noah. And it
 came to pass after the seven days, that the waters of the flood were
 upon the earth._
 
 34. This is clear from what precedes. Noah's faith is praiseworthy in
 that he obeyed the Lord's command and unwaveringly entered the ark
 with his sons and their wives. God truly could have saved him in
 innumerable other ways; he did not employ this seemingly absurd method
 because he knew no other. To him who kept Jonah for three days in the
 midst of the sea and in the belly of the whale, what do you think is
 impossible? But Noah's faith and obedience are to be commended because
 he took no offense at this plan of salvation divinely shown to him,
 but embraced it in simple faith.
 
 
 II. COMPLETE DESTRUCTION BY FLOOD.
 
  * Why Moses so often repeats and expresses in few words what other
    writers describe at length 35-39.
 
  * Noah's grief because of the approaching calamity 38.
 
  * The way of coarse and satiated spirits 39.
 
    1. When did the flood commence.
 
       a. Some think it began in the spring 40.
 
       b. Others think it began in the autumn 41.
 
       c. Which is the more probable 42.
 
        * What to think of the Jews reckoning the year has two
          beginnings 44.
 
    2. How the flood continued.
 
       a. Must distinguish the fountains of the earth, the windows of
          heaven and the rain 45.
 
        * Of the earth and the water.
 
          (1) Why the water does not overflow the earth since the earth
              floats in the water 46.
 
          (2) Why the water above the earth does not fall and overflow
              the earth 47-48.
 
          (3) How the prophets wondered at this as a miracle, but we in
              our day give it little thought 49.
 
       b. How were the fountains broken up, how can such a work be
          ascribed to God 50-51.
 
        * Overflowing of the German fountains at Halle 51.
 
       c. How were the windows of heaven opened 52.
 
          (1) What is meant by the windows of heaven 53.
 
          (2) Why such words used here 53.
 
    3. Flood covered and destroyed the whole earth 54.
 
    4. Why God sent the deluge 54.
 
     * Why God so often repeats the same thing 55-60.
 
     * What is meant by Zippor 55.
 
     * How God's wrath as seen in the deluge was very great 56-57.
 
    5. The deluge was a terrible spectacle; Noah and his sons took
       courage from it 58-60.
 
     * Noah's glorious faith at the sight of the deluge 60.
 
     * Noah's long ship voyage; how he was comforted 61.
 
    6. How the world's destruction harmonizes with God's promises: how
       the promises to the Church agree with his threatenings 62ff.
 
     * God's threatenings and man's unbelief.
 
       a. Why the first world believed not the threatenings about the
          deluge 62ff.
 
       b. Why the Jews believe not the threatenings of the prophets 63.
 
       c. Why the Papists believed not the threats against them 64.
 
     * God's Church and her maintenance.
 
       a. The world understands not how the church is maintained 66.
 
       b. What is the true form of the true Church 66.
 
       c. God's promises not rescinded when rejected; who bear the name
          of the Church 67-68.
 
    7. Whether God fully rescinded through the flood the rule over the
       earth he once gave man 69.
 
     * How God preserved his Church through the deluge 69.
 
    8. The deluge was apparently against God's promise 70.
 
     * God allows nothing to hinder the punishment of the impenitent
       71-73.
 
     * By what means Papists adorn themselves and how it is all in vain
       72.
 
     * Why we should not rely on present, temporal things, but upon
       God's Word 73.
 
     * The marks of a true Church.
 
       a. What they are not and what they are 74-76.
 
       b. Papists have characteristics Holy Scriptures give as marks of
          Antichrist 75.
 
       c. Church born of God's Word and is to be known by that Word 76.
 
       d. Rule to be observed in the marks of the true Church 77.
 
       e. How far one may consider the Papists the true church, and how
          far not 78-79.
 
       f. The true church is where the Word is, although few belong to
          it and it has no temporal power 79.
 
       g. Whether the Evangelicals can justly be accused of falling
          from the old church 80.
 
       h. How and why the Evangelical or Gospel Church is really the
          true Church 81.
 
        * How Noah retained all and remained lord of the world although
          the deluge destroyed everything 81.
 
 
 II. COMPLETE DESTRUCTION.
 
 Vs. 11-12. _In the six hundredth year of Noah's life, in the second
 month, on the seventeenth day of the month, on the same day were all
 the fountains of the great deep broken up, and the windows of heaven
 were opened. And the rain was upon the earth forty days and forty
 nights._
 
 35. We see that Moses uses a great many words, which results in
 tiresome repetition. How often he mentions the animals! how often the
 entrance into the ark! how often the sons of Noah who entered at the
 same time! The reason for this must be left to the spiritually minded;
 they alone know and see that the Holy Spirit does not repeat in vain.
 
 36. Others, however, who are more materially minded may think that
 Moses, being moved, when he wrote the passage, by the greatness of
 God's wrath, desired to enforce its truths by repetition; for
 reiteration of statements is soothing to troubled minds. Thus did
 David repeat his lament over his son Absalom, 2 Sam 18, 33. So viewed,
 this narrative shows depth of feeling and extreme agitation of mind.
 This example of wrath so impresses the narrator that for emphasis he
 mentions the same thing again and again, and in the same words.
 
 37. This is not the custom of poets and historians. Their emotions are
 factitious; they are diffuse in their descriptions; they pile up words
 for mere effect. Moses husbands his words, but is emphatic by
 repetition that he may arouse the reader's attention to the importance
 of the message and compel him to feel his own emotions instead of
 reading those of another.
 
 38. Evidently Moses did not only wish to convey by persistent
 repetition the extreme agitation of his own mind, but also of that of
 Noah himself, who, being filled with the Holy Spirit, and burning with
 love, necessarily deplored the calamity when he saw that he could not
 avert it. He foresaw the doom of the wisest and most distinguished and
 eminent men. Thus did David mourn when he could not call back Absalom
 to life. So Samuel mourned when he despaired of saving Saul.
 
 39. The text is not a mere tautology or repetition. The Holy Spirit
 does not idly repeat words, as those superficial minds believe, which,
 having read through the Bible once, throw it aside as if they had
 gathered all its contents. Yet these very repetitions of Moses contain
 a statement more startling than any to be found in heathen
 records--that Noah entered the ark in the six hundredth year, the
 second month and the second day of his life.
 
 40. Opinions differ as to the beginning of the year. One is, that the
 year begins at the conjunction of the sun and the moon which occurs
 nearest to the vernal equinox. Thus this month is called the first by
 Moses in Exodus. If the flood set in on the seventeenth day of the
 second month, it must have continued almost to the end of April, the
 most beautiful season of the year, when the earth seemingly gathers
 new strength, when the birds sing and the beasts rejoice, when the
 world puts on a new face, as it were, after the dreary season of
 winter. Death and destruction must have come with added terror at that
 season which was looked forward to as a harbinger of joy and the
 apparent beginning of a new life. This view is substantiated by the
 words of Christ in Matthew 24, 38, where he compares the last days of
 the world to the days of Noah and speaks of feasting, marriage and
 other signs of gladness.
 
 41. A second opinion makes the year begin with that new moon which is
 nearest to the autumnal equinox, when all the harvest has been
 gathered from the fields. Its advocates declare this to be the
 beginning of the year, because Moses calls that month in which such
 new moon occurs, the end of the year. They call this autumnal equinox
 the beginning of the civil year, and the vernal equinox the beginning
 of the holy year. The Mosaic ceremonies and festivals extend from the
 latter season up to the autumnal equinox.
 
 42. If Moses in this passage is speaking of the civil year, then the
 flood occurred in September or October, an opinion I find Lyra held.
 It is true that fall and winter are more liable to rains, the signs of
 the zodiac pointing to humidity. Again, as Moses writes further on, a
 dove was sent forth in the tenth month and brought back a green olive
 branch. This fact seems to harmonize with the view that the deluge
 began in October.
 
 43. But I cannot endorse this argument of the Jews, assuming two
 beginnings of the year. Why not make four beginnings, since there are
 four distinct seasons according to the equinoxes and solstices? It is
 safer to follow the divine order, making April the first month,
 starting with the new moon which is nearest to vernal equinox. The
 Jews betray their ignorance in speaking of an autumnal beginning of
 the year: the autumnal equinox is necessarily the end of the year.
 Moses so calls it for the reason that all field labors had then ceased
 and all products had been gathered and brought home.
 
 44. Hence, it is my belief that the flood began in the spring, when
 all minds were filled with hope of the new year. Such is the death of
 the wicked that when they shall say, "Peace and safety," they perish.
 1 Thes 5, 3. Nor is any inconsistence shown in the fact that the green
 olive branch is afterward mentioned, for certain trees are evergreen,
 as the boxwood, fir, pine, cedar, laurel, olive, palm and others.
 
 45. But what does Moses mean by saying that the fountains of the great
 deep burst, and that the windows of heaven were opened? No such record
 is found in all pagan literature, although the heathen searched with
 zeal the mysteries of nature. One discrimination should be made as
 regards the abysses of the earth, the floodgates or windows of heaven,
 and the rain. Rain, as we know it, is a common phenomenon, while that
 of bursting floodgates and abysses is both unfamiliar and amazing.
 
 46. Almost all interpreters are silent on this point. We know from
 Holy Writ that God, by his Word, established a dwelling-place for man
 and other living beings on dry land, above the water, contrary to
 nature; for it is opposed to natural law that the earth, being placed
 in water, should rise up out of it. If you cast a clod into the water,
 it sinks at once. But the dry land stands up out of the water by
 virtue of the Word, which has set bounds for the sea, as Solomon (Prov
 8, 27) and Job (ch 38, 11) declare. Unless the water were restrained
 by the power of the Word, with a bound, as it were, they would
 overflow and lay waste everything. Thus is our life guarded every
 single moment, and wonderfully preserved by the Word. We have an
 illustration in partial deluges, when at times entire states or
 regions are flooded, proving that we should daily suffer such
 unpleasant things if God did not take care of us.
 
 47. But just as there are waters below us, and beneath the earth, so,
 too, are there waters above us, and beyond the sky. If they should
 descend, obeying natural law, destruction would result. The clouds
 float as if suspended in space. When at times they descend, how great
 the terror they cause! But imagine the result of a universal collapse!
 How they would burst, in obedience to the law of their nature, did
 they not remain in place above us, suspended, as it were, by the Word!
 
 48. Thus we are girt about on all sides by water, shielded only by a
 frail ceiling of unsubstantial material--the air that we
 breathe--which bears up the clouds and carries that weight of water,
 not in obedience to the laws of nature, but by the command of God, or
 by the power of the Word.
 
 49. When the prophets think of these things they are lost in
 admiration. It is contrary to nature that such a weight should remain
 in suspension above the earth. But we, blinded by daily witnessing of
 such wonders, neither observe nor admire them. That we are not at any
 moment overwhelmed by waters from above or from below, we owe to the
 divine majesty which orders all things and preserves all creatures so
 wonderfully, and he ought to be the object of our praise.
 
 50. Startling and significant are the words Moses uses--the fountains
 of the great deep were broken up. The conception he would convey is
 that they had been closed by God's power and sealed, as it were, with
 God's seal, as today; and that God did not open them with a key, but
 rent them with violence, so that the ocean, in a sudden upheaval,
 covered everything with water. It is not to be supposed that God moved
 his hand, because the fountains of the deep are said to have been
 broken up. It is the custom of Scripture to adapt itself to our
 understanding in the phraseology employed, and that under
 consideration here denotes that God gives leave to the waters in that
 he no longer restrains or coerces them but suffers them to rage and
 break forth unchecked according to their nature. That is the reason
 the ocean seemed to swell and boil. In the salt works in our
 neighborhood there is a spring named after the Germans, which, if it
 is not pumped out at certain times, swells and overflows with terrific
 force.
 
 51. They say that in olden times the town of Halle was once destroyed
 by a violent overflow of a spring of the kind described. If a single
 spring could work such destruction what would be the result of the
 uncurbed power of ocean and seas? Thus mankind was destroyed before
 they even knew their danger. Whither should they flee when the waters
 poured in upon them with such force?
 
 52. But this is not all: the windows of heaven also were opened.
 Moses' word implies that to that time the windows were closed as they
 are closed today. Indeed, the world thought such opening impossible;
 their sins, however, made it possible.
 
 53. Moses' use here of the word "windows" signifies the literal
 opening of heaven. With rain as we know it, the water appears to fall
 by drops from the pores of the rain-clouds, but at the time of the
 flood it came down with great force, not through pores, but through
 windows, like water poured from a vessel with one movement, or as when
 water-skins burst in the middle. Moses uses this figure of speech for
 the sake of effect, so that those occurrences are brought to our
 vision.
 
 54. A volume of water, therefore, swept over the earth, from the sky
 as well as from the innermost parts of the earth, until at last the
 whole earth was covered with water, and the fertile soil, or the
 entire face of the earth was destroyed by the briny flood. A like
 instance occurs nowhere in any book. The Holy Scriptures alone teach
 us that these things were visited upon the world sinning in imagined
 security, and that to this day the waters suspended in the clouds are
 restrained only by the kindness of God. Otherwise they would descend
 in vast volume, as in the flood, according to the law of their nature.
 
 Vs. 13-16. _In the selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and
 Japheth, the sons of Noah, and Noah's wife, and three wives of his
 sons with them, into the ark; they, and every beast after its kind,
 and all the cattle after their kind, and every creeping thing that
 creepeth upon the earth after its kind, and every bird after its kind,
 every bird of every sort. And, they went in unto Noah and the ark, two
 and two of all flesh wherein is the breath of life. And they that went
 in, went in male and female of all flesh, as God commanded him._
 
 55. Here Moses begins to be remarkably verbose. His wordiness hurts
 tender ears when he so often and apparently without any use repeats
 the same things. It is not sufficient to say "all birds," but he names
 three kinds of birds. Of these, the term _zippor_ is usually said to
 mean "a sparrow," but this passage shows clearly that it is a generic
 term, doubtless so called from the sound, _zi, zi_. He also names
 three kinds of beasts. Also, when speaking of the flood itself, he is
 very wordy, saying that the waters prevailed, that they increased,
 that they flooded and covered the face of the earth. Finally, when he
 tells of the effect of this flood, he makes similar repetition: "All
 flesh expired, died, was destroyed," etc.
 
 56. But I said above (para 37) that Moses repeats these things
 contrary to his style, in order to force the reader to pause and more
 diligently learn and meditate upon this great event. We cannot fully
 comprehend the wrath which destroys, not man alone, but all his
 possessions. Moses wishes to arouse hardened and heedless sinners by
 such a consideration of God's wrath.
 
 57. Hence, these words are not idle, as a shallow and unspiritual
 reader might judge. They rather challenge us to fear God, and call
 attention to the present so that, sobered by the thought of such
 wrath, we may make an earnest beginning in the fear of God, and cease
 from sin. For not without many tears does Moses appear to have written
 this account! So utterly is he with eyes and mind absorbed in this
 horrible spectacle of wrath that he cannot but repeat the same
 statements again and again. Doubtless he does this with the purpose to
 thrust such darts of divine fear, so to speak, into the souls of pious
 readers.
 
 58. It may be well to transport ourselves in thought into the time of
 the event. What do you think would be our state of mind if we had been
 put into the ark, if we had seen the waters spreading everywhere with
 overwhelming force and the wretched human beings perishing without
 possibility of help? Let us remember that Noah and his sons were also
 flesh and blood; that is, they were men who, as that person in the
 comedy (Terence, Heaut. 1: 1, 25) says, thought nothing human was
 foreign to themselves. They were in the ark for forty days before it
 was lifted off the earth. In those days were destroyed all the human
 beings and animals living upon the earth. This calamity they saw with
 their own eyes; who would doubt that they were violently stirred by
 the sight?
 
 59. Furthermore, the ark floated upon the waters for one hundred and
 fifty days, buffeted on all sides by the waves and winds. There was no
 hope for any harbor, or for any meeting with men. As exiles,
 therefore, as vanished from the earth, as it were, they were driven
 here and there by currents and winds. Is it not a miracle that those
 eight human beings did not die from grief and fear? Truly, we are made
 of stone if we can read this story with dry eyes.
 
 60. What outcry, sorrow and wailing if from the shore we see a small
 boat overturned, and human beings miserably perishing! Here, however,
 not one boat-load, but the entire world of men perish in the waters; a
 world composed not only of grown persons, but also babes; not only of
 criminal and wicked ones, but also simple-hearted matrons and virgins.
 They all perished. Let us believe that Moses told the tale of this
 calamity with such redundancy of words in order that we might be
 impelled to give earnest attention to this important event. Noah's
 faith was truly of a rare kind, since he consoled himself and his
 family with the hope of promised seed and dwelt more upon this promise
 than the destruction of all the rest of the world.
 
 Vs. 16-24. _And Jehovah shut him in. And the flood was forty days upon
 the earth; and the waters increased, and bare up the ark, and it was
 lifted up above the earth. And the waters prevailed, and increased
 greatly upon the earth; and the ark went upon the face of the waters.
 And the waters prevailed exceedingly upon the earth; and all the high
 mountains that were under the whole heaven were covered. Fifteen
 cubits upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains were covered.
 And all flesh died that moved upon the earth, both birds, and cattle,
 and beasts, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth, and
 every man: all, in whose nostrils was the breath of the spirit of
 life, of all that was on the dry land, died. And every living thing
 was destroyed that was upon the face of the ground, both man, and
 cattle, and creeping things, and birds of the heavens; and they were
 destroyed from the earth: and Noah only was left, and they that were
 with him in the ark. And the waters prevailed upon the earth a hundred
 and fifty days._
 
 61. For forty days the ark stood in some plain. By that time the
 waters had risen to such an extent that they lifted the ark, which
 then floated for one hundred and fifty days. A long sea voyage indeed,
 and one of great mourning and tears. Yet the occupants upheld
 themselves by faith, not doubting the kindness of God toward them.
 They had experienced his goodness when building the ark, when
 preparing the food, when getting ready other things needful for this
 occasion, and finally when the Lord closed the ark after the flood
 came in its power.
 
 62. The question arises, how can God be truthful here? He had set man
 as master over the earth to cultivate and rule it. God did not create
 the earth to lie waste, but to be inhabited and give its fruits to
 men. How can we reconcile such purpose of the creator with the fact
 that he destroyed all mankind except eight souls? I have no doubt that
 this argument influenced the descendants of Cain as well as the wicked
 posterity of the righteous generation not to believe Noah when he
 proclaimed the flood. How can we harmonize God's promise to Adam and
 Eve, "You shall rule the earth," and his words here to Noah, "The
 water shall overpower all men, and destroy them all." So the
 unbelievers decided that Noah's preaching was wicked and heretical.
 
 63. In like manner the books of the prophets bear witness that the
 threats of the Assyrian and Babylonish captivity were not believed by
 the priests and kings, who knew this grand promise: "This is my
 resting-place forever: here will I dwell; for I have desired it," Ps
 132, 14; and that other, by Isaiah: "Here is my fire, and my
 hearth-stone," Is 31, 9. To them it was incredible that either the
 State or the temple should be overthrown by the gentiles. And the
 Jews, miserable outcast though they be, even to this day hold fast the
 promise that they are God's people and heirs of the promises given
 Abraham and the fathers.
 
 64. Thus is the pope puffed up with the promises given to the Church:
 "I am with you unto the end of the world," Mt 28, 20; "I will not
 leave you desolate," Jn 14, 18; "I made supplication for thee, that
 thy faith fail not," Lk 22, 32; and others. Though he sees and feels
 the wrath of God, yet, caught in these promises, he dreams, and
 likewise his followers, that his throne and power are secure. Hence
 the Papists blatantly use the name of the Church to overwhelm us,
 promising themselves the utmost success, as if they could force God to
 establish the Church according to their dreams and desires.
 
 65. Fitly, then, do we here raise the question how the flood, by which
 all mankind perished, agrees with the will of God, who created human
 nature and gave it the promise and endowment of dominion. The answer
 to this question will likewise settle the one concerning the Church.
 It is this: God remains truthful, preserving, ruling and governing his
 Church though in a manner transcending the observation and
 understanding of the world. He permits the Roman pontiff and his
 adherents to think that the pope is the Church. He suffers him to feel
 secure and to enjoy his dignity and title. But in fact God has
 excommunicated the pontiff, because he rejects the Word and
 establishes idolatrous worship.
 
 66. On the other hand, God has chosen for himself another Church,
 which embraces the Word and flees idolatry, a Church so oppressed and
 shamefully afflicted that it is not considered a Church but a band of
 heretics and the devil's school. Thus Paul writes to the Romans (ch 2,
 17) that the Jews do not fear God yet they glory in the Law and in
 God, at the same time denying, blaspheming and offending God. And
 while the Jews, who take pride in being God's people, are doing this,
 God prepares for himself a Church from the gentiles, who truly glory
 in God and embrace his Word.
 
 67. But who should dare to accuse God of untruthfulness because he
 preserves the Church in a manner unknown and undesired by man? Of
 similar nature were the promises concerning the preservation of
 Jerusalem and the temple. These promises were not violated when that
 city and temple were laid waste by the Babylonians. For God
 established another Jerusalem and another temple in the Spirit and by
 the Word; Jeremiah promised (Jer 29, 10-11) that the people should
 return after seventy years and that then both the temple and the
 nation should be re-established.
 
 68. As regards the Jews, these were destroyed at that time, but not as
 regards God who had promised in his Word that they should be rebuilt.
 The Jews argue correctly that God will not desert the nation and
 temple; but God keeps his promise in a way foreign to the thought of
 the Jews, who believed that the nation would not be destroyed because
 the promise said: "This is my resting-place forever." God permitted
 destruction in order to punish the sins of his people, and yet he
 preserved and protected the Church when the pious were brought back by
 Cyrus and built the temple.
 
 69. In like manner, dominion over the world was given to man in the
 beginning of creation. This is taken away in the flood, not forever,
 but for a time, and that not altogether. Though the greater part of
 the world perishes, yet man retains his mastery; and this mastery is
 preserved to mankind, not as represented by a multitude, as the world
 desired and believed, but by a few persons--eight souls--a thing which
 seemed incredible to the world.
 
 70. Hence God did not lie; he kept his promise, but not as the world
 would have had it. He destroyed the sinners and saved the righteous
 few, which, like a seed, he thereafter multiplied in many ways.
 
 71. The Papists should keep before their eyes this judgment of God. It
 teaches that neither numbers nor power nor his own promise is allowed
 to prevent him from punishing the impenitent. Otherwise he would have
 spared the first world and the offspring of the patriarchs to whom he
 had granted dominion over the earth. Now he destroys all and saves
 only eight.
 
 72. Is it wonderful, then, that he deals with the Papists in the same
 way? Though they boast of rank, dignity, numbers, and power, yet,
 because they trample the Word of God under foot and rage against it,
 God will cast them away, choosing for himself another Church, which
 will humbly obey the Word and accept with open arms the gifts of
 Christ which the pope's Church, trusting in its own merits, haughtily
 spurns.
 
 73. Therefore none should trust in the good things of present
 possession, though they be promised by the divine Word. We must look
 to the Word itself and trust in it alone. Those who set the Word aside
 and put their trust in present things, will not go unscathed in their
 fall from faith, however much they may boast of power and numbers.
 This truth is shown by the flood, by the captivity of the Jews and
 their present misfortune, and by the seven thousand men in the kingdom
 of Israel.
 
 74. The proof is sufficiently strong, that great numbers do not make a
 Church. Nor must we trust in holiness of origin, in forefathers, or in
 the gifts of God which we enjoy. We must look to the Word alone and
 judge thereby. Those alone who truly embrace the Word will be as
 immovable forever as Mount Zion. They may be few in number and
 thoroughly despised by the world, as were Noah and his children. But
 God, through these few, preserved to man the truth of that promised
 mastery when he had not even room to set his foot upon the earth.
 
 75. Our enemies, setting aside the Word, make much of number, outward
 appearance, and persons. But the apostles foretold that the Antichrist
 will be a respecter of persons, that will rely upon numbers and
 ancient origin, that he will hate the Word and corrupt God's promises
 and that he will kill those who cling to the Word. Shall we, then,
 consider such people to be the Church?
 
 76. The Church is a daughter born from the Word, not the mother of the
 Word. Therefore, whoever loses the Word and looks to men instead,
 ceases to be the Church and lapses into utter blindness; nor will
 either great numbers or power avail. They who keep the word, as did
 Noah and his family, are the Church, though they be few in number,
 even but eight souls. The Papists at this time surpass us in numbers
 and rank; we not only are cursed, but suffer many things. But we must
 endure until the judgment, when God will reveal that we are his
 Church, and the Papists the church of Satan.
 
 77. So, then, we must observe that rule in 1 Sam 16, 7, where the Lord
 says to Samuel: "Look not on his countenance, or on the height of his
 stature; because I have rejected him: for Jehovah seeth not as man
 seeth; for man looketh on the outward appearance, but Jehovah looketh
 on the heart."
 
 78. Let us not, therefore, give heed to the greatness and might of the
 pope, who boasts that he is the Church, proclaiming the apostolic
 succession and the majesty of his person. Let us look to the Word. If
 the pope embraces it, let us judge him to be the Church; but if he
 does violence to it, let us judge him to be the slave of Satan.
 
 79. Paul says (1 Cor 2, 15) that the spiritual person judgeth all
 things. If I were the only one on the face of the earth to keep the
 Word, I should be the Church, and rightfully pass judgment upon all
 the rest of the world that they were not the Church. Our enemies have
 the office without the Word, and really have nothing. We, on the other
 hand, have the Word, though we have nothing; yet we have everything
 through the Word. Therefore, either let the pope, the cardinals and
 the bishops come over to our side, or let them cease to boast that
 they are the Church, which they cannot be without the Word, since it
 is begotten only by the Word.
 
 80. We bear a great load of hatred, being accused of having deserted
 the ancient Church. The Papists, on the other hand, boast that they
 have remained true to the Church, and they want to leave everything to
 the judgment of the Church. But we are accused falsely. To speak the
 truth, we must say that we departed from the Word when we were still
 in their Church and now we have returned to the Word and have ceased
 to be apostates from the Word.
 
 81. Therefore though in their judgment they rob us of the title of the
 Church, still we retain the Word, and through the Word we have all
 ornaments of the true Church. For whoever has the Creator of all, must
 needs also possess the creatures themselves. In this sense Noah
 remained master of the world, though the waters prevailed, and the
 earth perished. Though he lost his property, yet, because he retained
 the Word by which everything was created, it may truly be said he
 retained everything.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER VIII.
 
 
 I. NOAH'S CONDITION IN THE ARK; THE WATERS ABATE.
 
    A. NOAH'S CONDITION IN THE ARK.
 
       1. How Noah and his family anxiously waited for God's promise,
          and lived in faith, which is a hard life 1-3.
 
       2. He had a hard time in the ark. What sustained him 2-4.
 
       3. How he suffered in two ways 5.
 
        * Whether God can forget his saints 6.
 
        * Severest temptations are when man thinks he is forsaken by
          God 7.
 
       4. Noah's condition became more miserable because of his
          family's distress 8-10.
 
       5. Noah and family with difficulty overcame their temptation 11.
 
        * Christians need steadfastness 12.
 
        * Why God for a time conceals himself from his faithful ones
          13.
 
        * Temptations severe when saints imagine God has forsaken them
          14.
 
    B. THE WATERS ABATE.
 
       1. The time the waters abated 15.
 
       2. How the wind blew upon the earth and dried it. 16-17.
 
       3. The abating of the waters was a sign by which God comforted
          Noah 18.
 
        * Noah's Ark.
 
          a. When it began to float, how long it floated and when it
             rested 19.
 
          b. On what mountain did it rest 20.
 
          c. What to think of Josephus' testimony 21.
 
       4. When the mountain tops first seen 22.
 
       5. How Noah learned the deluge had ceased.
 
          a. Why Noah sent forth the raven, and how the error arose the
             raven never returned 23-24.
 
           * The Jews' unclean thoughts of the raven 24.
 
          b. Noah sent forth a dove, and if at the same time with the
             raven 25.
 
          c. Noah sent out a second dove, which assured him that the
             flood had ceased 26.
 
             (1) Dove returned with an olive leaf 26.
 
             (2) Whether it did this of its own impulse, and what God
                 thereby wished to indicate 27-28.
 
             (3) The Jews' ideas on where the dove got the olive leaf
                 27.
 
             (4) Why an olive leaf 28.
 
       6. How long Noah and family were in the ark 29.
 
 
 I. NOAH IN ARK--FLOOD ABATES.
 
 A. NOAH'S CONDITION IN THE ARK.
 
 V. 1a. _And God remembered Noah, and all the beasts, and all the
 cattle that were with him in the ark._
 
 1. When that horrible wrath had exhausted itself, and all flesh with
 the earth had been destroyed, the promise made by God to Noah and his
 sons, that they were to be the seed of the human race, began to be
 realized. No doubt this promise was to them an object of eager
 expectation. No life is so hedged about with difficulties as that of
 faith. This was the life lived by Noah and his sons, whom we see
 absolutely depending upon the heavens for support. The earth was
 covered with water. Bottom on which to stand there was none. It was
 the word of promise that upheld them, as they drifted in this welter
 of waters.
 
 2. When the flesh is free from danger, it holds faith in contempt, as
 the claims of the Papists show. It loves showy and toilsome tasks; in
 these it sweats. But behold Noah, on all sides surrounded by waters,
 yet not overwhelmed! Surely it is not works that sustain him but faith
 in God's mercy extended through the word of promise.
 
 3. The difficulty besetting Noah is hinted at in the words: "God
 remembered." Moses thus intimates that Noah had been tossed on the
 water so long that God seemed to have forgotten him altogether. They
 who pass through such a mental strain, when the rays of divine grace
 are gone and they sit in darkness or are forgotten by God, find by
 experience that it is far more difficult to live in the Word or by
 faith alone than to be a hermit or a Carthusian monk.
 
 4. Hence, it is not a meaningless expression when the Holy Spirit says
 that "God remembered Noah." He means that from the day Noah entered
 the ark, no word was spoken, nothing was revealed to him; that he saw
 no ray of divine grace shining, but merely clung to the promise which
 he had accepted, while in the meantime the waters and waves raged as
 if God had certainly forgotten. The same danger beset his children and
 also the cattle and all the other animals throughout the one hundred
 and fifty days they were in the ark. And though the holy seed by the
 aid of the conquering Spirit overcame those difficulties, the victory
 was not won without vexation of the flesh, tears and stupendous fear,
 felt, in my opinion, even by the brutes.
 
 5. Thus a twofold danger beset them. The universal flood which
 swallowed up all mankind could not vanish without stupendous grief to
 the righteous, particularly as they saw themselves reduced to so small
 a number. Further, it was a serious matter to be buffeted by the
 waters for almost half a year without any consolation from God.
 
 6. The expression used by Moses, "God remembered Noah," must not be
 short of its meaning by calling it a rhetorical figure, signifying
 that God acted after the manner of one who had forgotten Noah, whereas
 God cannot in truth forget his saints. A mere master of rhetoric,
 indeed, does not know what it means to live in such a state as to feel
 that God has forgotten him. Only the most perfect saints understand
 that, and can in faith bear, so to speak, a God who forgets. Therefore
 the Psalms and all the Scriptures are filled with complaints of this
 nature, in which God is called upon to arise, to open his eyes, to
 hear, to awaken.
 
 7. Monks possessed of a higher degree of experience, at times
 underwent this temptation and called it a suspension of grace. The
 latter may be experienced also in temptations of a slighter nature.
 The flame of lust found in young people is altogether unbearable
 unless it is held in check by the Word of God and the Holy Spirit.
 Similarly, at a more mature age, impatience and the desire for revenge
 can nowise be overcome unless God tears them from the soul. How much
 more liable is the soul to fall into the darkness of despair, or into
 ensnaring predestinarian tenets, when more severe temptations beset us
 and the suspension of grace is felt.
 
 8. Hence this expression is not to be passed by as a mere rhetorical
 ornament, according to the interpretation of the rabbis. It is
 intended rather to portray the state of soul which feels despair
 coming on amid unutterable groanings of heart, with just a spark of
 faith left to wrest victory from the flesh. In the same way that Paul
 suffered from Satan's messenger, we may believe that Noah felt himself
 stabbed in the heart, and that he often argued thus within himself:
 Dost thou believe that thou alone art so beloved of God? Dost thou
 believe that thou will be kept safe to the end, when waters are
 boundless, and those immense clouds seem to be inexhaustible?
 
 9. When, then, such broodings found their way also into the weak souls
 of the women, what cries, wails and tears may we surmise to have been
 the result? Almost overcome by sadness and grief, he was forced to
 lift up and comfort those with the cheer his own heart did not feel.
 
 10. It was, therefore, no jest or frolic for them to live so long
 locked up within the ark, to see the endless downpour of rain and to
 be carried to and fro floating upon the waves. This was the experience
 of having been forgotten by God which Moses implies when he says that
 God at last remembered Noah and his sons.
 
 11. Though the occupants of the ark overcame this feeling by faith,
 they did not do so without great vexation of the flesh; just as a
 young man who leads a chaste life overcomes lust, but surely not
 without the greatest vexation and trouble. In this instance, where the
 trial was greater, where all evidence was at variance with the fact
 that God was gracious and mindful of them, they indeed triumphed, but
 not without fearful tribulation. For the flesh, weak in itself, can
 bear nothing less patiently than the thought of a God who has
 forgotten. Human nature is prone to be puffed up and haughty when God
 remembers it, when he vouchsafes success and favor. Is it a wonder,
 then, that we become broken in spirit and desperate when God seems to
 have cast us away and everything goes against us?
 
 12. Let us remember that this story sets before us an example of
 faith, of endurance, and of patience, to the end that, having the
 divine promise, we should not only learn to believe it, but should
 also consider that we are in need of endurance. Endurance is not
 maintained without a great struggle, and Christ calls upon us, in the
 New Testament, to acquire it when he says: "He that endureth to the
 end, the same shall be saved," Mt 24, 13.
 
 13. This is the reason why God hides for a time, as it were, seeming
 to have forgotten us, suspending his grace, as they say in the
 schools. As in this temptation not only the spirit but also the flesh
 is afflicted, so afterward, when he again begins to remember us, the
 perception of grace which during the trial was evident only to the
 spirit and most faintly at that, is extended to the flesh also.
 
 14. Hence, the word "remembered" indicates that great sadness beset
 both man and beast during the entire time of the flood. It must have
 been by dint of great patience and extraordinary courage that Noah and
 the others bore this lapse from God's memory, which is simply
 unbearable to the flesh without the spirit even in slight trials.
 True, God always remembers his own, even when he seems to have
 forsaken them; but Moses indicates that he remembered his people here
 in a visible way, by a sign, and by openly fulfilling what he had
 previously promised through the Word and the Spirit. This is the most
 important passage in this chapter.
 
 B. Waters Abate.
 
 Vs. 1b-3. _And God made a wind to pass over the earth, and the waters
 assuaged; the fountains also of the deep and the windows of heaven
 were stopped, and the rain from heaven was restrained; and the waters
 returned from off the earth continually; and after the end of a
 hundred and fifty days the waters decreased._
 
 15. Moses said above (ch 7, 11-12) that the deluge raged in three
 different ways; for not only were the fountains of the great deep
 broken up and the windows of heaven opened, but also the rain
 descended. When these forces ceased on the one hundred and fiftieth
 day, quiet was once more in evidence and the fact that God remembered,
 and Noah with his sons and their wives, as also the animals, was
 refreshed after terror so great and continuous. If a storm of two days
 duration causes seafarers to despair, how much more distressing was
 that tossing about for half a year!
 
 16. The question here arises, how the wind was made to pass over the
 earth, which as yet was entirely covered with water. It is nothing new
 that winds have the power to dry, especially those from the east,
 called by our countrymen "hohle winde," and by Virgil "parching
 winds," from the drouth which they bring upon the earth. These are
 mentioned also by Hosea 13, 15. The explanation, accordingly, is
 simple. Moses says that the wind was made to pass over the earth, that
 is, over the surface of the waters, for such a length of time that at
 last, the waters being dried up, the earth again appeared. So, in
 Exodus, a burning wind is said to have dried up the Red Sea. Now, God
 might have accomplished this without any wind, yet he habitually
 employs a natural means to attain his purposes.
 
 17. Up to this time Noah had lived in darkness, seeing nothing but the
 waters rolling and raging in a terrifying volume. Now the delicious
 light of the sun bursts forth once more, and the winds cease to roar
 from all points of the compass. Only the east wind, calculated to
 reduce the waters, is blowing, and gradually it takes away the
 stagnant flood. Other means also are effective; the ocean no longer
 hurls its waves upon the land, but takes back the waters which it had
 spewed forth, and the floodgates of heaven are closed up.
 
 18. These are outward and tangible signs by which God consoles Noah,
 showing him that he had not forgotten, but remembered him. This is a
 practical and needed lesson also for us. When in the midst of dangers
 we may with certainty look for God's help, who does not desert us if
 we continue in faith, looking forward to the fulfilment of God's
 promises.
 
 V. 4. _And the ark rested in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day
 of the month, upon the mountains of Ararat._
 
 19. The waters increased for forty days, until the ark was lifted from
 the earth. Then for one hundred and fifty days it floated upon the
 waters, driven by the winds and the waves, without a sign of God's
 remembrance. At length the waters began to decrease, and the ark
 rested.
 
 20. The point of dispute among the Jews here is the number of months.
 But why waste any more time upon immaterial matters, particularly as
 we see that the suggestions of the rabbis are not at all wise? It is
 more to the purpose for us to inquire where the mountains of Ararat
 are to be found. It is generally believed that they are mountains of
 Armenia, close by the highest ranges of Asia Minor, the Caucasus and
 the Taurus. But it appears to me that more likely the highest of all
 mountains is meant, the Imaus (Himalaya), which divides India.
 Compared to this range, other mountains are no more than warts. That
 the ark rested upon the highest mountain is substantiated by the fact
 that the waters continued to fall for three whole months before such
 smaller ranges as Lebanon, Taurus, and Caucasus were uncovered, which
 are, as it were, the feet or roots of the Himalaya, just as the
 mountains of Greece may be called branches of the Alps extending up to
 our Hercinian Forest (Harz). To anyone who surveys them with care the
 mountains seem to be wonderfully related and united.
 
 21. Josephus has wonderful things to tell about the mountains of
 Armenia, and he records that during his time remains of the ark were
 discovered there. But I suppose nobody will judge me to be a heretic
 if I occasionally doubt the reliability of his statements.
 
 V. 5. _And the waters decreased continually until the tenth month: in
 the tenth month, on the first day of the month, were the tops of the
 mountains seen._
 
 22. Moses said before that by the seventh month the waters had fallen
 so far that the ark rested upon Ararat. In the third month thereafter,
 the tops of the lower mountains began to appear, so that Noah, looking
 down from the mountains of Ararat as if from a watchtower, saw also
 the peaks of the other mountains, of the Taurus in Asia, the Lebanon
 in Syria, and the like. All these were signs of God's remembrance.
 
 Vs. 6-7. _And it came to pass at the end of forty days, that Noah
 opened the window of the ark which he had made: and he sent forth a
 raven, and it went forth to and fro, until the waters were dried up
 from off the earth._
 
 23. So far the history; the allegorical significance we shall discuss
 at its proper place. The carelessness of a translator has caused a
 dispute upon this part of the story. The Hebrew text does not say that
 the raven did not return, as Jerome translated; hence there was no
 need to invent a reason why he did not return--because he found dead
 bodies lying about everywhere. They claim that abundance of food
 prevented him.
 
 24. On the contrary, Moses says that the raven which had been sent
 forth, returned; although he did not permit himself to be again
 imprisoned in the ark as the dove did. Moses implies that Noah sent
 forth the raven to find out whether animals could, by that time find
 dry land and food. The raven, however, did not faithfully carry out
 his mission, but rejoicing to be set free from his prison, he flew to
 and fro, and paying no attention to Noah, he enjoyed the free sky. The
 swinish Jews, however, show the impurity of their minds everywhere.
 For they suppose that the raven had fears concerning his mate, and
 that he even suspected Noah concerning her. Shame upon those impure
 minds!
 
 Vs. 8-9. _And he sent forth a dove from him, to see if the waters were
 abated from off the face of the ground; but the dove found no rest for
 the sole of her foot, and she returned unto him to the ark; for the
 waters were on the face of the whole earth: and he put forth his hand,
 and took her, and brought her unto him into the ark._
 
 25. When Noah's hopes had been set at naught by the raven, which flew
 about wantonly but brought no tidings concerning the condition of the
 earth, he took a dove, thinking that she would more truly perform the
 mission. The text almost authorizes us to say that those two birds
 were sent forth at the same time, so that Noah might have two
 witnesses from whom to gain desired knowledge. The raven enjoying the
 free sky, flew round about the ark, but did not want to return into
 it. The dove, however, fleeing from the corpses and corruption, comes
 back and permits itself to be caught. This story, as we shall hear,
 offers a fine allegory concerning the Church.
 
 Vs. 10-12. _And he stayed yet other seven days; and again he sent
 forth the dove out of the ark; and the dove came in to him at
 eventide; and, lo, in her mouth an olive-leaf plucked off: so Noah
 knew that the waters were abated from off the earth. And he stayed yet
 other seven days, and sent forth the dove; and she returned not again
 unto him any more._
 
 26. The dove, being a faithful messenger, is sent forth once more.
 Moses carefully describes how the waters decreased gradually, until at
 last the surface of the earth, together with the trees, was laid bare.
 We do not believe that the dove brought the olive leaf intentionally,
 but by the command of God, who wanted to show Noah, little by little,
 that he had not altogether forgotten but remembered him. This olive
 leaf was an impressive sign to Noah and his fellow-prisoners in the
 ark, bringing them courage and hope of impending liberation.
 
 27. The Jews dispute sharply in respect to this matter of where the
 dove found the olive leaf, and some, in order to secure special glory
 for their homeland, make the ludicrous assertion that she took it from
 the Mount of Olives in the land of Israel, which God had spared from
 the flood that destroyed the remainder of the earth. But the saner
 Jews rightly refute this nonsense by arguing that if this were true,
 the olive leaf could not have been a sign for Noah that the waters had
 fallen. Others have invented the fable that the dove was admitted to
 paradise and brought the leaf from there.
 
 28. But I have (ch 2, para 39-42) set forth at length my views
 concerning paradise, and this nonsense is not worthy the effort of a
 refutation. It serves a better purpose to remind you that all these
 things happened miraculously and supernaturally. A dove is not so
 intelligent as to pluck a bough and bring it to the ark in order that
 Noah might form a judgment with reference to the decrease of waters.
 God ordained these events. Other trees had leaves at that time,
 particularly the taller ones which rose sooner from the waters. The
 olive tree is comparatively short, hence it was calculated to furnish
 information concerning the decrease of the waters and to serve as an
 object lesson of the cessation of the wrath of God and the return of
 the earth to its former state. Of this he had more certain proof
 however, when the dove, having been sent out the third time, did not
 return: for not only did it find food on earth, but was able to build
 nests and to flit to and fro.
 
 Vs. 13-14. _And it came to pass in the six hundred and first year, in
 the first month, the first day of the month, the waters were dried up
 from off the earth: and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and
 looked, and, behold, the face of the ground was dried. And in the
 second month, on the seven and twentieth day of the month, was the
 earth dry._
 
 29. Here we see that Noah was in the ark an entire year and ten days;
 for he entered the ark on the seventeenth day of the second month, and
 came out again, after a year had passed, in the same month, but on the
 twenty-seventh day. Poor Noah, with his sons and the women, lived in
 the ark more than half a year in sore grief, without a sign of being
 remembered by God. Afterward God gave him gradual proof, through
 various signs, that he had not forgotten him, until at last, after the
 lapse of a year and ten days, he was again given dominion over the
 earth and sea. On this day of the second month, the flood had not only
 disappeared, but the earth was dry. This is the story of the flood and
 its abatement. After this fearful wrath, there ensues an immeasurable
 light of grace, as is shown in the following sermon addressed to Noah
 by God himself.
 
 
 II. NOAH COMMANDED TO LEAVE THE ARK; HIS OFFERING TO GOD; GOD'S
     RESOLVE NOT TO CURSE THE EARTH AGAIN.
 
    A. NOAH COMMANDED TO LEAVE THE ARK, AND HE OBEYED 30-32.
 
     * Man should do nothing but what God commands 30-32.
 
     * Is it right to start a new worship without God's command to do
       so 33-34.
 
     * The examples of saints and special works.
 
       1. Should we imitate the works of the holy patriarchs 34-35.
 
       2. The result among the Jews of a reckless imitation of the
          saints 36.
 
       3. Should have regard here, not to works but to faith 37-38.
 
 
 II. NOAH LEAVES ARK, HIS SACRIFICE AND GOD'S PROMISE.
 
 A. Noah Obeys Command to Leave the Ark.
 
 Vs. 15-17. _And God spake unto Noah, saying, Go forth from the ark,
 thou, and thy wife, and thy sons, and thy sons' wives with thee. Bring
 forth with thee every living thing that is with thee of all flesh,
 both birds, and cattle, and every creeping thing that creepeth upon
 the earth; that they may breed abundantly in the earth._
 
 30. Up to this point the narrative is only a record of facts, or the
 description of a divine work. Though the works of God are not mute but
 eloquent witnesses, and present to our vision the will of God, a still
 greater comfort is vouchsafed when God links to the works the Word,
 which is not manifest to the eye but perceptible to the ear and
 intelligible to the heart through the promptings of the Holy Spirit.
 So far God had given proof by his work that he was appeased, that the
 God of wrath had turned into a God of mercy, who turns back the waters
 and dries up the earth. Such comfort he now amplifies by his Word in
 that he lovingly accosts and enjoins him to leave the ark with the
 other creatures, both men and animals.
 
 31. In the light of this passage the frequent and emphatic application
 of the principle is justified that we should neither design nor do
 anything, especially in respect to God's service and worship, without
 the initiative and command of the Word. As above narrated, Noah enters
 the ark upon God's command; and he leaves the ark upon God's command
 to leave it. He does not follow superstitious notions, as we see the
 Jews do, who, when they establish anything temporary by command,
 endeavor to retain it forever, as if it were essential to salvation.
 
 32. Noah might have argued thus: Behold, I built the ark by the
 command of God; I was saved in it while all other men perished:
 therefore I will remain in it, or keep it for a place of divine
 worship, since it has been sanctified by the Word of God and the
 presence of the saints, the Church. But the godly man did nothing of
 the kind. The Word had commanded him to go forth, therefore he obeyed.
 The ark had done its service during the flood and he left it, assured
 that he and his children were to live on the earth. So must we
 undertake nothing without the Word of God. In a holy calling, which
 has the Word and command of God, let us walk! For whosoever attempts
 anything without the command of God, will labor in vain.
 
 33. To deny this, some one might cite as example the act of Noah,
 described below, when he built an altar without God's command, and
 offered a burnt-offering thereon to God from the clean animals. If
 this was permitted to Noah, why should we not be permitted to choose
 certain forms of worship? And, in truth, the Papacy has heaped up
 works and forms of worship in the Church without measure, just as it
 pleased. But we must hold fast to the principle, which is a theorem of
 general application, that whatsoever is not of faith, is sin, (Rom 14,
 23). But faith cannot be separated from the Word; hence, whatsoever is
 done without the Word, is sin.
 
 34. Furthermore, it is plainly dangerous to take the acts of the
 fathers as models. As individuals differ, so also do their duties
 differ, and God requires diverse works according to the diversity of
 our calling. Accordingly the epistle to the Hebrews fitly refers the
 various acts of the fathers to the one faith, in order to show that
 each of us must imitate, in his calling, not the works, but the faith
 of the fathers. Heb 11.
 
 35. Hence works peculiar to the holy fathers must by no means be
 considered as models for us each to imitate as the monks imitate the
 fasting of Benedict, the gown of Francis, the shoes of Dominic and the
 like. Men become apes who imitate without judgment. The monks try to
 ape the works, but know nothing of the faith of the fathers.
 
 36. Abraham was commanded to slay his son. Afterward his descendants
 most wickedly believed they should follow his example, and they filled
 the earth with innocent blood. In a similar manner the people
 worshiped the brazen serpent and offered sacrifices before it. In both
 instances the people wanted to justify themselves by the example of
 their forefathers; but since they established these forms of worship
 without the Word, they were righteously condemned.
 
 37. Let us, therefore, remember not to establish anything without the
 Word of God. Duties differ, and so must the works of individuals. How
 foolish it would be for me to proclaim that I must follow Caesar's
 example, and that others must obey my laws! How wicked it would be for
 me to assert that I must follow the example of a judge, condemning
 some to the cross, others to the sword! Then, we must look, not upon
 the works, but upon the faith of individuals; for the faith of all
 saints is one, though their works are most diverse.
 
 38. Think not that because Noah built an altar, you may do likewise;
 but follow the faith of Noah, who thought it right to show his
 merciful Savior that he understood his beneficent gifts, and was
 grateful for them. Follow Abraham, not in slaying your son, but in
 believing the promises of God, and in obeying his commandments. The
 epistle to the Hebrews fitly refers the deeds and acts of the fathers
 to their faith, setting forth that we should follow their faith.
 
 
 B. NOAH'S SACRIFICE.
 
    1. Whether Noah was commanded to offer a sacrifice and in what way
       sacrificing is justified 39-41.
 
     * Have monks divine command to support their order 40.
 
     * Shall we find fault with the works of saints, for which they
       apparently had no command 41.
 
     * How in all works we should have respect for God's command 42.
 
     * Lyra's unfounded thoughts on the words, "Be fruitful" etc. 43.
 
     * Why Moses said so much about their leaving the ark 44.
 
    2. Noah's sacrifice proves Moses did not originate the idea of
       sacrifice 45-46.
 
    3. Why Noah's sacrifice was pleasing to God 47-48.
 
     * The meaning of "sweet savor" 47-48.
 
    4. How it can be said God "smelled the sweet savor", and why this
       form of speech used 49-50.
 
 
 B. NOAH'S SACRIFICE.
 
 39. The objection under consideration can be invalidated by the
 rejoinder that Noah did have a command to erect an altar and offer
 sacrifices. God approved the rite of sacrifice by ordering that more
 of the clean animals--suitable for sacrifice--should be taken into the
 ark. Nor was Noah permitted to cast aside the office of the
 priesthood, which had been established by the Word before the flood
 and had come down to him by the right of primogeniture. Adam, Seth,
 Enoch and others had been priests. From them Noah possessed the office
 of the priesthood as an inheritance.
 
 40. Therefore Noah, as priest and prophet, was not only at liberty to
 offer sacrifice, but he was under obligation to do so by virtue of his
 calling. Since his calling was founded on God's Word, in harmony with
 that Word and by God's command he built an altar and offered
 sacrifices. Therefore let a monk prove it is his office and calling to
 wear a cowl, to worship the blessed Virgin, to pray the rosary and do
 like things, and we will commend his life. But since the call is
 lacking, the Word is not the authority and the office does not exist,
 the life and works of the monks in their entirety stand justly
 condemned.
 
 41. Finally, even if all other arguments should fail, this argument,
 according to which man judges the cause by the effect, remains;
 namely, that God expresses approval of Noah's deed. Although such
 reasoning from effect to cause may not be unassailable, it yet is not
 without value in respect to such heroic and uncommon men, who meet not
 with rejection but approval on the part of God, although they appear
 to do what they have not been expressly commanded. They possess the
 inward conviction that they are guilty of no transgression, though the
 disclosure of this fact is delayed until later God expresses his
 approval. Such examples are numerous and it is noteworthy that God has
 expressed approval even of the acts of some heathen.
 
 42. Let this maxim, then, stand, that everything must be done by the
 command of God in order to obtain the assurance of conscience that we
 have acted in obedience to God. Hence they who abide in their divinely
 assigned calling, will not run uncertainly nor will they beat the air
 as those who have no course in which they have been commanded to run,
 and in consequence may not look forward to a prize. 1 Cor 9, 24.
 
 But I return to the text. Noah, with his sons and the women, is
 commanded to leave the ark, and to lead forth upon the earth every
 species of animals, that all his works may be sanctified and found in
 keeping with the Word. Concerning the animals Moses now expressly
 states:
 
 Vs. 17-19. _Be fruitful, and multiply upon the earth. And Noah went
 forth, and his sons, and his wife, and his sons' wives with him: every
 beast, every creeping thing, and every bird, whatsoever moveth upon
 the earth, after their families, went forth out of the ark._
 
 43. The Lord speaks of the propagation of Noah and his sons in the
 ninth chapter and that, I believe, is the reason why he speaks here
 only of the propagation of the animals. From the expression here used,
 Lyra foolishly concludes that cohabitation had been forbidden during
 the flood and was now again permitted after the departure from the
 ark, since God says, "Go forth, ... thou and thy wife." Such thoughts
 belong to monks not to God, who plans not sinful lust, but
 propagation; the latter is God's ordination, but lust is Satan's
 poison infused into nature through sin.
 
 44. Moses here uses many words to illustrate the overflowing joy of
 the captives' souls, when they were commanded to leave their prison,
 the ark, and to return upon the earth now everywhere open before them.
 In recounting the kinds of animals, however, he arranges them in a
 different order, distinguishing them by families, as it were, to let
 us see that only propagation was God's aim. It must have been a glad
 sight when each one of the many beasts, after leaving the ark, found
 its own mate, and then sought its accustomed haunt: the wolves, the
 bears, the lions, returning to the woods and groves; the sheep, the
 goats, the swine, to the fields; the dogs, the chickens, the cats, to
 man.
 
 V. 20. _And Noah builded an altar unto Jehovah, and took of every
 clean beast, and of every clean bird, and offered burnt-offerings on
 the altar._
 
 45. This text shows conclusively that Moses was not the first person
 to introduce sacrifices but that, like a bard who gathers chants, he
 arranged and classified them as they had been in vogue among the
 fathers and transmitted from the one to the other. Thus also the law
 of circumcision was not first written by Moses but received from the
 fathers.
 
 46. Above (ch 4, 4-5), where Moses mentioned the sacrifice of Abel and
 Cain, he called it _minchah_, an offering; here, however, we find the
 first record of a burnt-offering, one entirely consumed by fire. This,
 I say, is a clear proof that the law of sacrifices had been
 established before the time of Moses. His work, then, consisted in
 arranging the rites of the forefathers in definite order.
 
 V. 21. _And Jehovah smelled the sweet savor._
 
 47. It is set forth here that Jehovah approved Noah's sacrifice which
 he offered by virtue of his office as a priest, according to the
 example of the fathers. However, the differences of phraseology is to
 receive due attention. Of the former sacrifice he said that Jehovah
 "had respect" to it; here he says that "Jehovah smelled the sweet
 savor." Moses subsequently makes frequent use of this expression. The
 heathen also adopted it; Lucian, for example, makes fun of Jove who
 was conciliated by the odor of meats.
 
 48. The word in the original, however, does not properly signify the
 "savor of sweetness," but "the savor of rest", for _nichoach_ meaning
 "rest", is derived from the verb _nuach_, which Moses used before,
 when he said that the ark rested upon the mountains of Ararat.
 Therefore it is the "savor of rest," because God then rested from his
 wrath, dismissing his wrath, becoming appeased, and, as we commonly
 say, well content.
 
 49. Here the question might be raised why does he not say, Jehovah had
 respect to Noah and his burnt offering, rather than, Jehovah smelled
 the savor of rest, which latter certainly sounds shocking, as though
 he were not commending the man for his faith, but merely for his work.
 This objection is usually answered by saying that the Scriptures speak
 of God in human fashion. Men are pleased by a sweet savor. But it
 seems to me there is still another reason for this expression, namely,
 that God was so close at hand that he noticed the savor; for Moses
 desires to show that this holy rite was well-pleasing to God: Solomon
 says (Prov 27, 9) that perfume rejoiceth the heart. Physicians
 sometimes restore consciousness by sweet odors. On the other hand, a
 violent stench is extremely offensive to our nature, and often
 overpowers it.
 
 50. In this sense, one may say that God, having been annoyed by the
 stench of wickedness, was now refreshed, so to speak, when he saw this
 one priest girded himself to perform holy rites in order to give proof
 of his gratitude, and to manifest by some public act he did not belong
 to the ungodly, but that he had a God whom he feared. This is the real
 meaning of a sacrifice. As it had pleased God to destroy mankind, he
 is now delighted to increase it. Moses uses this expression for our
 sake, that we, through the experience of God's grace, may learn that
 God delights to do us good.
 
 
 C. GOD'S RESOLVE NOT TO CURSE THE EARTH AGAIN.
 
    1. God solemnly and earnestly means it 51.
 
     * How understood "it repented God that he had made man" 52-54.
 
     * Experiences in spiritual temptations and how God helps us to
       bear them 54.
 
    2. The meaning of "God will not again smite the earth" 55.
 
 
 C. GOD'S RESOLVE NOT TO CURSE THE EARTH AGAIN.
 
 V. 21b. _And Jehovah said in his heart._
 
 51. Moses points out that these words were not spoken by God without
 heart and feeling, but from his very vitals. This is the meaning of
 the Hebrew text which has it that God spoke to his own heart.
 
 V. 21c. _I will not again curse the ground any more for man's sake._
 
 52. God speaks as if he were sorry for the punishment inflicted upon
 the earth on account of man, just as formerly he expressed regret for
 his creation, reproving himself, as it were, for his fury against man.
 This must not, of course, be understood as implying that God could
 possibly change his mind; it is written only for our consolation. He
 accuses and blames himself in order to rouse the little flock to the
 certain faith that God will be merciful hereafter.
 
 53. And their souls stood in real need of such consolation. They had
 been terrified as they witnessed God's raging wrath, and their faith
 could not but be shaken. So now God is impelled to so order his acts
 and words that these people might expect only grace and mercy.
 Accordingly he now speaks with them, is present at their sacrifice,
 shows that he is pleased with them, blames his own counsel, and
 promises that he will never do anything like it in the future. In
 brief, he is a different God from what he had been before. While God,
 indeed, does not change, he wants to change men, who have become
 altogether habituated to thoughts of wrath.
 
 54. They who have experienced trials of the spirit, know full well how
 much the soul then stands in need of sure and strong consolation to
 induce it once more to hope for grace and to forget the wrath. One
 day, a whole month, perhaps is not enough for this change. Just as it
 takes a long time to recover from bodily disorders, so such wounds of
 the soul cannot be healed at once, or by one word. God sees this, and
 tries by various means to recall the terrified souls to a certain hope
 of grace; he even chides himself, speaking to his own heart, as in
 Jeremiah 18, 8, where he promises to repent of the evil he thought of
 doing, if the offenders also repent.
 
 55. It should furthermore be noted that he says, "I will not again
 curse the ground." He speaks of a general destruction of the earth,
 not of a partial one, as when he destroys fields, cities, or kingdoms.
 The latter instances are for a warning; as Mary says, "He hath put
 down princes from their thrones." Lk 1, 52.
 
 
 III. MAN'S NATURAL DEPRAVITY AND HIS NATURAL POWERS.
 
    1. Natural depravity crops out in infancy 56.
 
    2. It is seen as the years advance 57-58.
 
    3. Whether those who would drown it have reason for doing so 59-60.
 
    4. There is none untainted by it 61-62.
 
    5. The godless yield to it, believers resist it 62.
 
     * Can God be charged with being changeable 63-64.
 
    6. The knowledge of natural depravity is very necessary 65.
 
    7. What moves sophists to ignore natural depravity 65-66.
 
    8. How to view those who lightly regard natural depravity, and how
       to refute them 68-69.
 
     * Meaning of "the imagination of the heart" 70.
 
     * True theological definition of man 71.
 
    9. The proof of natural depravity and that the natural is not
       perfect 72-73.
 
   10. Consequence of false teaching on natural depravity and the
       natural 74-75.
 
     * What sophists understand by Merito congrui and condigni 74.
 
   11. How Scotus tried to prove that man's natural powers were all he
       had, and how to refute his opinion 75-76.
 
     * Value of the Scholastics and their theology 77.
 
   12. How teachers in these things lead astray 78.
 
     * The virtues of the heathen.
 
       a. Estimate of them 79-80.
 
       b. How they differ from the good works of the saints 81.
 
       c. What they lack 82-83.
 
   13. Natural depravity may sleep in youth, but it will awake as the
       years advance 84-86.
 
   14. Those who ignore natural depravity may be refuted by experience
       87.
 
   15. Philosophy manifests its vanity and blindness in its attitude to
       this doctrine 88-89.
 
   16. Experience confirms natural depravity 89-90.
 
   17. Whether natural depravity can be completely eradicated: how to
       check it 91.
 
     * How to understand "God will not smite the earth again" 92.
 
     * Nature thrown into great disorder by the deluge 93.
 
     * Seasons of the year again put in their order 94.
 
     * The people's talk about the signs of the last times 95.
 
     * The days of earth to be followed by the days of heaven, and we
       should prepare for them 96.
 
 
 III. MAN'S NATURAL DEPRAVITY AND HIS NATURAL POWERS.
 
 V. 21d. _For that the imagination of man's heart is evil from his
 youth._
 
 56. This is a powerful passage, relating to original sin. Whoever
 weakens its force, goes straying like the blind man in the sunlight,
 failing to see his own acts and experiences. Look at the days of our
 swaddling clothes; in how many ways sin manifests itself in our
 earlier years. What an amount of switching it requires until we are
 taught order, as it were, and attention to duty!
 
 57. Then youth succeeds. There a stronger rebellion becomes
 noticeable, and in addition that untamable evil, the rage of lust and
 desire. If one take a wife, the result is weariness of his own and a
 passion for others. If the government of a State is entrusted to him,
 an exceptionally fruitful harvest of vice will follow--as jealousy,
 rivalry, haughtiness, hope of gain, avarice, wrath, anger, and other
 evils.
 
 58. It is true, as the German proverb has it, that sins grow with the
 years: Je laenger, je aerger; je aelter, je kaerger (worse with time,
 stingier with age). All such vices are so blatant and gross as to
 become objects of observation and intelligence. What, then shall we
 say of the inward vices when unbelief, presumption, neglect of the
 Word, and wicked views grow up?
 
 59. There are those who are and desire to be considered powerful
 theologians, though they extenuate original sin by sophistry. But
 vices so numerous and great cannot be extenuated. Original sin is not
 a slight disorder or infirmity, but complete lawlessness, the like of
 which is not found in other creatures, except in evil spirits.
 
 60. But do those extenuators have any Scriptural proof to rest upon?
 Let us see what Moses says. As I pointed out in explaining the sixth
 chapter, he does not call such things evil, as lust, tyranny, and
 other sins, but the imagination of the human heart; that is, human
 energy, wisdom and reason, with all the faculties the mind employs
 even in our best works. Although we do not condemn acts which belong
 to the social or civil sphere, yet the human heart vitiates these
 works in themselves proper, by doing them for glory, for profit, or
 for oppression, and either from opposition to the neighbor or to God.
 
 61. Nor can we escape the force of this passage by saying that those
 are meant who perished by the flood. God uses a generic term which
 denotes that the heart of man, as such, is meant. At the time this was
 spoken there were no other people than those saved in the ark, and yet
 the declaration is: the imagination of man's heart is evil.
 
 62. Therefore, not even the saints are excepted. In Ham, the third
 son, this imagination of the heart betrayed its nature. And the other
 brothers were no better by nature. There was only this difference,
 that they, believing in the promised seed, retained the hope of
 forgiveness of sin, and did not give way to the evil imagination of
 their hearts, rather resisting it through the Holy Spirit, who is
 given for the very purpose of contending against, and overcoming, the
 malignity of man's nature. Because Ham gives way to his nature, he is
 wholly evil, and totally perishes. Shem and Japheth, who contend
 against it in their spirit, though being evil, are not altogether so.
 They have the Holy Spirit, through whom they contend against the evil,
 and hence are holy.
 
 63. It would seem here that God might be accused of fickleness.
 Before, when he was about to punish man, he assigned as a reason for
 his purpose the fact that the imagination of man's heart is evil;
 here, when he is about to give unto man the gracious promise that he
 will not thereafter show such anger, he puts forward the same reason.
 To human wisdom this appears foolish and inconsistent with divine
 wisdom.
 
 64. But I gladly pass by such sublime themes, and leave them to minds
 possessed of leisure. For me it is enough that these works are spoken
 to suit our spiritual condition, inasmuch as God points out that he is
 now appeased and no longer angry. So parents, having chastised their
 disobedient children as they deserve, win again their affections by
 kindness. This change of mood is not deserving of criticism but rather
 of commendation. It profits the children; otherwise they, while
 fearing the rod, might also begin to hate their parents. This
 explanation is good enough for me, for it appeals to our faith. Others
 may explain differently.
 
 65. We should give diligent attention to this passage because it
 plainly shows that man's nature is corrupt, a truth above all others
 to be apprehended, because without it God's mercy and grace cannot be
 rightly understood. Hence, the quibblers previously mentioned are to
 be despised and we have good reason to take to task the translator who
 gave occasion for this error by rendering the words so as to say, not
 that the imagination of man's heart is evil, but that it is inclined
 to evil. Upon this authority the quibblers distort or set aside those
 passages of Paul where he says that all are children of wrath (Eph 2,
 3) that all have sinned (Rom 5, 12) and are under sin (Rom 3, 9). They
 argue from our passage as follows: Moses does not say that human
 nature is evil, but that it is prone to evil; this condition, call it
 inclination or proclivity, is under the control of free will, nor does
 it force man toward the evil, or (to use their own words) it imposes
 no constraint upon man.
 
 66. Then they proceed to find a reason for this statement and declare
 that even after the fall of man, there remains in him a good will and
 a right understanding. For the natural powers, say they, are
 unimpaired, not only in man but even in the devil. And finally they so
 twist Aristotle's teachings as to make him say that reason tends
 toward that which is best. Some traces of these views are found also
 in the writings of the Church fathers. Using Psalms 4, 6 as a basis,
 where the prophet says, "Jehovah, lift thou up the light of thy
 countenance upon us," they distinguish between a higher part of reason
 which inquires concerning God, and a lower part employed in temporal
 and civil affairs. Even Augustine is pleased with this distinction, as
 we stated above when discussing the fall of man.
 
 67. But if only a spark of the knowledge of God had remained
 unimpaired in man, we should be different beings by far from what we
 now are. Hence, those quibblers who pick flaws in the plain statements
 of Paul are infinitely blind. If they would carefully and devoutly
 consider that very passage as they read it in their Latin Bible, they
 would certainly cease to father so bad a cause. For it is not an
 insignificant truth which Moses utters when he says the senses and the
 thoughts of the heart of man are prone to evil from his youth. This is
 the case especially in the sixth chapter (vs 5) where he says that the
 whole thought of his heart was bent on evil continually, meaning
 thereby that he purposes what is evil, and that in inclination,
 purpose and effort he inclines to evil. For example; an adulterer,
 whose desires are inflamed, may lack the opportunity, the place, the
 person, the time, and nevertheless be stirred by the fire of lust,
 unable to dwell upon anything else. In this manner, says Moses, does
 human nature always incline toward evil. Can, then, the natural powers
 of man be said to have remained unimpaired, seeing that man's thoughts
 are always set upon evil things?
 
 68. If the minds of the sophists were as open toward the holy doctrine
 contained in the prophetical and apostolical writings as toward their
 own teachers who teach the freedom of the will and the merit of works,
 they surely would not have permitted themselves by so small an
 inducement as one little word to be led away from the truth so as to
 teach, contrary to Scripture, that man's natural powers are uninjured,
 and that man, by nature, is not under wrath or condemnation.
 Notwithstanding, it appears that they turn against their own
 absurdity. Although the natural powers of man are uninjured, yet they
 maintain that, to become acceptable, grace is required; in other
 words, they teach that God is not satisfied with man's natural
 goodness, unless it be improved by love.
 
 69. But what is the need to argue longer against the madness of the
 sophists, since we know the true meaning of the Hebrew text to be, not
 that man's mind and thoughts are inclined to evil, but that the
 imagination of the human heart is evil from youth?
 
 70. By imagination, as I stated several times before (ch 6, para 148),
 he means reason itself, together with the will and the understanding,
 even when it dwells upon God, or occupies itself with most honorable
 pursuits, be they those of State or Home. It is always contrary to
 God's law, always in sin, always under God's wrath, and it cannot be
 freed from this evil state by its own strength, as witness Christ's
 words: "If therefore the Son shall make you free, ye shall be free
 indeed," Jn 8, 36.
 
 71. If you wish a definition of the word "man" take it from this text
 teaching that he is a rational being, with a heart given to
 imagination. But what does he imagine? Moses answers, "Evil"; that is,
 evil against God or God's Law, and against his fellow man. Thus holy
 Scriptures ascribe to man a reason that is not idle but always
 imagines something. This imagination it calls evil, wicked,
 sacrilegious, while the philosophers call it good, and the quibblers
 say that the natural gifts are unimpaired.
 
 72. Therefore this text should be carefully noted and urged against
 the caviling quibblers: Moses declares the imagination of the human
 heart to be evil. And if it be evil, the conclusion is natural that
 the natural gifts are not unimpaired, but corrupted: Inasmuch as God
 did not create man evil, but perfect, sound, holy, knowing God, his
 reason right and his will toward God good.
 
 73. Seeing we have clear testimony to the fact that man is evil and
 turned away from God, who would be mad enough to say that the natural
 gifts in man remain unimpaired? That would be practically saying that
 man's nature is unimpaired and good even now, whereas we have
 overwhelming evidence in our knowledge and experience that it is
 debased to the utmost.
 
 74. From that wicked theory there have sprung many dangerous and some
 palpably wicked utterances, for instance, that when man does the best
 in his power, God will unfailingly give his grace. By such teaching
 they have driven man, as by a trumpet, to prayer, fasting,
 self-torture, pilgrimages and similar performances. Thus the world was
 taught to believe that if men did the best that nature permitted, they
 would earn grace, if not the grace "de merito," at least that "de
 congruo." A "meritum congrui" (title to reward based upon equity) they
 attribute to a work which has been performed not against but in
 accordance to the divine law, inasmuch as an evil work is subject not
 to a reward but a penalty. The "meritum condigni" (a title to reward
 based upon desert) they attribute not to the work itself but to its
 quality as being performed in a state of grace.
 
 75. Another saying of this kind is the declaration of Scotus that man
 by mere natural powers may love God above all things. This declaration
 is based upon the principle that the natural powers are unimpaired. He
 argues as follows: A man loves a woman, who is a creature, and he
 loves her so immoderately that he will imperil his very life for her
 sake. Similarly, a merchant loves his wares, and so eagerly that he
 will risk death a thousand times if only he can gain something. If
 therefore, the love of created things is so great, though they rank
 far below God, how much more will a man love God who is the highest
 good! Hence, God can be loved with the natural powers alone.
 
 76. A fine argument, indeed, and worthy of a Franciscan monk! For he
 shows that, though he is a great teacher, he does not know what it
 means to love God. Nature is so corrupt that it can no longer know God
 unless it be enlightened by the Word and Spirit of God; how then can
 it love God without the Holy Spirit? For it is true that we have no
 desire for what we do not know. Therefore, nature cannot love God whom
 it does not know, but it loves an idol, and a dream of its own heart.
 Furthermore, it is so entirely fettered by the love of created things
 that even after it has learned to know God from his Word, it
 disregards him and despises his Word. Of this the people of our own
 times are an example.
 
 77. Such foolish and blasphemous deliverances are certain proof that
 scholastic theology has degenerated into a species of philosophy that
 has no knowledge of God, and walks in darkness because it disregards
 his Word. Also Aristotle and Cicero, who have the greatest influence
 with this tribe, give broad instructions concerning moral excellences.
 They magnify these exceedingly as social forces since they recognize
 them as useful for private and public ends. In nowise, however, do
 they teach that God's will and command is to be regarded far more than
 private or public advantage (and those who do not possess the Word are
 ignorant of the will of God). Quite plainly the scholastics have
 fallen victims to philosophical fancies to such an extent as to retain
 true knowledge neither of themselves nor of God. This is the cause of
 their lapse into such disastrous errors.
 
 78. And, indeed, it is easy to fall after you have departed from the
 Word; for the glitter of civil virtues is wonderfully enticing to the
 mind. Erasmus makes of Socrates almost a perfect Christian, and
 Augustine has unbounded praise for Marcus Attilius Regulus, because he
 kept faith with his enemy. Truthfulness indeed is the most beautiful
 of all virtues, and in this case another high commendation is added in
 that there was combined with it love of country, which in itself is a
 peculiar and most praiseworthy virtue.
 
 79. You may find men of renown not famous for truthfulness.
 Themistocles, for instance, did not have this virtue though he was a
 heroic man and did his country great service. That is the reason why
 Augustine admires Attilius, finding his reason and will to be utterly
 righteous, that is as far as it is possible for human nature to be.
 Where, then, is vice in this case? Where is wickedness? The hero's
 work surely cannot be censured.
 
 80. First, Regulus knew not God, and, although his conduct was right,
 it is still to be seen whether a theologian should not censure his
 motive. For to his zeal in behalf of his country is added the thirst
 for glory. He evinces contempt for his life so as to achieve immortal
 glory among those to live after him. Contemplating, therefore, merely
 his life's dream, as it were, and the outward mask, it is a most
 beautiful deed. But before God it is shameful idolatry; because he
 claims for himself the glory of his deed. And who would doubt that he
 had other failings besides this thirst for glory? Attilius cannot
 claim the great virtues of truthfulness and love of country without
 tending violently and insanely toward wickedness. For it is wicked for
 him to rob God of the glory and to claim it for himself. But human
 reason cannot recognize this spoliation of the Deity.
 
 81. A distinction must be made between the virtues of the heathen and
 the virtues of Christians. It is true that in both instances hearts
 are divinely prompted, but in the former ambition and love of glory
 afterward defile the divine impulse.
 
 82. If now, an orator should come forth, who would dilate upon the
 efficient cause, but disguise the ultimate and vicious one, would it
 not be apparent to every one that with the two most potent causes, the
 formal (that which gives moral value to an act) and the ultimate one,
 disguised, an eloquent man could extol such a wretched shadow of a
 virtue? But a man apt in logic will readily discover the deception; he
 will observe the absence of the formal cause, namely the right
 principle, there being no true knowledge of God nor of the proper
 attitude toward him. He sees, furthermore, that the final cause is
 vicious, because the true end and aim, obedience to God and love of
 neighbor, is not taken into consideration. But what kind of virtue is
 that where nearly every cause is lacking except the natural cause,
 which is a passion, an impetus or impulse, by which the soul is moved
 to show loyalty to an enemy? These impulses, as I said, are found also
 in the ungodly. If exercised for the good of the country, they become
 virtues; if for its injury, they become vices. This Aristotle sets
 forth very skillfully.
 
 83. I refer to these things that students of sacred literature may
 make special note of this passage, which advisedly declares human
 nature to be corrupt. For those make-believe virtues, found among the
 heathen, seem to prove the contrary--that some part of nature has
 remained as it was originally. Hence there is need of careful judgment
 in order to distinguish in this matter.
 
 84. Moses adds, "from his youth," because this evil is concealed
 during the first period of life and sleeps, as it were. Our early
 childhood so passes that reason and will are dormant and we are
 carried along by animal impulses, which pass away like a dream. Hardly
 have we passed our fifth year when we affect idleness, play,
 unchastity, and evil lust. But we try to escape discipline, we
 endeavor to get away from obedience, and hate all virtues, especially
 of a higher order as truth and justice. Then reason awakes out of a
 deep sleep, as it were, and sees certain kinds of pleasure, but not
 yet the true ones, and certain kinds of evils, but not yet the most
 powerful ones, by which it is held captive.
 
 85. Where, then, the understanding has attained to maturity, not only
 the other vices are found to have grown strong, but there are joined
 to them now sexual desire and unclean passion, gluttony, gambling,
 strife, rape, murder, theft, and what not? And as the parents had to
 apply the rod, so now the government must needs use prison and chains
 in order to restrain man's evil nature.
 
 86. And who does not know the vices of a more advanced age? They march
 along in unbroken file--love of money, ambition, pride, perfidy, envy,
 and others. These vices are so much the more harmful as at this age we
 are more crafty in concealing and masking them. Hence, the sword of
 government is not sufficient in this respect; there is need of hell
 fire for the punishment of crimes so manifold and great. Justly, then,
 did Moses say above (ch 6) that the human heart, or the imagination of
 the heart, is only evil each day--or at all times--and here again,
 that it is evil from youth.
 
 87. The Latin version, it is true, makes use of a weaker term; yet it
 says enough by stating that it is inclined toward evil, just as the
 comic dramatist says that the minds of all men are inclined to turn
 from labor to lust, Ter Andr 1, 1, 51. But those who try to misuse
 this expression for the purpose of making light of original sin, are
 shown to be in the wrong by the common experience of mankind; chiefly,
 however, that of the heathen, or ungodly men. For if spiritual men,
 who surely enjoy divine help from heaven, can hardly hold their ground
 against vices and be kept within the bounds of discipline, what can
 any man do without this help? If divine aid contends against the
 captivity of the law of the flesh only with fierce struggles (Rom 7,
 22-23), how insane is it to dream that, without this divine help,
 human nature can withstand corruption?
 
 88. Hence reason of itself does not decide upon the right, nor does
 the will, of itself, strive after the same, as a blind philosophy
 declares which does not know whence these fearful impulses to sin
 arise in children, youths, and old men. Therefore it defends them,
 calls them emotions or passions only, and does not call them natural
 corruption.
 
 89. Furthermore, in noble men, who check and control these impulses,
 it calls them virtues; in others who give the reins to their desires,
 it calls them vices. This is nothing less than ignorance of the fact
 that human nature is evil. The Scriptures, on the contrary agree with
 our experience and declare that the human heart is evil from youth.
 For we learn by experience that even holy men can scarcely stand firm;
 yea that even they are often entangled by gross sins, being
 overwhelmed by such natural corruptions.
 
 90. The term _ne-urim_ denotes the age when man begins to use his
 reason; this usually occurs in the sixth year. Similarly, the term
 _ne-arim_ is used to denote boys and youths who need the guidance of
 parents and teachers up to the age of manhood. It will be profitable
 for each of us to glance backward to that period of life and consider
 how willingly we obeyed the commands of our parents and teachers, how
 diligent we were in studying, how persevering we were, how often our
 parents punished our sauciness. Who can say for himself that he was
 not much more pleased to go out for a walk, to play games, and to
 gossip, than to go to Church in obedience to his parents?
 
 91. Although these impulses can be corrected or bridled to a certain
 extent by discipline, they cannot be rooted out of the heart
 altogether, as the traces of these impulses show when we are grown.
 There is truth in that unpolished lie: "The angelic youth becomes
 satanic in his older years." God, indeed, causes some persons to
 experience emotions which are naturally good; but they are induced by
 supernatural power. Thus Cyrus was impelled to restore the worship of
 God, and to preserve the Church. But such is not the tendency of human
 nature. Where God is present with his Holy Spirit, there only, the
 imagination of the human heart gives place to the thoughts of God. God
 dwells there through the Word and the Spirit. Of such, Moses does not
 speak here, but only of those who are without the Holy Spirit; they
 are wicked, even when at their best.
 
 V. 21e. _Neither will I again smite any more everything living, as I
 have done._
 
 92. Moses clearly speaks of a general destruction, like that which was
 caused by the flood. From this it does not follow that God will also
 abstain from partial destruction, and that he will take no heed of
 anybody's sin. There will also be an exception in the case of the last
 day, when not only all living things will be smitten, but all creation
 will be destroyed by fire.
 
 V. 22. _While the earth reigneth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and
 heat, and summer and winter, and day and night shall not cease._
 
 93. Following this text, the Jews divide the year into six parts, each
 comprising two months, a fact which Lyra also records in this
 connection. But it seems to me that Moses simply speaks of the promise
 that we need not fear another general flood. During the time of the
 flood such confusion reigned that there was no season, either of
 seedtime or harvest, and by reason of the great darkness caused by the
 clouds and the rain, day could not readily be distinguished from
 night. We know how heavy clouds obscure the light. How much greater,
 then, was the darkness when the waters, lying under the clouds like a
 mirror, reflected the darkness of the clouds into the faces and eyes
 of the beholders!
 
 94. The meaning, accordingly, is simply that God here promises Noah
 the imminent restoration of the earth, so that the fields might again
 be sowed; that the desolation caused by the flood should be no more;
 that the seasons might run their course in accordance with regular
 law: harvest following seedtime, winter following summer, cold
 following heat in due order.
 
 95. This text should be carefully remembered in view of the common
 notions concerning the signs before the last day. Then, some declare,
 there will be eclipses of I know not how many days duration. They say
 foolishly that for seven years not a single woman will bring forth a
 child, and the like. But this text declares that neither day nor
 night, neither summer nor winter, shall cease; therefore these natural
 changes will go on, and there will never be an eclipse which will rob
 human eyes of an entire day.
 
 96. Nor is it a phrase devoid of meaning when he says, "While the
 earth remaineth," for he gives us to understand that the days of this
 earth shall sometime be numbered, and other days, days of heaven,
 shall follow. As long, therefore, as the days of the earth endure, so
 long shall the earth abide, and with it the rotation of seasons. But
 when these days of the earth shall pass, then all these things shall
 cease, and there shall follow days of heaven, that is, eternal days.
 There shall be one Sabbath after the other, when we shall not be
 engrossed with bodily labor for the purpose of gaining a livelihood;
 for we shall be as the angels of God, Mk 12, 25. Our life will be to
 know God, to delight in God's wisdom and to enjoy the presence of God.
 This life we attain through faith in Christ, in which the eternal
 Father may mercifully keep us, through the merit of his son, our
 Savior, Jesus Christ, by the ruling and guidance of the Holy Spirit.
 Amen. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IX.
 
 
 I. GOD BLESSES NOAH AND THE RACE.
 
    A. MARRIAGE STATE BLESSED 1-5.
 
       1. Why this blessing necessary 1.
 
       2. Wedlock established twice 2.
 
       3. Evidence of God's love to the human race 3.
 
       4. Did this blessing pertain to Noah 4.
 
        * Bearing of children a special blessing of God unknown to the
          heathen 5.
 
 
 I. GOD BLESSES NOAH AND THE RACE.
 
 A. Marriage State Blessed.
 
 V. 1. _And God blessed Noah and his sons, and said unto them, Be
 fruitful, and multiply, and replenish the earth._
 
 1. This consolation was indeed needed after the whole human race had
 been destroyed by the flood and only eight souls were saved. Now Noah
 knew that God was truly merciful, since, not content with that first
 blessing which he had bestowed upon mankind in the creation of the
 world, he added this new blessing, that Noah might have no misgivings
 whatever in regard to the future increase of his posterity. And the
 joy brought by this promise was all the greater for God's emphatic
 promise on a previous occasion, that he would never again visit
 mankind with such severe punishment.
 
 2. In the first place, then, this chapter renews the establishment of
 marriage. God, by his Word and command, joins male and female for the
 purpose of repopulating the earth. Inasmuch as God had been roused to
 anger before the flood by the sin of lust, it was now needful, by
 reason of that fearful proof of wrath, to show that God does not abhor
 the lawful cohabitation of man and woman, but that it is his will to
 increase mankind by this means.
 
 3. The fact that God had expressed it as his will that the human race
 should be propagated through a union between man and woman, an end
 which could have been attained from stones had he failed to approve
 such union as lawful, after the manner of Deucalion of whom the poets
 fable--this fact tended to furnish Noah sure evidence that God loved
 man, and desired his welfare, and that now all anger was at an end.
 Therefore this passage illustrates the dignity of wedlock, which is
 the foundation of the family and State, and the nursery of the Church.
 
 4. The objection is here raised that Noah had already reached an age
 no longer fit for procreation in view of the fact that the Bible
 records no instance of children being born to him afterwards, and
 therefore this promise was valueless. To this I reply that this
 promise was given, not to Noah alone, but also to his sons, even to
 all mankind; so that the expectation of offspring was entertained even
 by the grandsire Noah.
 
 5. This passage, furthermore, tends to convince us that children are a
 gift of God and a result of his blessing, as is shown in Psalms 127,
 3. The heathen, who know nothing of God's Word, ascribe the increase
 of mankind partly to nature and partly to chance, in view of the fact
 that those who are evidently most fit for procreation often remain
 without offspring. Hence, they do not thank God for this gift, nor do
 they receive their children as a blessing from God.
 
 
 B. MAN'S USE OF AND DOMINION OVER ANIMALS 6-31.
 
    1. Whether animals feared man before the flood 6-7.
 
    2. Relation between this use and dominion and of what they give
       evidence 7-9.
 
    3. This use and rule a special blessing of God 8-10.
 
     * Whether the custom of slaying cattle dates from the beginning of
       the world 10-11.
 
    4. Whether Adam knew of this use and dominion 12.
 
    5. This use of animals is evidence of God's love to the human race
       13.
 
     * God's blessings greater than his wrath 13.
 
    6. Whether this use extends to unclean animals 14-15.
 
    7. How man's fear of animals and their wildness and cruelty can
       exist with this dominion 16-18.
 
     * New sins accompanied by new punishments 19-20.
 
     * Sodom before and after its destruction 21.
 
     * God's punishment of Wittenberg, Bruges and Venice, and the cause
       22-23.
 
     * God's command not to eat blood.
 
       a. Why given 24.
 
       b. How to treat this text, which contains God's Word 25.
 
        * Meaning of Nephesch and Basar 26.
 
       c. Right understanding of the command 27.
 
     * The words, "Surely your blood will I require" etc.
 
       a. Lyra's and the Rabbis' explanation, 28-29.
 
       b. Their true meaning 30-31.
 
 
 B. MAN'S USE OF AND DOMINION OVER ANIMALS.
 
 V. 2. _And the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every
 beast of the earth, and upon every bird of the heavens; with all
 wherewith the ground teemeth, and all the fishes of the sea, into your
 hand are they delivered._
 
 6. It would seem that the dominion of man is here increased for his
 greater consolation. For though after the creation man was given
 dominion over all animals, yet we do not read that the beasts feared
 and fled from him according to the description of Moses. The reason is
 found in the fact that heretofore the animals were not destined to be
 man's food; man had been a kind ruler of the beasts, not a killer and
 eater.
 
 7. Here, however, they are subjected to man as a tyrant with unlimited
 power of life and death. Since the servitude of the beasts is
 increased and the power of man over them extended, the animals are
 harassed by terror and fear of man. We see even the tamed ones do not
 readily allow themselves to be handled; they feel the mastery of man
 and have a constant instinct of danger. I do not believe that such was
 the case before this Word of God was spoken. Before that time, men
 used suitable animals for their work and for sacrifice, but not for
 food. This increase of power also is a token of God's favor; he
 confers a privilege unknown to the patriarchs, as a token of his love
 and interest in man.
 
 8. We must not undervalue this boon authority over the beasts; for it
 is a special gift of God, of which the heathen knew nothing, because
 they lack the Word. We are the ones who derive the greatest benefit
 from this gift. When this revelation was given to Noah, and such a
 privilege granted, there was really no need of it. A few men possessed
 the whole earth, so that its fruits were to be enjoyed by them in
 abundance and it was not necessary to add the flesh of beasts. But we
 today could not live altogether on the fruits of the earth; it is a
 great boon to us that we are permitted to eat the flesh of beasts, of
 birds and of fish.
 
 9. This word, therefore, establishes the butcher's trade; it puts
 hares, chickens, and geese upon the spit and fills our tables with all
 manner of dishes. Necessity makes men industrious. Not only do they
 hunt the animals of the forests, but carefully fatten others at home
 for food. God in this passage establishes himself a slaughterer, as it
 were, for by his word he consigns to slaughter and death those animals
 which are suitable for food, as recompence to God-fearing Noah for his
 tribulations during the flood. For that reason would God feed Noah
 with lavish hand.
 
 10. We must not think that this privilege was not divinely ordered.
 The heathen believe that this custom of slaughtering animals always
 existed. Such things are established, or rather permitted, by the Word
 of God; beasts could not have been killed without sin if God had not
 expressly permitted it by his Word. It is a great liberty for man to
 slaughter all kinds of beasts fit for food and eat them without
 wrong-doing. Had but a single kind of beasts been reserved for food,
 it would still have been a great boon; how much more should we value
 this lavish blessing, that all beasts suitable for sustenance are
 given into the power of man!
 
 11. The godless and the gentiles do not recognize this; nor do the
 philosophers. They believe that this privilege has always been man's.
 As for us, however, we should have full light on the subject, in order
 that our consciences may enjoy both rest and freedom in the use of
 what God has created and allowed, there being absolutely no law
 against such food. There can be no sin in their use, though the wicked
 priests have criminally burdened the Church on this subject.
 
 12. In this passage, then, the power of man is increased and the brute
 beasts are committed to him, even unto death. They fear man and flee
 him under the new order, running counter to the experience of the
 past. Adam would have been averse to killing even a small bird for
 food. But now, since the promulgation of this Word, we know that, as a
 special blessing, God has furnished our kitchens with all kinds of
 meat. Later on he will also take care of the cellar by showing man how
 to cultivate the vine.
 
 13. These are sure proofs that God no longer hates man, but favors
 him. This story bears witness that, as God's wrath, once aroused, is
 unbearable, so his mercy is likewise endless and without measure when
 it again begins to glow. But his mercy is the more abundantly
 exercised because it is the very nature of God, while wrath really is
 foreign to God; he takes it upon himself contrary to his nature and
 forced thereto by the wickedness of men.
 
 V. 3. _Every moving thing that liveth shall be food for you; as the
 green herb have I given you all._
 
 14. Here a question arises. In chapter 7, 2, Moses showed the
 difference between clean and unclean beasts; here, however, he speaks
 of all animals, without any distinction. Did God, then, permit man to
 use also the unclean animals for food?
 
 15. The statement as such is general: every moving thing that moveth
 upon the earth. There are some who believe that men at the time of
 Noah made no distinction between clean and unclean animals as regards
 food. But I hold a different opinion. For since such difference had
 been established before that time and was carefully observed in the
 Law afterward, I believe that men used only clean beasts for food;
 that is, such as were offered in sacrifice. Hence the general
 declaration must be understood with a modification: Everything that
 liveth and moveth, of clean beasts, is to be food for you. For, in
 general, human nature loathes serpents, wolves, ravens, mice, and
 dormice, though certain tribes may be found who relish even these
 animals. The fear and terror of man is upon all beasts of the earth,
 because he is allowed to kill them; but it does not follow that man
 uses them all for food. It is probable that Noah ate clean beasts
 only; and only clean beasts, he knew, were acceptable to Jehovah in
 sacrifice.
 
 16. But there is another thing hard to understand. How can it be that
 the terror and fear of man is upon all animals when wolves, lions,
 bears, wild boars, and tigers devour men, and are rather a terror to
 men? So with the entire family of serpents, from which we flee at a
 glance. What shall we say here? Is the Word of God untruthful? I
 answer: Though we, being aware of our danger, flee from such beasts
 and are afraid of them, yet they, likewise, fear man. Even the
 fiercest beasts become terrified and flee at the first sight of man;
 but when they become enraged they overcome man by reason of their
 bodily strength.
 
 17. But, you say, why do they fear when they are stronger? I answer:
 They know that man is endowed with reason, which is more powerful than
 any beast. The skill of man masters even elephants, lions, and tigers.
 Whatever man's bodily strength is unable to do, that he accomplishes
 by his skill and his reasoning powers. How would it otherwise be
 possible for a boy of ten years to control an entire herd of cattle?
 Or for man to guide a horse, an animal of singular fierceness and
 strength, to go in whatever direction he desires, now urging it
 forward and then compelling it to a more moderate gait? All these
 things are done by man's skill, not by his strength. Hence, we do not
 lack clear proofs that the fear of man remains upon the beasts, which
 harm man when they become enraged, and for that reason are feared by
 him.
 
 18. I have no doubt, however, that at the time of Noah and the
 patriarchs immediately succeeding, this fear in the beasts was
 greater, because righteousness then flourished and there was less of
 sin. Afterward, when holiness of life declined and sin increased, man
 began to lose this blessing, and the wild beasts became a punishment
 for sin. Moses threatens in Deut 32, 34 that God would send upon them
 the teeth of beasts. How fearful, also, was the plague of the fiery
 serpents in the desert! Num 21, 6. Bears tore to pieces the lads who
 mocked the prophet, 2 Kings 2, 24. Why did the beasts here lose their
 fear of man? Why did they rage against man? Was not sin the cause?
 
 19. Therefore, as stated before, when new sins arise, new punishments
 will also arise. So we see that in our day disease and misfortunes
 heretofore rare become general, like the English sweat, the locusts
 which in the year 1542 devastated great stretches of land in Poland
 and Silesia, and other examples.
 
 20. In like manner, God promised seasons of seeding and of harvest, of
 heat and cold, and yet he does not so close his eyes to our sins that
 the seasons, both of seeding and of harvest, are not subject to
 climatic disturbances, such as the fearful drouth of the year 1504 and
 the almost unending rains of the two following years. Considering the
 wickedness of our age, why should we wonder that the blessing gives
 place to a curse, so that the beasts, which would fear us were we not
 wicked, are now a terror unto us and harmful?
 
 21. The country of the Sodomites was like a paradise; but by reason of
 sin it was turned into a sea of asphalt; and those who have seen that
 country tell us that most beautiful apples grow there, but when they
 are cut open they are found to be filled with ashes and offensive
 odor. The reason for this is that the Sodomites did not acknowledge
 the gifts of God who blessed them, but misused them according to their
 own will. Furthermore, they blasphemed God, and persecuted his saints,
 being haughty by reason of those good gifts. Therefore the blessing
 was taken away, and everything became curse-ridden. This is the true
 explanation of the fact that, though there are signs of terror in wild
 animals, we are nevertheless afraid of them, and they inflict harm
 upon us.
 
 22. I am quite certain that very wicked men once lived in this country
 of ours; how could we otherwise explain the parched soil and barren
 sands? Names also show that the Jews at one time peopled this country.
 Where bad people live, there the land gradually grows bad by the curse
 of God.
 
 23. The city of Bruges in Flanders used to be a renowned port; but
 from the time when they held King Maximilian captive, the sea
 retreated, and the port ceased to exist. Of Venice they say the same
 thing today. Nor is this very astonishing, since to the numberless
 sins of rulers of the State, defence of idol worship and persecution
 of the Gospel was added.
 
 V. 4. _But flesh with the life thereof, which is the blood thereof,
 shall ye not eat._
 
 24. What we have heard so far, referred to domestic matters; now God
 adds a commandment pertaining to civil government. Since it was no
 more a sin to kill an ox or a sheep for food than it was to pluck a
 flower or an herb, growing in the field, there was some danger that
 men might misuse this God-given power over the beasts and go beyond it
 even to the shedding of human blood. Hence, he now adds a new law,
 that human blood must not be shed, and at the same time he curtails
 the liberty of eating flesh; he forbids them to eat flesh which has
 not first been drained of blood.
 
 25. The Hebrew text presents many difficulties, and, for this reason,
 interpreters are at variance. It is needless to recite all renderings
 of this verse. I steadily follow the rule that the words must explain
 the things, not the things the words. Hence, I spend no time upon the
 ideas of those who explain the words according to their own
 inclinations, making them serve the preconceived notions which they
 bring to their literature.
 
 26. Let us first look at the meaning of the words. _Rephesh_ properly
 denotes a body with a soul, or a living animal, such as the ox, the
 sheep, man, etc. It denotes not merely the body, but a living body, as
 when Christ says: I lay down my life for the sheep, Jn 10, 15. Here
 the word "life" means nothing else than the life animating the body.
 _Basar_, however, means flesh, which is a part of the material
 element, and yet has its breath and its energy, not from the body, but
 from the soul. For the flesh or the body, of itself and without the
 soul, is an inanimate thing, like a log or a stone; but when it is
 filled with the breath of the soul, then its fluids and all bodily
 forces assume activity.
 
 27. God here forbids the eating of a body which still contains the
 stirring, moving, living soul, as the hawk devours chickens, and the
 wolf sheep, without killing them, but while still alive. Such cruelty
 is here forbidden by Jehovah, who sets bounds to the privilege of
 slaughtering, lest it be done in so beastly a manner that living
 bodies or portions thereof be devoured. The lawful manner of
 slaughtering is to be observed, such as was followed at the altar and
 in religious rites, where the beast, having been slain without cruelty
 and duly cleansed from blood, was finally offered to God. I hold that
 the simple and true meaning of the text, which is also given by some
 Jewish teachers, is that we must not eat raw flesh and members still
 palpitating, as did the Laestrygones and the Cyclopes.
 
 V. 5. _And surely your blood, the blood of your lives, will I require;
 at the hand of every beast will I require it: and at the hand of man,
 even at the hand of every man's brother, will I require the life of
 man._
 
 28. Here the Hebrew text is even more difficult than in the foregoing
 verse. Lyra, quoting the Rabbins, finds four kinds of manslaughter
 indicated here; he divides the statement into two parts, and finds a
 twofold explanation for each. He understands the first part to mean
 those who lay murderous hands upon themselves. If this is correct,
 then this passage is a witness for immortality; for how could God call
 to account a person who, being dead, no longer exists? Hence,
 punishment of sin after this life could be indicated here. But it
 seems to me that philology militates against this explanation. Though
 I do not lay claim to a perfect knowledge of the Hebrew tongue, yet I
 am certain that such a meaning is not here apparent.
 
 29. The second kind of murder, he illustrates by the custom of
 throwing human beings before wild beasts, as was done aforetime in the
 theatres, truly a barbaric spectacle, repulsive to all human feeling;
 the third kind is murder at the instigation of another; the fourth,
 murder of a relative.
 
 30. This distinction would be quite satisfactory if it could be proven
 from the words of the text; but it is a Jewish invention born of their
 hatred of the Roman laws. It is much simpler to understand this
 passage as a general prohibition of murder, according to the fifth
 commandment, which says, "Thou shalt not kill." God desires not even a
 beast to be killed, except for a sacred purpose or for the benefit of
 man. Much less does he permit taking the life of man, except by divine
 authority, as will be explained hereafter.
 
 31. In the first place, then, wilful and wicked slaughter is
 forbidden. Culture is opposed to the wanton killing of animals and to
 the eating of raw meat. In the second place God forbids homicide of
 any description; for if God will require the blood of a murdered human
 being from the beast that slew him, how much more relentlessly will he
 require it at the hand of man? Thus this passage voices the sentiment
 of the fifth commandment, that no one shall spill human blood.
 
 
 II. LAW CONCERNING MAN'S SLAUGHTER; GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH; THE
     RAINBOW 32-68.
 
    A. LAW CONCERNING SLAYERS OF LIFE.
 
       1. If it existed before the flood 32.
 
       2. Relation of the flood to this law 33.
 
       3. This the source of all human laws 34-36.
 
       4. When and how this law can be executed 35.
 
        * Why is it well to observe that government was instituted by
          God 36-37.
 
       5. In what respect is it a great blessing from God 37.
 
       6. How is government a proof of God's love to man 38.
 
       7. Why God gave this command, and why he punishes man-slaughter
          39.
 
       8. Hereby a new police and a new order are instituted 40.
 
        * Verdict of philosophy and of reason on civil authority 41.
 
        * Verdict of God's Word 42.
 
       9. This law applies to all men 43.
 
      10. Why God is such an enemy of man-slaughter, and so earnestly
          forbids it 44-45.
 
      11. The conclusion that God loves life 46.
 
 
 II. THE LAW AGAINST TAKING LIFE; GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH; THE
 RAINBOW.
 
 A. The Law Against Taking Life.
 
 V. 6a. _Who sheddeth man's blood, by man shall his blood be shed._
 
 32. Here the carelessness of the Latin translator deserves reproof;
 for he omitted the very necessary expression "by man." The difference
 between the time before and that after the flood is thus brought out.
 When Cain had murdered his brother Abel, God revered human blood so
 highly that he threatened to visit sevenfold punishment upon anyone
 who should kill Cain. He would not have the slayer of man put to death
 even by due process of law; and though Adam punished the sin of his
 son severely by casting him out, he did not dare to pronounce sentence
 of death upon him.
 
 33. But here Jehovah establishes a new law, requiring the murderer be
 put to death by man--a law unprecedented, because heretofore God had
 reserved all judgment to himself. When he saw that the world was
 growing worse and worse, he finally enforced punishment against a
 wicked world by the flood. Here, however, God bestows a share of his
 authority upon man, giving him the power of life and death, that thus
 he may be the avenger of bloodshed. Whosoever takes man's life without
 due warrant, him God subjects not only to his own judgment, but also
 to the sword of man. Though God may use man as his instrument in
 punishing, he is himself still the avenger. Were it not for the divine
 command, then, it would be no more lawful now to slay a murderer than
 it was before the flood.
 
 34. This is the source from which spring all civil laws and the laws
 of nations. If God grants man the power of life and death, he
 certainly also grants power in matters of lesser importance--power
 over property, family, wife, children, servants and fields. God wills
 that these things shall be under the control of certain men, who are
 to punish the guilty.
 
 35. We must remember well that between the power of God and of men
 there is this difference: God has the power to slay us when the world
 cannot even accuse us--when before it we are innocent. Sin is born
 with us; we are all guilty before God. Men have no authority to slay
 except where guilt is apparent and crime is proven. Hence courts have
 been established and a definite method of proceeding instituted for
 the purpose of investigating and proving the crime before the sentence
 of death is passed.
 
 36. Heed, then, this passage. It establishes civil authority as God's
 institution, with power, not only of life and death, but jurisdiction
 in matters where life is not involved. Magistrates are to punish the
 disobedience of children, theft, adultery, perjury--all sins which are
 forbidden in the second table. He who grants jurisdiction over the
 life of man, at the same time grants judgment over lesser matters.
 
 37. The importance of this text and its claim to attention consists in
 the fact that it records the establishment of civil authority by God
 with the sword as insignia of power, for the purpose that license may
 be curbed and anger and other sins inhibited from growing beyond all
 bounds. Had God not granted this power to man, what kind of lives, I
 ask you, would we lead? He foresaw that wickedness would ever
 flourish, and established this external remedy to prevent the
 indefinite spread of license. By this safeguard God protects life and
 property as by a fence and a wall.
 
 38. We find here no less a proof of God's great love toward man than
 his promise that the flood shall never again rage, and his promise
 that flesh may be eaten for the sustenance of human life.
 
 V. 6b. _For in the image of God made he man._
 
 39. This is the powerful reason why God does not wish men to be killed
 by private arbitrament. Man is a noble creature, who, unlike other
 living beings, has been fashioned according to the image of God. While
 it is true that he has lost this image through sin, as we have seen
 above, it is capable of being restored through the Word and the Holy
 Spirit. This image God desires us to revere in each other; he forbids
 us to shed blood by the exercise of sheer force. But he who refuses to
 respect the image of God in man, and gives way to anger and
 provocation, those worst counselors of all, as some one has called
 them, his life is surrendered to civil authority in forfeit, by God,
 in that God commands that also his blood shall be shed.
 
 40. Thus the subject under consideration teaches the establishment of
 civil authority in the world, which did not exist before the flood.
 Cain and Lamech--and this is a case in point--were not slain, though
 the holy patriarchs were the arbiters, judges, of public action. But
 in this Scripture they who have the sword, are commanded to use it
 against those who have shed blood.
 
 41. Thus the problem is here solved that worried Plato and all sages.
 They concluded that it is impossible to administer government without
 injustice, because all men occupy the same level of dignity and
 position. Why did Caesar rule the world? Why did others obey him,
 since he was only human like themselves--no better, no stronger and
 liable to die as soon as themselves? He was subject to the same
 conditions as all men. Hence it seems to be tyranny for him, who was
 quite similar to other men, to usurp rulership among men. If he is
 like other men it is the highest wrong and injustice to ignore this
 similarity, and to foist his rule by force upon others.
 
 42. This is the conclusion at which reason arrives and it cannot
 entertain any view to the contrary. But we, having the Word, can see
 that we must oppose to such reasoning the command of God, the author
 of this order of things. Accordingly, it is for us to render obedience
 to the divine order and to endure it, so that to our other sins this
 may not be added, that we are disobedient to the will of God at the
 very point where we derive benefit in so many ways.
 
 43. To sum up, this passage permits the slaughter of animals for
 religious and personal use, but it emphatically forbids the taking of
 man's life, because man is made in the image of God. Those who violate
 his command he gives into the hands of the authorities to be slain.
 
 V. 7. _And you, be ye fruitful, and multiply; bring forth abundantly
 in the earth, and multiply therein._
 
 44. The slaughter of animals having been granted, not only for
 sacrifice, but also for food, and the killing of human beings having
 been forbidden, we are given the reason why God regards the shedding
 of human blood with so much aversion. He desires mankind to multiply
 on the earth; but the slaughter of men lays the earth waste and
 produces a wilderness. We see this in case of war. God did not create
 the earth without purpose. He intended it to be inhabited, Is 45, 18.
 He makes it fruitful by rain and sunshine for man's benefit. Therefore
 he is displeased with those who remove from the earth its inhabitants.
 His will is life, and not death, Ps 30, 5.
 
 45. These and similar sayings of the prophets are based upon promises
 like we find here, that God commands man to multiply. Plainly he is
 more inclined to give life and to do good than to be angry and to
 kill. If it were otherwise, why should he forbid the taking of human
 life? Why should pestilence be of rare occurrence? Pestilence and
 general epidemics occur scarce once in ten years. Men are born,
 animals grow, and crops without end are growing continually.
 
 46. All these facts go to show that God loves, not death, but life. He
 created man, not that he should die, but that he should live; "but
 through the envy of the devil did death enter the world," Sap 2, 24.
 But even after the fall, the blessings which remain are so guarded as
 to render the conclusion inevitable that God loves life rather than
 death.
 
 It is well for us to ponder these matters very often; thus, as Solomon
 has truly said, Jehovah shall be to us a fountain of blessings. Prov
 18, 22.
 
 
 B. GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH 47-55.
 
  * Why the same thing is repeated 47.
 
    1. Whether this covenant applies to man alone or also to the
       animals 48.
 
    2. Whether this covenant applies to the men and animals of that day
       only 49.
 
     * God always connected signs with his promises 49.
 
     * The significance of these to our first parents 49-50.
 
    3. Nature of this covenant 51.
 
     * Characteristics of a humble heart and God's dealings with it
       52-54.
 
    4. This covenant given for man's comfort and as a proof of God's
       love 53-54.
 
    5. It is a comfort to us at present 55.
 
 
 B. GOD'S COVENANT WITH NOAH.
 
 Vs. 8-11. _And God spake unto Noah, and his sons with him, saying, And
 I, behold, I establish my covenant with you, and with your seed after
 you; and with every living creature that is with you, the birds, the
 cattle, and every beast of the earth with you; of all that go out of
 the ark, even every beast of the earth. And I will establish my
 covenant with you; neither shall all flesh be cut off any more by the
 waters of the flood; neither shall there any more be a flood to
 destroy the earth._
 
 47. Previously we at various times explained this massing of words.
 When the Holy Spirit is prolix, there is a cause for it. Let us
 therefore, consider what fear, dread and peril Noah and his family
 endured and it will be easily understood why it was necessary for God
 to say and to emphasize the same things with such frequency.
 
 48. When, in addition it is remembered that the covenant here spoken
 of does not pertain to man alone but embraces every living soul, we
 recognize that the promise does not relate to the seed but merely, to
 this bodily life, enjoyed by man in common with the beasts; this God
 will not destroy by another flood.
 
 Vs. 12-16. _And God said, This is the token of the covenant which I
 make between me and you and every living creature that is with you,
 for the perpetual generations: I do set my bow in the cloud, and it
 shall be for a token of a covenant between me and the earth. And it
 shall come to pass, when I bring a cloud over the earth, that the bow
 shall be seen in the cloud, and I will remember my covenant, which is
 between me and you and every living creature of all flesh; and the
 waters shall no more become a flood to destroy all flesh. And the bow
 shall be in the cloud; and I will look upon it, that I may remember
 the everlasting covenant between God and every living creature of all
 flesh that is upon the earth._
 
 49. The term "perpetual generations" deserves particular notice; it
 embraces not only man and beast at that time, but all their offspring
 down to the end of the world. We learn another thing from this
 passage. God usually confirms his promise with an outward sign. In the
 third chapter above we read of the coats of skin with which he covered
 the nakedness of the first parents as token of his protection and
 guardianship.
 
 50. Some offer the following apt allegorical explanation. As the skin
 of the dead sheep keeps warm our body, so Christ, having died, keeps
 us warm by his Spirit, and will, on the last day, raise us up and give
 us life. Others say that the skins were selected as a sign of
 mortality. But this seems unnecessary; all our life reminds us of
 mortality. More expedient was a token of life, suggesting the blessing
 and favor of God. The office of such tokens is to console, not to
 terrify. So was the sign of the rainbow given, a supplement of the
 promise.
 
 51. In chapter 8, 21-22, God says in his heart that he repents of that
 terrible punishment, and promises that he will not repeat it, because
 the imagination of man's heart is evil from his youth. If he should
 desire to so punish evil, there would be need of a flood every day.
 Here he again sends forth his Word to mankind, through an angel, or
 possibly through the mouth of Noah, promising that no flood shall
 hereafter come upon the earth. That the promise is repeated so often
 is evidence of God's endeavor, in loving kindness, to remove man's
 fear of punishment and to set before him a hope of blessing and utmost
 mercy.
 
 52. Such consolation Noah and his loved ones required. One who has
 been humbled by God cannot forget the wound and the pain. Chastening
 is longer remembered than blessing. Boys are a case in point. The
 tender mother, having chastised her child with the rod, endeavors to
 calm him with toys and other allurements, yet the memory of pain
 lingers, and the child cannot restrain frequent sighs and bitter sobs.
 How much more difficult for the conscience to accept solace after
 having felt the wrath of God and the fear of death! So firmly fixed
 are these in the mind that the soul trembles and fears in spite of
 gifts and consolations offered.
 
 53. So God here shows his good will in manifold ways and feels
 singular joy in pouring forth mercy. He is like a mother who pets and
 caresses her boy until he at last begins to forget his tears and to
 smile into his mother's face.
 
 54. Hence figures are employed, and words are massed and the subject
 is presented in a clearer and clearer light, in order to adapt the
 consolation to the needs of the wretched people who, for an entire
 year, had been witnesses of the immeasurable wrath of God. They could
 not be delivered from fear and terror by an occasional word. There was
 need of repeating the promise with much exposition to dry their tears
 and to soften their grief. For, though they were saints, they were
 flesh, even as we are.
 
 55. Likewise we in our day need this consolation. At all times when
 the elements rage, we may be secure in the thought that the fountains
 of heaven and the wells of the deep are closed up by the word of God.
 The rainbow shows itself to this day for the purpose of symbolizing
 that, henceforth, there shall never be another general flood. And this
 promise requires, on our part, the faith that we trust God, in his
 mercy, will never bring another great flood upon us.
 
 
 C. THE RAINBOW.
 
    1. Can it be assigned to natural causes 56-58.
 
     * What to think of the fiery meteors 59-60.
 
    2. Can it be caused by the position of the clouds 60.
 
    3. The rainbow witnesses of God's wrath and of his goodness 61.
 
    4. Did it exist before the flood?
 
       a. Opinion of those believing it did, and their reasons 62.
 
       b. Luther's opinion that it was a new creation 63.
 
       c. Solomon's words, "There is nothing new", do not apply here
          64.
 
    5. Rainbow to be viewed as a new creature and as God's sign-board
       65.
 
    6. Colors of the rainbow.
 
       a. What are they and their number 66.
 
       b. What do they signify 67.
 
    7. To what end should the rainbow serve us 68.
 
 
 C. THE RAINBOW.
 
 56. They further dispute whether the natural causes in the rainbow
 signify this. It is well known that philosophers, especially Aristotle
 in his book on Meteors, use all sorts of arguments on the color of the
 rainbow, on the character of the clouds where it is produced, and on
 its curvature. Quite appropriately the resemblance is noted between a
 mirror, which reflects an image, and the moist and arched cloud, which
 catches the rays of the sun, and by reflection produces the rainbow.
 Reason sees in such phenomena what appears to it most probable, but it
 does not discover the truth everywhere. That is not in the power of
 the creature but of the Creator alone. As for me, I have never given
 to any book less credence than to that on meteors, the basic principle
 of which is the assumption that natural causes explain everything.
 
 57. Some declare the rainbow to be a forerunner of a storm lasting
 three days, which I am ready to admit, but this much is certain, that
 it signifies that there will never be another flood. However, it
 derives this signification, not from any natural causes but only from
 the Word of God. Its meaning is such, only because God orders and
 declares it to be so through his Word. Circumcision was a token that
 the seed of Abraham were the people of God; yet circumcision did not
 have this meaning in itself, but only through the Word which was
 joined with it. Again, the clothing of skin signified life and safety,
 not because they contained this guarantee by nature, but because God
 had promised it. So, the significance of the rainbow that the flood
 shall not return, is not based upon the Word of God.
 
 58. I do not altogether ignore theories along the lines of natural law
 concerning these matters; but since they are not substantiated, I
 place little trust in them. The reasoning of Aristotle regarding the
 humid and hollow cloud as the cause of the rainbow is not reliable,
 such clouds may exist without producing a rainbow. Again, according to
 the greater or lesser density of the medium, the bow may appear wider
 or narrower. I have seen here at Wittenberg a circular rainbow,
 forming a complete ring, not simply an arch terminating on the surface
 of the earth, as rainbows generally appear. Why, then, do rainbows
 assume different forms at different times? A philosopher, I suppose,
 will think of some reason; for he will consider it a disgrace not to
 be able to assign a reason for all things. But indeed, he will never
 persuade me to believe that he speaks the truth.
 
 59. The only consistent and incontrovertable view to take is that all
 these phenomena are either works of God or of evil spirits. I have no
 doubt that the dancing goats (stars), the flying serpents, fiery
 lances, and the like, are produced by evil spirits, which thus gambol
 in the air, either to terrify or to deceive men. The flames which
 appear on board of ships were thought by the heathen to be Castor and
 Pollux. Sometimes the image of a moon appears above the ears of
 horses. It is certain that all these things are due to the antics of
 evil spirits in the air, though Aristotle believes them to be luminous
 air, just as he also declares that a comet is shining vapor.
 
 60. To me it appears that we shall move with greater security and
 certainty, when, arguing from cause to effect, we conclude that the
 comet blazes, when it pleases God, as a sign of calamity, just as the
 rainbow glows, when it pleases God as a sign of mercy. Who can compute
 all the causes which produce the appearance of the rainbow in such
 diversity of beautiful color, and in the form of an arch of perfect
 curvature? The arrangement of the clouds alone surely does not produce
 this perfection. Hence it is by the will and the promise of God, and
 fulfilling his pleasure, that the rainbow is a sign to man and beast
 that there will nevermore at any time be a flood.
 
 61. In recognition of this token we ought to give thanks to God. As
 often as the rainbow appears, it proclaims to the world with a loud
 voice, as it were, the story of the wrath of God, which once destroyed
 the world by a flood. And it proclaims solace for us, so that we may
 conclude that God is propitious to us henceforth and will never again
 visit upon us so fearful a punishment. It teaches both the love and
 the fear of God, the highest virtues, of which philosophy knows
 nothing. Philosophy only disputes about material and formal causes. It
 does not know the final cause of this most beautiful creation. But
 theology does explain it.
 
 62. In this connection also the question has received much attention
 whether the rainbow existed from the beginning. And in this
 controversy much force has been displayed. Since it is written above
 (ch 2, 23) that God created heaven and earth in six days, and then
 rested from all his works, some conclude that the rainbow existed from
 the beginning. Otherwise it would follow that creation extended beyond
 those six days. What, however, occurred in Noah's time is this, that
 the rainbow, created in the beginning, was selected by God and made,
 through a new word, a fixed symbol, having existed hitherto without
 special significance. To support this view, they even quote the word
 of Solomon that "there is no new thing under the sun," Ec 1, 9. On
 this they base their argument that after those six days no new thing
 has been created.
 
 63. My opinion is quite the contrary--that the rainbow never had
 existed before; it was then and there created. Thus, the coats of skin
 with which God clothed the first parents certainly were not created in
 those six days, but after man's fall; hence, they were a new creation.
 The statement that God rested, must not be interpreted to mean that he
 created nothing thereafter; for Christ says, "My Father worketh even
 until now, and I work," Jn 5, 17.
 
 64. Solomon's statement that there is no new thing under the sun, has
 given much trouble to the learned. But is it not apparent that it
 refers not to the works of God, but to original sin, meaning that the
 same reasoning powers Adam had after the fall are found in man
 today--the same debates concerning morals, vices, virtues, the nurture
 of the body and the transaction of business? As the comic poet has it,
 speaking of another matter, "Nothing is said that has not been said
 before." Really, within the sphere of man's activity and effort there
 is nothing new; the same words, thoughts, designs, the same emotions,
 griefs, affections and incidents exist now which always existed.
 Consequently it is quite inappropriate, in consequence to apply this
 aphorism to God and his works.
 
 65. Therefore, I believe that the rainbow was a new creation, not seen
 in the world before that time. It was established to remind the world
 of the bygone wrath, traces of which are still seen in the rainbow,
 and to give assurance of the mercy of God. It is a record, or picture
 in which both the bygone wrath and the present mercy are revealed.
 
 66. There is also a difference of opinion as to the colors of the
 rainbow. Some say there are four colors: the fiery, the bright yellow,
 the green and the color of water, or blue. But I think there are only
 two, those of fire and water. The fiery color is above, unless the
 rainbow is seen reversed; then, as in a mirror, that which is above is
 seen below. Where the hues of fire and water meet, or blend, yellow
 results.
 
 67. The colors have been thus arranged by God for a definite purpose.
 The blue should be a reminder of bygone wrath; the fiery color, a
 picture to us of the future judgment. While the interior or blue
 portion is restricted, the outer and fiery color is without bounds.
 Thus, the first world perished by the flood, but an end was set to
 God's wrath. A remnant was preserved and a second world arose, but
 bounds are set to it. When God shall destroy the world by fire, this
 bodily life will never be restored. The wicked will suffer the
 everlasting punishment of death in the fire, while the saints will be
 raised up unto a new and everlasting life, which, though in the body,
 shall not be of the body, but of the spirit.
 
 68. Let this sign teach us to fear God and to trust in him. So may we
 escape the punishment of fire, even as we have escaped the punishment
 of the flood. It will be more practical to think of these things than
 to consider those philosophical arguments concerning the material
 cause.
 
 
 III. ALLEGORIES 69-132.
 
    A. ALLEGORIES IN GENERAL 69-81.
 
       1. Luther at first given to allegories 69-70.
 
       2. How and why monks and Anabaptists esteem them so highly 71.
 
       3. How we should regard them 72.
 
       4. Are they to be entirely rejected 73.
 
       5. Some are, and others not 74-76.
 
       6. How to regard Origen's, Augustine's and Jerome's allegories
          77-78.
 
       7. Pope's allegories of the sun, moon and ark 79-80.
 
       8. What to think of the doctrine of these allegories 81.
 
 
 III. CONCERNING ALLEGORIES.
 
 A. Allegories in General.
 
 69. At last we have finished the story of the flood, which Moses
 satisfactorily describes at great length. It is a fearful example of
 the immeasurable and all but boundless wrath of God, which is beyond
 the power of human utterance. There remains to be said a word or two
 concerning its allegorical meaning. I have often declared that I take
 no great pleasure in allegories, although in my younger days they had
 such a fascination for me that I thought everything ought to be shown
 to have an allegorical meaning. I was influenced in this respect by
 the example of Origen and Jerome, whom I admired as the greatest of
 all theologians. I may add that Augustine also uses the allegory quite
 frequently.
 
 70. But while I followed the example of these men, I discovered at
 last that, to my great loss, I had followed a shadow, and had
 overlooked the very sap and marrow of the Scriptures. Thereupon I
 began to hate allegories. They are pleasing, to be sure, especially
 when they contain happy allusions. They may be compared to choice
 pictures. But as much as real objects with their native hues surpass a
 picture, even though it should glow, as the poet has it (stat silo V.
 1, 5), with Apelles-like colors, closely copied from nature, so much
 the historical narrative itself is superior to the allegory.
 
 71. In our day the ignorant mob of the Anabaptists is as much filled
 with immoderate craving for allegory as are the monks. They love to
 delve in the more mysterious books, such as the Revelation of John,
 and that worthless fabrication passing under the title of the second
 and third books of Esdras. For, there you are at liberty to follow
 your fancy as you please. We recall that Muntzer, the seditious
 spirit, turned everything into allegory. But true it is, that he who,
 without judgment, makes allegories or follows those made by others,
 will not only be deceived but sustain deplorable injury, as there are
 examples to prove.
 
 72. Allegories must either be avoided altogether or be worked out with
 the best judgment. They must conform to the rule followed by the
 apostles, of which we shall soon have occasion to speak. Let us avoid
 falling into those ugly and baneful absurdities, not only of those who
 are misnamed theologians, but also of the Canonists, or rather
 Assinists, of which the decretals and decisions of that most
 detestable master, the pope, are an example.
 
 73. This statement, however, must not be taken for a general
 condemnation of all allegory. Christ and the apostles made use of
 allegories at times. These, however, were in keeping with the faith
 according to the injunction of Paul (Rom 12, 6) that prophecy, or
 doctrine, should be according to the proportion of faith.
 
 74. When we put the allegory under the ban, we confine ourselves to
 that species which, with the setting aside of scriptural warrant, is
 altogether the product of man's mind and fancy. Those which are tested
 by the analogy of faith, serve not only as ornaments of the doctrine
 but also as consolation for the soul.
 
 75. Peter turns this very story of the flood into a most beautiful
 allegory, saying that baptism is symbolized by the flood, and saves
 us. For, in it not only the filth of the flesh is washed away, but
 conscience makes good answer toward God through the resurrection of
 Jesus Christ, who is enthroned at the right hand of God and has
 destroyed death in order to make us heirs of eternal life; who,
 moreover, is gone into heaven; angels and authorities and powers being
 made subject unto him, 1 Pet 3, 21-22. This is, indeed, a theological
 allegory, in accordance with faith, and full of solace.
 
 76. Such is also the allegory of Christ in John 3, 14, concerning the
 serpent lifted up in the wilderness and the healing of those bitten by
 the serpent's tooth who gazed upon it. Again, there is that one by
 Paul (1 Cor 10, 1), All our fathers did drink from the same spiritual
 rock, etc. Such allegories as these not only agree with the matter
 itself, but also instruct the heart in faith and are a help to the
 conscience.
 
 77. But take a look at the ordinary allegory of Jerome, Origen and
 Augustine. These men, when they create an allegory, leave faith
 altogether out of consideration, and merely air philosophical
 opinions, foreign alike to the sphere of faith and to that of morals;
 not to speak of the fact that they are quite silly and a mass of
 absurdities.
 
 78. In a former chapter (ch 3. paras 61, 298, 304), we heard of
 Augustine's allegory concerning the creation of man and woman, by
 which he illustrates the higher and the lower attributes of man, that
 is, reason and the emotions. But, I ask you, what is the value of this
 figment?
 
 79. The pope, however, carries away the real honors for piety and
 learning when he thunders from his high seat as follows: God made two
 great lights, the sun and the moon; the sun represents the authority
 of the pope, from which his imperial majesty borrows its light as the
 moon does from the sun. Away with such rash impudence and vicious
 ambition!
 
 80. In a similar style the ark, of Noah's story, is compared to the
 Roman Catholic Church, in which is found the pope with his cardinals,
 bishops, and prelates, while the laymen are swimming in the sea. That
 is, the laymen are altogether given to earthly business and would not
 be saved did not those helmsmen of the ark, or Church, cast boards and
 ropes to the swimmers, drawing them into the ark by these means.
 Pictures of this nature were frequently painted by monks to represent
 the Church.
 
 81. Origen shows more sanity than the papists, in that his allegories
 conform to moral standards, as a rule. Yet, he ought to have kept in
 view the rule laid down by Paul, who demands that prophesy is to be
 the guardian of faith; for faith is edifying and the proper sphere of
 the Church. Rules governing morals can be laid by even heathen
 philosophers who know nothing whatever concerning faith.
 
 
 B. ALLEGORIES IN DETAIL 82-132.
 
    1. Allegory of the baptism of the Israelites under Moses; the ark
       and the flood 82ff.
 
     * Points of likeness and unlikeness in the death of believers and
       unbelievers 84-86.
 
     * In what way is death to be conquered 87.
 
     * How all temptations are to be overcome and believers be
       preserved 88-90.
 
    2. Allegories of the ark's proportions 91-92.
 
    3. Allegories of the sun and moon 93.
 
     * To what all allegories should point 94.
 
    4. Allegory of the cup 95-96.
 
    5. Allegory of the dove Noah sent out of the ark 97-99.
 
    6. Allegory of the raven Noah sent forth.
 
       a. Thoughts of the fathers on this point 100.
 
       b. The correct allegory of the raven 101-116.
 
        * The law and the teachings of the law 101-116.
 
          (1) How illustrated by the raven 102-105.
 
            * Luther's opponents falsely accuse him of forbidding good
              works 106-107.
 
          (2) They are no better than the intelligent moralists among
              the heathen 108-110.
 
          (3) They cannot quiet the conscience 111.
 
            * The raven a perfect representative of the Papists
              112-113.
 
          (4) How the Papists make the unrighteous righteous and
              condemn the righteous 114-115.
 
    7. Allegories of the doves in detail 116-124.
 
     * Characteristics of the dove 116.
 
       a. First dove sent forth.
 
          (1) A figure of the office of grace 117.
 
          (2) A figure of the Old Testament prophets 118-119.
 
       b. Second dove returned with the olive leaf.
 
          (1) A figure of New Testament preachers 120-122.
 
            * The fanatics and Anabaptists wait in vain for new
              revelations 121.
 
            * Nature of true Gospel preachers 122.
 
          (2) A figure of the New Testament 123.
 
       c. Third dove did not return 124ff.
 
    8. Allegory of the seven days Noah waited after he sent forth the
       first dove 125.
 
    9. Allegory of the evening the dove returned 126-127.
 
       *  Several things to be remembered in this connection.
 
          (1) Allegories are not to have a world-wide treatment like
              the articles of faith 128.
 
          (2) Defects in the allegories of the fathers 129-130.
 
            * Lyra is to be preferred to all commentators 131.
 
          (3) Right use of allegories 132.
 
 
 B. ALLEGORIES IN DETAIL.
 
 82. Writing to the Corinthians, Paul says (1 Cor 10, 2) that the
 Israelites "were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the sea."
 If you regard only the outward circumstance and the words, even
 Pharaoh was baptized, but he perished with his men, while Israel
 passed through safe and unharmed. Noah and his sons were saved in this
 baptism of the flood, while all the rest of the world, being outside
 of the ark, perished thereby. Such a way of speaking is appropriate
 and forcible. "Baptism" and "death" are interchangeable in Scripture.
 Paul says (Rom 6, 3): "All we who were baptized into Christ Jesus were
 baptized into his death," and Jesus says, "I have a baptism to be
 baptized with; and how am I straitened till it be accomplished!" (Lk
 12, 50). And to his disciples he said, "Ye shall ... be baptized with
 the baptism that I am baptized with" (Mt 20, 23).
 
 83. In this sense the Red Sea was a baptism indeed. It represented to
 Pharaoh death and God's anger. Yet though Israel was baptized with the
 same baptism, they passed through it unharmed. So the flood is truly
 death and the wrath of God, and yet, the faithful are saved in the
 midst of the flood. Death engulfs and swallows all mankind; for, the
 wrath of God smites both the good and the bad, the pious and the
 wicked, without distinction. The flood was sent upon Noah the same as
 upon the rest of the world. The Red Sea that engulfed Pharaoh was the
 same as that through which Israel passed unharmed. But in both cases
 the believers are saved while the wicked perish. That is the point of
 difference. The ark was Noah's salvation, and it was but an expression
 of the promise and Word of God. In these he had life, but the wicked,
 who believed not the Word, were left to perish.
 
 84. This is the difference which the Holy Spirit desired to bring out,
 so that the righteous, warned by this example, might believe and hope
 for salvation through the mercy of God in the very midst of death.
 They consider baptism as bound together with the promise of life, as
 Noah did the ark. Therefore, though the wise man and the fool must
 suffer the same death--for Peter and Paul die, not otherwise than Nero
 and other wicked persons die--yet the righteous believe that in death
 they will be saved unto eternal life. And this hope is not vain, for
 they have Christ, who receives their souls, and will, on the last day,
 raise up also the bodies of his believers unto eternal life.
 
 85. This class of allegory is of great service, and tends to comfort
 the heart when you consider the contrast in the ultimate outcome. The
 testimony of the material eye would seem to confirm the statement of
 Solomon (Ec 2, 16) that the wise man dieth as the fool, that the
 righteous man dieth as though he were not the beloved of God. But the
 eyes of the soul must view this point of difference, that Israel
 enters into the Red Sea and is saved, while Pharaoh, pressing upon the
 heels of Israel, is overwhelmed by the waves and perishes. It is the
 same death, then, which takes away the righteous and the wicked, and
 almost always the end of the former is ignominious, while that of the
 latter is attended by elements of splendor and power; but in the eyes
 of God, while the death of sinners is deplorable, that of his saints
 is precious, for it is consecrated by Christ, through whom it becomes
 the beginning of eternal life.
 
 86. As the flood and the Red Sea were instruments to save Noah and
 Israel from death, so to us, death is but the instrument to give us
 life, if we remain in faith. When the children of Israel were in
 utmost peril, suddenly the sea parted and rose on the right side and
 on the left, like an iron wall, so that Israel passed through without
 danger. Why was it? In order that so death might be made to serve
 life. Divine power overcomes the assaults of Satan. Thus it was in
 Paradise. Satan purposed to slay all mankind by his venom. But what
 happens? By reason of the truly happy guilt of our first parents, as
 the Church sings, it comes to pass that the Son of God became
 incarnate to free us from evil.
 
 87. This allegory, then, beautifully teaches, strengthens and consoles
 us, enabling us to fear neither death nor sin, but to despise all
 perils, giving thanks to God that he has so called and dealt with us
 that even death, the universal destroyer, is compelled to be a servant
 of life, just as the flood, an occasion of destruction to the rest of
 the world, was one of salvation for Noah; and the Red Sea, when
 Pharaoh met his doom, served to save the children of Israel.
 
 88. What has been here expressed, finds application to the subject of
 temptation in general, so that we learn to despise dangers and be
 hopeful even where no hope seems to remain. When death or any other
 danger is imminent, we should rise to meet it, saying: Behold, here is
 my Red Sea; here is my flood, my baptism and my death. Here my
 life--as the philosopher said of the sea-farers--is removed from death
 barely by a hand's breadth. But fear not; this danger is as a handful
 of water opposed to the flood of grace which is mine through the Word.
 Therefore death will not destroy me, but will lift me and bear me to
 life. Death is so utterly incapable of destroying the Christian, that
 it constitutes the very escape from death. For bodily death ushers in
 the emancipation of the spirit and the resurrection of the flesh.
 Thus, Noah in the flood was not borne by the earth, nor by trees, nor
 by mountains, but by the very flood which destroyed the total
 remainder of the human race.
 
 89. Well may the prophets often extol those wonderful works of
 God--the passage through the Red Sea, the exodus from Egypt, and the
 like. For the sea, which by its nature can only devour and destroy, is
 forced to part and rise and protect the Israelites, lest they be
 overwhelmed by its tides. That which in its very nature is wrath,
 becomes grace to the believer; that which in reality is death, becomes
 life. Therefore, whatever calamity comes--and this life has it in
 infinite measure--to threaten our property and our lives, it will all
 become salvation and joy if we only are in the ark; that is, if by
 faith we lay hold of the promise made in Christ. Then even death, by
 which we are removed, must be turned into life, and the hell, which
 swallows us, into a way to heaven.
 
 90. Therefore Peter says (1 Pet 3, 21) that we are saved by the water
 in baptism, which was prefigured by the flood. The water which streams
 about us, or the plunge into it, is death, and yet from this death or
 plunge, life results by virtue of the ark of safety--the Word of
 promise to which we cling. The inspired Scriptures set forth this
 allegory, which is not only free from weaknesses but of service in
 every way, and worthy of our careful attention, since it offers
 wonderful consolation even in the utmost perils.
 
 91. The fathers have added another allegory taken from the form and
 dimensions of the ark. The human body, measured from the top of the
 head to the sole of the foot, is six times as long as it is wide. Now,
 the ark, which was fifty cubits wide, measured six times as much in
 length, namely 300 cubits. Hence, they say, the ark typifies Christ
 the man, in whom all promises center. Therefore, those who believe in
 him are saved even in the midst of the flood, that is, in death
 itself.
 
 92. This conception is both appropriate and beautiful; above all, it
 agrees with faith. Though there may be a mistake in the application,
 the groundwork is strong and secure. There is no doubt that the Holy
 Spirit found various ways to illustrate the promises to be fulfilled
 in Christ, and the wonderful counsel of salvation for mankind through
 faith in Christ. Hence, allegories of this nature, though lacking in
 aptness, are not necessarily wicked and a source of offense.
 
 93. If one were to say the sun represents Christ, while the moon
 represents the Church, which receives its light by the grace of
 Christ, he might possibly be mistaken in his choice of illustration,
 yet his error is based, not upon an erroneous, but upon a sure
 foundation. But when the pope declares the sun represents the papal
 authority, while the moon represents the emperor's, then not only the
 application is inapt and foolish, but the very foundation is evil.
 Such allegories are not conceived and invented by the Holy Spirit, but
 by the devil, the spirit of lies.
 
 94. Allegories must have some application to the promises and the
 doctrine of faith if they are to comfort and strengthen the soul.
 Peter's allegory teaches us this. Because Peter saw that Noah was set
 free in the midst of death and that the ark was an instrument of life,
 the ark was rightly applied to typify Christ. Only divine power can
 save in the midst of death and lead unto life. The Scriptures declare
 that to God belong the issues from death, (Ps 68, 21), and he makes
 death the occasion, yea, even an aid to life.
 
 95. This has given rise to expressions used in Scripture, where
 afflictions and perils are likened to a cup that intoxicates. This is
 an apt and vivid figure of speech. So the passion of Christ is called
 a draught from a brook (Ps 110, 7), meaning that it is a medicinal
 draught or mixture, which, though bitter, is healing in its bitterness
 and gives life by causing death. Such soothing words serve to console
 us that we may learn to despise death and other perils and meet them
 with greater readiness.
 
 96. Satan, also, has his cup; but it is sweet, and inebriates unto
 nausea. He who, attracted by its sweetness, drinks it, loses his life
 and dies the eternal death. Such was the cup the Babylonians drained,
 as the prophet has it (Jer 25, 15-27). Let us, therefore, accept the
 cup of salvation with thanksgiving, and, as Paul declares of
 believers, rejoice in tribulation (Rom 5, 3).
 
 97. Having explained this figure of the ark and the meaning of the
 flood according to the canonical Scriptures, we will say something
 also about the other features of this story--about the raven which did
 not return, and the doves, the first of which returned because she
 found no resting-place for her foot, while the second brought back
 with her a twig from an olive tree, and the third did not return
 because the earth was no more covered by water.
 
 98. In our treatise on the narrative proper, we stated that these
 things occurred to be a consolation for Noah and his sons; to assure
 them that God's wrath had passed and that he was now pacified. The
 dove did not bring the olive branch of her own volition. She
 miraculously obeyed divine power. So the serpent in paradise spoke,
 not of its own volition, but through the inspiration of the devil, who
 had taken possession of it. As, on that occasion, the serpent, by the
 devil's prompting, spoke, with the result that man was led into sin,
 so, on this occasion, it was not its own volition or instinct which
 moved the dove to bring the olive branch, but the prompting of God, in
 order that Noah might gain comfort from the pleasant sight. For the
 olive does not supply the dove with food; she prefers the several
 species of wheat or pease.
 
 99. The incident of the dove, then, is a miraculous occurrence with a
 definite meaning. The prophets in their messages concerning the
 kingdom of Christ, frequently make mention of doves (Ps 68, 13) and
 (Is 60, 8). Solomon also in his Song seems to mention the dove with
 particular pleasure. Therefore, we should not despise the picture this
 allegory holds before us, but treat its truth skillfully and aptly.
 
 100. The allegory of the raven, invented by the doctors, is well
 known. Because ravens delight in eating dead bodies, they have been
 taken as a likeness of carnal men, who delight in carnal pleasures and
 indulge in them. The Epicureans were an example. A very fair
 explanation but inadequate, because it is merely of that moral and
 philosophical sort which Erasmus was in the habit of giving after the
 example of Origen.
 
 101. We must look for a theological explanation. In the first place,
 those moralists fail to observe that Scripture commends the raven for
 not leaving the ark of his own will. He went out at the bidding of
 Noah, to ascertain if the waters had ceased and if God's wrath was
 ended. The raven, however, did not return, neither did he become a
 messenger of happy omen. He remained without the ark, and, though he
 came and went, yet he did not suffer himself to be taken by Noah.
 
 102. In all these points the allegory fittingly typifies the ministry
 of the Law. Black, the color of the bird, is a token of sadness, and
 the sound of his voice is unpleasant. This is true of the teachers of
 the Law, who teach justification by works. They are the ministers of
 death and sin, Paul calling the ministry of the Law a ministry of
 death, (2 Cor 3, 6). The Law is unto death (Rom 7, 10). The Law
 worketh wrath. (Rom 4, 15.) The Law entered that trespass might
 abound. (Rom 5, 20).
 
 103. And yet, Moses was sent forth by God with the Law, just as the
 raven was sent out by Noah. It is God's will that mankind be taught
 morality and holiness of life, and that wrath and sure punishments be
 announced to all who transgress the Law. Nevertheless, such teachers
 are naught but ravens wandering aimlessly about the ark; nor do they
 have the certain assurance that God is pacified.
 
 104. For, the Law is a teaching of such character that it cannot
 assure, strengthen and console an uneasy conscience, but rather
 terrifies it, since it only teaches what God requires of us, what he
 wishes to be performed by us. Our consciences bear witness against us
 that we not only have failed to carry out the will of God as set forth
 in the Law, but that we have done the very contrary.
 
 105. With all justice, therefore, we may say of the teachers of the
 Law, in the words of Psalms 5, 9: "There is no certainty in their
 mouth." Our translation has it "There is no faithfulness in their
 mouth." Their teaching at its best can only say: If you do this, if
 you do that, you will be saved. Christ speaks ironically when he
 answers the scribe who had grandly set forth the doctrine of the Law,
 by saying, "This do, and thou shalt live" (Lk 10, 28). He shows the
 scribe that the doctrine is holy and good, but since we are corrupt,
 it follows that we are guilty, since we do not, and cannot, fulfil the
 Law.
 
 106. Hence, we declare rightly that we are not justified by the works
 of the Law. By the works of the Law we mean, not the ceremonial
 commandments, but those highest commandments of all, to love God and
 our neighbor. The reason we are not justified is that we cannot keep
 the commandments. We have reason, however, to challenge the impudence
 of our opponents who set up the cry that we forbid good works and
 condemn the Law of God because we deny that justification is by works.
 This would be true if we did not admit that the raven was sent forth
 from the ark by Noah. But we do say that the raven was sent out from
 the ark. And this we deny, that it was not a raven, or that it was a
 dove. All the clamor, the abuse, the blasphemy of our opponents have
 no other purpose than to force us to declare that the raven was a
 dove.
 
 107. But now examine their books and carefully consider their
 doctrine. Is it anything but a doctrine of works? This is good, this
 is honorable, they say; this you must do; the other is dishonorable
 and wicked, hence you must not do it. On the strength of such
 teaching, they believe themselves to be true theologians and doctors.
 But let them show us the person who either has done or will do all
 those things, especially if you present, not only the second table of
 the Law, as they do, but also the first one.
 
 108. He who takes his stand upon this doctrine of the Law, then, is
 truly nothing but a hearer. He does not learn anything except its
 demands. Since such persons have no desire to learn anything further,
 it should suffice for them if they are given the poem of Cato, or
 given Esop, whom I consider a better teacher of morals. These two
 writers are profitable reading for young men. Older persons should
 study Cicero, who, to my astonishment, is considered by some as
 inferior to Aristotle in the sphere of ethics. This would be a
 rational course of study. So far as imparting moral precepts is
 concerned, the good intentions and the assiduity of the heathen must
 be commended. Yet they are inferior to Moses. He sets forth not only
 morality, but also teaches the true worship of God. Nevertheless, he
 who places his trust solely in Moses has nothing but the raven
 wandering aimlessly about outside of the ark. Of the dove and the
 olive branch, he has nothing.
 
 109 The raven, then, represents not only the Law given by God, but all
 laws and all philosophy which are the product of human reason and
 wisdom. They tell us no more than what ought to be done and do not
 provide the strength to do it. The judgment of Christ is true: "When
 ye shall have done all the things that are commanded you, say, We are
 unprofitable servants" (Lk 17, 10).
 
 110. True the raven is sent out. God desires the Law to be taught. He
 reveals it from heaven; yea, he writes it upon the hearts of all men,
 as Paul proves (Rom 2, 15). From this inherent knowledge originated
 all writings of the saner philosophers, of Esop, Aristotle, Plato,
 Xenophon, Cicero and Cato. And these are not unfit to set before
 untrained and vicious persons, that their vile tendencies may be
 curbed to some extent.
 
 111. If, however, you seek for peace of conscience and for certain
 hope of eternal life, such philosophers are like the raven, which
 wanders around the ark, finding no peace outside, but not looking for
 it within. Paul says of the Jews, "Israel, following after a law of
 righteousness, did not arrive at that law" (Rom 9, 31). The reason for
 this is in the fact that the Law is like the raven; it is either the
 ministry of death and sin or it produces hypocrites.
 
 112. Now, let those who wish, follow out this allegory by studying the
 nature of the raven. It is an impure bird, of somber and funereal
 color, with a strong beak and a harsh, shrill voice. It scents dead
 bodies from a great distance, and therefore men fear its voice as a
 certain augury of an impending death. It feeds upon carrion and enjoys
 localities made foul by public executions.
 
 113. Though I would not apply each and every one of these
 characteristics to the Law, yet who does not see how well they fit the
 servants of the Pope, the mass-priests and the monks, who were not
 only richly fed upon the slaughter of consciences by their false
 doctrines, but also used the dead bodies to obtain their livelihood,
 since they made a paying business out of their vigils, their
 anniversaries, their purifying water used in burials, and even of
 purgatory itself. And surely, this devotion to the dead was more
 profitable to them than their care of the living.
 
 Truly, then, they are ravens, feeding on corpses and sitting upon them
 with wild cries. Not only may the popish priests be fitly likened to
 the ravens, but indeed the whole ministry of the papacy, where it is
 at its best, does nothing but to gash and murder consciences. It does
 not show the way to true righteousness, but merely makes hypocrites,
 as does the Law.
 
 114. Among other crimes of false prophets, Ezekiel enumerates (ch 13,
 19) the fact that, for handfuls of barley and for pieces of bread,
 they slay souls that should not die, and save the souls alive that
 should not live. This is true of these ravens, the teachers of the
 Law. They call those righteous who live according to the letter of the
 Law, and yet these are the very souls which do not live. On the other
 hand, they condemn those who violate their traditions, just as the
 Pharisees condemned the disciples when they plucked ears of corn, when
 they did not wash their hands and when they failed to fast. This is an
 outcry, fierce and dismal, reminding us of ravens which sit upon
 corpses.
 
 115. When cursing a wicked person, the Greeks said, "To the ravens!"
 Similarly, the Germans use the expression, "May the ravens devour
 you." If we make this curse an element of the allegory, its serious
 character becomes evident. For what is more deplorably disastrous than
 to have teachers, the outcome of whose best teaching is death, and who
 ensnare the conscience with difficulties that cannot be disentangled?
 Though some say this allegory of the raven is inaptly applied to the
 priesthood, it is true nevertheless and agrees with the fundamental
 truth, and it is not only most apt, but very profitable for
 instruction.
 
 116. On the other hand, the incident of the dove is a most delightful
 picture of the gospel, especially if you carefully consider the
 characteristics of the dove. Ten of these are usually enumerated: 1.
 It is without guile. 2. It does not harm with its mouth. 3. It does
 not harm with its claws. 4. It gathers pure grains. 5. It nourishes
 the young of others. 6. Its song is a sigh. 7. It abides by the
 waters. 8. It flies in flocks. 9. It nests in safe places. 10. Its
 flight is swift. These ten characteristics have been set forth in six
 verses, as follows:
 
   Free from guile is the dove; the bite of her beak does not injure;
     Wounds her claws do not strike; pure is the grain that she eats.
   Frequent and swift is her flight to shining courses of water.
     List to her voice, and lo! sighs you will hear but no song!
   Other nestlings she rears; in swarms she flies through the ether.
     Safe is the place and high where she prepares her abode.
 
 117. The New Testament tells us the Holy Spirit appeared in the form
 of a dove (Mt 3, 16). Hence, we are justified in using the dove as an
 allegory of the ministry of grace.
 
 118. Moses implies that the dove did not fly aimlessly about the ark,
 as did the raven, but having been sent out and finding no place to
 rest, it returned to the ark and was seized by Noah.
 
 119. This dove is a picture of the holy prophets sent to teach the
 people; but the flood, that is, the time of the Law, had not yet
 passed away. Thus David, Elias, Isaiah, though they did not live to
 see the time of the New Testament, were yet sent as messengers with
 the tidings that the flood would eventually be brought to an end,
 though that time was at a distance. Having delivered their message,
 they returned to the ark; that is, they were justified and saved
 without the Law, by faith in the blessed seed, in which they believed
 and for which they longed.
 
 120. After this, another dove was sent forth, which found the earth
 dried, and not only the mountains, but also the trees, standing free
 from water. But she alighted upon an olive tree, plucked a branch, and
 brought it back to Noah.
 
 121. The allegorical meaning of this incident is interpreted by the
 Scriptures. The olive tree is very often used as a symbol of grace, of
 mercy or of forgiveness of sins. The dove brings the branch in her
 beak, thus typifying the outward ministry, or the spoken Word. For the
 Holy Spirit does not teach by new revelations aside from the ministry
 of the Word, as the enthusiasts and Anabaptists, those truly fanatical
 teachers, dream. It was the will of God that a branch from a living
 olive tree should be carried to Noah in the mouth of the bird, to
 teach that in the New Testament, the time of the flood or anger being
 past, God desires to set his mercy before the world by the spoken
 Word.
 
 122. The messengers of this Word are doves; that is, sincere men,
 without guile, and filled with the Holy Spirit. Isaiah 60, 8, likens
 ministers of the Gospel or of grace to doves which fly to their
 windows. And, though Christ commands them to imitate the harmlessness
 of doves, Mt 10, 16, meaning that they should be sincere and free from
 venom, yet, he admonishes them to be wise like serpents; that is, they
 should be wary of false and cunning people, and cautious like the
 serpent, which is said to shield its head with special skill in a
 fight.
 
 123. The green freshness of the olive branch, also, is a type of the
 Word of the Gospel, which endureth forever and is never without fruit.
 Psalms 1, 3 likens those who study the Word to a tree, the leaves of
 which do not wither. We heard nothing like this above concerning the
 raven, which flew to and fro near the ark. This second dove which was
 sent forth is a type of the New Testament, where grace and the
 forgiveness of sins are promised openly through the sacrifice of
 Christ. This is why the Holy Spirit chose to appear in the form of a
 dove in the New Testament.
 
 124. The third dove did not return. After the fulfilment of the
 promise given the whole world through the mouth of the dove, no new
 teaching is to be looked for, but we simply await the revelation of
 those things which we believe. Herein is certain testimony for us that
 the Gospel will endure unto the end of the world.
 
 125. The text, furthermore, specifies the time Noah waited after he
 had first sent forth a dove, namely, seven days. These seven days
 typify the time of the Law which, of necessity, preceded the period of
 the New Testament.
 
 126. We read, likewise, that the second dove returned at dusk,
 carrying the olive branch. To the Gospel the last age of the world has
 been assigned. Nor should we look for another kind of doctrine, for it
 is to an evening meal that Christ compared the Gospel (Mt 22, 2; Lk
 14, 16).
 
 127. True, the doctrine of the Gospel has been in the world since the
 fall of our first parents, and the Lord confirmed this promise to the
 patriarchs by various signs. The first ages knew nothing of the
 rainbow, nor of circumcision, nor of other signs afterward ordained by
 God. But all ages have known of the blessed seed. Since it has been
 revealed, there remains nothing else than the revelation of that which
 we believe. With the third dove, we shall fly away to that other life,
 never to return to the life here, so wretched and so full of grief.
 
 128. These are my thoughts concerning this allegory. I have set them
 forth briefly, for we must not tarry with them as we do with
 historical narratives and articles of faith.
 
 129. Origen, Jerome, Augustine, and Bernard seek diligently for
 allegories. But this practice has one drawback. The more attention
 they direct to allegories, the more do they draw it away from the
 facts of sacred history and from faith, to the exclusion of these more
 important things. Allegories should be employed for the purpose of
 inducing and increasing, of explaining and strengthening, that faith
 of which all the stories treat. It is not to be wondered at, that
 persons who do not seek faith in the stories of the Bible, look for
 the region of allegorical shades as a pleasant playground in which to
 stroll about.
 
 130. Just as in the popish Church false and unscriptural words are
 rendered in sweet music, so learned men have too often spoiled the
 good meaning of a Bible story, which contains a useful lesson of
 faith, by their childish allegories.
 
 131. I have often spoken of the kind of theology that prevailed when I
 began to study. Its advocates said that the letter killeth (2 Cor 3,
 6). Therefore I disliked Lyra most of all interpreters, because he
 followed the literal meaning so carefully. But now I prefer him, for
 this very reason, to all interpreters of Scripture.
 
 132. I advise you as strongly as I can to fully appreciate the great
 value of the Bible history. But whenever you wish to employ allegory,
 take pains to follow the analogy of faith; that is, make the allegory
 agree with Christ, with the Church, with faith, with the ministry of
 the Gospel. If constructed in this manner, allegories will not go
 astray from faith, even though they may not be genuine in every point.
 This foundation shall remain firm, while the stubble perishes. But let
 us return to our story.
 
 
 IV. NOAH AND HIS FALL.
 
    A. NOAH.
 
       1. Noah's character before the flood 133.
 
       2. Noah's character after the flood 134.
 
       3. Way Noah executed his office as bishop 135.
 
       4. Way he executed his office as a civil ruler 136.
 
 
 IV. NOAH AND HIS FALL.
 
 A. Noah.
 
 Vs. 20-22. _And Noah began to be a husbandman, and planted a vineyard;
 and he drank of the wine, and was drunken; and he was uncovered within
 his tent. And Ham, the father of Canaan, saw the nakedness of his
 father, and told his two brethren without._
 
 133. What manner of man Noah was during the flood, is shown
 sufficiently by the story of the flood itself. What manner of man he
 had been before the flood, is shown by Moses' declaration that he was
 righteous and perfect. Great as this man was, we hear nothing else
 about him, except that his wonderful and almost incredible continence
 is faintly suggested and commended by the statement that he begat his
 first born when five hundred years of age. This very fact shows that
 human nature was by far stronger in its integrity at that time, and
 that the Holy Spirit held more perfect sway in the holy men of the
 early world than He does in us who are, as it were, the dregs and the
 remnants of the world's production.
 
 It surely was a commendatory record for Noah to be accorded righteous
 and perfect before God; that is, full of faith and of the Holy Spirit,
 adorned with chastity and all good works, pure in worship and
 religion, suffering many temptations from the devil, the world, and
 himself, all which he overcame triumphantly. Such was Noah before the
 flood.
 
 134. Of his life after the flood, Moses tells us very little. But is
 it not apparent that so noble a man, living for about 350 years after
 the flood, could not be idle, but must have been busy with the
 government of the Church, which he alone established and ruled?
 
 135. First of all, then, he performed the duties of a bishop. Beset
 with various temptations, his foremost endeavor was to resist the
 devil, to console the troubled ones, to bring back the erring to the
 true way, to strengthen the doubting, to cheer souls in despair, to
 exclude from his Church the impenitent, and to receive back with
 fatherly gladness the repentant. For, these are the duties a bishop
 must perform through the ministry of the Word.
 
 136. Moreover, he had civil duties in establishing forms of government
 and in making laws, without which human passions cannot be held in
 check. To this was added the rule of his own household, or the care of
 his home.
 
 
 B. NOAH'S FALL.
 
    1. Why Moses omitted many important things about Noah and related
       his fall 137-138.
 
    2. Lyra tries to excuse Noah's fall 139.
 
    3. Noah's fall cannot be excused 140-141.
 
    4. His fall caused a great scandal 142.
 
    5. Ham scandalized himself through it 142-143.
 
       a. Real root of this scandal 144.
 
       b. Thereby Noah greatly sinned 145ff.
 
        * Original sin develops presumptuous people 146-148.
 
       c. This scandal reveals Satan's bitterest enmity against God's
          Church 149.
 
        * Papists are Ham's disciples 150.
 
        * David's enemies rejoiced over his fall 151.
 
    6. To what end should Noah's fall serve us 152-154.
 
     * The godless are not worthy to see God's glory in believers 155.
 
     * Why we should not be vexed at the infirmities of believers
       156-157.
 
    7. The conduct of Shem and Japheth in this connection 158-173.
 
       a. They still honored their father, though they approved not his
          deed 158.
 
        * Origin of outward sin 159.
 
        * How to avoid offense 160-162.
 
        * Luther aware of his own infirmities 163.
 
        * Attitude of the opponents of the Word to true preachers 164.
 
        * Why Moses never mentioned many great events in Noah's life,
          and thought of his fall 165-166.
 
       b. How the sons covered their father's shame 167.
 
       c. Herein they had regard for God's will and were therefore
          pleasing to God 168.
 
        * Ham's scandal.
 
          (1) It was a wilful and grievous sin 168-169.
 
          (2) The lesson we may learn from it 170.
 
          (3) Reward of this scandalous deed, and why Canaan is here
              mentioned 172-173.
 
 
 B. Noah's Fall.
 
 137. Though reason tells us that Noah was burdened with these manifold
 duties after the flood, yet Moses does not mention them. It appears to
 him sufficient to confine his remarks to the statement that Noah began
 to plant a vineyard, and that he lay in his tent drunken and naked.
 
 This, surely, is a foolish and very useless tale in comparison with
 the many praiseworthy acts he must have performed in the course of so
 many years. Other things might have been recorded for edification and
 for teaching righteousness of life. But this story even seems to
 endorse an offense, by abetting drunkards and those who sin in
 drunkenness.
 
 138. The purpose of the Holy Spirit, however, is apparent from what we
 have said. It is to console by this record of the great sins committed
 by the holiest and most perfect patriarchs those righteous persons who
 are discouraged by the knowledge of their own weakness and are,
 therefore, cast down. In them we are to find proofs of our own
 shortcomings, that we may come to humble confession and, at the same
 time, seek and hope for forgiveness. This is the real and
 theologically true reason why the Holy Spirit records, rather than
 seemingly more important matters, the great fall of this grand man.
 
 139. Lyra states as excuse for Noah that he knew not the power of wine
 and was deceived into drinking a little too freely. Whether wine had
 been known before or whether Noah began to cultivate it by his own
 skill and by divine suggestion, I know not, but I believe that Noah
 knew the nature of this produce quite well, and that he had often made
 use of wine in company with his family, partly for his own person and
 partly also in his offerings or libations. I think that in making use
 of wine for his own refreshment, he partook of it too freely.
 
 140. His action I excuse in no way. Should anyone want to do so, there
 would be weightier arguments than those Lyra uses. According to him
 this aged man, tired out by the great number of his daily duties and
 cares, had been overpowered by the wine although he was already used
 to it. For wine overcomes more easily those who are either exhausted
 by much work or burdened with age. Persons of mature age, on the other
 hand, and such of care-free mind, can drink considerable quantities of
 wine without greatly impairing their reason.
 
 141. But he who makes this excuse for the patriarch, wilfully casts
 aside that consolation which the Holy Spirit considered needful for
 the Church, that even the greatest saints sometimes fall into sin.
 
 142. Transgression like this may seem to be slight, yet it causes
 great offense. Not only is Ham offended, but also the other brother,
 possibly also their wives. And we must not imagine that Ham was a boy
 of seven years. Having been born when Noah was five hundred years old,
 he had reached an age of at least one hundred years and had one or two
 children of his own.
 
 143. Hence, it was not boyish thoughtlessness which caused Ham to
 laugh at his father, as boys will do when surrounding a drunken rustic
 in the street and making sport of him. He was truly offended by his
 father's sin and thought himself to be more righteous, holy and
 religious than his father. Noah's deed was an offense not only in
 appearance, but in very truth, since Ham was so far tempted by the
 knowledge of it that he passed judgment upon Noah, and found in such
 sin an occasion for mirth.
 
 144. If we wish to judge Ham's sin aright, we must take into account
 original sin, that is, the wickedness of the heart. This son would
 never have derided his father for being overcome by wine had he not
 first dismissed from his soul that reverence and esteem which God's
 commandment requires children to cherish toward their parents.
 
 145. Noah had been considered a fool before the flood, by the majority
 of mankind, and had been condemned as a false teacher and despised as
 a man of wild ideas. Now he is laughed at by his son as a fool, and
 condemned as a sinner. Noah was sole governor of the Church and State,
 and ruled his own household with tireless care and labor. He had
 doubtless therein offended the proud and haughty spirit of his son in
 many ways. But the depravity of his heart which now, that the father's
 sin had become manifest, leaped to the surface, had so far been
 successfully concealed.
 
 146. When we consider the source of Ham's sin, its hideousness first
 appears in its true light. One never becomes an adulterer or commits
 murder until he has first cast out of his heart the fear of God. A
 pupil does not rebel against his teacher unless he has first lost due
 reverence for that teacher. The fourteenth Psalm, verse 2, says that
 Jehovah looked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if
 there were any that did understand, and that did seek after God. When
 he saw there was none he adds there was none who did good; that they
 had all become worthless, sinning tongues, sinning with their hands,
 fearing where there was no need of fear, and the like.
 
 147. So Ham, in his own estimation, was wise and holy. In his judgment
 his father had often acted unrighteously or foolishly. His attitude
 discloses a heart that despised, not only the parent, but also the
 divine commandment. Hence, nothing remains for the evil-minded son but
 to grasp an opportunity for obtaining evidence to betray his father's
 foolishness. He does not laugh at his drunken father as a boy would,
 nor does he call his brethren merely that they may look upon a
 laughable spectacle. He means that this shall be open proof that God
 has withdrawn from his father and has accepted himself. Therefore, he
 takes delight in disclosing his father's sin to others. As I said
 before, Ham was not a boy of seven years, but had reached the age of
 at least one hundred.
 
 148. Original sin shows its depraving tendency in that it makes men
 arrogant, haughty and conceited. Paul admonishes in Romans 12, 3, to
 think of one's self soberly, "according as God hath dealt to each man
 a measure of faith." But, original sin does not permit Ham to occupy
 this lowly level; hence, he presumes to go beyond his station in
 passing judgment upon his father.
 
 149. We observe the same attitude in Absalom. Before he stirs up a
 rebellion against David, his father, he passes unrighteous judgment
 upon David's government. This dissatisfaction with his father's rule
 was afterward followed by unconcealed contempt and open violence, with
 David's destruction as the object. Ham's heart being full of poison
 which he had gathered from his father as a spider gathers poison from
 the fairest rose, precisely such a result had to follow.
 
 150. These examples serve to call our attention to the battle waged
 from the beginning of the world between the Church and Satan with his
 followers, the hypocrites, or false brethren. This deed of Ham must
 not be looked upon as a result of boyish love of pranks, but of
 Satan's most bitter enmity, wherewith he inflames his followers
 against the Church. Particularly does he incite them against those in
 the ministry, leading them to close watch at all times for material
 available for purposes of slander.
 
 The Papists at present have no other business than to watch our
 conversation for the purpose of slander. Whenever we fall into human
 error (for we are truly weak and are beset by our failings), they
 seize upon our moral uncleanness, like famished swine, and find great
 delight in publishing and betraying our weaknesses, like Ham the
 accursed. They truly hunger and thirst after our offenses. Although by
 God's grace they cannot fasten adultery, murder or like errors upon
 us, unless by their own fabrication (this shameless class of people
 abhor no kind of lie), yet they gather up smaller matters, which they
 afterward exaggerate to the public.
 
 151. David's experience is well known. He was surrounded on all sides
 by enemies who eagerly sought out every opportunity for persecution.
 They were envious because he had been called to the throne by God;
 hence, they triumphed over his horrible fall.
 
 152. His case, however, serves for our instruction. God sometimes
 permits even righteous and holy men to stumble and fall into offenses,
 either really or apparently, and we must take heed lest we pass
 judgment at once, after the example of Ham, who, having secretly
 despised his father long before, now does so openly. He declared that
 his parent, being imbecile by age, had clearly been deserted by the
 Holy Spirit, since he was unable to guard against drunkenness, though
 the government of the Church, State, and household lay upon his
 shoulders. O wretched Ham, how happy art thou, having found at last
 what thou soughtest--poison in a most delightful rose!
 
 153. Everlasting praises and blessings be given to God, whose dealings
 with his saints are wonderful indeed. While he permits them to be weak
 and to fall, to be overwhelmed with disgrace and offenses, and while
 the world judges and condemns them, he forgives them their weaknesses
 and has compassion upon them; whereas he delivers into Satan's hands
 those who regard themselves angels, and utterly rejects them.
 
 The first lesson of this story is that godly persons have the needed
 consolation against their infirmities when they see that even the
 holiest men sometimes fell most disgracefully by reason of similar
 infirmities.
 
 154. In the second place, the case of Ham is a fearful example of
 divine judgment, to teach us by Ham's experience not to condemn at
 once, even when we see rulers of State, Church, or household--such as
 our parents--fall into error and sin. Who can tell why God so permits?
 Such sins must not be excused, yet we see that they are of value for
 the consolation of the pious. They teach us that God can bear with the
 errors and sins of his people and that even we, when beset with sins,
 may trust in the mercy of God and need not lose heart.
 
 155. But what is medicine for the righteous, is poison for the wicked.
 The latter do not seek to be taught and comforted by God. Their
 unworthiness prevents them from recognizing his glory in the saints.
 They see nothing but the stumbling block and the snare, with the
 result that they fall and are left to perish alone.
 
 156. Let us, therefore, truly respect those in authority over us. If
 they fall, we must not be offended. We must remember that they are
 human, and that God's ways are wonderful in his saints, because it is
 his will that the wicked shall be offended and provoked. Thus Moses
 threatens the Jews: "I will provoke them to anger with a foolish
 nation" (Deut 32, 21). Because, during the whole period of the
 kingdom, they refused to hear the prophets, God gave the offense of
 casting away a wise and religious people, which had the promises and
 was descended from the patriarchs. In its place, he chose the filth
 and dregs of the world, a foolish people; that is, it was without
 piety, without religion, without worship, without that divine wisdom
 which is his Word. This offense roused the Jews to insane anger.
 
 157. This will be the lot of the papists. Some great offense shall be
 given them by God against which they shall find themselves helpless,
 and thus they shall come to grief like Ham. Renouncing the reverence
 due both to God and his father, in deeming himself more capable of
 ruling the Church than Noah, in secretly deriding or censuring his
 parent, he finally presents the spectacle of disclosing his wicked and
 irreverent attitude before others.
 
 158. The two other brothers, Shem and Japheth, did not follow Ham's
 wicked example. While conscious of the scandalous fact that their
 father was drunk and lay in shameless nakedness like a little
 boy,--while recognizing that this ill became the ruler of Church and
 State, they remained mindful of the reverence due a parent. They
 gulped down the offense given; they hid the offense and gave it a
 worthier aspect, so to speak, by covering their father with a garment,
 approaching him with eyes averted. They would have been incapable of
 this fine outward expression of reverence for their father, had they
 not occupied a correct attitude toward God in their hearts and
 believed their father to be both priest and ruler by right divine.
 
 159. It is a fearful example, this one of Ham. Though one of the few
 saved during the flood, he forgets all piety. It is profitable to
 carefully consider how he came to fall. Outward sins must first be
 committed in our minds; that is, before sins are visibly committed,
 the heart first departs from the Word and from the fear of God. It
 neither knows God nor seeks after him, as we read in Psalms 14, 2. As
 soon as the heart begins to set aside the Word, and to despise the
 ministers and prophets of God, ambition and pride follow. Those who
 stand in the way of our desires are overborne by hatred and slander,
 until finally insolent speech ends in murder.
 
 160. Those who are to become rulers of Church or State, should daily
 pray earnestly to God that they may remain humble. It is the object of
 stories of this character to set this duty before us, for it is
 evident what occasioned Ham's frightful fall.
 
 161. If, then, the saints fall into sin, let us not be offended. Much
 less should we rejoice over the weakness of others, haughtily
 esteeming ourselves braver, wiser, or holier than they. Let us rather
 endure and cover up, and even put a good construction upon and excuse
 such errors in so far as we can, remembering that perhaps tomorrow we
 may suffer what happened to them today. For we all constitute a unit,
 being born of the same flesh. Let us then heed the advice of Paul,
 "Let him that thinketh he standeth, take heed lest he fall" (1 Cor 10,
 12). In this way the other two brothers looked upon their drunken
 father. Their thoughts were these: Behold, our father has fallen. But
 God is wonderful in his dealing with saints, whom he sometimes permits
 to fall for our instruction, that we may not despair when afflicted by
 kindred infirmity.
 
 162. Let us imitate their wisdom! The sins of others give us no right
 to judge them. Before their own master they stand or fall (Rom 14, 4).
 Furthermore, if the downfall of others displease us (since, in truth,
 many acts neither can nor ought to be excused), let us be so much the
 more careful lest something like it overtake ourselves. Let us not sit
 in proud and haughty judgment, for this is original sin in all its
 corruption: To lay claim to exceptional wisdom and to hunt for the
 moral lapses of others in order to gain the reputation of
 righteousness for ourselves.
 
 163. We truly are weak sinners and must freely confess, being human,
 that our conversation is not always free from offense. But while we
 share this weakness with our enemies, we nevertheless do our duty
 diligently, by spreading God's Word, by teaching the churches, by
 bettering the evil, by urging the right, by consoling the weak, by
 chiding the stubborn, and, in brief, by doing whatever duty God lays
 upon us.
 
 164. On the other hand since our adversaries strive after nothing but
 hypocrisy and an outward show of holiness, so they add to the frailty
 which they have in common with us, the most grievous sins, because
 they do not follow their calling, but concern themselves with their
 honors and emoluments. They neglect the churches and suffer them to
 miserably decay. They condemn the true doctrine and teach idolatry. In
 short, in public life they are wise, but in their own sphere they are
 utterly foolish. This is the most destructive evil in the Church.
 
 165. This is the first part of the story, and, in the preparation of
 his record, Moses has confined himself to the same. It is certain that
 Noah was a righteous man, gifted with many heroic virtues, and that he
 accomplished most important things both for the Church and for the
 State. It is not possible either to establish political communities or
 to found churches except by diligent effort. Life, in both these
 manifestations (I will say nothing of the management of the home) is
 beset with many dangers; for Satan, a liar and murderer, is the most
 relentless enemy of Church and State.
 
 166. But Moses passes by all these achievements, not so much as
 alluding to them. He records but this one circumstance--that Noah
 became drunk and was scoffed at by his youngest son. He intended it as
 a valuable example, teaching pious souls to trust in God's mercy. On
 the other hand, the proud, the lovers of cant, the sanctimonious, the
 wise-acres,--let them learn to fear God and beware of passing a
 reckless judgment upon others! As Manasseh the king declares, God
 displays in his saints both his wonders and his terrors "against
 wicked and sinful men." This is illustrated in the case of Ham, who
 did not now first come to his downfall but had cherished this hate
 against his father for a long time, afterward to fill the world with
 idolatry.
 
 Vs. 23-27. _And Shem and Japheth took a garment, and laid it upon both
 their shoulders, and went backward, and covered the nakedness of their
 father; and their faces were backward, and they saw not their father's
 nakedness. And Noah awoke from his wine, and knew what his youngest
 son had done unto him. And he said, Cursed be Canaan; a servant of
 servants shall he be unto his brethren._
 
 167. It is truly a beautiful and memorable example of respect to a
 father which Moses records in this passage. The sons might without sin
 have approached their father and covered him, while turning their
 faces toward him. What sin should it be if one, happening upon a nude
 person, should see what is before him without his will? Still the two
 sons do not do this. When they heard from their haughty and mocking
 brother what had happened to their father, they laid a garment upon
 both their shoulders, entered the tent with faces turned away (how
 admirable!), and lowering the garment backward, covered their father.
 
 168. Who can fail to observe here the thoughtfulness of the will and
 Word of God, and reverence before the majesty of fatherhood, which God
 requires to be honored, not despised or mocked by children? God seems
 to approve this reverence and accept it as a most pleasing offering
 and the very noblest worship and obedience. But his utmost hatred
 rests upon Ham, who might have seen without sin what he saw, since it
 came to his view by chance, if only he had covered it up, if only he
 had remained silent about it, if only he had not shown himself to be
 pleased by the sin of his father. But he who despised God, the Word,
 and the order established by God, not only failed to cover his father
 with a garment, but even derided him and left him naked.
 
 169. In describing the act of the two brothers Moses emphasizes the
 malice of Ham, who was filled with violent and satanic hatred against
 his father. Who of us, on finding a stranger lying by the wayside
 drunk and nude, would not at least cover him with his own coat to
 forestall disgrace? How much greater the demand in this case of a
 father! Ham, however, fails to do for his father, the highest ruler of
 the world, what common humanity teaches us to do for strangers.
 Moreover he publishes the circumstance joyfully, insulting his drunken
 father and making the sin of his father known to his brothers as if he
 had a piece of good news.
 
 170. Moses, therefore, sets Ham before us as a fearful example, to be
 carefully taught in the churches, in order that young people may learn
 to respect their elders, rulers, and parents. Not on account of Noah,
 not on account of Ham, but on account of those to come--on our
 account--is this story written, and Ham, with his contempt for God and
 father, pictured in most repulsive colors.
 
 171. Also the punishment of this wickedness is carefully set before
 us. Noah, looked upon by his son as a foolish, insane, and ridiculous
 old man, now steps forth in the majesty of a prophet, to announce to
 his son a divine revelation of future events. Truly does Paul declare
 that "power is made perfect in weakness" (2 Cor 12, 9); for the
 certainty characterizing Noah's utterance is proof that he was filled
 with the Holy Spirit, notwithstanding that his son had mocked and
 despised him as one utterly deserted by the Holy Spirit.
 
 172. I will not attempt here to settle the question above referred to
 (ch 5, para 95) concerning the order of the sons of Noah, as to which
 of them was the first-born and which the youngest. A point more worthy
 of our attention is the fact that the Holy Spirit is so filled with
 strong wrath against that disobedient and scornful son that he does
 not even choose to call him by his own name, but calls him Canaan
 after the name of his son. Some say that, because God had desired to
 save Ham in the ark as one under his blessing the same as the others,
 he had no wish to curse him, but cursed Canaan instead, a curse which,
 nevertheless, could not but recoil upon Ham who had provoked it. Thus
 Ham's name perishes here, since the Holy Spirit hates it, whose hatred
 is, indeed, a serious hatred. We read in the psalm, "I hate them with
 perfect hatred" (Ps 139, 22). When the Holy Spirit exercises his
 wrath, eternal death must follow.
 
 173. Although Ham had sinned against his father in many ways, it is
 remarkable that the fruit of the first sin and the devil's malice did
 not become manifest until the father lay drunk and bare. When, with
 this sin, the previous ones had attained to fullness of power and
 growth, the Holy Spirit condemned him, and, as a warning to others,
 also announced the infliction of impending, endless servitude.
 
 V. 26. _And he said, Blessed be Jehovah, the God of Shem; and let
 Canaan be his servant._
 
 These are two sublime prophecies, worthy of close attention. They have
 significance in our time, though they were grossly garbled by the
 Jews. The Jews observe that Ham is cursed thrice; this fact they wrest
 to the glory of their own nation, promising themselves worldly
 dominion.
 
 
 V. HAM CURSED; SHEM AND JAPHETH BLESSED.
 
    A. THE CURSE PRONOUNCED UPON HAM 174-188.
 
       1. Why Ham was thrice cursed 174.
 
        * Disrespect of parents, pastors and authority signs of
          approaching misfortune 175.
 
       2. Way Ham disregarded the curse 176.
 
       3. Why Ham disregarded the curse 177-178.
 
       4. Ham's temporal prosperity continued with his curse 179-181.
 
        * Faith alone grasps God's threatenings and promises 180-181.
 
        * Reason God postpones punishment and reward 181-182.
 
        * The Papal Church is not the true Church 183.
 
        * Believers have comfort in their tribulations 184-185.
 
        * The pious have their kingdom here in faith 186.
 
       5. From this curse it is clear Noah was enlightened by the Holy
          Spirit 187.
 
        * Were all Ham's descendents cursed? 188.
 
    B. BLESSING PRONOUNCED UPON SHEM 189-191.
 
       1. This is an exceedingly great blessing 189.
 
       2. Why is it clothed in praise to God 190.
 
       3. This blessing proves that Noah possessed a precious light
          191.
 
    C. BLESSING PRONOUNCED UPON JAPHETH 192-224.
 
       1. Why the form of Japheth's blessing differed from that of
          Shem's 192.
 
       2. Herein lies a special secret 193.
 
       3. The Jews' false interpretation of this blessing 194.
 
       4. Relation of these two blessings to each other 195.
 
        * The Jews' false notion about Shem's blessing 196.
 
       5. The order in which these blessings are enjoyed 197-198.
 
        * The form God's Church takes in this world 199.
 
        * Divine promises and threatenings to be understood in a
          spiritual sense 199-200.
 
        * Ham and Cain resemble one another in their positions and
          works 201.
 
        * The Turk and the Pope.
 
          a. What strengthens them in their opposition to the true
             Church 202.
 
           * How a Christian should conduct himself in times of
             misfortunes 203.
 
          b. The power and advantages of the Turk and Pope of no avail
             204.
 
          c. Attitude of Church members to their pride 205-206.
 
           * Why Ham's name was not mentioned when he was cursed
             207-208.
 
       6. The word dilatet the Latins use in explaining Japheth's
          blessing 209-210.
 
          a. It is not in harmony with the Hebrew 209-210.
 
          b. Why all Latin interpreters use it 211.
 
          c. It does not fully express the sense of the Holy Spirit
             212.
 
          d. What explanation should be given here 213-215.
 
       7. All descendents of Japheth partake of this blessing through
          the Gospel 216-217.
 
       8. Translations of Latin interpreters of this blessing are to be
          harmonized with the original text 218-219.
 
        * Ham's name 220-221.
 
          a. Its meaning and reason his parents gave it to him 220.
 
          b. The hope of his parents in this name disappointed 221.
 
       9. It is ascribed to this promise that Germany in these last
          days received the light of the Gospel 222.
 
        * Abraham had Noah as his teacher 223.
 
        * The temporal prosperity of Ham's family, and their wickedness
          224.
 
 
 V. HAM CURSED; SHEM AND JAPHETH BLESSED.
 
 A. The Curse Pronounced Upon Ham.
 
 174. But there is another reason for this repeatedly uttered curse.
 God cannot forget such great irreverence toward parents, nor does he
 suffer it to go unpunished. He requires that parents and rulers be
 regarded with reverence. He requires that elders be honored,
 commanding that one shall rise up before a hoary head (Lev 19, 32).
 And, speaking of ministers of the Word, he says, "He that despiseth
 you, despiseth me" (Mt 10, 40; Lk 10, 16).
 
 175. Hence disobedience of parents is a sure indication that curse and
 disaster are close at hand. Likewise is contempt of ministers and of
 rulers punished. When the people of the primitive world began to
 deride the patriarchs and to hold their authority in contempt, the
 flood followed. When, among the people of Judah, the child began to
 behave himself proudly against the old man, as Isaiah has it (ch 3,
 5), Jerusalem was laid waste and Judah went down. Such corruption of
 morals is a certain sign of impending evil. We justly fear for Germany
 a like fate when we look upon the prevailing disrespect for authority.
 
 176. Let us, however, bear witness of a practice to which both Holy
 Writ and our experience testify. Because God delays the threatened
 punishment he is mocked and considered a liar. In this practice we
 should see the seal, as it were, to every prophecy. Ham hears that he
 is accursed; but inasmuch as the curse does not go into immediate
 effect, he securely despises and derides the same.
 
 177. Thus did the first world hold Noah's prophecy in ridicule when he
 spoke of the flood. Had they believed that such a punishment was close
 at hand, would they have gone on in a feeling of security? Would they
 not rather have repented and begun a better life? If Ham had believed
 that to be true which he heard from his father, he would have sought
 refuge in mercy and, confessing his crime, craved forgiveness. But he
 did neither; rather did he haughtily leave his father, to go to
 Babylon. There, with his posterity, he gave himself up to the building
 of a city and of a tower, and made himself lord of all Greater Asia.
 
 178. What is the reason for this feeling of security? It lies in the
 fact that divine prophecies must be believed; they cannot be perceived
 by our senses, or by experience. This is true both of divine promises
 and of divine threats. Therefore the opposite always seems to the
 flesh to be true.
 
 179. Ham is cursed by his father; but he lays hold upon the greater
 portion of the earth and establishes vast kingdoms. On the other hand,
 Shem and Japheth are blessed, but in comparison with Ham, they and
 their posterity are beggarly.
 
 Where then are we to seek the truth of this prophecy? I answer: This
 prophecy and all others, whether they be promises or threats, cannot
 be understood by reason, but by faith alone. God delays both
 punishments and rewards; hence there is need of endurance. For "He
 that endureth to the end, the same shall be saved," as Christ says (Mt
 24, 13).
 
 180. The life of all pious people is wholly of faith and hope. The
 evidence of our senses, history, and the way of the world, would teach
 us the opposite. Ham is cursed, yet he alone obtains dominion. Shem
 and Japheth are blessed, yet they alone bear reproach and affliction.
 Since both the promises and the threats of God reach out into the
 future, the issue must be awaited in faith. Habakkuk says (ch 2, 3),
 "It will surely come, it will not delay."
 
 181. Great is the wrath of the Holy Spirit which here prompts him to
 say of Ham, "A servant of servants shall he be;" that is, the lowest
 and vilest of slaves. But if you let history speak, you will see Ham
 rule in Canaan, whereas Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, and others who
 followed, and had the blessing, lived like servants among the
 Canaanites. The Egyptians are Ham's offspring, and how cruel was the
 servitude Israel suffered there!
 
 182. How, then, was it true that Ham was cursed and Shem was blessed?
 In this way: The fulfillment of the promise and of the threat was in
 the future. This delay is ordained in order that the wicked may fill
 their measure of sin and may not be able to accuse God of having given
 them no room for repentance. On the other hand, when the righteous
 suffer at the hands of the unrighteous and become the servants of
 servants, they undergo such trial and discipline for the purpose of
 increasing in faith and in love toward God; so that, trained in
 manifold vexations and tribulations, they may attain the promise.
 
 When the time was fulfilled, the might of Ham's posterity was not
 great enough to withstand the posterity of Shem. Then, indeed, was
 fulfilled that curse which Ham and his posterity had so long despised
 and disbelieved.
 
 183. It is much the same with us today. We have the true doctrine and
 the true worship. Hence we can boast that we are the true Church,
 having the promise of spiritual blessings in Christ. As the pope's
 church condemns our doctrine, we know her to be not the Church of
 Christ but of Satan, and truly, like Ham, a "servant of servants." And
 yet anyone may see that the pope rules, while we are servants and the
 off-scouring, as Paul says (1 Cor 4, 12).
 
 184. What, then, shall we poor, oppressed people do? We are to comfort
 our souls meanwhile with our spiritual dominion. We know we have
 forgiveness of sins and a gracious God, through Christ, until also
 temporal freedom shall be vouchsafed on the last day. And we are not
 without traces of temporal freedom even in this life; for while
 tyrants stubbornly oppose the Gospel, they are cut off from the earth,
 root and branch.
 
 185. So was the Roman empire destroyed after all the other
 world-powers perished; but God's Word and Church remain forever.
 Likewise, Christ weakens the Pope's power, little by little; but that
 he may be utterly removed and become a servant of servants with wicked
 Ham is a matter for faith to await. Ham is shut out from the kingdom
 of God and possesses the kingdoms of the world for a time, just as the
 pope is shut out from the Church of God and holds temporal dominion
 for a time. But his dominion shall vanish.
 
 186. The divine law and order is that the righteous have dominion, but
 by faith, being satisfied with such spiritual blessing as a gracious
 God and the certain hope of the heavenly kingdom. Meanwhile, we leave
 possession of the kingdoms of the world to the wicked until God shall
 scatter also their worldly power, and, through Christ, make us heirs
 of all things.
 
 187. Furthermore, we learn from this prophecy that Noah, by a special
 illumination of the Holy Spirit, was enabled to see, in the first
 place, that his posterity would remain forever, and in the second
 place, that the family of Ham, though they were to be rulers for a
 time, would perish at last and above all would lose the spiritual
 blessing.
 
 188. However, the explanation given above (ch 4, para 182) with
 reference to the descendants of Cain, applies also here. I do not
 entertain the opinion that the offspring of Ham were doomed, without
 exception. Some found salvation by being converted to faith, but such
 salvation was not due to a definite promise but to uncovenanted grace,
 so to speak. Likewise the Gibeonites and others were saved when the
 children of Israel occupied the land of Canaan. Job, Naaman the
 Syrian, the people of Nineveh, the widow of Zarephath, and others from
 the heathen were saved, not by virtue of a promise, but by
 uncovenanted grace.
 
 B. Blessing Pronounced Upon Shem.
 
 189. But why does Noah not say, "Blessed be Shem," instead of,
 "Blessed be Jehovah, the God of Shem"? I answer that it is because of
 the magnitude of the blessing. The reference here is not to a temporal
 blessing, but to the future blessing through the promised seed. He
 sees this blessing to be so great that he cannot express it; hence, he
 turns to thanksgiving. It seems that Zacharias was thinking of this
 very passage when he said, for a similar reason, "Blessed be the Lord,
 the God of Israel" (Lk 1, 68).
 
 190. Noah's blessing takes the form of thanksgiving unto God. God, he
 says, is blessed, who is the God of Shem. In other words: It is
 needless for me to extend my blessing over Shem, who has been blessed
 before with spiritual blessing; he already is a child of God, and from
 him the Church will be continued, as it was continued from Seth before
 the flood. Full of wonderful meaning is the fact that Noah joins God
 with Shem, his son, and, as it were, unites them.
 
 191. Noah's heart must have been divinely illumined since he makes
 such a distinction between his sons, rejecting Ham with his posterity
 and placing Shem in line with the saints and the Church because the
 spiritual blessing, given in paradise concerning the seed, would rest
 upon him. Therefore, this holy man blesses God and gives thanks unto
 him.
 
 C. Blessing Pronounced Upon Japheth.
 
 V. 27. _God enlarge Japheth, and let him dwell in the tents of Shem;
 and let Canaan be his servant._
 
 192. This prophecy is wonderful for the aptness of each single word.
 Noah did not bless Shem, but the God of Shem, by way of giving thanks
 to God for having embraced Shem and having adorned him with a
 spiritual promise, or the blessing of the woman's seed. But when he
 mentions Japheth he does not employ the same manner of speaking as in
 the case of Shem. His words are chosen for the purpose of showing the
 mystery of which Paul speaks (Rom 11, 11) and Christ (Jn 4, 22), that
 salvation is from the Jews and yet the gentiles also became partakers
 of this salvation. Shem alone is the true root and stem, yet the
 heathen are grafted upon this stem, as a foreign branch, and become
 partakers of the fatness and the sap which are in the chosen tree.
 
 193. Noah, seeing this through the Holy Spirit, predicts, in dim
 allusions but correctly, that Christ's kingdom is to spread in the
 world from the root of Shem, and not from that of Japheth.
 
 194. The Jews prate that Japheth stands for the neighboring nations
 around Jerusalem which were admitted to the temple and its worship.
 But Noah makes little ado about the temple of Jerusalem, or the
 tabernacle of Moses; his words refer to greater matters. He treats of
 the three patriarchs who are to replenish the earth. While he affirms
 of Japheth that he does not belong to the root of the people of God
 which possesses the promise of the Christ, he declares that he shall
 be incorporated through the call of the Gospel into the fellowship of
 that people which has God and the promises.
 
 195. Here, then, we have a picture of the Church of the Gentiles and
 of the Jews. Ham, being wicked, is not admitted to the spiritual
 blessing of the seed, except as it happens by uncovenanted grace. To
 Japheth, however, though he has not the promise of the seed, like
 Shem, the hope is nevertheless given that he will, at some future
 time, be taken into the fellowship of the Church. Thus we Gentiles,
 being sons of Japheth, have no direct promise, indeed, and yet we are
 included in the promise given to the Jews, since we are predestined to
 the fellowship of the holy people of God. These matters are here
 recorded, not for Shem and Japheth so much as for their posterity.
 
 196. We learn why the Jews are so haughty and boastful. They see that
 Shem, their father, alone has the promise of eternal blessing, which
 is given through Christ. So far, so good. But when they believe that
 the promise pertains not to faith but rather to the carnal descent,
 they are in error. This subject has been splendidly treated by Paul
 (Rom 9, 6). There he establishes the fact that the children of Abraham
 are not his carnal descendants but those who have his faith (Gal 3,
 7).
 
 197. The same thought is suggested here by Moses, who says in so many
 words, "Blessed be Jehovah, the God of Shem." This shows that there is
 no blessing except by the God of Shem. Hence, no Jew will share this
 blessing unless he have the God of Shem; that is, unless he believes.
 Nor will Japheth share the blessing unless he dwells in the tents of
 Shem, that is, unless he associates himself with him in faith.
 
 198. This is a grand promise, valid unto the end of the world. But
 just as it is limited to those who have the God of Shem, that is, who
 believe, so the curse also is limited to those who abide in the
 wickedness of Ham. Noah spoke these words, not on the strength of
 human authority and feeling, but by the Spirit of God. His words then
 refer not to a temporal, but to a spiritual and eternal curse. Nor
 must we understand him to speak of a curse that is a curse only in the
 sight of the world, but rather of one in the sight of God.
 
 199. The same statement has been made heretofore (ch 4 para 182)
 regarding the curse of Cain. Judged by outward appearances, Cain
 obtained a greater earthly blessing than Seth. God desires that his
 Church in this world shall apparently suffer the curse pronounced upon
 the wicked and that, on the other hand, the wicked shall seem to be
 blessed. Cain was the first man to build a city, calling it Enoch;
 while Seth dwelt in tents.
 
 200. Thus did Ham build the city and tower of Babel and ruled far and
 wide, while Shem and Japheth were poor, living in lowly tents. The
 facts of history, then, teach that both the promises and the curses of
 God are not to be understood carnally, or of the present life, but
 spiritually. Although oppressed in the world, the righteous are surely
 heirs and sons of God, while the wicked, though flourishing for a
 season, shall ultimately be cut down and wither; a warning often
 uttered in the Psalms.
 
 201. There is a striking similarity in the conduct and the lot of Cain
 and Ham. Cain killed his brother, which shows plainly enough the lack
 of reverence for his father in his heart. Having been put in the ban
 by his father, he leaves the Church of the true God and the true
 worship, builds the city of Enoch, giving himself up altogether to
 worldly things. Just so does Ham sin by dishonoring his father. When
 also he subsequently receives as sentence the curse whereby he is
 excluded from the promised seed and the Church, he parts with God and
 the Church without misgivings, since the curse rests not upon his
 person but upon that of his son, and migrates to Babylon, where he
 establishes a kingdom.
 
 202. These are very illustrious examples and needed by the Church,
 Turk and Pope today; allow us to boast of the heavenly and everlasting
 promise in that we have the Gospel doctrine, and are the Church. They
 know, however, our judgment of them, that we consider and condemn both
 Pope and Turk as very Antichrist. How securely they ignore our
 judgment, confidently because of the wealth and power they possess,
 and also because of our weakness in character and numbers. The very
 same spirit we plainly see in Cain and Ham, in the condemned and
 excommunicated.
 
 203. These truths enforce the lesson that we must not seek an abiding
 city or country in this bodily existence, but in its varying changes
 and fortunes look to the hope of eternal life, promised through
 Christ. This is the final haven; and we must strive for it with sail
 and oar, as eager and earnest sailors while the tempest rages.
 
 204. What if the Turk should obtain sway over the whole world, which
 he never will? Michael, as Daniel says, will bring aid to the holy
 people, the Church (ch 10, 13). What matter if the Pope should gain
 possession of the wealth of all the world, as he has tried to do for
 many centuries with all the wealth at his command? Will Turk and Pope
 thereby escape death, or even secure permanence of temporal power?
 Why, then, should we be misled by the temporal blessings which they
 enjoy, or by our misfortunes and dangers, since we know that they are
 banished from the fellowship of the saints, while we enjoy everlasting
 blessings through the Son of God?
 
 205. If Cain and Ham, and Pope and Turk, who are as father and son to
 each other, can afford to despise the judgment of the true Church on
 the strength of fleeting and meager successes in this life, why can
 not we afford in turn to despise their power and censure, on the
 strength of the everlasting blessings which we possess? Ham was not
 moved by his father's curse. Full of anger against him, and despising
 him as a crazy old man, he goes away and arms himself with the power
 of the world, esteeming this more highly than to be blessed with Shem
 by his father.
 
 206. This story should give us strength for the similar experiences of
 today. The priests and bishops heap contempt upon us, saying, What can
 those poverty stricken heretics do? Priest and bishop are puffed up
 with their wealth and power. But let us bear this insolence of the
 wicked with undisturbed mind, as Noah bore that of his son. Let us
 take consolation in the hope and faith of the eternal benediction, of
 which, we know, they are deprived.
 
 207. I said above (para 172) that the Holy Spirit was so greatly
 angered by the sin of Ham that he could not bear even to speak his
 name in the curse. And it is true, as the punishment shows, that Ham
 sinned grievously. The other reason mentioned above as not at all
 unlikely, I will here repeat: Ham had been called and received into
 the ark by the divine Word, and had been saved with the others, and
 Noah wanted to spare him whom God had spared in the flood. Therefore,
 he transferred the curse which Ham merited, to Canaan, his son, whom
 Ham doubtless desired to keep with him.
 
 208. The Jews offer a different explanation: Canaan, the son, having
 been the first to see his grandfather Noah lying naked, announced it
 to his father, who then saw for himself; hence, Canaan gave his father
 cause to commit the sin. Let the reader judge what value there is in
 this exposition.
 
 209. But there is also a philological question which must be discussed
 in connection. Scholars call translators to account for the rendering,
 "God enlarge Japheth," when the Hebrew words do not permit it, though
 not only the Hebrews but also the Chaldeans, are mostly agreed that
 the word _jepheth_ means "to enlarge." Technical discussions of this
 kind, however, are sometimes very useful to clear up the precise
 meaning of a passage.
 
 210. Some scholars derive the name _Japheth_ from the verb _jephah_,
 which signifies _to be beautiful_, as in Ps 45, 2: _japhjaphita mibene
 Adam_, "Thou art fairer than the children of men." But this may easily
 be shown to be an error; for the true origin of the word is the verb
 _phatah_, which means "to persuade," "to deceive with fair words" as
 in Ex 22 16: _ki jephateh isch betulah_, "If a man entice a virgin, he
 shall surely pay a dowry for her." And in Jer 20, 7: _pethithani
 jehovah va-epath_, "O Jehovah, thou hast persuaded me and I was
 persuaded;" Prov 1, 10: _Im-jephatukah_, "If sinners entice thee."
 There is no need of more examples, for the word occurs frequently, and
 I have no doubt that it is derived from the Greek word _peitho_, for
 it has the same meaning.
 
 211. But let us turn to the question: Why have all translators made it
 read, "God enlarge Japheth," while it is not the word _pathach_, which
 means "to enlarge" or "to open", but rather the word _pathah_? I have
 no doubt that the translators were influenced by the harsh expression.
 Since this is a promise, it seemed too harsh to state that Noah had
 said, "God deceive Japheth." This would appear to be a word of
 cursing, not of blessing. Hence they chose a milder term, though it
 violated the rules of language. And since there is but a slight
 difference between _pathach_, and _pathah_, they used one for the
 other. They meant to preserve the important fact that this is a
 promise.
 
 212. But there is no need for us to alter the text in this manner, and
 to violate its grammatical construction, since the word _pathah_,
 offers a most suitable meaning. Being a word of double meaning, as the
 word _suadere_ in Latin, it may be accepted either in a bad or in a
 good sense. Hence, it is not irreverent to apply this word to God. We
 find it clearly so used in Hosea 2, 14, where the Lord says:
 "Therefore, behold, I will (_mephateha_) allure her (or, entice her by
 coaxing), and bring her into the wilderness, and speak comfortably
 unto her." I will suckle her, speak sweetly unto her, and thus will I
 deceive her, as it were, so that she may agree with me, so that the
 Church will join herself to me, etc.
 
 In this sense the word may here rightly be taken to mean "allure,"
 "persuade," "coax by means of friendly words and flattery." God
 suckle, persuade, deceive Japheth by persuasion, so that Japheth
 himself, being allured, as his name signifies, may be invited in a
 friendly way and thus be beguiled.
 
 213. But you say, what will be the meaning of this? or why should
 there be need for Japheth to be beguiled or persuaded, and that by God
 himself? I answer: Noah makes the names to serve his purpose in this
 prophecy. He gives thanks to God that he establishes them to stand
 like a firm root from which Christ was to spring. For the verb _sum_,
 signifies "to place," "to put in position," "to establish."
 
 214. For Japheth, however, he prays that he may become a true Japheth.
 Since he was the oldest son, who ordinarily should have been given the
 right of the first-born, he prays that God would persuade him in a
 friendly manner, first, not to envy his brother this honor, nor to be
 dissatisfied that this privilege was taken from him and given to his
 brother. Furthermore, because this matter touches the person of
 Japheth only, God includes his entire offspring in the blessing.
 Though the promise was given to Shem alone, yet God does not shut out
 from it the offspring of Japheth, but speaks to them lovingly through
 the Gospel, that they may also become _jepheth_, being persuaded by
 the Word of the Gospel. This is a divine persuasion, coming from the
 Holy Spirit; not from the flesh, nor from the world, nor from Satan,
 but holy and quickening. This expression is used by Paul in Gal 1, 10,
 where he says, "Am I now persuading men or God?" And Gal 3, 1, "Who
 did bewitch you that ye should not obey the truth?"--that ye do not
 agree to the truth, that ye do not permit yourselves to be persuaded
 by that which is true?
 
 215. Viewing the name Japheth in this case, it signifies a person of
 the kind which we call guileless, who believes readily, permitting
 himself to be easily persuaded of a matter, who does not dispute or
 cling to his own ideas but submits his mind to the Lord and rests upon
 his Word, remaining a learner, not desiring to be master over the
 words and works of God.
 
 Hence it is a touching prayer which is here recorded, that God might
 persuade Japheth; that is, that he might speak fondly with him. Noah
 prays that, though God does not speak to Japheth on the basis of a
 promise, as he does with Shem, yet he would speak with him on the
 basis of grace and divine goodness.
 
 216. This prayer of Noah foresees the spread of the Gospel throughout
 the whole world. Shem is the stem. From his posterity Christ was born.
 The Church is of the Jews, who had patriarchs, prophets, and kings.
 And yet God here shows Noah that also the wretched Gentiles were to
 dwell in the tents of Shem; that is, they were to come into that
 heritage of the saints which the Son of God brought into this
 world--forgiveness of sins, the Holy Spirit, and everlasting life. He
 prophesies clearly that also Japheth will hear the sweet message of
 the Gospel as his name suggests; so that, though he have not the same
 title as Shem, who was set to be the stem from which Christ was to
 spring, yet he should have the persuader, namely the Gospel.
 
 217. It was Paul through whom this prophecy was fulfilled. He almost
 unaided taught the Gospel doctrine to the posterity of Japheth. He
 says: "From Jerusalem, and round about even unto Illyricum, I have
 fully preached the Gospel of Christ" (Rom 15, 19). Almost all of Asia,
 with the exception of the oriental peoples, together with Europe,
 belongs to the posterity of Japheth. The Gentiles, therefore, did not,
 as the Jews did, receive the kingdom and the priesthood from God. They
 had neither the law nor the promise. Yet by the mercy of God they have
 heard that sweet voice of the Gospel, the persuader, which is
 indicated by the very name of Japheth.
 
 218. The interpreters failed to recognize this as the true meaning,
 and God permitted them to make this mistake. Still they did not miss
 the true meaning altogether. For the verb _hirchib_, which means "to
 enlarge," means also "to give consolation," just as conversely in
 Latin the word _angustiae_ (narrow place) signifies also "pains," or
 "perils," or "disaster." Thus we read in Psalms 4, 1: "Thou hast set
 me at large when I was in distress." The only real enlargement, or
 consolation, is the Word of the Gospel.
 
 219. Thus the several expositions are harmonized by proper
 interpretation. But the primary meaning of _enlarge_, which conveys
 the idea of _persuasion_, is the native and proper one. It sheds a
 bright light upon the fact that we Gentiles, although the promise was
 not given to us, have nevertheless been called by the providence of
 God to the Gospel. The promise pertains to Shem alone, but Japheth, as
 Paul has it in Romans 11, 17, was grafted into the olive tree, like a
 wild olive, and became a partaker of the original fatness, or the sap,
 of the olive. The older portions of the Bible agree with the newer,
 and what God promised in the days of Noah, he now carries out.
 
 220. "Ham" signifies "the hot and burning one." This name was given to
 him by his father, I believe, because of the great things he hoped for
 his youngest son. To Noah the other two were cold men in comparison.
 Eve rejoiced greatly when Cain was born (Gen 4, 1). She believed that
 he would restore whatever had been wrought amiss. Yet he was the first
 to harm mankind in a new way, in that he killed his brother.
 
 221. Thus God, according to his unsearchable counsel, changes the
 expectations even of the saints. Ham, whom his father, at his birth,
 had expected to be inflamed with greater zeal for the support of the
 Church than his brothers, was hot and burning, indeed, when he grew
 older, but in a different sense. He burned against his parent and his
 God, as his deed shows. Hence, his name was one of evil prophecy,
 unsuspected of Noah when he gave it.
 
 222. This is Noah's prophecy concerning his sons, who have filled the
 earth with their offspring. The fact, therefore, that God has
 permitted the light of the Gospel to shine upon Germany, is due to the
 prophecy anent Japheth. We see today the fulfillment of that which
 Noah foretold. Though we are not of the seed of Abraham, yet we dwell
 in the tents of Shem and enjoy the fulfilment of the prophecies
 concerning Christ.
 
 Vs. 28-29. _And Noah lived after the flood three hundred and fifty
 years. And all the days of Noah were nine hundred and fifty years; and
 he died._
 
 223. History shows that Noah died fifty years after the birth of
 Abraham. Abraham, therefore, enjoying the instruction of so able and
 renowned a teacher until his fiftieth year, had an opportunity to
 learn something of religion. And there is no doubt that Noah, being
 filled with the Holy Spirit, cared for this grandchild of his with
 special care and love, as the only heir of Shem's promises.
 
 224. At that time the offspring of Ham flourished, spreading idolatry
 throughout the regions of the East. Abraham was in touch with it, and
 not without danger to himself. He was saved, however, by Noah, being
 almost alone in recognizing the greatness of a man who was the only
 survivor of the early world. The others, forgetful of the wrath which
 had raged in the flood, taunted the pious, old man; particularly Ham's
 progeny, puffed up by wealth and power. They heaped insults upon
 Father Noah, and--frenzied by success--they divided the curse of
 servitude pronounced upon them as a sign of his dotage. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Laura J. Hoelter
 
 
 
 
 
 
 COMMENTARY ON THE EPISTLE TO THE GALATIANS
 
 (1535)
 
 By Martin Luther
 
 Translated by Theodore Graebner
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE
 
 The preparation of this edition of Luther's Commentary on Galatians was
 first suggested to me by Mr. P. J. Zondervan, of the firm of publishers,
 in March, 1937. The consultation had the twofold merit of definiteness
 and brevity.
 
 "Luther is still the greatest name in Protestantism. We want you to
 help us publish some leading work of Luther's for the general American
 market. Will you do it?"
 
 "I will, on one condition."
 
 "And what is that?"
 
 "The condition is that I will be permitted to make Luther talk American,
 'streamline' him, so to speak--because you will never get people,
 whether in or outside the Lutheran Church, actually to read Luther
 unless we make him talk as he would talk today to Americans."
 
 I illustrated the point by reading to Mr. Zondervan a few sentences from
 an English translation lately reprinted by an American publisher, of one
 of Luther's outstanding reformatory essays.
 
 The demonstration seemed to prove convincing for it was agreed that one
 may as well offer Luther in the original German or Latin as expect the
 American church-member to read any translations that would adhere to
 Luther's German or Latin constructions and employ the Mid-Victorian type
 of English characteristic of the translations now on the market.
 
 "And what book would be your choice?"
 
 "There is one book that Luther himself likes better than any other. Let
 us begin with that: his Commentary on Galatians..."
 
 The undertaking, which seemed so attractive when viewed as a literary
 task, proved a most difficult one, and at times became oppressive.
 The Letter to the Galatians consists of six short chapters. Luther's
 commentary fills seven hundred and thirty-three octavo pages in the
 Weidman Edition of his works. It was written in Latin. We were resolved
 not to present this entire mass of exegesis. It would have run to more
 than fifteen hundred pages, ordinary octavo (like this), since it
 is impossible to use the compressed structure of sentences which is
 characteristic of Latin, and particularly of Luther's Latin. The work
 had to be condensed. German and English translations are available,
 but the most acceptable English version, besides laboring under the
 handicaps of an archaic style, had to be condensed into half its volume
 in order to accomplish the "streamlining" of the book. Whatever merit
 the translation now presented to the reader may possess should be
 written to the credit of Rev. Gerhardt Mahler of Geneva, N.Y., who came
 to my assistance in a very busy season by making a rough draft of the
 translation and later preparing a revision of it, which forms the basis
 of the final draft submitted to the printer. A word should now be said
 about the origin of Luther's Commentary on Galatians.
 
 The Reformer had lectured on this Epistle of St. Paul's in 1519 and
 again in 1523. It was his favorite among all the Biblical books. In his
 table talks the saying is recorded: "The Epistle to the Galatians is
 my epistle. To it I am as it were in wedlock. It is my Katherine." Much
 later when a friend of his was preparing an edition of all his Latin
 works, he remarked to his home circle: "If I had my way about it
 they would republish only those of my books which have doctrine. My
 Galatians, for instance." The lectures which are preserved in the works
 herewith submitted to the American public were delivered in 1531. They
 were taken down by George Roerer, who held something of a deanship
 at Wittenberg University and who was one of Luther's aids in the
 translation of the Bible. Roerer took down Luther's lectures and this
 manuscript has been preserved to the present day, in a copy which
 contains also additions by Veit Dietrich and by Cruciger, friends of
 Roerer's, who with him attended Luther's lectures. In other words, these
 three men took down the lectures which Luther addressed to his students
 in the course of Galatians, and Roerer prepared the manuscript for
 the printer. A German translation by Justus Menius appeared in the
 Wittenberg Edition of Luther's writings, published in 1539.
 
 The importance of this Commentary on Galatians for the history of
 Protestantism is very great. It presents like no other of Luther's
 writings the central thought of Christianity, the justification of the
 sinner for the sake of Christ's merits alone. We have permitted in the
 final revision of the manuscript many a passage to stand which seemed
 weak and ineffectual when compared with the trumpet tones of the Latin
 original. But the essence of Luther's lectures is there. May the reader
 accept with indulgence where in this translation we have gone too far in
 modernizing Luther's expression--making him "talk American."
 
 At the end of his lectures in 1531, Luther uttered a brief prayer and
 then dictated two Scriptural texts, which we shall inscribe at the end
 of these introductory remarks:
 
 "The Lord who has given us power to teach and to hear, let Him also give
 us the power to serve and to do."
 
                  LUKE 2
 
           Glory to God in the highest,
           And on earth peace,
           Good will to men.
 
 
                     ISAIAH 40
 
          The Word of our God shall stand forever.
 
 
 THEODORE GRAEBNER
 
 St. Louis, Missouri
 
 
 
 
 FROM LUTHER'S INTRODUCTION, 1538
 
 
   In my heart reigns this one article, faith in my dear Lord Christ,
   the beginning, middle and end of whatever spiritual and divine
   thoughts I may have, whether by day or by night.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 1
 
 
   VERSE 1. Paul, an apostle, (not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus
   Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead).
 
 
 St. Paul wrote this epistle because, after his departure from the
 Galatian churches, Jewish-Christian fanatics moved in, who perverted
 Paul's Gospel of man's free justification by faith in Christ Jesus.
 
 The world bears the Gospel a grudge because the Gospel condemns the
 religious wisdom of the world. Jealous for its own religious views, the
 world in turn charges the Gospel with being a subversive and licentious
 doctrine, offensive to God and man, a doctrine to be persecuted as the
 worst plague on earth.
 
 As a result we have this paradoxical situation: The Gospel supplies the
 world with the salvation of Jesus Christ, peace of conscience, and every
 blessing. Just for that the world abhors the Gospel.
 
 These Jewish-Christian fanatics who pushed themselves into the Galatian
 churches after Paul's departure, boasted that they were the descendants
 of Abraham, true ministers of Christ, having been trained by the
 apostles themselves, that they were able to perform miracles.
 
 In every way they sought to undermine the authority of St. Paul. They
 said to the Galatians: "You have no right to think highly of Paul. He
 was the last to turn to Christ. But we have seen Christ. We heard Him
 preach. Paul came later and is beneath us. It is possible for us to be
 in error--we who have received the Holy Ghost? Paul stands alone. He has
 not seen Christ, nor has he had much contact with the other apostles.
 Indeed, he persecuted the Church of Christ for a long time."
 
 When men claiming such credentials come along, they deceive not only the
 naive, but also those who seemingly are well-established in the faith.
 This same argument is used by the papacy. "Do you suppose that God for
 the sake of a few Lutheran heretics would disown His entire Church? Or
 do you suppose that God would have left His Church floundering in error
 all these centuries?" The Galatians were taken in by such arguments with
 the result that Paul's authority and doctrine were drawn in question.
 
 Against these boasting, false apostles, Paul boldly defends his
 apostolic authority and ministry. Humble man that he was, he will not
 now take a back seat. He reminds them of the time when he opposed Peter
 to his face and reproved the chief of the apostles.
 
 Paul devotes the first two chapters to a defense of his office and his
 Gospel, affirming that he received it, not from men, but from the Lord
 Jesus Christ by special revelation, and that if he or an angel from
 heaven preach any other gospel than the one he had preached, he shall be
 accursed.
 
                         The Certainty of Our Calling
 
 Every minister should make much of his calling and impress upon others
 the fact that he has been delegated by God to preach the Gospel. As the
 ambassador of a government is honored for his office and not for his
 private person, so the minister of Christ should exalt his office in
 order to gain authority among men. This is not vain glory, but needful
 glorying.
 
 Paul takes pride in his ministry, not to his own praise but to the
 praise of God. Writing to the Romans, he declares, "Inasmuch as I am
 the apostle of the Gentiles, I magnify mine office," i.e., I want to be
 received not as Paul of Tarsus, but as Paul the apostle and ambassador
 of Jesus Christ, in order that people might be more eager to hear. Paul
 exalts his ministry out of the desire to make known the name, the grace,
 and the mercy of God.
 
   VERSE 1. Paul, an apostle, (not of men, etc.)
 
 Paul loses no time in defending himself against the charge that he had
 thrust himself into the ministry. He says to the Galatians: "My call may
 seem inferior to you. But those who have come to you are either called
 of men or by man. My call is the highest possible, for it is by Jesus
 Christ, and God the Father."
 
 When Paul speaks of those called "by men," I take it he means those whom
 neither God nor man sent, but who go wherever they like and speak for
 themselves.
 
 When Paul speaks of those called "by man" I take it he means those who
 have a divine call extended to them through other persons. God calls
 in two ways. Either He calls ministers through the agency of men, or
 He calls them directly as He called the prophets and apostles. Paul
 declares that the false apostles were called or sent neither by men, nor
 by man. The most they could claim is that they were sent by others. "But
 as for me I was called neither of men, nor by man, but directly by Jesus
 Christ. My call is in every respect like the call of the apostles. In
 fact I am an apostle."
 
 Elsewhere Paul draws a sharp distinction between an apostleship and
 lesser functions, as in I Corinthians 12:28: "And God hath set some in
 the church; first, apostles; secondarily, prophets; thirdly, teachers."
 He mentions the apostles first because they were appointed directly by
 God.
 
 Matthias was called in this manner. The apostles chose two candidates
 and then cast lots, praying that God would indicate which one He would
 have. To be an apostle he had to have his appointment from God. In the
 same manner Paul was called as the apostle of the Gentiles.
 
 The call is not to be taken lightly. For a person to possess knowledge
 is not enough. He must be sure that he is properly called. Those who
 operate without a proper call seek no good purpose. God does not bless
 their labors. They may be good preachers, but they do not edify. Many of
 the fanatics of our day pronounce words of faith, but they bear no good
 fruit, because their purpose is to turn men to their perverse opinions.
 On the other hand, those who have a divine call must suffer a good
 deal of opposition in order that they may become fortified against the
 running attacks of the devil and the world.
 
 This is our comfort in the ministry, that ours is a divine office to
 which we have been divinely called. Reversely, what an awful thing it
 must be for the conscience if one is not properly called. It spoils
 one's best work. When I was a young man I thought Paul was making too
 much of his call. I did not understand his purpose. I did not then
 realize the importance of the ministry. I knew nothing of the doctrine
 of faith because we were taught sophistry instead of certainty, and
 nobody understood spiritual boasting. We exalt our calling, not to gain
 glory among men, or money, or satisfaction, or favor, but because people
 need to be assured that the words we speak are the words of God. This is
 no sinful pride. It is holy pride.
 
   VERSE 1. And God the Father, who raised him from the dead.
 
 Paul is so eager to come to the subject matter of his epistle, the
 righteousness of faith in opposition to the righteousness of works, that
 already in the title he must speak his mind. He did not think it quite
 enough to say that he was an apostle "by Jesus Christ"; he adds, "and
 God the Father, who raised him from the dead."
 
 The clause seems superfluous on first sight. Yet Paul had a good reason
 for adding it. He had to deal with Satan and his agents who endeavored
 to deprive him of the righteousness of Christ, who was raised by God the
 Father from the dead. These perverters of the righteousness of Christ
 resist the Father and the Son, and the works of them both.
 
 In this whole epistle Paul treats of the resurrection of Christ. By His
 resurrection Christ won the victory over law, sin, flesh, world, devil,
 death, hell, and every evil. And this His victory He donated unto us.
 These many tyrants and enemies of ours may accuse and frighten us, but
 they dare not condemn us, for Christ, whom God the Father has raised
 from the dead is our righteousness and our victory.
 
 Do you notice how well suited to his purpose Paul writes? He does not
 say, "By God who made heaven and earth, who is Lord of the angels," but
 Paul has in mind the righteousness of Christ, and speaks to the point,
 saying, "I am an apostle, not of men, neither by man, but by Jesus
 Christ, and God the Father, who raised him from the dead."
 
 
   VERSE 2. And all the brethren which are with me.
 
 This should go far in shutting the mouths of the false apostles. Paul's
 intention is to exalt his own ministry while discrediting theirs. He
 adds for good measure the argument that he does not stand alone, but
 that all the brethren with him attest to the fact that his doctrine
 is divinely true. "Although the brethren with me are not apostles like
 myself, yet they are all of one mind with me, think, write, and teach as
 I do."
 
 
   VERSE 2. Unto the churches of Galatia.
 
 Paul had preached the Gospel throughout Galatia, founding many churches
 which after his departure were invaded by the false apostles. The
 Anabaptists in our time imitate the false apostles. They do not go where
 the enemies of the Gospel predominate. They go where the Christians are.
 Why do they not invade the Catholic provinces and preach their doctrine
 to godless princes, bishops, and doctors, as we have done by the help of
 God? These soft martyrs take no chances. They go where the Gospel has
 a hold, so that they may not endanger their lives. The false apostles
 would not go to Jerusalem of Caiaphas, or to the Rome of the Emperor,
 or to any other place where no man had preached before as Paul and the
 other apostles did. But they came to the churches of Galatia, knowing
 that where men profess the name of Christ they may feel secure.
 
 It is the lot of God's ministers not only to suffer opposition at the
 hand of a wicked world, but also to see the patient indoctrination of
 many years quickly undone by such religious fanatics. This hurts more
 than the persecution of tyrants. We are treated shabbily on the outside
 by tyrants, on the inside by those whom we have restored to the liberty
 of the Gospel, and also by false brethren. But this is our comfort and
 our glory, that being called of God we have the promise of everlasting
 life. We look for that reward which "eye hath not seen, nor ear heard,
 neither hath entered into the heart of man."
 
 Jerome raises the question why Paul called them churches that were no
 churches, inasmuch as the Galatians had forsaken the grace of Christ
 for the law of Moses. The proper answer is: Although the Galatians had
 fallen away from the doctrine of Paul, baptism, the Gospel, and the
 name of Christ continued among them. Not all the Galatians had become
 perverted. There were some who clung to the right view of the Word and
 the Sacraments. These means cannot be contaminated. They remain divine
 regardless of men's opinion. Wherever the means of grace are found,
 there is the Holy Church, even though Antichrist reigns there. So much
 for the title of the epistle. Now follows the greeting of the apostle.
 
 
   VERSE 3. Grace be to you, and peace, from God the Father, and from our
   Lord Jesus Christ.
 
 The terms of grace and peace are common terms with Paul and are now
 pretty well understood. But since we are explaining this epistle, you
 will not mind if we repeat what we have so often explained elsewhere.
 The article of justification must be sounded in our ears incessantly
 because the frailty of our flesh will not permit us to take hold of it
 perfectly and to believe it with all our heart.
 
 The greeting of the Apostle is refreshing. Grace remits sin, and peace
 quiets the conscience. Sin and conscience torment us, but Christ has
 overcome these fiends now and forever. Only Christians possess this
 victorious knowledge given from above. These two terms, grace and peace,
 constitute Christianity. Grace involves the remission of sins, peace,
 and a happy conscience. Sin is not canceled by lawful living, for no
 person is able to live up to the Law. The Law reveals guilt, fills the
 conscience with terror, and drives men to despair. Much less is sin
 taken away by man-invented endeavors. The fact is, the more a person
 seeks credit for himself by his own efforts, the deeper he goes into
 debt. Nothing can take away sin except the grace of God. In actual
 living, however, it is not so easy to persuade oneself that by grace
 alone, in opposition to every other means, we obtain the forgiveness of
 our sins and peace with God.
 
 The world brands this a pernicious doctrine. The world advances free
 will, the rational and natural approach of good works, as the means of
 obtaining the forgiveness of sin. But it is impossible to gain peace
 of conscience by the methods and means of the world. Experience proves
 this. Various holy orders have been launched for the purpose of securing
 peace of conscience through religious exercises, but they proved
 failures because such devices only increase doubt and despair. We find
 no rest for our weary bones unless we cling to the word of grace.
 
 The Apostle does not wish the Galatians grace and peace from the
 emperor, or from kings, or from governors, but from God the Father. He
 wishes them heavenly peace, the kind of which Jesus spoke when He
 said, "Peace I leave unto you: my peace I give unto you." Worldly peace
 provides quiet enjoyment of life and possessions. But in affliction,
 particularly in the hour of death, the grace and peace of the world will
 not deliver us. However, the grace and peace of God will. They make a
 person strong and courageous to bear and to overcome all difficulties,
 even death itself, because we have the victory of Christ's death and the
 assurance of the forgiveness of our sins.
 
               Men Should Not Speculate About the Nature of God
 
 The Apostle adds to the salutation the words, "and from our Lord Jesus
 Christ." Was it not enough to say, "from God the Father"?
 
 It is a principle of the Bible that we are not to inquire curiously into
 the nature of God. "There shall no man see me, and live," Exodus 33:20.
 All who trust in their own merits to save them disregard this principle
 and lose sight of the Mediator, Jesus Christ.
 
 True Christian theology does not inquire into the nature of God, but
 into God's purpose and will in Christ, whom God incorporated in our
 flesh to live and to die for our sins. There is nothing more dangerous
 than to speculate about the incomprehensible power, wisdom, and majesty
 of God when the conscience is in turmoil over sin. To do so is to lose
 God altogether because God becomes intolerable when we seek to measure
 and to comprehend His infinite majesty.
 
 We are to seek God as Paul tells us in I Corinthians 1:23, 24: "We
 preach Christ crucified, unto the Jews a stumbling block, and unto
 the Greeks foolishness; but unto them which are called, both Jews and
 Greeks, Christ the power of God, and the wisdom of God." Begin with
 Christ. He came down to earth, lived among men, suffered, was crucified,
 and then He died, standing clearly before us, so that our hearts and
 eyes may fasten upon Him. Thus we shall be kept from climbing into
 heaven in a curious and futile search after the nature of God.
 
 If you ask how God may be found, who justifies sinners, know that there
 is no other God besides this man Christ Jesus. Embrace Him, and forget
 about the nature of God. But these fanatics who exclude our Mediator in
 their dealings with God, do not believe me. Did not Christ Himself
 say: "I am the way, and the truth, and the life: no man cometh unto the
 Father, but by me"? Without Christ there is no access to the Father, but
 futile rambling; no truth, but hypocrisy; no life, but eternal death.
 
 When you argue about the nature of God apart from the question of
 justification, you may be as profound as you like. But when you deal
 with conscience and with righteousness over against the law, sin, death,
 and the devil, you must close your mind to all inquiries into the nature
 of God, and concentrate upon Jesus Christ, who says, "Come unto me,
 all ye that labor and are heavy laden, and I will give you rest." Doing
 this, you will recognize the power, and majesty condescending to your
 condition according to Paul's statement to the Colossians, "In Christ
 are hid all the treasures of wisdom and knowledge," and, "In him
 dwelleth all the fulness of the Godhead bodily." Paul in wishing grace
 and peace not alone from God the Father, but also from Jesus Christ,
 wants to warn us against the curious incursions into the nature of
 God. We are to hear Christ, who has been appointed by the Father as our
 divine Teacher.
 
                            Christ is God by Nature
 
 At the same time, Paul confirms our creed, "that Christ is very God." We
 need such frequent confirmation of our faith, for Satan will not fail
 to attack it. He hates our faith. He knows that it is the victory which
 overcometh him and the world. That Christ is very God is apparent in
 that Paul ascribes to Him divine powers equally with the Father, as for
 instance, the power to dispense grace and peace. This Jesus could not do
 unless He were God.
 
 To bestow peace and grace lies in the province of God, who alone can
 create these blessings. The angels cannot. The apostles could
 only distribute these blessings by the preaching of the Gospel. In
 attributing to Christ the divine power of creating and giving grace,
 peace, everlasting life, righteousness, and forgiveness of sins, the
 conclusion is inevitable that Christ is truly God. Similarly, St. John
 concludes from the works attributed to the Father and the Son that they
 are divinely One. Hence, the gifts which we receive from the Father and
 from the Son are one and the same. Otherwise Paul should have written:
 "Grace from God the Father, and peace from our Lord Jesus Christ." In
 combining them he ascribes them equally to the Father and the Son. I
 stress this on account of the many errors emanating from the sects.
 
 The Arians were sharp fellows. Admitting that Christ had two natures,
 and that He is called "very God of very God," they were yet able to deny
 His divinity. The Arians took Christ for a noble and perfect creature,
 superior even to the angels, because by Him God created heaven and
 earth. Mohammed also speaks highly of Christ. But all their praise is
 mere palaver to deceive men. Paul's language is different. To paraphrase
 him: "You are established in this belief that Christ is very God because
 He gives grace and peace, gifts which only God can create and bestow."
 
 
   VERSE 4. Who gave himself for our sins.
 
 Paul sticks to his theme. He never loses sight of the purpose of his
 epistle. He does not say, "Who received our works," but "who gave." Gave
 what? Not gold, or silver, or paschal lambs, or an angel, but Himself.
 What for? Not for a crown, or a kingdom, or our goodness, but for our
 sins. These words are like so many thunderclaps of protest from heaven
 against every kind and type of self-merit. Underscore these words, for
 they are full of comfort for sore consciences.
 
 How may we obtain remission of our sins? Paul answers: "The man who is
 named Jesus Christ and the Son of God gave himself for our sins."
 The heavy artillery of these words explodes papacy, works, merits,
 superstitions. For if our sins could be removed by our own efforts, what
 need was there for the Son of God to be given for them? Since Christ was
 given for our sins it stands to reason that they cannot be put away by
 our own efforts.
 
 This sentence also defines our sins as great, so great, in fact, that
 the whole world could not make amends for a single sin. The greatness
 of the ransom, Christ, the Son of God, indicates this. The vicious
 character of sin is brought out by the words "who gave himself for our
 sins." So vicious is sin that only the sacrifice of Christ could atone
 for sin. When we reflect that the one little word "sin" embraces
 the whole kingdom of Satan, and that it includes everything that is
 horrible, we have reason to tremble. But we are careless. We make light
 of sin. We think that by some little work or merit we can dismiss sin.
 
 This passage, then, bears out the fact that all men are sold under sin.
 Sin is an exacting despot who can be vanquished by no created power, but
 by the sovereign power of Jesus Christ alone.
 
 All this is of wonderful comfort to a conscience troubled by the
 enormity of sin. Sin cannot harm those who believe in Christ, because
 He has overcome sin by His death. Armed with this conviction, we
 are enlightened and may pass judgment upon the papists, monks, nuns,
 priests, Mohammedans, Anabaptists, and all who trust in their own
 merits, as wicked and destructive sects that rob God and Christ of the
 honor that belongs to them alone.
 
 Note especially the pronoun "our" and its significance. You will readily
 grant that Christ gave Himself for the sins of Peter, Paul, and others
 who were worthy of such grace. But feeling low, you find it hard to
 believe that Christ gave Himself for your sins. Our feelings shy at
 a personal application of the pronoun "our" and we refuse to have
 anything to do with God until we have made ourselves worthy by good
 deeds.
 
 This attitude springs from a false conception of sin, the conception
 that sin is a small matter, easily taken care of by good works; that
 we must present ourselves unto God with a good conscience; that we must
 feel no sin before we may feel that Christ was given for our sins.
 
 This attitude is universal and particularly developed in those who
 consider themselves better than others. Such readily confess that
 they are frequent sinners, but they regard their sins as of no such
 importance that they cannot easily be dissolved by some good action, or
 that they may not appear before the tribunal of Christ and demand the
 reward of eternal life for their righteousness. Meantime they pretend
 great humility and acknowledge a certain degree of sinfulness for which
 they soulfully join in the publican's prayer, "God be merciful to me
 a sinner." But the real significance and comfort of the words "for our
 sins" is lost upon them.
 
 The genius of Christianity takes the words of Paul "who gave himself for
 our sins" as true and efficacious. We are not to look upon our sins as
 insignificant trifles. On the other hand, we are not to regard them
 as so terrible that we must despair. Learn to believe that Christ
 was given, not for picayune and imaginary transgressions, but for
 mountainous sins; not for one or two, but for all; not for sins that can
 be discarded, but for sins that are stubbornly ingrained.
 
 Practice this knowledge and fortify yourself against despair,
 particularly in the last hour, when the memory of past sins assails the
 conscience. Say with confidence: "Christ, the Son of God, was given not
 for the righteous, but for sinners. If I had no sin I should not need
 Christ. No, Satan, you cannot delude me into thinking I am holy. The
 truth is, I am all sin. My sins are not imaginary transgressions,
 but sins against the first table, unbelief, doubt, despair, contempt,
 hatred, ignorance of God, ingratitude towards Him, misuse of His name,
 neglect of His Word, etc.; and sins against the second table,
 dishonor of parents, disobedience of government, coveting of another's
 possessions, etc. Granted that I have not committed murder, adultery,
 theft, and similar sins in deed, nevertheless I have committed them in
 the heart, and therefore I am a transgressor of all the commandments of
 God.
 
 "Because my transgressions are multiplied and my own efforts at
 self-justification rather a hindrance than a furtherance, therefore
 Christ the Son of God gave Himself into death for my sins." To believe
 this is to have eternal life.
 
 Let us equip ourselves against the accusations of Satan with this and
 similar passages of Holy Scripture. If he says, "Thou shalt be damned,"
 you tell him: "No, for I fly to Christ who gave Himself for my sins. In
 accusing me of being a damnable sinner, you are cutting your own throat,
 Satan. You are reminding me of God's fatherly goodness toward me, that
 He so loved the world that He gave His only-begotten Son that whosoever
 believeth in Him should not perish, but have everlasting life. In
 calling me a sinner, Satan, you really comfort me above measure." With
 such heavenly cunning we are to meet the devil's craft and put from us
 the memory of sin.
 
 St. Paul also presents a true picture of Christ as the virgin-born
 Son of God, delivered into death for our sins. To entertain a true
 conception of Christ is important, for the devil describes Christ as an
 exacting and cruel judge who condemns and punishes men. Tell him that
 his definition of Christ is wrong, that Christ has given Himself for
 our sins, that by His sacrifice He has taken away the sins of the whole
 world.
 
 Make ample use of this pronoun "our" Be assured that Christ has
 canceled the sins, not of certain persons only, but your sins. Do not
 permit yourself to be robbed of this lovely conception of Christ. Christ
 is no Moses, no law-giver, no tyrant, but the Mediator for sins, the
 Giver of grace and life.
 
 We know this. Yet in the actual conflict with the devil, when he scares
 us with the Law, when he frightens us with the very person of the
 Mediator, when he misquotes the words of Christ, and distorts for us our
 Savior, we so easily lose sight of our sweet High-Priest.
 
 For this reason I am so anxious for you to gain a true picture of Christ
 out of the words of Paul "who gave himself for our sins." Obviously,
 Christ is no judge to condemn us, for He gave Himself for our sins.
 He does not trample the fallen but raises them. He comforts the
 broken-hearted. Otherwise Paul should lie when he writes "who gave
 himself for our sins."
 
 I do not bother my head with speculations about the nature of God. I
 simply attach myself to the human Christ, and I find joy and peace, and
 the wisdom of God in Him. These are not new truths. I am repeating what
 the apostles and all teachers of God have taught long ago. Would to God
 we could impregnate our hearts with these truths.
 
 
   VERSE 4. That he might deliver us from this present evil world.
 
 Paul calls this present world evil because everything in it is subject
 to the malice of the devil, who reigns over the whole world as
 his domain and fills the air with ignorance, contempt, hatred, and
 disobedience of God. In this devil's kingdom we live.
 
 As long as a person is in the world he cannot by his own efforts rid
 himself of sin, because the world is bent upon evil. The people of
 the world are the slaves of the devil. If we are not in the Kingdom
 of Christ, it is certain we belong to the kingdom of Satan and we are
 pressed into his service with every talent we possess.
 
 Take the talents of wisdom and integrity. Without Christ, wisdom is
 double foolishness and integrity double sin, because they not only
 fail to perceive the wisdom and righteousness of Christ, but hinder
 and blaspheme the salvation of Christ. Paul justly calls it the evil
 or wicked world, for when the world is at its best the world is at its
 worst. The grossest vices are small faults in comparison with the wisdom
 and righteousness of the world. These prevent men from accepting the
 Gospel of the righteousness of Christ. The white devil of spiritual sin
 is far more dangerous than the black devil of carnal sin because the
 wiser, the better men are without Christ, the more they are likely to
 ignore and oppose the Gospel.
 
 With the words, "that he might deliver us," Paul argues that we stand in
 need of Christ. No other being can possibly deliver us from this present
 evil world. Do not let the fact disturb you that a great many people
 enjoy excellent reputations without Christ. Remember what Paul says,
 that the world with all its wisdom, might, and righteousness is the
 devil's own. God alone is able to deliver us from the world.
 
 Let us praise and thank God for His mercy in delivering us from the
 captivity of Satan, when we were unable to do so by our own strength.
 Let us confess with Paul that all our work-righteousness is loss and
 dung. Let us condemn as filthy rags all talk about free will, all
 religious orders, masses, ceremonies, vows, fastings, and the like.
 
 In branding the world the devil's kingdom of iniquity, ignorance, error,
 sin, death, and everlasting despair, Paul at the same time declares the
 Kingdom of Christ to be a kingdom of equity, light, grace, remission
 of sin, peace, saving health, and everlasting life into which we are
 translated by our Lord Jesus Christ, to whom be glory forever.
 
 In this passage Paul contends against the false apostles for the article
 of Justification. Christ, says Paul, has delivered us from this wicked
 kingdom of the devil and the world according to the good will, the
 pleasure and commandment of the Father. Hence we are not delivered by
 our own will, or shrewdness, or wisdom, but by the mercy and love of
 God, as it is written, I John 4:10, "Herein is love, not that we loved
 God, but that he loved us, and sent his Son to be the propitiation for
 our sins."
 
 Another reason why Paul, like John, emphasizes the Father's will is
 Christ's habit of directing attention to the Father. For Christ came
 into the world to reconcile God with us and to draw us to the Father.
 
 Not by curious inquiries into the nature of God shall we know God
 and His purpose for our salvation, but by taking hold of Christ, who
 according to the will of the Father has given Himself into death for our
 sins. When we understand this to be the will of the Father in Christ,
 then shall we know God to be merciful, and not angry. We shall realize
 that He loved us wretched sinners so much indeed that He gave us His
 only-begotten Son into death for us.
 
 The pronoun "our" refers to both God and Father. He is our God and
 our Father. Christ's Father and our Father are one and the same. Hence
 Christ said to Mary Magdalene: "Go to my brethren, and say unto them,
 I ascend unto my Father, and your Father; and to my God, and your God."
 God is our Father and our God, but only in Christ Jesus.
 
 
   VERSE 5. To whom be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
 
 Hebrew writing is interspersed with expressions of praise and gratitude.
 This peculiarity can be traced in the apostolic writings, particularly
 in those of Paul. The name of the Lord is to be mentioned with great
 reverence and thanksgiving.
 
 
   VERSE 6. I marvel.
 
 How patiently Paul deals with his seduced Galatians! He does not pounce
 on them but, like a father, he fairly excuses their error. With motherly
 affection he talks to them yet he does it in a way that at the same time
 he also reproves them. On the other hand, he is highly indignant at the
 seducers whom he blames for the apostasy of the Galatians. His anger
 bursts forth in elemental fury at the beginning of his epistle. "If
 any may," he cries, "preach any other gospel unto you than that ye
 have received, let him be accursed." Later on, in the fifth chapter,
 he threatens the false apostles with damnation. "He that troubleth you
 shall bear his judgment, whosoever he be." He pronounces a curse upon
 them. "I would they were even cut off which trouble you."
 
 He might have addressed the Galatians after this fashion: "I am ashamed
 of you. Your ingratitude grieves me. I am angry with you." But his
 purpose was to call them back to the Gospel. With this purpose in his
 mind he speaks very gently to them. He could not have chosen a milder
 expression than this, "I marvel." It indicates his sorrow and his
 displeasure.
 
 Paul minds the rule which he himself lays down in a later chapter where
 he says: "Brethren, if a man be overtaken in a fault, ye which are
 spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering
 thyself, lest thou also be tempted." Toward those who have been misled
 we are to show ourselves parentally affectionate, so that they may
 perceive that we seek not their destruction but their salvation. Over
 against the devil and his missionaries, the authors of false doctrines
 and sects, we ought to be like the Apostle, impatient, and rigorously
 condemnatory, as parents are with the dog that bites their little one,
 but the weeping child itself they soothe.
 
 The right spirit in Paul supplies him with an extraordinary facility
 in handling the afflicted consciences of the fallen. The Pope and his
 bishops, inspired by the desire to lord it over men's souls, crack out
 thunders and curses upon miserable consciences. They have no care for
 the saving of men's souls. They are interested only in maintaining their
 position.
 
 
   VERSE 6. That ye are so soon.
 
 Paul deplores the fact that it is difficult for the mind to retain a
 sound and steadfast faith. A man labors for a decade before he succeeds
 in training his little church into orderly religion, and then some
 ignorant and vicious poltroon comes along to overthrow in a minute the
 patient labor of years. By the grace of God we have effected here in
 Wittenberg the form of a Christian church. The Word of God is taught
 as it should be, the Sacraments are administered, and everything is
 prosperous. This happy condition, secured by many years of arduous
 labors, some lunatic might spoil in a moment. This happened in the
 churches of Galatia which Paul had brought into life in spiritual
 travail. Soon after his departure, however, these Galatian churches were
 thrown into confusion by the false apostles.
 
 The church is a tender plant. It must be watched. People hear a couple
 of sermons, scan a few pages of Holy Writ, and think they know it all.
 They are bold because they have never gone through any trials of faith.
 Void of the Holy Spirit, they teach what they please as long as it
 sounds good to the common people who are ever ready to join something
 new.
 
 We have to watch out for the devil lest he sow tares among the wheat
 while we sleep. No sooner had Paul turned his back on the churches of
 Galatia, than the false apostles went to work. Therefore, let us watch
 over ourselves and over the whole church.
 
 
   VERSE 6. I marvel that ye are so soon removed.
 
 Again the Apostle puts in a gentle word. He does not berate the
 Galatians, "I marvel that ye are so unsteady, unfaithful." He says,
 "I marvel that ye are so soon removed." He does not address them as
 evildoers. He speaks to them as people who have suffered great loss. He
 condemns those who removed them rather than the Galatians. At the same
 time he gently reproves them for permitting themselves to be removed.
 The criticism is implied that they should have been rather a little more
 settled in their beliefs. If they had taken better hold of the Word they
 could not have been removed so easily.
 
 Jerome thinks that Paul is playing upon the name Galatians, deriving
 it from the Hebrew word Galath, which means fallen or carried away, as
 though Paul wanted to say, "You are true Galatians, i.e., fallen away in
 name and in fact." Some believe that the Germans are descended from
 the Galatians. There may be something to that. For the Germans are not
 unlike the Galatians in their lack of constancy. At first we Germans are
 very enthusiastic, but presently our emotions cool and we become slack.
 When the light of the Gospel first came to us many were zealous, heard
 sermons greedily, and held the ministry of God's Word in high esteem.
 But now that religion has been reformed, many who formerly were
 such earnest disciples have discarded the Word of God, have become
 sow-bellies like the foolish and inconsistent Galatians.
 
 
   VERSE 6. From him that called you into the grace of Christ.
 
 The reading is a little doubtful. The sentence may be construed to read:
 "From that Christ that called you into grace"; or it may be construed to
 read: "From God that called you into the grace of Christ." I prefer the
 former for it seems to me that Paul's purpose is to impress upon us the
 benefits of Christ. This reading also preserves the implied criticism
 that the Galatians withdrew themselves from that Christ who had called
 them not unto the law, but unto grace. With Paul we decry the blindness
 and perverseness of men in that they will not receive the message of
 grace and salvation, or having received it they quickly let go of it,
 in spite of the fact that the Gospel bestows all good things spiritual:
 forgiveness of sins, true righteousness, peace of conscience,
 everlasting life; and all good things temporal: good judgment, good
 government and peace.
 
 Why does the world abhor the glad tidings of the Gospel and the
 blessings that go with it? Because the world is the devil's. Under his
 direction the world persecutes the Gospel and would if it could nail
 again Christ, the Son of God, to the Cross although He gave Himself into
 death for the sins of the world. The world dwells in darkness. The world
 is darkness.
 
 Paul accentuates the point that the Galatians had been called by Christ
 unto grace. "I taught you the doctrine of grace and of liberty from
 the Law, from sin and wrath, that you should be free in Christ, and
 not slaves to the hard laws of Moses. Will you allow yourselves to be
 carried away so easily from the living fountain of grace and life?"
 
 
   VERSE 6. Unto another gospel.
 
 Note the resourcefulness of the devil. Heretics do not advertise their
 errors. Murderers, adulterers, thieves disguise themselves. So the devil
 masquerades all his devices and activities. He puts on white to make
 himself look like an angel of light. He is astoundingly clever to sell
 his patent poison for the Gospel of Christ. Knowing Satan's guile, Paul
 sardonically calls the doctrine of the false apostles "another gospel,"
 as if he would say, "You Galatians have now another gospel, while my
 Gospel is no longer esteemed by you."
 
 We infer from this that the false apostles had depreciated the Gospel
 of Paul among the Galatians on the plea that it was incomplete.
 Their objection to Paul's Gospel is identical to that recorded in the
 fifteenth chapter of the Book of Acts to the effect that it was not
 enough for the Galatians to believe in Christ, or to be baptized, but
 that it was needful to circumcise them, and to command them to keep the
 law of Moses, for "except ye be circumcised after the manner of Moses,
 ye cannot be saved." As though Christ were a workman who had begun a
 building and left it for Moses to finish.
 
 Today the Anabaptists and others, finding it difficult to condemn us,
 accuse us Lutherans of timidity in professing the whole truth. They
 grant that we have laid the foundation in Christ, but claim that we
 have failed to go through with the building. In this way these perverse
 fanatics parade their cursed doctrine as the Word of God, and, flying
 the flag of God's name, they deceive many. The devil knows better
 than to appear ugly and black. He prefers to carry on his nefarious
 activities in the name of God. Hence the German proverb: "All mischief
 begins in the name of God."
 
 When the devil sees that he cannot hurt the cause of the Gospel by
 destructive methods, he does it under the guise of correcting and
 advancing the cause of the Gospel. He would like best of all to
 persecute us with fire and sword, but this method has availed him little
 because through the blood of martyrs the church has been watered. Unable
 to prevail by force, he engages wicked and ungodly teachers who at first
 make common cause with us, then claim that they are particularly called
 to teach the hidden mysteries of the Scriptures to superimpose upon the
 first principles of Christian doctrine that we teach. This sort of thing
 brings the Gospel into trouble. May we all cling to the Word of Christ
 against the wiles of the devil, "for we wrestle not against flesh and
 blood, but against principalities, against powers, against the rulers
 of the darkness of this world, against spiritual wickedness in high
 places."
 
 
   VERSE 7. Which is not another; but there be some that trouble you.
 
 Here again the apostle excuses the Galatians, while he blames the false
 apostles for disturbing their consciences and for stealing them out
 of his hand. How angry he gets at these deceivers! He calls them
 troublemakers, seducers of poor consciences.
 
 This passage adduces further evidence that the false apostles defamed
 Paul as an imperfect apostle and a weak and erroneous preacher. They
 condemn Paul, Paul condemns them. Such warfare of condemnation is always
 going on in the church. The papists and the fanatics hate us, condemn
 our doctrine, and want to kill us. We in turn hate and condemn their
 cursed doctrine. In the meanwhile the people are uncertain whom to
 follow and which way to turn, for it is not given to everybody to
 judge these matters. But the truth will win out. So much is certain,
 we persecute no man, neither does our doctrine trouble men. On the
 contrary, we have the testimony of many good men who thank God on their
 knees for the consolation that our doctrine has brought them. Like Paul,
 we are not to blame that the churches have trouble. The fault lies with
 the Anabaptists and other fanatics.
 
 Every teacher of work-righteousness is a trouble-maker. Has it never
 occurred to you that the pope, cardinals, bishops, monks, and that the
 whole synagogue of Satan are trouble-makers? The truth is, they are
 worse than false apostles. The false apostles taught that in addition
 to faith in Christ the works of the Law of God were necessary unto
 salvation. But the papists omit faith altogether and teach self-devised
 traditions and works that are not commanded of God, indeed are contrary
 to the Word of God, and for these traditions they demand preferred
 attention and obedience.
 
 Paul calls the false apostles troublers of the church because they
 taught circumcision and the keeping of the Law as needful unto
 salvation. They insisted that the Law must be observed in every detail.
 They were supporters in this contention by the Jews, with the result
 that those who were not firmly established in faith were easily
 persuaded that Paul was not a sincere teacher of God because he ignored
 the Law. The Jews were offended at the idea that the Law of God
 should be entirely ignored by Paul and that the Gentiles, former
 idol-worshippers, should gratuitously attain to the station of God's
 people without circumcision, without the penitentiary performance of the
 law, by grace alone through faith in Christ Jesus.
 
 These criticisms were amplified by the false apostles. They accused
 Paul of designs to abolish the law of God and the Jewish dispensation,
 contrary to the law of God, contrary to their Jewish heritage, contrary
 to apostolic example, contrary to Paul's own example. They demanded that
 Paul be shunned as a blasphemer and a rebel, while they were to be heard
 as true teachers of the Gospel and authentic disciples of the apostles.
 Thus Paul stood defamed among the Galatians. He was forced to attack the
 false apostles. He did so without hesitation.
 
 
   VERSE 7. And would pervert the gospel of Christ.
 To paraphrase this sentence: "These false apostles do not merely trouble
 you, they abolish Christ's Gospel. They act as if they were the only
 true Gospel-preachers. For all that they muddle Law and Gospel. As a
 result they pervert the Gospel. Either Christ must live and the Law
 perish, or the Law remains and Christ must perish; Christ and the Law
 cannot dwell side by side in the conscience. It is either grace or law.
 To muddle the two is to eliminate the Gospel of Christ entirely."
 
 It seems a small matter to mingle the Law and Gospel, faith and works,
 but it creates more mischief than man's brain can conceive. To mix Law
 and Gospel not only clouds the knowledge of grace, it cuts out Christ
 altogether.
 
 The words of Paul, "and would pervert the gospel of Christ," also
 indicate how arrogant these false apostles were. They were shameless
 boasters. Paul simply had to exalt his own ministry and Gospel.
 
 
   VERSE 8. But though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other
   gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him
   be accursed.
 
 Paul's zeal for the Gospel becomes so fervent that it almost leads him
 to curse angels. "I would rather that I, my brethren, yes, the angels of
 heaven be anathematized than that my gospel be overthrown."
 
 The Greek word _anathema_, Hebrew _herem_, means to accurse, execrate,
 to damn. Paul first (hypothetically) curses himself. Knowing persons
 first find fault with themselves in order that they may all the more
 earnestly reprove others.
 
 Paul maintains that there is no other gospel besides the one he
 had preached to the Galatians. He preached, not a gospel of his own
 invention, but the very same Gospel God had long ago prescribed in the
 Sacred Scriptures. No wonder Paul pronounces curses upon himself and
 upon others, upon the angels of heaven, if anyone should dare to preach
 any other gospel than Christ's own.
 
 
   VERSE 9. As we said before, so say I now again. If any man preach
   any other gospel unto you than that ye have received, let him be
   accursed.
 
 Paul repeats the curse, directing it now upon other persons. Before, he
 cursed himself, his brethren, and an angel from heaven. "Now," he says,
 "if there are any others who preach a gospel different from that you
 have received from us, let them also be accursed." Paul herewith curses
 and excommunicates all false teachers including his opponents. He is so
 worked up that he dares to curse all who pervert his Gospel. Would to
 God that this terrible pronouncement of the Apostle might strike fear
 into the hearts of all who pervert the Gospel of Paul.
 
 The Galatians might say: "Paul, we do not pervert the Gospel you have
 brought unto us. We did not quite understand it. That is all. Now these
 teachers who came after you have explained everything so beautifully."
 This explanation the Apostle refuses to accept. They must add nothing;
 they must correct nothing. "What you received from me is the genuine
 Gospel of God. Let it stand. If any man brings any other gospel than the
 one I brought you, or promises to deliver better things than you have
 received from me, let him be accursed."
 
 In spite of this emphatic denunciation so many accept the pope as the
 supreme judge of the Scriptures. "The Church," they say, "chose only
 four gospels. The Church might have chosen more. Ergo the Church is
 above the Gospel." With equal force one might argue: "I approve the
 Scriptures. Ergo I am above the Scriptures. John the Baptist confessed
 Christ. Hence he is above Christ." Paul subordinates himself, all
 preachers, all the angels of heaven, everybody to the Sacred Scriptures.
 We are not the masters, judges, or arbiters, but witnesses, disciples,
 and confessors of the Scriptures, whether we be pope, Luther, Augustine,
 Paul, or an angel from heaven.
 
 
   VERSE 10. For do I now persuade men, or God?
 
 With the same vehemence Paul continues: "You Galatians ought to be able
 to tell from my preaching and from the many afflictions which I have
 endured, whether I serve men or God. Everybody can see that my preaching
 has stirred up persecution against me everywhere, and has earned for me
 the cruel hatred of my own people, in fact the hatred of all men. This
 should convince you that by my preaching I do not seek the favor and
 praise of men, but the glory of God."
 
 No man can say that we are seeking the favor and praise of men with our
 doctrine. We teach that all men are naturally depraved. We condemn
 man's free will, his strength, wisdom, and righteousness. We say that we
 obtain grace by the free mercy of God alone for Christ's sake. This is
 no preaching to please men. This sort of preaching procures for us
 the hatred and disfavor of the world, persecutions, excommunications,
 murders, and curses.
 
 "Can't you see that I seek no man's favor by my doctrine?" asks Paul.
 "If I were anxious for the favor of men I would flatter them. But what
 do I do? I condemn their works. I teach things only that I have been
 commanded to teach from above. For that I bring down upon my head
 the wrath of Jews and Gentiles. My doctrine must be right. It must
 be divine. Any other doctrine cannot be better than mine. Any other
 doctrine must be false and wicked."
 
 With Paul we boldly pronounce a curse upon every doctrine that does not
 agree with ours. We do not preach for the praise of men, or the favor of
 princes. We preach for the favor of God alone whose grace and mercy we
 proclaim. Whosoever teaches a gospel contrary to ours, or different from
 ours, let us be bold to say that he is sent of the devil.
 
 
   VERSE 10. Or do I seek to please men?
 
 "Do I serve men or God?" Paul keeps an eye on the false apostles, those
 flatterers of men. They taught circumcision to avoid the hatred and
 persecution of men.
 
 To this day you will find many who seek to please men in order that they
 may live in peace and security. They teach whatever is agreeable to men,
 no matter whether it is contrary to God's Word or their own conscience.
 But we who endeavor to please God and not men, stir up hell itself. We
 must suffer reproach, slanders, death.
 
 For those who go about to please men we have a word from Christ recorded
 in the fifth chapter of St. John: "How can ye believe, which receive
 honor one of another, and seek not the honor that cometh from God
 alone?"
 
 
   VERSE 10. For if I yet pleased men, I should not be the servant of
   Christ.
 
 Observe the consummate cleverness with which the false apostles went
 about to bring Paul into disrepute. They combed Paul's writings for
 contradictions (our opponents do the same) to accuse him of teaching
 contradictory things. They found that Paul had circumcised Timothy
 according to the Law, that Paul had purified himself with four other men
 in the Temple at Jerusalem, that Paul had shaven his head at Cenchrea.
 The false apostles slyly suggested that Paul had been constrained by
 the other apostles to observe these ceremonial laws. We know that Paul
 observed these _decora_ out of charitable regard for the weak brethren.
 He did not want to offend them. But the false apostles turned Paul's
 charitable regard to his disadvantage. If Paul had preached the Law and
 circumcision, if he had commended the strength and free will of man, he
 would not have been so obnoxious to the Jews. On the contrary they would
 have praised his every action.
 
 
   VERSES 11, 12. But I certify you, brethren, that the gospel which
   was preached of me is not after man. For I neither received it of
   man, neither was I taught it, but by the revelation of Jesus Christ.
 
 This passage constitutes Paul's chief defense against the accusations of
 his opponents. He maintains under oath that he received his Gospel not
 from men, but by the revelation of Jesus Christ.
 
 In declaring that his Gospel is not after man, Paul does not merely wish
 to state that his Gospel is not mundane. The false apostles made the
 same claim for their gospel. Paul means to say that he learned his
 Gospel not in the usual and accepted manner through the agency of men
 by hearing, reading, or writing. He received the Gospel by special
 revelation directly from Jesus Christ.
 
 Paul received his Gospel on the way to Damascus when Christ appeared to
 him. St. Luke furnishes an account of the incident in the ninth chapter
 of the Book of Acts. "Arise," said Christ to Paul, "and go into the
 city, and it shall be told thee what thou must do." Christ did not send
 Paul into the city to learn the Gospel from Ananias. Ananias was only
 to baptize Paul, to lay his hands on Paul, to commit the ministry of the
 Word unto Paul, and to recommend him to the Church. Ananias recognized
 his limited assignment when he said to Paul: "Brother Saul, the Lord,
 even Jesus, that appeared unto thee in the way as thou camest, hath sent
 me, that thou mightest receive thy sight, and be filled with the Holy
 Ghost." Paul did not receive instruction from Ananias. Paul had already
 been called, enlightened, and taught by Christ in the road. His contact
 with Ananias was merely a testimonial to the fact that Paul had been
 called by Christ to preach the Gospel.
 
 Paul was forced to speak of his conversion to combat the slanderous
 contention of the false apostles to the effect that this apostleship was
 inferior to that of the other apostles.
 
 If it were not for the example of the Galatian churches I would never
 have thought it possible that anybody who had received the Word of God
 with such eagerness as they had, could so quickly let go of it. Good
 Lord, what terrible mischief one single false statement can create.
 
 The article of justification is fragile. Not in itself, of course, but
 in us. I know how quickly a person can forfeit the joy of the Gospel.
 I know in what slippery places even those stand who seem to have a good
 footing in the matters of faith. In the midst of the conflict when we
 should be consoling ourselves with the Gospel, the Law rears up and
 begins to rage all over our conscience. I say the Gospel is frail
 because we are frail.
 
 What makes matters worse is that one-half of ourselves, our own reason,
 stands against us. The flesh resists the spirit, or as Paul puts it,
 "The flesh lusteth against the Spirit." Therefore we teach that to know
 Christ and to believe in Him is no achievement of man, but the gift of
 God. God alone can create and preserve faith in us. God creates faith in
 us through the Word. He increases, strengthens and confirms faith in us
 through His word. Hence the best service that anybody can render God is
 diligently to hear and read God's Word. On the other hand, nothing is
 more perilous than to be weary of the Word of God. Thinking he knows
 enough, a person begins little by little to despise the Word until he
 has lost Christ and the Gospel altogether.
 
 Let every believer carefully learn the Gospel. Let him continue in
 humble prayer. We are molested not by puny foes, but by mighty ones,
 foes who never grow tired of warring against us. These, our enemies,
 are many: Our own flesh, the world, the Law, sin, death, the wrath and
 judgment of God, and the devil himself.
 
 The arguments which the false apostles advanced impress people to this
 day. "Who are you to dissent from the fathers and the entire Church, and
 to bring a contradictory doctrine? Are you wiser than so many holy men,
 wiser than the whole Church?" When Satan, abetted by our own reason,
 advances these arguments against us, we lose heart, unless we keep
 on saying to ourselves: "I don't care if Cyprian, Ambrose, Augustine,
 Peter, Paul, John, or an angel from heaven, teaches so and so. I know
 that I teach the truth of God in Christ Jesus."
 
 When I first took over the defense of the Gospel, I remembered what
 Doctor Staupitz said to me. "I like it well," he said, "that the
 doctrine which you proclaim gives glory to God alone and none to man.
 For never can too much glory, goodness, and mercy be ascribed unto God."
 These words of the worthy Doctor comforted and confirmed me. The Gospel
 is true because it deprives men of all glory, wisdom, and righteousness
 and turns over all honor to the Creator alone. It is safer to attribute
 too much glory unto God than unto man.
 
 You may argue that the Church and the fathers are holy. Yet the Church
 is compelled to pray: "Forgive us our trespasses," I am not to be
 believed, nor is the Church to be believed, or the fathers, or the
 apostles, or an angel from heaven, if they teach anything contrary to
 the Word of God. Let the Word of God abide forever.
 
 Peter erred in life and in doctrine. Paul might have dismissed Peter's
 error as a matter of no consequence. But Paul saw that Peter's error
 would lead to the damage of the whole Church unless it were corrected.
 Therefore he withstood Peter to his face. The Church, Peter, the
 apostles, angels from heaven, are not to be heard unless they teach the
 genuine Word of God.
 
 This argument is not always to our advantage. People ask: "Whom then
 shall we believe?" Our opponents maintain that they teach the pure Word
 of God. We do not believe them. They in turn hate and persecute us for
 vile heretics. What can we do about it? With Paul we glory in the Gospel
 of Jesus Christ. What do we gain? We are told that our glorying is idle
 vanity and unadulterated blasphemy. The moment we abase ourselves and
 give in to the rage of our opponents, Papists and Anabaptists grow
 arrogant. The Anabaptists hatch out some new monstrosity. The Papists
 revive their old abominations. What to do? Let everybody become sure of
 his calling and doctrine, that he may boldly say with Paul: "But though
 we, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel unto you than ye
 have received, let him be accursed."
 
 
   VERSES 13, 14. For ye have heard of my conversation in time past in
   the Jews' religion, how that beyond measure I persecuted the church
   of God, and wasted it: And profited in the Jews' religion above many
   my equals in mine own nation.
 
 This passage does not contain doctrine. Paul adduces his own case for an
 example. "I have," he says, "at one time defended the traditions of the
 Pharisees more fiercely than any of your false apostles. Now, if the
 righteousness of the Law had been worth anything I would never have
 forsaken it. So carefully did I live up to the Law that I excelled many
 of my companions. So zealous was I in defense of the Law that I wasted
 the church of God."
 
 
   VERSE 14. Being more exceedingly zealous of the traditions of my
   fathers.
 
 Speaking now of the Mosaic Law, Paul declares that he was wrapped up
 in it. To the Philippians he wrote: "As touching the law, a Pharisee;
 concerning zeal, persecuting the church; touching the righteousness
 which is in the law, blameless." He means to say, "I can compare myself
 with the best and holiest of all those who are of the circumcision. Let
 them show me if they can, a more earnest defender of the Mosaic Law than
 I was at one time. This fact, O Galatians, should have put you on your
 guard against these deceivers who make so much of the Law. If anybody
 ever had reason to glory in the righteousness of the Law, it was I."
 I too may say that before I was enlightened by the Gospel, I was as
 zealous for the papistical laws and traditions of the fathers as ever
 a man was. I tried hard to live up to every law as best I could. I
 punished myself with fasting, watching, praying, and other exercises
 more than all those who today hate and persecute me. I was so much in
 earnest that I imposed upon my body more than it could stand. I honored
 the pope as a matter of conscience. Whatever I did, I did with a single
 heart to the glory of God. But our opponents, well-fed idlers that they
 are, will not believe what I and many others have endured.
 
 
   VERSES 15, 16, 17. But when it pleased God, who separated me from
   my mother's womb, and called me by his grace. To reveal his Son in
   me, that I might preach him among the heathen; immediately I
   conferred not with flesh and blood: Neither went I up to Jerusalem to
   them which were apostles before me; but I went into Arabia, and
   returned again unto Damascus.
 
 Here Paul relates that immediately upon being called by God to preach
 the Gospel to the Gentiles, he went into Arabia without consulting a
 single person. "When it had pleased God," he writes, "I did not deserve
 it. I had been an enemy of Christ. I had blasphemed His Gospel. I had
 shed innocent blood. In the midst of my frenzy I was called. Why? On
 account of my outrageous cruelty? Indeed not. My gracious God who shows
 mercy unto whom He will, pardoned all mine iniquities. He bestowed His
 grace upon me, and called me for an apostle."
 
 We also have come to the knowledge of the truth by the same kindness of
 God. I crucified Christ daily in my cloistered life, and blasphemed God
 by my wrong faith. Outwardly I kept myself chaste, poor, and obedient. I
 was much given to fasting, watching, praying, saying of masses, and the
 like. Yet under the cloak of my outward respectability I continually
 mistrusted, doubted, feared, hated, and blasphemed God. My righteousness
 was a filthy puddle. Satan loves such saints. They are his darlings,
 for they quickly destroy their body and soul by depriving them of the
 blessings of God's generous gifts.
 
 I tell you I stood in awe of the pope's authority. To dissent from him I
 considered a crime worthy of eternal death. I thought of John Huss as a
 cursed heretic. I counted it a sin even to think of him. I would gladly
 have furnished the wood to burn him. I would have felt I had done God a
 real service.
 
 In comparison with these sanctimonious hypocrites of the papacy,
 publicans and harlots are not bad. They at least feel remorse. They
 at least do not try to justify their wicked deeds. But these pretended
 saints, so far from acknowledging their errors, justify them and regard
 them as acceptable sacrifices unto God.
 
 
   VERSE 15. When it pleased God.
 
 "By the favor of God I, a wicked and cursed wretch, a blasphemer,
 persecutor, and rebel, was spared. Not content to spare me, God granted
 unto me the knowledge of His salvation, His Spirit, His Son, the office
 of an apostle, everlasting life." Paul speaking.
 
 God not only pardoned our iniquities, but in addition overwhelmed us
 with blessings and spiritual gifts. Many, however, are ungrateful.
 Worse, by opening again a window to the devil many begin to loathe God's
 Word, and end by perverting the Gospel.
 
 
   VERSE 15. Who separated me from my mother's womb.
 
 This is a Hebrew expression, meaning to sanctify, ordain, prepare. Paul
 is saying, "When I was not yet born God ordained me to be an apostle,
 and in due time confirmed my apostleship before the world. Every gift,
 be it small or great, spiritual or temporal, and every good thing I
 should ever do, God has ordained while I was yet in my mother's womb
 where I could neither think nor perform any good thing. After I was born
 God supported me. Heaping mercy upon mercy, He freely forgave my sins,
 replenishing me with His grace to enable me to learn what great things
 are ours in Christ. To crown it all, He called me to preach the Gospel
 to others."
 
 
   VERSE 15. And called me by his grace.
 
 "Did God call me on account of my holy life? Or on account of my
 pharisaical religion? Or on account of my prayers, fastings, and works?
 Never. Well, then, it is certain God did not call me on account of my
 blasphemies, persecutions, oppressions. What prompted Him to call me?
 His grace alone."
 
 
   VERSE 16. To reveal his Son to me.
 
 We now hear what kind of doctrine was committed to Paul: The doctrine
 of the Gospel, the doctrine of the revelation of the Son of God.
 This doctrine differs greatly from the Law. The Law terrorizes the
 conscience. The Law reveals the wrath and judgment of God. The Gospel
 does not threaten. The Gospel announces that Christ is come to forgive
 the sins of the world. The Gospel conveys to us the inestimable
 treasures of God.
 
 
   VERSE 16. That I might preach him among the heathen.
 
 "It pleased God," says the Apostle, "to reveal himself in me. Why? For a
 twofold purpose. That I personally should believe in the Son of God, and
 that I should reveal Him to the Gentiles."
 
 Paul does not mention the Jews, for the simple reason that he was the
 called and acknowledged apostle of the Gentiles, although he preached
 Christ also to the Jews.
 
 We can hear the Apostle saying to himself: "I will not burden the
 Gentiles with the Law, because I am their apostle and not their
 lawgiver. Not once did you Galatians hear me speak of the righteousness
 of the Law or of works. My job was to bring you the Gospel. Therefore
 you ought to listen to no teachers of the Law, but the Gospel: not
 Moses, but the Son of God; not the righteousness of works, but the
 righteousness of faith must be proclaimed to the Gentiles. That is the
 right kind of preaching for Gentiles."
 
 
   VERSE 16. Immediately I conferred not with flesh and blood.
 
 Once Paul had received the Gospel from Christ, he conferred with nobody
 in Damascus. He asked no man to teach him. He did not go up to Jerusalem
 to sit at the feet of Peter and the other apostles. At once he preached
 Jesus Christ in Damascus.
 
 
   VERSE 17. Neither went I up to Jerusalem to them which were
   apostles before me; but I went into Arabia, and returned again unto
   Damascus.
 
 "I went to Arabia before I saw any of the apostles. I took it upon
 myself to preach the Gospel to the Gentiles without delay, because
 Christ had called me for that purpose." This statement refutes the
 assertion of the false apostles that Paul had been a pupil of the
 apostles, from which the false apostles inferred that Paul had been
 instructed in the obedience of the Law, that therefore the Gentiles also
 ought to keep the Law and submit to circumcision.
 
 
   VERSES 18, 19. Then after three years I went up to Jerusalem to see
   Peter, and abode with him fifteen days. But other of the apostles
   saw I none, save James the Lord's brother.
 
 Paul minutely recounts his personal history to stop the cavil of the
 false apostles. Paul does not deny that he had been with some of the
 apostles. He went to Jerusalem uninvited, not to be instructed, but to
 visit with Peter. Luke reports the occasion in the ninth chapter of the
 Book of Acts. Barnabas introduced Paul to the apostles and related to
 them how Paul had met the Lord Jesus on the way to Damascus, also how
 Paul had preached boldly at Damascus in the name of Jesus. Paul says
 that he saw Peter and James, but he denies that he learned anything from
 them.
 
 Why does Paul harp on this seemingly unimportant fact? To convince the
 churches of Galatia that his Gospel was the true Word of Christ which he
 learned from Christ Himself and from no man. Paul was forced to affirm
 and re-affirm this fact. His usefulness to all the churches that had
 used him as their pastor and teacher was at stake.
 
 
   VERSE 20. Now the things which I write unto you, behold, before God,
   I lie not.
 
 Was it necessary for Paul to go under oath? Yes. Paul is reporting
 personal history. How else would the churches believe him? The false
 apostles might say, "Who knows whether Paul is telling the truth?"
 Paul, the elect vessel of God, was held in so little esteem by his own
 Galatians to whom he had preached Christ that it was necessary for him
 to swear an oath that he spoke the truth. If this happened to Paul, what
 business have we to complain when people doubt our words, or hold us
 in little regard, we who cannot begin to compare ourselves with the
 Apostle?
 
 
   VERSE 21. Afterwards I came into the regions of Syria and Cilicia.
 
 Syria and Cilicia are adjacent countries. Paul traces his movements
 carefully in order to convince the Galatians that he had never been the
 disciple of any apostle.
 
 
   VERSES 22, 23, 24. And was unknown by face unto the churches of
   Judaea which were in Christ: But they had heard only, that he which
   persecuted us in times past now preacheth the faith which once he
   destroyed. And they glorified God in me.
 
 In Syria and Cilicia Paul won the indorsement of all the churches of
 Judea, by his preaching. All the churches everywhere, even those of
 Judea, could testify that he had preached the same faith everywhere.
 "And," Paul adds, "these churches glorified God in me, not because I
 taught that circumcision and the law of Moses should be observed, but
 because I urged upon all faith in the Lord Jesus Christ."
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 2
 
 
   VERSE 1. Then fourteen years after I went up again to Jerusalem.
 
 Paul taught justification by faith in Christ Jesus, without the deeds
 of the Law. He reported this to the disciples at Antioch. Among the
 disciples were some that had been brought up in the ancient customs of
 the Jews. These rose against Paul in quick indignation, accusing him of
 propagating a gospel of lawlessness.
 
 Great dissension followed. Paul and Barnabas stood up for the truth.
 They testified: "Wherever we preached to the Gentiles, the Holy Ghost
 came upon those who received the Word. This happened everywhere. We
 preached not circumcision, we did not require observance of the Law. We
 preached faith in Jesus Christ. At our preaching of faith, God gave to
 the hearers the Holy Ghost." From this fact Paul and Barnabas inferred
 that the Holy Ghost approved the faith of the Gentiles without the Law
 and circumcision. If the faith of the Gentiles had not pleased the Holy
 Ghost, He would not have manifested His presence in the uncircumcised
 hearers of the Word.
 
 Unconvinced, the Jews fiercely opposed Paul, asserting that the Law
 ought to be kept and that the Gentiles ought to be circumcised, or else
 they could not be saved.
 
 When we consider the obstinacy with which Romanists cling to their
 traditions, we can very well understand the zealous devotion of the
 Jews for the Law. After all, they had received the Law from God. We
 can understand how impossible it was for recent converts from Judaism
 suddenly to break with the Law. For that matter, God did bear with them,
 as He bore with the infirmity of Israel when the people halted
 between two religions. Was not God patient with us also while we were
 blindfolded by the papacy? God is longsuffering and full of mercy. But
 we dare not abuse the patience of the Lord. We dare no longer continue
 in error now that the truth has been revealed in the Gospel. The
 opponents of Paul had his own example to prefer against him. Paul had
 circumcised Timothy. Paul defended his action on the ground that he had
 circumcised Timothy, not from compulsion, but from Christian love, lest
 the weak in faith should be offended. His opponents would not accept
 Paul's explanation.
 
 When Paul saw that the quarrel was getting out of hand he obeyed the
 direction of God and left for Jerusalem, there to confer with the other
 apostles. He did this not for his own sake, but for the sake of the
 people.
 
 
   VERSE 1. With Barnabas, and took Titus with me also.
 
 Paul chose two witnesses, Barnabas and Titus. Barnabas had been Paul's
 preaching companion to the Gentiles. Barnabas was an eye-witness of the
 fact that the Holy Ghost had come upon the Gentiles in response to the
 simple preaching of faith in Jesus Christ. Barnabas stuck to Paul on
 this point, that it was not necessary for the Gentiles to be bothered
 with the Law as long as they believed in Christ.
 
 Titus was superintendent of the churches in Crete, having been placed in
 charge of the churches by Paul. Titus was a former Gentile.
 
 
   VERSE 2. And I went up by revelation.
 
 If God had not ordered Paul to Jerusalem, Paul would never have gone
 there.
 
 
   VERSE 2. And communicated unto them that gospel.
 
 After an absence of fourteen years, respectively eighteen years, Paul
 returned to Jerusalem to confer with the other apostles.
 
 
   VERSE 2. Which I preach among the Gentiles.
 
 Among the Jews Paul allowed Law and circumcision to stand for the time
 being. So did all the apostles. Nevertheless Paul held fast to the
 liberty of the Gospel. On one occasion he said to the Jews: "Through
 this man (Christ) is preached unto you forgiveness of sins; and by him
 all that believe are justified from all things, from which ye could not
 be justified by the law of Moses." (Acts 13:39.) Always remembering the
 weak, Paul did not insist that they break at once with the Law.
 
 Paul admits that he conferred with the apostles concerning his Gospel.
 But he denies that the conference benefited or taught him anything. The
 fact is he resisted those who wanted to force the practice of the Law
 upon the Gentiles. They did not overcome him, he overcame them. "Your
 false apostles lie, when they say that I circumcised Timothy, shaved
 my head in Cenchrea, and went up to Jerusalem, at the request of the
 apostles. I went to Jerusalem at the request of God. What is more, I won
 the indorsement of the apostles. My opponents lost out."
 
 The matter upon which the apostles deliberated in conference was
 this: Is the observance of the Law requisite unto justification? Paul
 answered: "I have preached faith in Christ to the Gentiles, and not the
 Law. If the Jews want to keep the Law and be circumcised, very well, as
 long as they do so from a right motive."
 
 
   VERSE 2. But privately to them which were of reputation.
 
 This is to say, "I conferred not only with the brethren, but with the
 leaders among them."
 
 
   VERSE 2. Lest by any means I should run, or had run, in vain.
 
 Not that Paul himself ever thought he had run in vain. However, many
 did think that Paul had preached the Gospel in vain, because he kept the
 Gentiles free from the yoke of the Law. The opinion that obedience to
 the Law was mandatory unto salvation was gaining ground. Paul meant to
 remedy this evil. By this conference he hoped to establish the identity
 of his Gospel with that of the other apostles, to stop the talk of his
 opponents that he had been running around in vain.
 
 
   VERSE 3. But neither Titus, who was with me, being a Greek, was
   compelled to be circumcised.
 
 The word "compelled" acquaints us with the outcome of the conference.
 It was resolved that the Gentiles should not be compelled to be
 circumcised.
 
 Paul did not condemn circumcision in itself. Neither by word nor deed
 did he ever inveigh against circumcision. But he did protest against
 circumcision being made a condition for salvation. He cited the case of
 the Fathers. "The fathers were not justified by circumcision. It was to
 them a sign and seal of righteousness. They looked upon circumcision as
 a confession of their faith."
 
 The believing Jews, however, could not get it through their heads that
 circumcision was not necessary for salvation. They were encouraged in
 their wrong attitude by the false apostles. The result was that the
 people were up in arms against Paul and his doctrine.
 
 Paul did not condemn circumcision as if it were a sin to receive it.
 But he insisted, and the conference upheld him, that circumcision had
 no bearing upon salvation and was therefore not to be forced upon the
 Gentiles. The conference agreed that the Jews should be permitted to
 keep their ancient customs for the time being, so long as they did not
 regard those customs as conveying God's justification of the sinner.
 
 The false apostles were dissatisfied with the verdict of the conference.
 They did not want to rest circumcision and the practice of the Law in
 Christian liberty. They insisted that circumcision was obligatory unto
 salvation.
 
 As the opponents of Paul, so our own adversaries [Luther's, the enemies
 of the Reformation] contend that the traditions of the Fathers dare not
 be neglected without loss of salvation. Our opponents will not agree
 with us on anything. They defend their blasphemies. They go as far to
 enforce them with the sword.
 
 Paul's victory was complete. Titus, who was with Paul, was not compelled
 to be circumcised, although he stood in the midst of the apostles when
 this question of circumcision was debated. This was a blow to the
 false apostles. With the living fact that Titus was not compelled to be
 circumcised Paul was able to squelch his adversaries.
 
 
   VERSES 4,5. And that because of false brethren unawares brought in,
   who came in privily to spy out our liberty which we have in Christ
   Jesus, that they might bring us into bondage: To whom we gave place by
   subjection, no, not for an hour; that the truth of the gospel might
   continue with you.
 
 Paul here explains his motive for going up to Jerusalem. He did not go
 to Jerusalem to be instructed or confirmed in his Gospel by the other
 apostles. He went to Jerusalem in order to preserve the true Gospel for
 the Galatian churches and for all the churches of the Gentiles.
 
 When Paul speaks of the truth of the Gospel he implies by contrast a
 false gospel. The false apostles also had a gospel, but it was an untrue
 gospel. "In holding out against them," says Paul, "I conserved the truth
 of the pure Gospel."
 
 Now the true Gospel has it that we are justified by faith alone, without
 the deeds of the Law. The false gospel has it that we are justified by
 faith, but not without the deeds of the Law. The false apostles preached
 a conditional gospel.
 
 So do the papists. They admit that faith is the foundation of salvation.
 But they add the conditional clause that faith can save only when it is
 furnished with good works. This is wrong. The true Gospel declares that
 good works are the embellishment of faith, but that faith itself is the
 gift and work of God in our hearts. Faith is able to justify, because it
 apprehends Christ, the Redeemer.
 
 Human reason can think only in terms of the Law. It mumbles: "This I
 have done, this I have not done." But faith looks to Jesus Christ, the
 Son of God, given into death for the sins of the whole world. To turn
 one's eyes away from Jesus means to turn them to the Law.
 
 True faith lays hold of Christ and leans on Him alone. Our opponents
 cannot understand this. In their blindness they cast away the precious
 pearl, Christ, and hang onto their stubborn works. They have no idea
 what faith is. How can they teach faith to others?
 
 Not satisfied with teaching an untrue gospel, the false apostles tried
 to entangle Paul. "They went about," says Paul, "to spy out our liberty
 which we have in Christ Jesus, that they might bring us into bondage."
 
 When Paul saw through their scheme, he attacked the false apostles. He
 says, "We did not let go of the liberty which we have in Christ Jesus.
 We routed them by the judgment of the apostles, and we would not give in
 to them, no, not an inch."
 
 We too were willing to make all kinds of concessions to the papists.
 Yes, we are willing to offer them more than we should. But we will not
 give up the liberty of conscience which we have in Christ Jesus. We
 refuse to have our conscience bound by any work or law, so that by doing
 this or that we should be righteous, or leaving this or that undone we
 should be damned.
 
 Since our opponents will not let it stand that only faith in Christ
 justifies, we will not yield to them. On the question of justification
 we must remain adamant, or else we shall lose the truth of the Gospel.
 It is a matter of life and death. It involves the death of the Son
 of God, who died for the sins of the world. If we surrender faith
 in Christ, as the only thing that can justify us, the death and
 resurrection of Jesus are without meaning; that Christ is the Savior
 of the world would be a myth. God would be a liar, because He would not
 have fulfilled His promises. Our stubbornness is right, because we want
 to preserve the liberty which we have in Christ. Only by preserving our
 liberty shall we be able to retain the truth of the Gospel inviolate.
 
 Some will object that the Law is divine and holy. Let it be divine and
 holy. The Law has no right to tell me that I must be justified by it.
 The Law has the right to tell me that I should love God and my neighbor,
 that I should live in chastity, temperance, patience, etc. The Law has
 no right to tell me how I may be delivered from sin, death, and hell. It
 is the Gospel's business to tell me that. I must listen to the Gospel.
 It tells me, not what I must do, but what Jesus Christ, the Son of God,
 has done for me.
 
 To conclude, Paul refused to circumcise Titus for the reason that the
 false apostles wanted to compel him to circumcise Titus. Paul refused to
 accede to their demands. If they had asked it on the plea of brotherly
 love, Paul would not have denied them. But because they demanded it on
 the ground that it was necessary for salvation, Paul defied them, and
 prevailed. Titus was not circumcised.
 
 
   VERSE 6. But of those who seemed to be somewhat, whatsoever they
   were, it maketh no matter to me.
 
 This is a good point in Paul's refutation. Paul disparages the authority
 and dignity of the true apostles. He says of them, "Which seemed to be
 somewhat." The authority of the apostles was indeed great in all the
 churches. Paul did not want to detract from their authority, but he had
 to speak disparagingly of their authority in order to conserve the truth
 of the Gospel, and the liberty of conscience.
 
 The false apostles used this argument against Paul: "The apostles lived
 with Christ for three years. They heard His sermons. They witnessed His
 miracles. They themselves preached and performed miracles while Christ
 was on earth. Paul never saw Jesus in the flesh. Now, whom ought you to
 believe: Paul, who stands alone, a mere disciple of the apostles, one
 of the last and least; or will you believe those grand apostles who were
 sent and confirmed by Christ Himself long before Paul?"
 
 What could Paul say to that? He answered: "What they say has no bearing
 on the argument. If the apostles were angels from heaven, that would not
 impress me. We are not now discussing the excellency of the apostles. We
 are talking about the Word of God now, and the truth of the Gospel. That
 Gospel is more excellent than all apostles."
 
 
   VERSE 6. God accepteth no man's person.
 
 Paul is quoting Moses: "Thou shalt not respect the person of the poor,
 nor honor the person of the mighty." (Lev. 19:15) This quotation from
 Moses ought to shut the mouths of the false apostles. "Don't you
 know that God is no respecter of persons?" cries Paul. The dignity
 or authority of men means nothing to God. The fact is that God often
 rejects just such who stand in the odor of sanctity and in the aura
 of importance. In doing so God seems unjust and harsh. But men need
 deterring examples. For it is a vice with us to esteem personality more
 highly than the Word of God. God wants us to exalt His Word and not men.
 
 There must be people in high office, of course. But we are not to deify
 them. The governor, the mayor, the preacher, the teacher, the scholar,
 father, mother, are persons whom we are to love and revere, but not to
 the extent that we forget God. Least we attach too much importance
 to the person, God leaves with important persons offenses and sins,
 sometimes astounding shortcomings, to show us that there is a lot of
 difference between any person and God. David was a good king. But when
 the people began to think too well of him, down he fell into horrible
 sins, adultery and murder. Peter, excellent apostle that he was, denied
 Christ. Such examples of which the Scriptures are full, ought to warn
 us not to repose our trust in men. In the papacy appearance counts for
 everything. Indeed, the whole papacy amounts to nothing more than a mere
 kowtowing of persons and outward mummery. But God alone is to be feared
 and honored.
 
 I would honor the Pope, I would love his person, if he would leave my
 conscience alone, and not compel me to sin against God. But the Pope
 wants to be adored himself, and that cannot be done without offending
 God. Since we must choose between one or the other, let us choose God.
 The truth is we are commissioned by God to resist the Pope, for it is
 written, "We ought to obey God rather than men." (Acts 5:29)
 
 We have seen how Paul refutes the argument of the false apostles
 concerning the authority of the apostles. In order that the truth of the
 Gospel may continue; in order that the Word of God and the righteousness
 of faith may be kept pure and undefiled, let the apostles, let an angel
 from heaven, let Peter, let Paul, let them all perish.
 
 
   VERSE 6. For they who seemed to be somewhat in conference added
   nothing to me.
 
 The Apostle repeats: "I did not so confer with the apostles that they
 taught me anything. What could they possibly teach me since Christ by
 His revelation had taught me all things? It was but a conference, and
 no disputation. I learned nothing, neither did I defend my cause. I only
 stated what I had done, that I had preached to the Gentiles faith in
 Christ, without the Law, and that in response to my preaching the Holy
 Ghost came down upon the Gentiles. When the apostles heard this, they
 were glad that I had taught the truth."
 
 If Paul would not give in to the false apostles, much less ought we to
 give in to our opponents. I know that a Christian should be humble, but
 against the Pope I am going to be proud and say to him: "You, Pope,
 I will not have you for my boss, for I am sure that my doctrine is
 divine." Such pride against the Pope is imperative, for if we are not
 stout and proud we shall never succeed in defending the article of the
 righteousness of faith.
 
 If the Pope would concede that God alone by His grace through Christ
 justifies sinners, we would carry him in our arms, we would kiss his
 feet. But since we cannot obtain this concession, we will give in to
 nobody, not to all the angels in heaven, not to Peter, not to Paul, not
 to a hundred emperors, not to a thousand popes, not to the whole world.
 If in this matter we were to humble ourselves, they would take from
 us the God who created us, and Jesus Christ who has redeemed us by His
 blood. Let this be our resolution, that we will suffer the loss of all
 things, the loss of our good name, of life itself, but the Gospel and
 our faith in Jesus Christ--we will not stand for it that anybody take
 them from us.
 
 
   VERSES 7, 8. But contrariwise, when they saw that the gospel of the
   uncircumcision was committed unto me, as the gospel of the circumcision
   was unto Peter; [For he that wrought effectually in Peter to the
   apostleship of the circumcision, the same was mighty in me toward the
   Gentiles.]
 
 Here the Apostle claims for himself the same authority which the false
 apostles attributed to the true apostles. Paul simply inverts their
 argument. "To bolster their evil cause," says he, "the false apostles
 quote the authority of the great apostles against me. I can quote the
 same authority against them, for the apostles are on my side. They
 gave me the right hand of fellowship. They approved my ministry. O my
 Galatians, do not believe the counterfeit apostles!"
 
 What does Paul mean by saying that the gospel of the uncircumcision was
 committed unto him, and that of the circumcision to Peter? Did not Paul
 preach to the Jews, while Peter preached to the Gentiles also? Peter
 converted the Centurion. Paul's custom was to enter into the synagogues
 of the Jews, there to preach the Gospel. Why then should he call himself
 the apostle of the Gentiles, while he calls Peter the apostle of the
 circumcision?
 
 Paul refers to the fact that the other apostles remained in Jerusalem
 until the destruction of the city became imminent. But Paul was
 especially called the apostle of the Gentiles. Even before the
 destruction of Jerusalem Jews dwelt here and there in the cities of the
 Gentiles. Coming to a city, Paul customarily entered the synagogues of
 the Jews and first brought to them as the children of the kingdom, the
 glad tidings that the promises made unto the fathers were fulfilled in
 Jesus Christ. When the Jews refused to hear these glad tidings, Paul
 turned to the Gentiles. He was the apostle of the Gentiles in a special
 sense, as Peter was the apostle of the Jews.
 
 Paul reiterates that Peter, James, and John, the accepted pillars of the
 Church, taught him nothing, nor did they commit unto him the office of
 preaching the Gospel unto the Gentiles. Both the knowledge of the Gospel
 and the commandment to preach it to the Gentiles, Paul received directly
 from God. His case was parallel to that of Peter's, who was particularly
 commissioned to preach the Gospel to the Jews.
 
 The apostles had the same charge, the identical Gospel. Peter did not
 proclaim a different Gospel, nor had he appointed his fellow apostles.
 They were equals. They were all taught of God. None was greater than the
 other, none could point to prerogatives above the other. To justify his
 usurped primacy in the Church the Pope claims that Peter was the chief
 of the apostles. This is an impudent falsehood.
 
 
   VERSE 8. For he that wrought effectually in Peter.
 
 With these words Paul refutes another argument of the false apostles.
 "What reason have the false apostles to boast that the Gospel of Peter
 was mighty, that he converted many, that he wrought great miracles, and
 that his very shadow healed the sick? These reports are true enough. But
 where did Peter acquire this power? God gave him the power. I have the
 same power. I received my power, not from Peter, but from the same God,
 the same Spirit who was mighty in Peter was mighty in me also." Luke
 corroborates Paul's statement in the words: "And God wrought special
 miracles by the hands of Paul, so that from his body were brought unto
 the sick handkerchiefs or aprons, and the diseases departed from them,
 and the evil spirits went out of them." (Acts 19:11, 12.)
 
 To conclude, Paul is not going to be inferior to the rest of the
 apostles. Some secular writers put Paul's boasting down as carnal pride.
 But Paul had no personal interest in his boasting. It was with him a
 matter of faith and doctrine. The controversy was not about the glory
 of Paul, but the glory of God, the Word of God, the true worship of God,
 true religion, and the righteousness of faith.
 
 
   VERSE 9. And when James, Cephas and John, who seemed to be pillars,
   perceived the grace that was given unto me, they gave to me and
   Barnabas the right hands of fellowship; that we should go unto the
   heathen, and they unto the circumcision.
 
 "The fact is, when the apostles heard that I had received the charge to
 preach the Gospel to the Gentiles from Christ; when they heard that God
 had wrought many miracles through me; that great numbers of the Gentiles
 had come to the knowledge of Christ through my ministry; when they
 heard that the Gentiles had received the Holy Ghost without Law and
 circumcision, by the simple preaching of faith; when they heard all this
 they glorified God for His grace in me." Hence, Paul was justified in
 concluding that the apostles were for him, and not against him.
 
 
   VERSE 9. The right hands of fellowship.
 
 As if the apostles had said to him: "We, Paul, do agree with you in all
 things. We are companions in doctrine. We have the same Gospel with this
 difference, that to you is committed the Gospel for the uncircumcised,
 while the Gospel for the circumcision is committed unto us. But this
 difference ought not to hinder our friendship, since we preach one and
 the same Gospel."
 
 
   VERSE 10. Only they would that we should remember the poor; the same
   which I also was forward to do.
 
 Next to the preaching of the Gospel, a true and faithful pastor will
 take care of the poor. Where the Church is, there must be the poor,
 for the world and the devil persecute the Church and impoverish many
 faithful Christians.
 
 Speaking of money, nobody wants to contribute nowadays to the
 maintenance of the ministry, and the erection of schools. When it comes
 to establishing false worship and idolatry, no cost is spared. True
 religion is ever in need of money, while false religions are backed by
 wealth.
 
 
   VERSE 11. But when Peter was come to Antioch, I withstood him to the
   face, because he was to be blamed.
 
 Paul goes on in his refutation of the false apostles by saying that in
 Antioch he withstood Peter in the presence of the whole congregation.
 As he stated before, Paul had no small matter in hand, but the chief
 article of the Christian religion. When this article is endangered, we
 must not hesitate to resist Peter, or an angel from heaven. Paul paid no
 regard to the dignity and position of Peter, when he saw this article in
 danger. It is written: "He that loveth father or mother or his own life,
 more than me, is not worthy of me." (Matt. 10:37.)
 
 For defending the truth in our day, we are called proud and obstinate
 hypocrites. We are not ashamed of these titles. The cause we are called
 to defend, is not Peter's cause, or the cause of our parents, or that of
 the government, or that of the world, but the cause of God. In defense
 of that cause we must be firm and unyielding.
 
 When he says, "to his face," Paul accuses the false apostles of
 slandering him behind his back. In his presence they dared not to open
 their mouths. He tells them, "I did not speak evil of Peter behind his
 back, but I withstood him frankly and openly."
 
 Others may debate here whether an apostle might sin. I claim that we
 ought not to make Peter out as faultless. Prophets have erred. Nathan
 told David that he should go ahead and build the Temple of the Lord. But
 his prophecy was afterwards corrected by the Lord. The apostles erred
 in thinking of the Kingdom of Christ as a worldly state. Peter had heard
 the command of Christ, "Go ye into all the world, and preach the Gospel
 to every creature." But if it had not been for the heavenly vision and
 the special command of Christ, Peter would never have gone to the home
 of Cornelius. Peter also erred in this matter of circumcision. If Paul
 had not publicly censured him, all the believing Gentiles would have
 been compelled to receive circumcision and accept the Jewish law. We are
 not to attribute perfection to any man.
 
 Luke reports "that the contention between Paul and Barnabas was so
 sharp that they departed asunder one from the other." The cause of their
 disagreement could hardly have been small since it separated these
 two, who had been joined together for years in a holy partnership. Such
 incidents are recorded for our consolation. After all, it is a comfort
 to know that even saints might and do sin.
 
 Samson, David, and many other excellent men, fell into grievous sins.
 Job and Jeremiah cursed the day of their birth. Elijah and Jonah became
 weary of life and prayed for death. Such offenses on the part of the
 saints, the Scriptures record for the comfort of those who are near
 despair. No person has ever sunk so low that he cannot rise again. On
 the other hand, no man's standing is so secure that he may not fall. If
 Peter fell, I may fall. If he rose again, I may rise again. We have the
 same gifts that they had, the same Christ, the same baptism and the
 same Gospel, the same forgiveness of sins. They needed these saving
 ordinances just as much as we do.
 
 
   VERSE 12. For before that certain came from James, he did eat with the
   Gentiles.
 
 The Gentiles who had been converted to faith in Christ, ate meats
 forbidden by the Law. Peter, visiting some of these Gentiles, ate
 meat and drank wine with them, although he knew that these things were
 forbidden in the Law. Paul declared that he did likewise, that he became
 as a Jew to the Jews, and to them that were without law, as without law.
 He ate and drank with the Gentiles unconcerned about the Jewish Law.
 When he was with the Jews, however, he abstained from all things
 forbidden in the Law, for he labored to serve all men, that he "might by
 all means save some." Paul does not reprove Peter for transgressing the
 Law, but for disguising his attitude to the Law.
 
 
   VERSE 12. But when they were come, he withdrew and separated himself,
   fearing them which were of the circumcision.
 
 Paul does not accuse Peter of malice or ignorance, but of lack of
 principle, in that he abstained from meats, because he feared the Jews
 that came from James. Peter's weak attitude endangered the principle of
 Christian liberty. It is the deduction rather than the fact which Paul
 reproves. To eat and to drink, or not to eat and drink, is immaterial.
 But to make the deduction "If you eat, you sin; if you abstain you are
 righteous"--this is wrong.
 
 Meats may be refused for two reasons. First, they may be refused for the
 sake of Christian love. There is no danger connected with a refusal of
 meats for the sake of charity. To bear with the infirmity of a
 brother is a good thing. Paul himself taught and exemplified such
 thoughtfulness. Secondly, meats may be refused in the mistaken hope of
 thereby obtaining righteousness. When this is the purpose of abstaining
 from meats, we say, let charity go. To refrain from meats for this
 latter reason amounts to a denial of Christ. If we must lose one or the
 other, let us lose a friend and brother, rather than God, our Father.
 
 Jerome, who understood not this passage, nor the whole epistle for
 that matter, excuses Peter's action on the ground "that it was done
 in ignorance." But Peter offended by giving the impression that he was
 indorsing the Law. By his example he encouraged Gentiles and Jews to
 forsake the truth of the Gospel. If Paul had not reproved him, there
 would have been a sliding back of Christians into the Jewish religion,
 and a return to the burdens of the Law.
 
 It is surprising that Peter, excellent apostle that he was, should have
 been guilty of such vacillation. In a former council at Jerusalem he
 practically stood alone in defense of the truth that salvation is
 by faith, without the Law. Peter at that time valiantly defended the
 liberty of the Gospel. But now by abstaining from meats forbidden in the
 Law, he went against his better judgment. You have no idea what danger
 there is in customs and ceremonies. They so easily tend to error in
 works.
 
 
   VERSE 13. And the other Jews dissembled likewise with him; insomuch
   that Barnabas also was carried away with their dissimulation.
 
 It is marvelous how God preserved the Church by one single person. Paul
 alone stood up for the truth, for Barnabas, his companion, was lost to
 him, and Peter was against him. Sometimes one lone person can do more in
 a conference than the whole assembly.
 
 I mention this to urge all to learn how properly to differentiate
 between the Law and the Gospel, in order to avoid dissembling. When it
 come to the article of justification we must not yield, if we want to
 retain the truth of the Gospel.
 
 When the conscience is disturbed, do not seek advice from reason or from
 the Law, but rest your conscience in the grace of God and in His Word,
 and proceed as if you had never heard of the Law. The Law has its place
 and its own good time. While Moses was in the mountain where he talked
 with God face to face, he had no law, he made no law, he administered
 no law. But when he came down from the mountain, he was a lawgiver. The
 conscience must be kept above the Law, the body under the Law.
 
 Paul reproved Peter for no trifle, but for the chief article of
 Christian doctrine, which Peter's hypocrisy had endangered. For Barnabas
 and other Jews followed Peter's example. It is surprising that such good
 men as Peter, Barnabas, and others should fall into unexpected error,
 especially in a matter which they knew so well. To trust in our own
 strength, our own goodness, our own wisdom, is a perilous thing. Let us
 search the Scriptures with humility, praying that we may never lose the
 light of the Gospel. "Lord, increase our faith."
 
 
   VERSE 14. But when I saw that they walked not uprightly according to
   the truth of the gospel.
 
 No one except Paul had his eyes open. Consequently it was his duty
 to reprove Peter and his followers for swerving from the truth of the
 Gospel. It was no easy task for Paul to reprimand Peter. To the honor of
 Peter it must be said that he took the correction. No doubt, he freely
 acknowledged his fault.
 
 The person who can rightly divide Law and Gospel has reason to thank
 God. He is a true theologian. I must confess that in times of temptation
 I do not always know how to do it. To divide Law and Gospel means to
 place the Gospel in heaven, and to keep the Law on earth; to call the
 righteousness of the Gospel heavenly, and the righteousness of the Law
 earthly; to put as much difference between the righteousness of the
 Gospel and that of the Law, as there is difference between day and
 night. If it is a question of faith or conscience, ignore the Law
 entirely. If it is a question of works, then lift high the lantern of
 works and the righteousness of the Law. If your conscience is oppressed
 with a sense of sin, talk to your conscience. Say: "You are now
 groveling in the dirt. You are now a laboring ass. Go ahead, and carry
 your burden. But why don't you mount up to heaven? There the Law cannot
 follow you!" Leave the ass burdened with laws behind in the valley. But
 your conscience, let it ascend with Isaac into the mountain.
 
 In civil life obedience to the law is severely required. In civil life
 Gospel, conscience, grace, remission of sins, Christ Himself, do
 not count, but only Moses with the lawbooks. If we bear in mind this
 distinction, neither Gospel nor Law shall trespass upon each other. The
 moment Law and sin cross into heaven, i.e., your conscience, kick them
 out. On the other hand, when grace wanders unto the earth, i.e., into
 the body, tell grace: "You have no business to be around the dreg and
 dung of this bodily life. You belong in heaven."
 
 By his compromising attitude Peter confused the separation of Law and
 Gospel. Paul had to do something about it. He reproved Peter, not to
 embarrass him, but to conserve the difference between the Gospel which
 justifies in heaven, and the Law which justifies on earth.
 
 The right separation between Law and Gospel is very important to know.
 Christian doctrine is impossible without it. Let all who love and fear
 God, diligently learn the difference, not only in theory but also in
 practice.
 
 When your conscience gets into trouble, say to yourself: "There is a
 time to die, and a time to live; a time to learn the Law, and a time
 to unlearn the Law; a time to hear the Gospel, and a time to ignore the
 Gospel. Let the Law now depart, and let the Gospel enter, for now is
 the right time to hear the Gospel, and not the Law." However, when the
 conflict of conscience is over and external duties must be performed,
 close your ears to the Gospel, and open them wide to the Law.
 
 
   VERSE 14. I said unto Peter before them all, If thou being a Jew, livest
   after the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews, why compellest
   thou the Gentiles to live as do the Jews
 
 To live as a Jew is nothing bad. To eat or not to eat pork, what
 difference does it make? But to play the Jew, and for conscience' sake
 to abstain from certain meats, is a denial of Christ. When Paul saw that
 Peter's attitude tended to this, he withstood Peter and said to
 him: "You know that the observance of the Law is not needed unto
 righteousness. You know that we are justified by faith in Christ.
 You know that we may eat all kinds of meats. Yet by your example you
 obligate the Gentiles to forsake Christ, and to return to the Law. You
 give them reason to think that faith is not sufficient unto salvation."
 
 Peter did not say so, but his example said quite plainly that the
 observance of the Law must be added to faith in Christ, if men are to
 be saved. From Peter's example the Gentiles could not help but draw the
 conclusion that the Law was necessary unto salvation. If this error
 had been permitted to pass unchallenged, Christ would have lost out
 altogether.
 
 The controversy involved the preservation of pure doctrine. In such a
 controversy Paul did not mind if anybody took offense.
 
 
   VERSE 15. We who are Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles.
 
 "When we Jews compare ourselves with the Gentiles, we look pretty good.
 We have the Law, we have good works. Our rectitude dates from our birth,
 because the Jewish religion is natural to us. But all this does not
 make us righteous before God." Peter and the others lived up to the
 requirements of the Law. They had circumcision, the covenant, the
 promises, the apostleship. But because of these advantages they were
 not to think themselves righteous before God. None of these prerogatives
 spell faith in Christ, which alone can justify a person. We do not mean
 to imply that the Law is bad. We do not condemn the Law, circumcision,
 etc., for their failure to justify us. Paul spoke disparagingly of these
 ordinances, because the false apostles asserted that mankind is saved by
 them without faith. Paul could not let this assertion stand, for without
 faith all things are deadly.
 
 
   VERSE 16. Knowing that a man is not justified by the works of the law,
   but by the faith of Jesus Christ.
 
 For the sake of argument let us suppose that you could fulfill the Law
 in the spirit of the first commandment of God: "Thou shalt love the
 Lord, thy God, with all thy heart." It would do you no good. A person
 simply is not justified by the works of the Law.
 
 The works of the Law, according to Paul, include the whole Law,
 judicial, ceremonial, moral. Now, if the performance of the moral law
 cannot justify, how can circumcision justify, when circumcision is part
 of the ceremonial law?
 
 The demands of the Law may be fulfilled before and after justification.
 There were many excellent men among the pagans of old, men who never
 heard of justification. They lived moral lives. But that fact did not
 justify them. Peter, Paul, all Christians, live up to the Law. But that
 fact does not justify them. "For I know nothing by myself," says Paul,
 "yet am I not hereby justified." (I Cor. 4:4.)
 
 The nefarious opinion of the papists, which attributes the merit of
 grace and the remission of sins to works, must here be emphatically
 rejected. The papists say that a good work performed before grace has
 been obtained, is able to secure grace for a person, because it is
 no more than right that God should reward a good deed. When grace has
 already been obtained, any good work deserves everlasting life as a due
 payment and reward for merit. For the first, God is no debtor, they say;
 but because God is good and just, it is no more than right (they say)
 that He should reward a good work by granting grace for the service.
 But when grace has already been obtained, they continue, God is in the
 position of a debtor, and is in duty bound to reward a good work with
 the gift of eternal life. This is the wicked teaching of the papacy.
 
 Now, if I could perform any work acceptable to God and deserving of
 grace, and once having obtained grace my good works would continue to
 earn for me the right and reward of eternal life, why should I stand in
 need of the grace of God and the suffering and death of Christ? Christ
 would be of no benefit to me. Christ's mercy would be of no use to me.
 
 This shows how little insight the pope and the whole of his religious
 coterie have into spiritual matters, and how little they concern
 themselves with the spiritual health of their forlorn flocks. They
 cannot believe that the flesh is unable to think, speak, or do anything
 except against God. If they could see evil rooted in the nature of
 man, they would never entertain such silly dreams about man's merit or
 worthiness.
 
 With Paul we absolutely deny the possibility of self merit. God never
 yet gave to any person grace and everlasting life as a reward for merit.
 The opinions of the papists are the intellectual pipe-dreams of idle
 pates, that serve no other purpose but to draw men away from the true
 worship of God. The papacy is founded upon hallucinations.
 
 The true way of salvation is this. First, a person must realize that he
 is a sinner, the kind of a sinner who is congenitally unable to do any
 good thing. "Whatsoever is not of faith, is sin." Those who seek to
 earn the grace of God by their own efforts are trying to please God with
 sins. They mock God, and provoke His anger. The first step on the way to
 salvation is to repent.
 
 The second part is this. God sent His only-begotten Son into the world
 that we may live through His merit. He was crucified and killed for us.
 By sacrificing His Son for us God revealed Himself to us as a
 merciful Father who donates remission of sins, righteousness, and life
 everlasting for Christ's sake. God hands out His gifts freely unto all
 men. That is the praise and glory of His mercy.
 
 The scholastics explain the way of salvation in this manner. When a
 person happens to perform a good deed, God accepts it and as a reward
 for the good deed God pours charity into that person. They call it
 "charity infused." This charity is supposed to remain in the heart.
 They get wild when they are told that this quality of the heart cannot
 justify a person.
 
 They also claim that we are able to love God by our own natural
 strength, to love God above all things, at least to the extent that we
 deserve grace. And, say the scholastics, because God is not satisfied
 with a literal performance of the Law, but expects us to fulfill the
 Law according to the mind of the Lawgiver, therefore we must obtain
 from above a quality above nature, a quality which they call "formal
 righteousness."
 
 We say, faith apprehends Jesus Christ. Christian faith is not an
 inactive quality in the heart. If it is true faith it will surely take
 Christ for its object. Christ, apprehended by faith and dwelling in the
 heart, constitutes Christian righteousness, for which God gives eternal
 life.
 
 In contrast to the doting dreams of the scholastics, we teach this:
 First a person must learn to know himself from the Law. With the prophet
 he will then confess: "All have sinned, and come short of the glory of
 God." And, "there is none that doeth good, no, not one." And, "against
 thee, thee only, have I sinned."
 
 Having been humbled by the Law, and having been brought to a right
 estimate of himself, a man will repent. He finds out that he is so
 depraved, that no strength, no works, no merits of his own will ever
 deliver him from his guilt. He will then understand the meaning of
 Paul's words: "I am sold under sin"; and "they are all under sin."
 
 At this state a person begins to lament: "Who is going to help me?"
 In due time comes the Word of the Gospel, and says: "Son, thy sins are
 forgiven thee. Believe in Jesus Christ who was crucified for your sins.
 Remember, your sins have been imposed upon Christ."
 
 In this way are we delivered from sin. In this way are we justified and
 made heirs of everlasting life.
 
 In order to have faith you must paint a true portrait of Christ. The
 scholastics caricature Christ into a judge and tormentor. But Christ is
 no law giver. He is the Lifegiver. He is the Forgiver of sins. You must
 believe that Christ might have atoned for the sins of the world with one
 single drop of His blood. Instead, He shed His blood abundantly in order
 that He might give abundant satisfaction for our sins.
 
 Here let me say, that these three things, faith, Christ, and imputation
 of righteousness, are to be joined together. Faith takes hold of Christ.
 God accounts this faith for righteousness.
 
 This imputation of righteousness we need very much, because we are far
 from perfect. As long as we have this body, sin will dwell in our flesh.
 Then, too, we sometimes drive away the Holy Spirit; we fall into sin,
 like Peter, David, and other holy men. Nevertheless we may always take
 recourse to this fact, "that our sins are covered," and that "God will
 not lay them to our charge." Sin is not held against us for Christ's
 sake. Where Christ and faith are lacking, there is no remission or
 covering of sins, but only condemnation.
 
 After we have taught faith in Christ, we teach good works. "Since you
 have found Christ by faith," we say, "begin now to work and do well.
 Love God and your neighbor. Call upon God, give thanks unto Him, praise
 Him, confess Him. These are good works. Let them flow from a cheerful
 heart, because you have remission of sin in Christ."
 
 When crosses and afflictions come our way, we bear them patiently.
 "For Christ's yoke is easy, and His burden is light." When sin has been
 pardoned, and the conscience has been eased of its dreadful load, a
 Christian can endure all things in Christ.
 
 To give a short definition of a Christian: A Christian is not somebody
 who chalks(sp) sin, because of his faith in Christ. This doctrine brings
 comfort to consciences in serious trouble. When a person is a Christian
 he is above law and sin. When the Law accuses him, and sin wants to
 drive the wits out of him, a Christian looks to Christ. A Christian is
 free. He has no master except Christ. A Christian is greater than the
 whole world.
 
 
   VERSE 16. Even we have believed in Jesus Christ, that we might be
   justified.
 
 The true way of becoming a Christian is to be justified by faith in
 Jesus Christ, and not by the works of the Law.
 
 We know that we must also teach good works, but they must be taught in
 their proper turn, when the discussion is concerning works and not the
 article of justification.
 
 Here the question arises by what means are we justified? We answer with
 Paul, "By faith only in Christ are we pronounced righteous, and not
 by works." Not that we reject good works. Far from it. But we will not
 allow ourselves to be removed from the anchorage of our salvation.
 
 The Law is a good thing. But when the discussion is about justification,
 then is no time to drag in the Law. When we discuss justification we
 ought to speak of Christ and the benefits He has brought us.
 
 Christ is no sheriff. He is "the Lamb of God, which taketh away the sin
 of the world." (John 1:29.)
 
 
   VERSE 16. That we might be justified by the faith of Christ, and not by
   the works of the Law.
 
 We do not mean to say that the Law is bad. Only it is not able to
 justify us. To be at peace with God, we have need of a far better
 mediator than Moses or the Law. We must know that we are nothing. We
 must understand that we are merely beneficiaries and recipients of the
 treasures of Christ.
 
 So far, the words of Paul were addressed to Peter. Now Paul turns to the
 Galatians and makes this summary statement:
 
 
   VERSE 16. For by the works of the law shall no flesh be justified.
 
 By the term "flesh" Paul does not understand manifest vices. Such sins
 he usually calls by their proper names, as adultery, fornication, etc.
 By "flesh" Paul understands what Jesus meant in the third chapter of
 John, "That which is born of the flesh is flesh". (John 3:6.) "Flesh"
 here means the whole nature of man, inclusive of reason and instincts.
 "This flesh," says Paul, "is not justified by the works of the law."
 
 The papists do not believe this. They say, "A person who performs this
 good deed or that, deserves the forgiveness of his sins. A person who
 joins this or that holy order, has the promise of everlasting life."
 
 To me it is a miracle that the Church, so long surrounded by vicious
 sects, has been able to survive at all. God must have been able to call
 a few who in their failure to discover any good in themselves to cite
 against the wrath and judgment of God, simply took to the suffering and
 death of Christ, and were saved by this simple faith.
 
 Nevertheless God has punished the contempt of the Gospel and of Christ
 on the part of the papists, by turning them over to a reprobate state
 of mind in which they reject the Gospel, and receive with gusto the
 abominable rules, ordinances, and traditions of men in preference to the
 Word of God, until they went so far as to forbid marriage. God punished
 them justly, because they blasphemed the only Son of God.
 
 This is, then, our general conclusion: "By the works of the law shall no
 flesh be justified."
 
 
   VERSE 17. But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves
   also are found sinners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God
   forbid.
 
 Either we are not justified by Christ, or we are not justified by
 the Law. The fact is, we are justified by Christ. Hence, we are not
 justified by the Law. If we observe the Law in order to be justified,
 or after having been justified by Christ, we think we must further be
 justified by the Law, we convert Christ into a legislator and a minister
 of sin.
 
 "What are these false apostles doing?" Paul cries. "They are turning Law
 into grace, and grace into Law. They are changing Moses into Christ, and
 Christ into Moses. By teaching that besides Christ and His righteousness
 the performance of the Law is necessary unto salvation, they put the Law
 in the place of Christ, they attribute to the Law the power to save, a
 power that belongs to Christ only."
 
 The papists quote the words of Christ: "If thou wilt enter into life,
 keep the commandments." (Matt. 19:17.) With His own words they deny
 Christ and abolish faith in Him. Christ is made to lose His good
 name, His office, and His glory, and is demoted to the status of a law
 enforcer, reproving, terrifying, and chasing poor sinners around.
 
 The proper office of Christ is to raise the sinner, and extricate him
 from his sins.
 
 Papists and Anabaptists deride us because we so earnestly require faith.
 "Faith," they say, "makes men reckless." What do these law-workers know
 about faith, when they are so busy calling people back from baptism,
 from faith, from the promises of Christ to the Law?
 
 With their doctrine these lying sects of perdition deface the benefits
 of Christ to this day. They rob Christ of His glory as the Justifier of
 mankind and cast Him into the role of a minister of sin. They are like
 the false apostles. There is not a single one among them who knows the
 difference between law and grace.
 
 We can tell the difference. We do not here and now argue whether we
 ought to do good works, or whether the Law is any good, or whether the
 Law ought to be kept at all. We will discuss these questions some other
 time. We are now concerned with justification. Our opponents refuse
 to make this distinction. All they can do is to bellow that good works
 ought to be done. We know that. We know that good works ought to be
 done, but we will talk about that when the proper time comes. Now we are
 dealing with justification, and here good works should not be so much as
 mentioned.
 
 Paul's argument has often comforted me. He argues: "If we who have been
 justified by Christ are counted unrighteous, why seek justification in
 Christ at all? If we are justified by the Law, tell me, what has Christ
 achieved by His death, by His preaching, by His victory over sin and
 death? Either we are justified by Christ, or we are made worse sinners
 by Him."
 
 The Sacred Scriptures, particularly those of the New Testament, make
 frequent mention of faith in Christ. "Whosoever believeth in him is
 saved, shall not perish, shall have everlasting life, is not judged,"
 etc. In open contradiction to the Scriptures, our opponents misquote,
 "He that believeth in Christ is condemned, because he has faith without
 works." Our opponents turn everything topsy-turvy. They make Christ
 over into a murderer, and Moses into a savior. Is not this horrible
 blasphemy?
 
 
   VERSE 17. Is therefore Christ the minister of sin?
 
 This is Hebrew phraseology, also used by Paul in II Corinthians, chapter
 3. There Paul speaks of two ministers: The minister of the letter, and
 the minister of the spirit; the minister of the Law, and the minister
 of grace; the minister of death, and the minister of life. "Moses,"
 says Paul, "is the minister of the Law, of sin, wrath, death, and
 condemnation."
 
 Whoever teaches that good works are indispensable unto salvation, that
 to gain heaven a person must suffer afflictions and follow the example
 of Christ and of the saints, is a minister of the Law, of sin, wrath,
 and of death, for the conscience knows how impossible it is for a person
 to fulfill the Law. Why, the Law makes trouble even for those who have
 the Holy Spirit. What will not the Law do in the case of the wicked who
 do not even have the Holy Spirit?
 
 The Law requires perfect obedience. It condemns all who do not
 accomplish the will of God. But show me a person who is able to render
 perfect obedience. The Law cannot justify. It can only condemn according
 to the passage: "Cursed is every one that continueth not in all things
 which are written in the book of the law to do them."
 
 Paul has good reason for calling the minister of the Law the minister of
 sin, for the Law reveals our sinfulness. The realization of sin in turn
 frightens the heart and drives it to despair. Therefore all exponents of
 the Law and of works deserve to be called tyrants and oppressors.
 
 The purpose of the Law is to reveal sin. That this is the purpose of the
 Law can be seen from the account of the giving of the Law as reported
 in the nineteenth and twentieth chapters of Exodus. Moses brought the
 people out of their tents to have God speak to them personally from a
 cloud. But the people trembled with fear, fled, and standing aloof they
 begged Moses: "Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but let not God
 speak with us, lest we die." The proper office of the Law is to lead us
 out of our tents, in other words, out of the security of our self-trust,
 into the presence of God, that we may perceive His anger at our
 sinfulness.
 
 All who say that faith alone in Christ does not justify a person,
 convert Christ into a minister of sin, a teacher of the Law, and a cruel
 tyrant who requires the impossible. All merit-seekers take Christ for a
 new lawgiver.
 
 In conclusion, if the Law is the minister of sin, it is at the same
 time the minister of wrath and death. As the Law reveals sin it fills
 a person with the fear of death and condemnation. Eventually the
 conscience wakes up to the fact that God is angry. If God is angry
 with you, He will destroy and condemn you forever. Unable to stand the
 thought of the wrath and judgment of God, many a person commits suicide.
 
 
   VERSE 17. God forbid.
 
 Christ is not the minister of sin, but the Dispenser of righteousness
 and the Giver of life. Christ is Lord over law, sin and death. All who
 believe in Him are delivered from law, sin and death.
 
 The Law drives us away from God, but Christ reconciles God unto us, for
 "He is the Lamb of God, that taketh away the sins of the world." Now if
 the sin of the world is taken away, it is taken away from me. If sin is
 taken away, the wrath of God and His condemnation are also taken away.
 Let us practice this blessed conviction.
 
 
   VERSE 18. For if I build again the things which I destroyed, I make
   myself a transgressor.
 
 "I have not preached to the end that I build again the things which I
 destroyed. If I should do so, I would not only be laboring in vain,
 but I would make myself guilty of a great wrong. By the ministry of the
 Gospel I have destroyed sin, heaviness of heart, wrath, and death. I
 have abolished the Law, so that it should not bother your conscience any
 more. Should I now once again establish the Law, and set up the rule
 of Moses? This is exactly what I should be doing, if I would urge
 circumcision and the performance of the Law as necessary unto salvation.
 Instead of righteousness and life, I would restore sin and death."
 
 By the grace of God we know that we are justified through faith in
 Christ alone. We do not mingle law and grace, faith and works. We keep
 them far apart. Let every true Christian mark the distinction between
 law and grace, and mark it well.
 
 We must not drag good works into the article of justification as the
 monks do who maintain that not only good works, but also the punishment
 which evildoers suffer for their wicked deeds, deserve everlasting life.
 When a criminal is brought to the place of execution, the monks try to
 comfort him in this manner: "You want to die willingly and patiently,
 and then you will merit remission of your sins and eternal life." What
 cruelty is this, that a wretched thief, murderer, robber should be so
 miserably misguided in his extreme distress, that at the very point of
 death he should be denied the sweet promises of Christ, and directed to
 hope for pardon of his sins in the willingness and patience with which
 he is about to suffer death for his crimes? The monks are showing him
 the paved way to hell.
 
 These hypocrites do not know the first thing about grace, the Gospel,
 or Christ. They retain the appearance and the name of the Gospel and
 of Christ for a decoy only. In their confessional writings faith or the
 merit of Christ are never mentioned. In their writings they play up
 the merits of man, as can readily be seen from the following form of
 absolution used among the monks.
 
   "God forgive thee, brother. The merit of the passion of our Lord Jesus
   Christ, and of the blessed Saint Mary, always a virgin, and of all the
   saints; the merit of thy order, the strictness of thy religion, the
   humility of thy profession, the contrition of thy heart, the good works
   thou hast done and shalt do for the love of our Lord Jesus Christ, be
   available unto thee for the remission of thy sins, the increase of thy
   worth and grace, and the reward of everlasting life. Amen."
 
 True, the merit of Christ is mentioned in this formula of absolution.
 But if you look closer you will notice that Christ's merit is belittled,
 while monkish merits are aggrandized. They confess Christ with their
 lips, and at the same time deny His power to save. I myself was at one
 time entangled in this error. I thought Christ was a judge and had to be
 pacified by a strict adherence to the rules of my order. But now I give
 thanks unto God, the Father of all mercies, who has called me out of
 darkness into the light of His glorious Gospel, and has granted unto me
 the saving knowledge of Christ Jesus, my Lord.
 
 We conclude with Paul, that we are justified by faith in Christ, without
 the Law. Once a person has been justified by Christ, he will not be
 unproductive of good, but as a good tree he will bring forth good fruit.
 A believer has the Holy Spirit, and the Holy Spirit will not permit a
 person to remain idle, but will put him to work and stir him up to
 the love of God, to patient suffering in affliction, to prayer,
 thanksgiving, to the habit of charity towards all men.
 
 
   VERSE 19. For I through the law am dead to the law, that I might live
   unto God.
 
 This cheering form of speech is frequently met with in the Scriptures,
 particularly in the writings of St. Paul, when the Law is set against
 the Law, and sin is made to oppose sin, and death is arrayed against
 death, and hell is turned loose against hell, as in the following
 quotations: "Thou hast led captivity captive," Psalm 68:18. "O death, I
 will be thy plagues; O grave, I will be thy destruction," Hosea 13:14.
 "And for sin, condemned sin in the flesh," Romans 8:3.
 
 Here Paul plays the Law against the Law, as if to say: "The Law of Moses
 condemns me; but I have another law, the law of grace and liberty which
 condemns the accusing Law of Moses."
 
 On first sight Paul seems to be advancing a strange and ugly heresy.
 He says, "I am dead to the law, that I might live unto God." The false
 apostles said the very opposite. They said, "If you do not live to the
 law, you are dead unto God."
 
 The doctrine of our opponents is similar to that of the false apostles
 in Paul's day. Our opponents teach, "If you want to live unto God,
 you must live after the Law, for it is written, Do this and thou shalt
 live." Paul, on the other hand, teaches, "We cannot live unto God unless
 we are dead unto the Law." If we are dead unto the Law, the Law can have
 no power over us.
 
 Paul does not only refer to the Ceremonial Law, but to the whole Law.
 We are not to think that the Law is wiped out. It stays. It continues to
 operate in the wicked. But a Christian is dead to the Law. For example,
 Christ by His resurrection became free from the grave, and yet the grave
 remains. Peter was delivered from prison, yet the prison remains. The
 Law is abolished as far as I am concerned, when it has driven me into
 the arms of Christ. Yet the Law continues to exist and to function. But
 it no longer exists for me.
 
 "I have nothing to do with the Law," cries Paul. He could not have
 uttered anything more devastating to the prestige of the Law. He
 declares that he does not care for the Law, that he does not intend ever
 to be justified by the Law.
 
 To be dead to the Law means to be free of the Law. What right, then,
 has the Law to accuse me, or to hold anything against me? When you see
 a person squirming in the clutches of the Law, say to him: "Brother, get
 things straight. You let the Law talk to your conscience. Make it talk
 to your flesh. Wake up, and believe in Jesus Christ, the Conqueror of
 Law and sin. Faith in Christ will lift you high above the Law into the
 heaven of grace. Though Law and sin remain, they no longer concern you,
 because you are dead to the Law and dead to sin."
 
 Blessed is the person who knows how to use this truth in times of
 distress. He can talk. He can say: "Mr. Law, go ahead and accuse me as
 much as you like. I know I have committed many sins, and I continue to
 sin daily. But that does not bother me. You have got to shout louder,
 Mr. Law. I am deaf, you know. Talk as much as you like, I am dead to
 you. If you want to talk to me about my sins, go and talk to my flesh.
 Belabor that, but don't talk to my conscience. My conscience is a lady
 and a queen, and has nothing to do with the likes of you, because my
 conscience lives to Christ under another law, a new and better law, the
 law of grace."
 
 We have two propositions: To live unto the Law, is to die unto God. To
 die unto the Law, is to live unto God. These two propositions go against
 reason. No law-worker can ever understand them. But see to it that you
 understand them. The Law can never justify and save a sinner. The Law
 can only accuse, terrify, and kill him. Therefore to live unto the Law
 is to die unto God. Vice versa, to die unto the Law is to live unto God.
 If you want to live unto God, bury the Law, and find life through faith
 in Christ Jesus.
 
 We have enough arguments right here to conclude that justification is
 by faith alone. How can the Law effect our justification, when Paul so
 plainly states that we must be dead to the Law if we want to live unto
 God? If we are dead to the Law and the Law is dead to us, how can it
 possibly contribute anything to our justification? There is nothing left
 for us but to be justified by faith alone.
 
 This nineteenth verse is loaded with consolation. It fortifies a person
 against every danger. It allows you to argue like this:
 
   "I confess I have sinned."
   "Then God will punish you."
   "No, He will not do that."
   "Why not? Does not the Law say so?"
   "I have nothing to do with the Law."
   "How so?"
   "I have another law, the law of liberty."
   "What do you mean--'liberty'?"
   "The liberty of Christ, for Christ has made me free from the Law that
   held me down. That Law is now in prison itself, held captive by grace
   and liberty."
 
 By faith in Christ a person may gain such sure and sound comfort, that
 he need not fear the devil, sin, death, or any evil. "Sir Devil," he
 may say, "I am not afraid of you. I have a Friend whose name is Jesus
 Christ, in whom I believe. He has abolished the Law, condemned sin,
 vanquished death, and destroyed hell for me. He is bigger than you,
 Satan. He has licked you, and holds you down. You cannot hurt me." This
 is the faith that overcomes the devil.
 
 Paul manhandles the Law. He treats the Law as if it were a thief and
 a robber He treats the Law as contemptible to the conscience, in order
 that those who believe in Christ may take courage to defy the Law, and
 say: "Mr. Law, I am a sinner. What are you going to do about it?"
 
 Or take death. Christ is risen from death. Why should we now fear the
 grave? Against my death I set another death, or rather life, my life in
 Christ.
 
 Oh, the sweet names of Jesus! He is called my law against the Law, my
 sin against sin, my death against death. Translated, it means that He is
 my righteousness, my life, my everlasting salvation. For this reason was
 He made the law of the Law, the sin of sin, the death of death, that
 He might redeem me from the curse of the Law. He permitted the Law to
 accuse Him, sin to condemn Him, and death to take Him, to abolish the
 Law, to condemn sin, and to destroy death for me.
 
 This peculiar form of speech sounds much sweeter than if Paul had said:
 "I through liberty am dead to the law." By putting it in this way, "I
 through the law am dead to the law," he opposes one law with another
 law, and has them fight it out.
 
 In this masterly fashion Paul draws our attention away from the Law,
 sin, death, and every evil, and centers it upon Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 20. I am crucified with Christ.
 
 Christ is Lord over the Law, because He was crucified unto the Law. I
 also am lord over the Law, because by faith I am crucified with Christ.
 
 Paul does not here speak of crucifying the flesh, but he speaks of that
 higher crucifying wherein sin, devil, and death are crucified in Christ
 and in me. By my faith in Christ I am crucified with Christ. Hence these
 evils are crucified and dead unto me.
 
 
   VERSE 20. Nevertheless I live.
 
 "I do not mean to create the impression as though I did not live before
 this. But in reality I first live now, now that I have been delivered
 from the Law, from sin, and death. Being crucified with Christ and dead
 unto the Law, I may now rise unto a new and better life."
 
 We must pay close attention to Paul's way of speaking. He says that we
 are crucified and dead unto the Law. The fact is, the Law is crucified
 and dead unto us. Paul purposely speaks that way in order to increase
 the portion of our comfort.
 
 
   VERSE 20. Yet not I.
 
 Paul explains what constitutes true Christian righteousness. True
 Christian righteousness is the righteousness of Christ who lives in us.
 We must look away from our own person. Christ and my conscience must
 become one, so that I can see nothing else but Christ crucified and
 raised from the dead for me. If I keep on looking at myself, I am gone.
 
 If we lose sight of Christ and begin to consider our past, we simply
 go to pieces. We must turn our eyes to the brazen serpent, Christ
 crucified, and believe with all our heart that He is our righteousness
 and our life. For Christ, on whom our eyes are fixed, in whom we live,
 who lives in us, is Lord over Law, sin, death, and all evil.
 
 
   VERSE 20. But Christ liveth in me.
 
 "Thus I live," the Apostle starts out. But presently he corrects
 himself, saying, "Yet not I, but Christ liveth in me." He is the form of
 my perfection. He embellishes my faith.
 
 Since Christ is now living in me, He abolishes the Law, condemns sin,
 and destroys death in me. These foes vanish in His presence. Christ
 abiding in me drives out every evil. This union with Christ delivers me
 from the demands of the Law, and separates me from my sinful self. As
 long as I abide in Christ, nothing can hurt me.
 
 Christ domiciling in me, the old Adam has to stay outside and remain
 subject to the Law. Think what grace, righteousness, life, peace, and
 salvation there is in me, thanks to that inseparable conjunction between
 Christ and me through faith!
 
 Paul has a peculiar style, a celestial way of speaking. "I live," he
 says, "I live not; I am dead, I am not dead; I am a sinner, I am not
 a sinner; I have the Law, I have no Law." When we look at ourselves we
 find plenty of sin. But when we look at Christ, we have no sin. Whenever
 we separate the person of Christ from our own person, we live under the
 Law and not in Christ; we are condemned by the Law, dead before God.
 
 Faith connects you so intimately with Christ, that He and you become
 as it were one person. As such you may boldly say: "I am now one with
 Christ. Therefore Christ's righteousness, victory, and life are mine."
 On the other hand, Christ may say: "I am that big sinner. His sins and
 his death are mine, because he is joined to me, and I to him."
 
 Whenever remission of sins is freely proclaimed, people misinterpret it
 according to Romans 3:8, "Let us do evil, that good may come." As
 soon as people hear that we are not justified by the Law, they reason
 maliciously: "Why, then let us reject the Law. If grace abounds, where
 sin abounds, let us abound in sin, that grace may all the more abound."
 People who reason thus are reckless. They make sport of the Scriptures
 and slander the sayings of the Holy Ghost.
 
 However, there are others who are not malicious, only weak, who may take
 offense when told that Law and good works are unnecessary for salvation.
 These must be instructed as to why good works do not justify, and from
 what motives good works must be done. Good works are not the cause, but
 the fruit of righteousness. When we have become righteous, then first
 are we able and willing to do good. The tree makes the apple; the apple
 does not make the tree.
 
 
   VERSE 20. And the life which I now live in the flesh I live by the
   faith of the Son of God.
 
 Paul does not deny the fact that he is living in the flesh. He performs
 the natural functions of the flesh. But he says that this is not his
 real life. His life in the flesh is not a life after the flesh.
 
 "I live by the faith of the Son of God," he says. "My speech is no
 longer directed by the flesh, but by the Holy Ghost. My sight is no
 longer governed by the flesh, but by the Holy Ghost. My hearing is no
 longer determined by the flesh, but by the Holy Ghost. I cannot teach,
 write, pray, or give thanks without the instrumentality of the flesh;
 yet these activities do not proceed from the flesh, but from God."
 
 A Christian uses earthly means like any unbeliever. Outwardly they look
 alike. Nevertheless there is a great difference between them. I may live
 in the flesh, but I do not live after the flesh. I do my living now "by
 the faith of the Son of God." Paul had the same voice, the same tongue,
 before and after his conversion. Before his conversion his tongue
 uttered blasphemies. But after his conversion his tongue spoke a
 spiritual, heavenly language.
 
 We may now understand how spiritual life originates. It enters the heart
 by faith. Christ reigns in the heart with His Holy Spirit, who sees,
 hears, speaks, works, suffers, and does all things in and through us
 over the protest and the resistance of the flesh.
 
 
   VERSE 20. Who loved me, and gave himself for me.
 
 The sophistical papists assert that a person is able by natural strength
 to love God long before grace has entered his heart, and to perform
 works of real merit. They believe they are able to fulfill the
 commandments of God. They believe they are able to do more than
 God expects of them, so that they are in a position to sell their
 superfluous merits to laymen, thereby saving themselves and others.
 They are saving nobody. On the contrary, they abolish the Gospel, they
 deride, deny, and blaspheme Christ, and call upon themselves the wrath
 of God. This is what they get for living in their own righteousness, and
 not in the faith of the Son of God.
 
 The papists will tell you to do the best you can, and God will give you
 His grace. They have a rhyme for it:
 
   "God will no more require of man, Than of himself perform he can."
 
 This may hold true in ordinary civic life. But the papists apply it to
 the spiritual realm where a person can perform nothing but sin, because
 he is sold under sin.
 
 Our opponents go even further than that. They say, nature is depraved,
 but the qualities of nature are untainted. Again we say: This may hold
 true in everyday life, but not in the spiritual life. In spiritual
 matters a person is by nature full of darkness, error, ignorance,
 malice, and perverseness in will and in mind. In view of this, Paul
 declares that Christ began and not we. "He loved me, and gave Himself
 for me. He found in me no right mind and no good will. But the good Lord
 had mercy upon me. Out of pure kindness He loved me, loved me so that
 He gave Himself for me, that I should be free from the Law, from sin,
 devil, and death."
 
 The words, "The Son of God who loved me, and gave Himself for me," are
 so many thunderclaps and lightning bolts of protest from heaven against
 the righteousness of the Law. The wickedness, error, darkness, ignorance
 in my mind and my will were so great, that it was quite impossible
 for me to be saved by any other means than by the inestimable price of
 Christ's death.
 
 Let us count the price. When you hear that such an enormous price was
 paid for you, will you still come along with your cowl, your shaven
 pate, your chastity, your obedience, your poverty, your works, your
 merits? What do you want with all these trappings? What good are the
 works of all men, and all the pains of the martyrs, in comparison with
 the pains of the Son of God dying on the Cross, so that there was not
 a drop of His precious blood, but it was all shed for your sins. If you
 could properly evaluate this incomparable price, you would throw all
 your ceremonies, vows, works, and merits into the ash can. What awful
 presumption to imagine that there is any work good enough to pacify God,
 when to pacify God required the invaluable price of the death and blood
 of His own and only Son?
 
 
   VERSE 20. For me.
 
 Who is this "me"? I, wretched and damnable sinner, dearly beloved of the
 Son of God. If I could by work or merit love the Son of God and come to
 Him, why should He have sacrificed Himself for me? This shows how the
 papists ignore the Scriptures, particularly the doctrine of faith.
 If they had paid any attention at all to these words, that it was
 absolutely necessary for the Son of God to be given into death for me,
 they would never have invented so many hideous heresies.
 
 I always say, there is no remedy against the sects, no power to resist
 them, except this article of Christian righteousness. If we lose this
 article we shall never be able to combat errors or sects. What business
 have they to make such a fuss about works or merits? If I, a condemned
 sinner, could have been purchased and redeemed by any other price, why
 should the Son of God have given Himself for me? Just because there
 was no other price in heaven and on earth big and good enough, was it
 necessary for the Son of God to be delivered for me. This He did out of
 His great love for me, for the Apostle says, "Who loved me."
 
 Did the Law ever love me? Did the Law ever sacrifice itself for me? Did
 the Law ever die for me? On the contrary, it accuses me, it frightens
 me, it drives me crazy. Somebody else saved me from the Law, from sin
 and death unto eternal life. That Somebody is the Son of God, to whom be
 praise and glory forever.
 
 Hence, Christ is no Moses, no tyrant, no lawgiver, but the Giver of
 grace, the Savior, full of mercy. In short, He is no less than infinite
 mercy and ineffable goodness, bountifully giving Himself for us.
 Visualize Christ in these His true colors. I do not say that it is easy.
 Even in the present diffusion of the Gospel light, I have much trouble
 to see Christ as Paul portrays Him. So deeply has the diseased opinion
 that Christ is a lawgiver sunk into my bones. You younger men are a good
 deal better off than we who are old. You have never become infected
 with the nefarious errors on which I suckled all my youth, until at the
 mention of the name of Christ I shivered with fear. You, I say, who are
 young may learn to know Christ in all His sweetness.
 
 For Christ is Joy and Sweetness to a broken heart. Christ is a Lover of
 poor sinners, and such a Lover that He gave Himself for us. Now if
 this is true, and it is true, then are we never justified by our own
 righteousness.
 
 Read the words "me" and "for me" with great emphasis. Print this "me"
 with capital letters in your heart, and do not ever doubt that you
 belong to the number of those who are meant by this "me." Christ did not
 only love Peter and Paul. The same love He felt for them He feels for
 us. If we cannot deny that we are sinners, we cannot deny that Christ
 died for our sins.
 
 
   VERSE 21. I do not frustrate the grace of God.
 
 Paul is now getting ready for the second argument of his Epistle, to the
 effect that to seek justification by works of the Law, is to reject the
 grace of God. I ask you, what sin can be more horrible than to reject
 the grace of God, and to refuse the righteousness of Christ? It is
 bad enough that we are wicked sinners and transgressors of all the
 commandments of God; on top of that to refuse the grace of God and the
 remission of sins offered unto us by Christ, is the worst sin of all,
 the sin of sins. That is the limit. There is no sin which Paul and the
 other apostles detested more than when a person despises the grace of
 God in Christ Jesus. Still there is no sin more common. That is why Paul
 can get so angry at the Antichrist, because he snubs Christ, rebuffs the
 grace of God, and refuses the merit of Christ. What else would you call
 it but spitting in Christ's face, pushing Christ to the side, usurping
 Christ's throne, and to say: "I am going to justify you people; I am
 going to save you." By what means? By masses, pilgrimages, pardons,
 merits, etc. For this is Antichrist's doctrine: Faith is no good, unless
 it is reinforced by works. By this abominable doctrine Antichrist has
 spoiled, darkened, and buried the benefit of Christ, and in place of
 the grace of Christ and His Kingdom, he has established the doctrine of
 works and the kingdom of ceremonies.
 
 We despise the grace of God when we observe the Law for the purpose of
 being justified. The Law is good, holy, and profitable, but it does not
 justify. To keep the Law in order to be justified means to reject grace,
 to deny Christ, to despise His sacrifice, and to be lost.
 
 
   VERSE 21. For if righteousness come by the law, then Christ is dead
   in vain.
 
 Did Christ die, or did He not die? Was His death worth while, or was it
 not? If His death was worth while, it follows that righteousness does
 not come by the Law. Why was Christ born anyway? Why was He crucified?
 Why did He suffer? Why did He love me and give Himself for me? It was
 all done to no purpose if righteousness is to be had by the Law.
 
 Or do you think that God spared not His Son, but delivered Him for us
 all, for the fun of it? Before I would admit anything like that, I would
 consign the holiness of the saints and of the angels to hell.
 
 To reject the grace of God is a common sin, of which everybody is guilty
 who sees any righteousness in himself or in his deeds. And the Pope is
 the sole author of this iniquity. Not content to spoil the Gospel of
 Christ, he has filled the world with his cursed traditions, e.g., his
 bulls and indulgences.
 
 We will always affirm with Paul that either Christ died in vain, or else
 the Law cannot justify us. But Christ did not suffer and die in vain.
 Hence, the Law does not justify.
 
 If my salvation was so difficult to accomplish that it necessitated the
 death of Christ, then all my works, all the righteousness of the Law,
 are good for nothing. How can I buy for a penny what cost a million
 dollars? The Law is a penny's worth when you compare it with Christ.
 Should I be so stupid as to reject the righteousness of Christ which
 cost me nothing, and slave like a fool to achieve the righteousness of
 the Law which God disdains?
 
 Man's own righteousness is in the last analysis a despising and
 rejecting of the grace of God. No combination of words can do justice to
 such an outrage. It is an insult to say that any man died in vain. But
 to say that Christ died in vain is a deadly insult. To say that Christ
 died in vain is to make His resurrection, His victory, His glory, His
 kingdom, heaven, earth, God Himself, of no purpose and benefit whatever.
 
 That is enough to set any person against the righteousness of the Law
 and all the trimmings of men's own righteousness, the orders of monks
 and friars, and their superstitions.
 
 Who would not detest his own vows, his cowls, his shaven crown, his
 bearded traditions, yes, the very Law of Moses, when he hears that for
 such things he rejected the grace of God and the death of Christ. It
 seems that such a horrible wickedness could not enter a man's heart,
 that he should reject the grace of God, and despise the death of Christ.
 And yet this atrocity is all too common. Let us be warned. Everyone
 who seeks righteousness without Christ, either by works, merits,
 satisfactions, actions, or by the Law, rejects the grace of God, and
 despises the death of Christ.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 3
 
 
   VERSE 1. 0 foolish Galatians.
 
 THE Apostle Paul manifests his apostolic care for the Galatians.
 Sometimes he entreats them, then again he reproaches them, in accordance
 with his own advice to Timothy: "Preach the word; be instant in season,
 out of season; reprove, rebuke, exhort."
 
 In the midst of his discourse on Christian righteousness Paul breaks
 off, and turns to address the Galatians. "O foolish Galatians," he
 cries. "I have brought you the true Gospel, and you received it with
 eagerness and gratitude. Now all of a sudden you drop the Gospel. What
 has got into you?"
 
 Paul reproves the Galatians rather sharply when he calls them "fools,
 bewitched, and disobedient." Whether he is indignant or sorry, I cannot
 say. He may be both. It is the duty of a Christian pastor to reprove the
 people committed to his charge. Of course, his anger must not flow from
 malice, but from affection and a real zeal for Christ.
 
 There is no question that Paul is disappointed. It hurts him to think
 that his Galatians showed so little stability. We can hear him say:
 "I am sorry to hear of your troubles, and disappointed in you for the
 disgraceful part you played." I say rather much on this point to save
 Paul from the charge that he railed upon the churches, contrary to the
 spirit of the Gospel.
 
 A certain distance and coolness can be noted in the title with which
 the Apostle addresses the Galatians. He does not now address them as his
 brethren, as he usually does. He addresses them as Galatians in order to
 remind them of their national trait to be foolish.
 
 We have here an example of bad traits that often cling to individual
 Christians and entire congregations. Grace does not suddenly transform a
 Christian into a new and perfect creature. Dregs of the old and natural
 corruption remain. The Spirit of God cannot at once overcome human
 deficiency. Sanctification takes time.
 
 Although the Galatians had been enlightened by the Holy Spirit through
 the preaching of faith, something of their national trait of foolishness
 plus their original depravity clung to them. Let no man think that once
 he has received faith, he can presently be converted into a faultless
 creature. The leavings of old vices will stick to him, be he ever so
 good a Christian.
 
 
   VERSE 1. Who hath bewitched you, that ye should not obey the truth?
 
 Paul calls the Galatians foolish and bewitched. In the fifth chapter he
 mentions sorcery among the works of the flesh, declaring that witchcraft
 and sorcery are real manifestations and legitimate activities of the
 devil. We are all exposed to the influence of the devil, because he is
 the prince and god of the world in which we live.
 
 Satan is clever. He does not only bewitch men in a crude manner, but
 also in a more artful fashion. He bedevils the minds of men with hideous
 fallacies. Not only is he able to deceive the self-assured, but even
 those who profess the true Christian faith. There is not one among us
 who is not at times seduced by Satan into false beliefs.
 
 This accounts for the many new battles we have to wage nowadays. But
 the attacks of the old Serpent are not without profit to us, for they
 confirm our doctrine and strengthen our faith in Christ. Many a time we
 were wrestled down in these conflicts with Satan, but Christ has always
 triumphed and always will triumph. Do not think that the Galatians were
 the only ones to be bewitched by the devil. Let us realize that we too
 may be seduced by Satan.
 
   VERSE 1. Who hath bewitched you?
 
 In this sentence Paul excuses the Galatians, while he blames the false
 apostles for the apostasy of the Galatians.
 
 As if he were saying: "I know your defection was not willful. The devil
 sent the false apostles to you, and they tallied you into believing that
 you are justified by the Law. With this our epistle we endeavor to undo
 the damage which the false apostles have inflicted upon you."
 
 Like Paul, we struggle with the Word of God against the fanatical
 Anabaptists of our day; and our efforts are not entirely in vain. The
 trouble is there are many who refuse to be instructed. They will not
 listen to reason; they will not listen to the Scriptures, because they
 are bewitched by the tricky devil who can make a lie look like the
 truth.
 
 Since the devil has this uncanny ability to make us believe a lie until
 we would swear a thousand times it were the truth, we must not be proud,
 but walk in fear and humility, and call upon the Lord Jesus to save us
 from temptation.
 
 Although I am a doctor of divinity, and have preached Christ and
 fought His battles for a long time, I know from personal experience how
 difficult it is to hold fast to the truth. I cannot always shake off
 Satan. I cannot always apprehend Christ as the Scriptures portray Him.
 Sometimes the devil distorts Christ to my vision. But thanks be to God,
 who keeps us in His Word, in faith, and in prayer.
 
 The spiritual witchery of the devil creates in the heart a wrong idea
 of Christ. Those who share the opinion that a person is justified by the
 works of the Law, are simply bewitched. Their belief goes against faith
 and Christ.
 
   VERSE 1. That ye should not obey the truth.
 
 Paul incriminates the Galatians in worse failure. "You are so bewitched
 that you no longer obey the truth. I fear many of you have strayed so
 far that you will never return to the truth."
 
 The apostasy of the Galatians is a fine indorsement of the Law, all
 right. You may preach the Law ever so fervently; if the preaching of the
 Gospel does not accompany it, the Law will never produce true conversion
 and heartfelt repentance. We do not mean to say that the preaching of
 the Law is without value, but it only serves to bring home to us the
 wrath of God. The Law bows a person down. It takes the Gospel and the
 preaching of faith in Christ to raise and save a person.
 
 
   VERSE 1. Before whose eyes Jesus Christ hath been evidently set forth.
 
 Paul's increasing severity becomes apparent as he reminds the Galatians
 that they disobeyed the truth in defiance of the vivid description he
 had given them of Christ. So vividly had he described Christ to them
 that they could almost see and handle Him. As if Paul were to say: "No
 artist with all his colors could have pictured Christ to you as vividly
 as I have pictured Him to you by my preaching. Yet you permitted
 yourselves to be seduced to the extent that you disobeyed the truth of
 Christ."
 
 
   VERSE 1. Crucified among you.
 
 "You have not only rejected the grace of God, you have shamefully
 crucified Christ among you." Paul employs the same phraseology in
 Hebrews 6:6: "Seeing they crucify to themselves the Son of God afresh,
 and put him to an open shame."
 
 It should make any person afraid to hear Paul say that those who seek
 to be justified by the Law, not only deny Christ, but also crucify Him
 anew. If those who seek to be justified by the Law and its works are
 crucifiers of Christ, what are they, I like to know, who seek salvation
 by the filthy rags of their own work-righteousness?
 
 Can there be anything more horrible than the papacy, an alliance of
 people who crucify Christ in themselves, in the Church, and in the
 hearts of the believers?
 
 Of all the diseased and vicious doctrines of the papacy the worst is
 this: "If you want to serve God you must earn your own remission of sins
 and everlasting life, and in addition help others to obtain salvation by
 giving them the benefit of your extra work-holiness." Monks, friars, and
 all the rest of them brag that besides the ordinary requirements common
 to all Christians, they do the works of supererogation, i.e., the
 performance of more than is required. This is certainly a fiendish
 illusion.
 
 No wonder Paul employs such sharp language in his effort to recall the
 Galatians from the doctrine of the false apostles. He says to them:
 "Don't you realize what you have done? You have crucified Christ anew
 because you seek salvation by the Law."
 
 True, Christ can no longer be crucified in person, but He is crucified
 in us when we reject grace, faith, free remission of sins and endeavor
 to be justified by our own works, or by the works of the Law.
 
 The Apostle is incensed at the presumptuousness of any person who thinks
 he can perform the Law of God to his own salvation. He charges that
 person with the atrocity of crucifying anew the Son of God.
 
 
   VERSE 2. This only would I learn of you, Received ye the Spirit by the
   works of the law, or by the hearing of faith?
 
 There is a touch of irony in these words of the Apostle. "Come on now,
 my smart Galatians, you who all of a sudden have become doctors, while
 I seem to be your pupil: Received ye the Holy Ghost by the works of
 the Law, or by the preaching of the Gospel?" This question gave them
 something to think about, because their own experience contradicted
 them.
 
 "You cannot say that you received the Holy Spirit by the Law. As long as
 you were servants of the Law, you never received the Holy Ghost. Nobody
 ever heard of the Holy Ghost being given to anybody, be he doctor or
 dunce, as a result of the preaching of the Law. In your own case, you
 have not only learned the Law by heart, you have labored with all your
 might to perform it. You most of all should have received the Holy Ghost
 by the Law, if that were possible. You cannot show me that this ever
 happened. But as soon as the Gospel came your way, you received the Holy
 Ghost by the simple hearing of faith, before you ever had a chance to do
 a single good deed." Luke verifies this statement of Paul in the Book
 of Acts: "While Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all
 them which heard the word." (Acts 10:44.) "And as I began to speak, the
 Holy Ghost fell on them, as on us at the beginning." (Acts 11:15.)
 
 Try to appreciate the force of Paul's argument which is so often
 repeated in the Book of Acts. That Book was written for the express
 purpose of verifying Paul's assertion, that the Holy Ghost comes upon
 men, not in response to the preaching of the Law, but in response to
 the preaching of the Gospel. When Peter preached Christ at the first
 Pentecost, the Holy Ghost fell upon the hearers, "and the same day there
 were added unto them about three thousand souls." Cornelius received the
 Holy Ghost while Peter was speaking of Christ. "The Holy Ghost fell on
 all of them which heard the word." These are actual experiences that
 cannot very well be denied. When Paul and Barnabas returned to Jerusalem
 and reported what they had been able to accomplish among the Gentiles,
 the whole Church was astonished, particularly when it heard that the
 uncircumcised Gentiles had received the Holy Ghost by the preaching of
 faith in Christ.
 
 Now as God gave the Holy Ghost to the Gentiles without the Law by the
 simple preaching of the Gospel, so He gave the Holy Ghost also to the
 Jews, without the Law, through faith alone. If the righteousness of the
 Law were necessary unto salvation, the Holy Ghost would never have come
 to the Gentiles, because they did not bother about the Law. Hence the
 Law does not justify, but faith in Christ justifies.
 
 How was it with Cornelius? Cornelius and his friends whom he had invited
 over to his house, do nothing but sit and listen. Peter is doing the
 talking. They just sit and do nothing. The Law is far removed from their
 thoughts. They burn no sacrifices. They are not at all interested in
 circumcision. All they do is to sit and listen to Peter. Suddenly the
 Holy Ghost enters their hearts. His presence is unmistakable, "for they
 spoke with tongues and magnified God."
 
 Right here we have one more difference between the Law and the Gospel.
 The Law does not bring on the Holy Ghost. The Gospel, however, brings
 on the gift of the Holy Ghost, because it is the nature of the Gospel to
 convey good gifts. The Law and the Gospel are contrary ideas. They have
 contrary functions and purposes. To endow the Law with any capacity to
 produce righteousness is to plagiarize the Gospel. The Gospel brings
 donations. It pleads for open hands to take what is being offered. The
 Law has nothing to give. It demands, and its demands are impossible.
 
 Our opponents come back at us with Cornelius. Cornelius, they point out,
 was "a devout man, and one that feared God with all his house, which
 gave much alms to the people and prayed God always." Because of these
 qualifications, he merited the forgiveness of sins, and the gift of the
 Holy Ghost. So reason our opponents.
 
   I answer: Cornelius was a Gentile. You cannot deny it. As a Gentile he
   was uncircumcised. As a Gentile he did not observe the Law. He never
   gave the Law any thought. For all that, he was justified and received
   the Holy Ghost. How can the Law avail anything unto righteousness?
 Our opponents are not satisfied. They reply: "Granted that Cornelius was
 a Gentile and did not receive the Holy Ghost by the Law, yet the text
 plainly states that he was a devout man who feared God, gave alms, and
 prayed. Don't you think he deserved the gift of the Holy Ghost?"
 
   I answer: Cornelius had the faith of the fathers who were saved by
   faith in the Christ to come. If Cornelius had died before Christ, he
   would have been saved because he believed in the Christ to come. But
   because the Messiah had already come, Cornelius had to be apprized of
   the fact. Since Christ has come we cannot be saved by faith in the
   Christ to come, but we must believe that he has come. The object of
   Peter's visit was to acquaint Cornelius with the fact that Christ was
   no longer to be looked for, because He is here.
 
 As to the contention of our opponents that Cornelius deserved grace and
 the gift of the Holy Ghost, because he was devout and just, we say
 that these attributes are the characteristics of a spiritual person who
 already has faith in Christ, and not the characteristics of a Gentile
 or of natural man. Luke first praises Cornelius for being a devout and
 God-fearing man, and then Luke mentions the good works, the alms and
 prayers of Cornelius. Our opponents ignore the sequence of Luke's words.
 They pounce on this one sentence, "which gave much alms to the people,"
 because it serves their assertion that merit precedes grace. The fact
 is that Cornelius gave alms and prayed to God because he had faith.
 And because of his faith in the Christ to come, Peter was delegated to
 preach unto Cornelius faith in the Christ who had already come. This
 argument is convincing enough. Cornelius was justified without the Law,
 therefore the Law cannot justify.
 
 Take the case of Naaman, the Syrian, who was a Gentile and did not
 belong to the race of Moses. Yet his flesh was cleansed, the God of
 Israel was revealed unto him, and he received the Holy Ghost. Naaman
 confessed his faith: "Behold, now I know that there is no God in all the
 earth, but in Israel." (II Kings 5:15.) Naaman does not do a thing. He
 does not busy himself with the Law. He was never circumcised. That does
 not mean that his faith was inactive. He said to the Prophet Elisha:
 "Thy servant will henceforth offer neither burnt offering nor sacrifice
 unto other gods, but unto the Lord. In this thing the Lord pardon thy
 servant, that when my master goeth into the house of Rimmon to worship
 there, and he leaneth on my hand, and I bow myself in the house of
 Rimmon: when I bow down myself in the house of Rimmon, the Lord pardon
 thy servant in this thing." What did the Prophet tell him? "Go in
 peace." The Jews do not like to hear the prophet say this. "What," they
 exclaim, "should this heathen be justified without the Law? Should he be
 made equal to us who are circumcised?"
 
 Long before the time of Moses, God justified men without the Law. He
 justified many kings of Egypt and Babylonia. He justified Job. Nineveh,
 that great city, was justified and received the promise of God that
 He would not destroy the city. Why was Nineveh spared? Not because it
 fulfilled the Law, but because Nineveh believed the word of God. The
 Prophet Jonah writes: "So the people of Nineveh believed God, and
 proclaimed a fast, and put on sackcloth." They repented. Nowhere in the
 Book of Jonah do you read that the Ninevites received the Law of Moses,
 or that they were circumcised, or that they offered sacrifices.
 
 All this happened long before Christ was born. If the Gentiles were
 justified without the Law and quietly received the Holy Spirit at a
 time when the Law was in full force, why should the Law count unto
 righteousness now, now that Christ has fulfilled the Law?
 
 And yet many devote much time and labor to the Law, to the decrees
 of the fathers, and to the traditions of the Pope. Many of these
 specialists have incapacitated themselves for any kind of work, good or
 bad, by their rigorous attention to rules and laws. All the same, they
 could not obtain a quiet conscience and peace in Christ. But the moment
 the Gospel of Christ touches them, certainty comes to them, and joy, and
 a right judgment.
 
 I have good reason for enlarging upon this point. The heart of man finds
 it difficult to believe that so great a treasure as the Holy Ghost is
 gotten by the mere hearing of faith. The hearer likes to reason like
 this: Forgiveness of sins, deliverance from death, the gift of the Holy
 Ghost, everlasting life are grand things. If you want to obtain these
 priceless benefits, you must engage in correspondingly great efforts.
 And the devil says, "Amen."
 
 We must learn that forgiveness of sins, Christ, and the Holy Ghost,
 are freely granted unto us at the preaching of faith, in spite of our
 sinfulness. We are not to waste time thinking how unworthy we are of the
 blessings of God. We are to know that it pleased God freely to give us
 His unspeakable gifts. If He offers His gifts free of charge, why not
 take them? Why worry about our lack of worthiness? Why not accept gifts
 with joy and thanksgiving?
 
 Right away foolish reason is once more offended. It scolds us. "When you
 say that a person can do nothing to obtain the grace of God, you foster
 carnal security. People become shiftless and will do no good at all.
 Better not preach this doctrine of faith. Rather urge the people to
 exert and to exercise themselves in good works, so that the Holy Ghost
 will feel like coming to them."
 
 What did Jesus say to Martha when she was very "careful and troubled
 about many things" and could hardly stand to see her sister Mary sitting
 at the feet of Jesus, just listening? "Martha, Martha," Jesus said,
 "thou art careful and troubled about many things: but one thing is
 needful; and Mary hath chosen that good part, which shall not be taken
 away from her." A person becomes a Christian not by working, but by
 hearing. The first step to being a Christian is to hear the Gospel. When
 a person has accepted the Gospel, let him first give thanks unto God
 with a glad heart, and then let him get busy on the good works to strive
 for, works that really please God, and not man-made and self-chosen
 works.
 
 Our opponents regard faith as an easy thing, but I know from personal
 experience how hard it is to believe. That the Holy Ghost is received by
 faith, is quickly said, but not so quickly done.
 
 All believers experience this difficulty. They would gladly embrace the
 Word with a full faith, but the flesh deters them. You see, our reason
 always thinks it is too easy and cheap to have righteousness, the Holy
 Spirit, and life everlasting by the mere hearing of the Gospel.
 
 
   VERSE 3. Are ye so foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye now made
   perfect by the flesh?
 
 Paul now begins to warn the Galatians against a twofold danger. The
 first danger is: "Are ye so foolish, that after ye have begun in the
 Spirit, ye would now end in the flesh?"
 
 "Flesh" stands for the righteousness of reason which seeks justification
 by the accomplishment of the Law. I am told that I began in the spirit
 under the papacy, but am ending up in the flesh because I got married.
 As though single life were a spiritual life, and married life a carnal
 life. They are silly. All the duties of a Christian husband, e.g., to
 love his wife, to bring up his children, to govern his family, etc., are
 the very fruits of the Spirit.
 
 The righteousness of the Law which Paul also terms the righteousness of
 the flesh is so far from justifying a person that those who once had
 the Holy Spirit and lost Him, end up in the Law to their complete
 destruction.
 
 
   VERSE 4. Have ye suffered so many things in vain?
 
 The other danger against which the Apostle warns the Galatians is this:
 "Have ye suffered so many things in vain?" Paul wants to say: "Consider
 not only the good start you had and lost, but consider also the many
 things you have suffered for the sake of the Gospel and for the name of
 Christ. You have suffered the loss of your possessions, you have borne
 reproaches, you have passed through many dangers of body and life. You
 endured much for the name of Christ and you endured it faithfully.
 But now you have lost everything, the Gospel, faith, and the spiritual
 benefit of your sufferings for Christ's sake. What a miserable thing to
 endure so many afflictions for nothing."
 
 
   VERSE 4. If it be yet in vain.
 
 The Apostle adds the afterthought: "If it be yet in vain. I do not
 despair of all hope for you. But if you continue to look to the Law
 for righteousness, I think you should be told that all your past
 true worship of God and all the afflictions that you have endured
 for Christ's sake are going to help you not at all. I do not mean to
 discourage you altogether. I do hope you will repent and amend."
 
 
   VERSE 5. He therefore that ministereth to you the Spirit, and worketh
   miracles among you, doeth he it by the works of the law, or by the
   hearing of faith?
 
 This argument based on the experience of the Galatians, pleased the
 Apostle so well that he returns to it after he had warned them against
 their twofold danger. "You have not only received the Spirit by the
 preaching of the Gospel, but by the same Gospel you were enabled to do
 things." "What things?" we ask. Miracles. At least the Galatians had
 manifested the striking fruits of faith which true disciples of the
 Gospel manifested in those days. On one occasion the Apostle wrote:
 "The kingdom of God is not in word, but in power." This "power" revealed
 itself not only in readiness of speech, but in demonstrations of the
 supernatural ability of the Holy Spirit.
 
 When the Gospel is preached unto faith, hope, love, and patience, God
 gives His wonder-working Spirit. Paul reminds the Galatians of this.
 "God had not only brought you to faith by my preaching. He had also
 sanctified you to bring forth the fruits of faith. And one of the fruits
 of your faith was that you loved me so devotedly that you were willing
 to pluck out your eyes for me." To love a fellow-man so devotedly as to
 be ready to bestow upon him money, goods, eyes in order to secure his
 salvation, such love is the fruit of the Holy Spirit.
 
 "These products of the Spirit you enjoyed before the false apostles
 misled you," the Apostle reminds the Galatians. "But you haven't
 manifested any of these fruits under the regime of the Law. How does
 it come that you do not grow the same fruits now? You no longer teach
 truly; you do not believe boldly; you do not live well; you do not work
 hard; you do not bear things patiently. Who has spoiled you that you no
 longer love me; that you are not now ready to pluck out your eyes for
 me? What has happened to cool your personal interest in me?"
 
 The same thing happened to me. When I began to proclaim the Gospel,
 there were many, very many who were delighted with our doctrine and had
 a good opinion of us. And now? Now they have succeeded in making us so
 odious to those who formerly loved us that they now hate us like poison.
 
 Paul argues: "Your experience ought to teach you that the fruits of love
 do not grow on the stump of the Law. You had not virtue prior to the
 preaching of the Gospel and you have no virtues now under the regime of
 the false apostles."
 
 We, too, may say to those who misname themselves "evangelical" and flout
 their new-found liberty: Have you put down the tyranny of the Pope and
 obtained liberty in Christ through the Anabaptists and other fanatics?
 Or have you obtained your freedom from us who preach faith in Christ
 Jesus? If there is any honesty left in them they will have to confess
 that their freedom dates from the preaching of the Gospel.
 
 
   VERSE 6. Even as Abraham believed God, and it was accounted to him
   for righteousness.
 
 The Apostle next adduces the example of Abraham and reviews the
 testimony of the Scriptures concerning faith. The first passage is taken
 from Genesis 16:6: "And he believed in the Lord; and he counted it to
 him for righteousness." The Apostle makes the most of this passage.
 Abraham may have enjoyed a good standing with men for his upright life,
 but not with God. In the sight of God, Abraham was a condemned sinner.
 That he was justified before God was not due to his own exertions, but
 due to his faith. The Scriptures expressly state: "Abraham believed in
 the Lord; and he counted it to him for righteousness."
 
 Paul places the emphasis upon the two words: Abraham believed. Faith
 in God constitutes the highest worship, the prime duty, the first
 obedience, and the foremost sacrifice. Without faith God forfeits His
 glory, wisdom, truth, and mercy in us. The first duty of man is to
 believe in God and to honor Him with his faith. Faith is truly the
 height of wisdom, the right kind of righteousness, the only real
 religion. This will give us an idea of the excellence of faith.
 
 To believe in God as Abraham did is to be right with God because faith
 honors God. Faith says to God: "I believe what you say." When we pay
 attention to reason, God seems to propose impossible matters in the
 Christian Creed. To reason it seems absurd that Christ should offer His
 body and blood in the Lord's Supper; that Baptism should be the washing
 of regeneration; that the dead shall rise; that Christ the Son of God
 was conceived in the womb of the Virgin Mary, etc. Reason shouts that
 all this is preposterous. Are you surprised that reason thinks little
 of faith? Reason thinks it ludicrous that faith should be the foremost
 service any person can render unto God.
 
 Let your faith supplant reason. Abraham mastered reason by faith in the
 Word of God. Not as though reason ever yields meekly. It put up a fight
 against the faith of Abraham. Reason protested that it was absurd to
 think that Sarah who was ninety years old and barren by nature, should
 give birth to a son. But faith won the victory and routed reason, that
 ugly beast and enemy of God. Everyone who by faith slays reason, the
 world's biggest monster, renders God a real service, a better service
 than the religions of all races and all the drudgery of meritorious
 monks can render.
 
 Men fast, pray, watch, suffer. They intend to appease the wrath of God
 and to deserve God's grace by their exertions. But there is no glory in
 it for God, because by their exertions these workers pronounce God an
 unmerciful slave driver, an unfaithful and angry Judge. They despise
 God, make a liar out of Him, snub Christ and all His benefits; in short
 they pull God from His throne and perch themselves on it.
 
 Faith truly honors God. And because faith honors God, God counts faith
 for righteousness.
 
 Christian righteousness is the confidence of the heart in God through
 Christ Jesus. Such confidence is accounted righteousness for Christ's
 sake. Two things make for Christian righteousness: Faith in Christ,
 which is a gift of God; and God's acceptance of this imperfect faith
 of ours for perfect righteousness. Because of my faith in Christ, God
 overlooks my distrust, the unwillingness of my spirit, my many other
 sins. Because the shadow of Christ's wing covers me I have no fear
 that God will cover all my sins and take my imperfections for perfect
 righteousness.
 
 God "winks" at my sins and covers them up. God says: "Because you
 believe in My Son I will forgive your sins until death shall deliver you
 from the body of sin."
 
 Learn to understand the constitution of your Christian righteousness.
 Faith is weak, but it means enough to God that He will not lay sin to
 our charge. He will not punish nor condemn us for it. He will forgive
 our sins as though they amount to nothing at all. He will do it not
 because we are worthy of such mercy. He will do it for Jesus' sake in
 whom we believe.
 
 Paradoxically, a Christian is both right and wrong, holy and profane,
 an enemy of God and a child of God. These contradictions no person can
 harmonize who does not understand the true way of salvation. Under the
 papacy we were told to toil until the feeling of guilt had left us. But
 the authors of this deranged idea were frequently driven to despair
 in the hour of death. It would have happened to me, if Christ had not
 mercifully delivered me from this error.
 
 We comfort the afflicted sinner in this manner: Brother, you can never
 be perfect in this life, but you can be holy. He will say: "How can I be
 holy when I feel my sins?" I answer: You feel sin? That is a good sign.
 To realize that one is ill is a step, and a very necessary step, toward
 recovery. "But how will I get rid of my sin?" he will ask. I answer:
 See the heavenly Physician, Christ, who heals the broken-hearted. Do not
 consult that Quackdoctor, Reason. Believe in Christ and your sins will
 be pardoned. His righteousness will become your righteousness, and your
 sins will become His sins.
 
 On one occasion Jesus said to His disciples: "The Father loveth you."
 Why? Not because the disciples were Pharisees, or circumcised, or
 particularly attentive to the Law. Jesus said: "The Father loveth you,
 because ye have loved me, and have believed that I came out from God. It
 pleased you to know that the Father sent me into the world. And because
 you believed it the Father loves you." On another occasion Jesus called
 His disciples evil and commanded them to ask for forgiveness.
 
 A Christian is beloved of God and a sinner. How can these two
 contradictions be harmonized: I am a sinner and deserve God's wrath
 and punishment, and yet the Father loves me? Christ alone can harmonize
 these contradictions. He is the Mediator.
 
 Do you now see how faith justifies without works? Sin lingers in us, and
 God hates sin. A transfusion of righteousness therefore becomes vitally
 necessary. This transfusion of righteousness we obtain from Christ
 because we believe in Him.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Know ye therefore that they which are of faith, the same are
   the children of Abraham.
 
 This is the main point of Paul's argument against the Jews: The children
 of Abraham are those who believe and not those who are born of Abraham's
 flesh and blood. This point Paul drives home with all his might because
 the Jews attached saving value to the genealogical fact: "We are the
 seed and children of Abraham."
 
 Let us begin with Abraham and learn how this friend of God was justified
 and saved. Not because he left his country, his relatives, his father's
 house; not because he was circumcised; not because he stood ready to
 sacrifice his own son Isaac in whom he had the promise of posterity.
 Abraham was justified because he believed. Paul's argumentation runs
 like this: "Since this is the unmistakable testimony of Holy Writ, why
 do you take your stand upon circumcision and the Law? Was not Abraham,
 your father, of whom you make so much, justified and saved without
 circumcision and the Law by faith alone?" Paul therefore concludes:
 "They which are of faith, the same are the children of Abraham."
 
 Abraham was the father of the faithful. In order to be a child of the
 believing Abraham you must believe as he did. Otherwise you are merely
 the physical offspring of the procreating Abraham, i.e., you were
 conceived and born in sin unto wrath and condemnation.
 
 Ishmael and Isaac were both the natural children of Abraham. By rights
 Ishmael should have enjoyed the prerogatives of the firstborn, if
 physical generation had any special value. Nevertheless he was left out
 in the cold while Isaac was called. This goes to prove that the children
 of faith are the real children of Abraham.
 
 Some find fault with Paul for applying the term "faith" in Genesis 15:6
 to Christ. They think Paul's use of the term too wide and general.
 They think its meaning should be restricted to the context. They claim
 Abraham's faith had no more in it than a belief in the promise of God
 that he should have seed.
 
 We reply: Faith presupposes the assurance of God's mercy. This assurance
 takes in the confidence that our sins are forgiven for Christ's sake.
 Never will the conscience trust in God unless it can be sure of God's
 mercy and promises in Christ. Now all the promises of God lead back to
 the first promise concerning Christ: "And I will put enmity between thee
 and the woman, and between thy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy
 head, and thou shalt bruise his heel." The faith of the fathers in the
 Old Testament era, and our faith in the New Testament are one and the
 same faith in Christ Jesus, although times and conditions may differ.
 Peter acknowledged this in the words: "Which neither our fathers nor
 we were able to bear? But we believe that through the grace of the Lord
 Jesus Christ we shall be saved, even as they." (Acts l5: 10, 11.) And
 Paul writes: "And did all drink the spiritual drink; for they drank of
 that spiritual Rock that followed them: and that Rock was Christ." (I
 Cor. 10:4.) And Christ Himself declared: "Your father Abraham rejoiced
 to see my day: and he saw it and was glad." (John 8:56.) The faith of
 the fathers was directed at the Christ who was to come, while ours rests
 in the Christ who has come. Time does not change the object of true
 faith, or the Holy Spirit. There has always been and always will be one
 mind, one impression, one faith concerning Christ among true believers
 whether they live in times past, now, or in times to come. We too
 believe in the Christ to come as the fathers did in the Old Testament,
 for we look for Christ to come again on the last day to judge the quick
 and the dead.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Know ye therefore that they which are of faith, the same are
   the children of Abraham.
 
 Paul is saying: "You know from the example of Abraham and from the plain
 testimony of the Scriptures that they are the children of Abraham, who
 have faith in Christ, regardless of their nationality, regardless of the
 Law, regardless of works, regardless of their parentage. The promise was
 made unto Abraham, 'Thou shalt be a father of many nations'; again, 'And
 in thee shall all families of the earth be blessed.'" To prevent the
 Jews from misinterpreting the word "nations," the Scriptures are careful
 to say "many nations." The true children of Abraham are the believers in
 Christ from all nations.
 
 
   VERSE 8. And the Scripture, foreseeing that God would justify the
   heathen through faith.
 
 "Your boasting does not get you anywhere," says Paul to the Galatians,
 "because the Sacred Scriptures foresaw and foretold long before the
 Law was ever given, that the heathen should be justified by the blessed
 'seed' of Abraham and not by the Law. This promise was made four hundred
 and thirty years before the Law was given. Because the Law was given so
 many years after Abraham, it could not abolish the promised blessing."
 This argument is strong because it is based on the exact factor of time.
 "Why should you boast of the Law, my Galatians, when the Law came four
 hundred and thirty years after the promise?"
 
 The false apostles glorified the Law and despised the promise made
 unto Abraham, although it antedated the Law by many years. It was after
 Abraham was accounted righteous because of his faith that the Scriptures
 first make mention of circumcision. "The Scriptures," says Paul, "meant
 to forestall your infatuation for the righteousness of the Law by
 installing the righteousness of faith before circumcision and the Law
 ever were ordained."
 
 
   VERSE 8. Preached before the gospel unto Abraham, saying, In thee shall
   all nations be blessed.
 
 The Jews misconstrue this passage. They want the term "to bless" to
 mean "to praise." They want the passage to read: In thee shall all the
 nations of the earth be praised. But this is a perversion of the
 words of Holy Writ. With the words "Abraham believed" Paul describes a
 spiritual Abraham, renewed by faith and regenerated by the Holy Ghost,
 that he should be the spiritual father of many nations. In that way all
 the Gentiles could be given to him for an inheritance.
 
 The Scriptures ascribe no righteousness to Abraham except through faith.
 The Scriptures speak of Abraham as he stands before God, a man justified
 by faith. Because of his faith God extends to him the promise: "In thee
 shall all nations be blessed."
 
 
   VERSE 9. So then they which be of faith are blessed with faithful
   Abraham.
 
 The emphasis lies on the words "with faithful Abraham." Paul
 distinguishes between Abraham and Abraham. There is a working and there
 is a believing Abraham. With the working Abraham we have nothing to do.
 Let the Jews glory in the generating Abraham; we glory in the believing
 Abraham of whom the Scriptures say that he received the blessing of
 righteousness by faith, not only for himself but for all who believe as
 he did. The world was promised to Abraham because he believed. The whole
 world is blessed if it believes as Abraham believed.
 
 The blessing is the promise of the Gospel. That all nations are to be
 blessed means that all nations are to hear the Gospel. All nations are
 to be declared righteous before God through faith in Christ Jesus. To
 bless simply means to spread abroad the knowledge of Christ's salvation.
 This is the office of the New Testament Church which distributes
 the promised blessing by preaching the Gospel, by administering the
 sacraments, by comforting the broken-hearted, in short, by dispensing
 the benefits of Christ.
 
 The Jews exhibited a working Abraham. The Pope exhibits a working
 Christ, or an exemplary Christ. The Pope quotes Christ's saying recorded
 in John 13:15, "I have given you an example, that ye should do as I
 have done to you." We do not deny that Christians ought to imitate the
 example of Christ; but mere imitation will not satisfy God. And bear
 in mind that Paul is not now discussing the example of Christ, but
 the salvation of Christ. That Abraham submitted to circumcision at the
 command of God, that he was endowed with excellent virtues, that he
 obeyed God in all things, was certainly admirable of him. To follow
 the example of Christ, to love one's neighbor, to do good to them
 that persecute you, to pray for one's enemies, patiently to bear
 the ingratitude of those who return evil for good, is certainly
 praiseworthy. But praiseworthy or not, such virtues do not acquit us
 before God. It takes more than that to make us righteous before God. We
 need Christ Himself, not His example, to save us. We need a redeeming,
 not an exemplary Christ, to save us. Paul is here speaking of the
 redeeming Christ and the believing Abraham, not of the model Christ or
 the sweating Abraham.
 
 The believing Abraham is not to lie buried in the grave. He is to be
 dusted off and brought out before the world. He is to be praised to the
 sky for his faith. Heaven and earth ought to know about him and about
 his faith in Christ. The working Abraham ought to look pretty small next
 to the believing Abraham.
 
 Paul's words contain the implication of contrast. When he quotes
 Scripture to the effect that all nations that share the faith of
 faithful Abraham are to be blessed, Paul means to imply the contrast
 that all nations are accursed without faith in Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 10. For as many as are of the works of the law are under the
   curse.
 
 The curse of God is like a flood that swallows everything that is not of
 faith. To avoid the curse we must hold on to the promise of the blessing
 in Christ.
 
 The reader is reminded that all this has no bearing upon civil laws,
 customs, or political matters. Civil laws and ordinances have their
 place and purpose. Let every government enact the best possible laws.
 But civil righteousness will never deliver a person from the
 condemnation of God's Law.
 
 I have good reason for calling your attention to this. People easily
 mistake civil righteousness for spiritual righteousness. In civil
 life we must, of course, pay attention to laws and deeds, but in the
 spiritual life we must not think to be justified by laws and works, but
 always keep in mind the promise and blessing of Christ, our only Savior.
 
 According to Paul everything that is not of faith is sin. When our
 opponents hear us repeat this statement of Paul, they make it appear as
 if we taught that governments should not be honored, as if we favored
 rebellion against the constituted authorities, as if we condemned
 all laws. Our opponents do us a great wrong, for we make a clear-cut
 distinction between civil and spiritual affairs.
 
 Governmental laws and ordinances are blessings of God for this life
 only. As for everlasting life, temporal blessings are not good enough.
 Unbelievers enjoy more temporal blessings than the Christians. Civil
 or legal righteousness may be good enough for this life but not for the
 life hereafter. Otherwise the infidels would be nearer heaven than the
 Christians, for infidels often excel in civil righteousness.
 
 
   VERSE 10. For it is written, Cursed is every one that continueth not in
    all things which are written in the book of the law to do them.
 
 Paul goes on to prove from this quotation out of the Book of Deuteronomy
 that all men who are under the Law are under the sentence of sin, of
 the wrath of God, and of everlasting death. Paul produces his proof in
 a roundabout way. He turns the negative statement, "Cursed is every one
 that continueth not in all things which are written in the book of the
 law to do them," into a positive statement, "As many as are of the works
 of the law are under the curse." These two statements, one by Paul and
 the other by Moses, appear to conflict. Paul declares, "Whosoever shall
 do the works of the Law, is accursed." Moses declares, "Whosoever
 shall not do the works of the Law, is accursed." How can these two
 contradictory statements be reconciled? How can the one statement prove
 the other? No person can hope to understand Paul unless he understands
 the article of justification. These two statements are not at all
 inconsistent.
 
 We must bear in mind that to do the works of the Law does not mean only
 to live up to the superficial requirements of the Law, but to obey the
 spirit of the Law to perfection. But where will you find the person who
 can do that? Let him step forward and we will praise him.
 
 Our opponents have their answer ready-made. They quote Paul's own
 statement in Romans 2:13, "The doers of the law shall be justified."
 Very well. But let us first find out who the doers of the law are. They
 call a "doer" of the Law one who performs the Law in its literal sense.
 This is not to "do" the Law. This is to sin. When our opponents go about
 to perform the Law they sin against the first, the second, and the third
 commandments, in fact they sin against the whole Law. For God requires
 above all that we worship Him in spirit and in faith. In observing the
 Law for the purpose of obtaining righteousness without faith in Christ
 these law-workers go smack against the Law and against God. They deny
 the righteousness of God, His mercy, and His promises. They deny Christ
 and all His benefits.
 
 In their ignorance of the true purpose of the Law the exponents of the
 Law abuse the Law, as Paul says, Romans 10:3, "For they, being
 ignorant of God's righteousness, and going about to establish their own
 righteousness, have not submitted themselves unto the righteousness of
 God."
 
 In their folly our opponents rush into the Scriptures, pick out a
 sentence here and a sentence there about the Law and imagine they know
 all about it. Their work-righteousness is plain idolatry and blasphemy
 against God. No wonder they abide under the curse of God.
 
 Because God saw that we could not fulfill the Law, He provided a way
 of salvation long before the Law was ever given, a salvation that He
 promised to Abraham, saying, "In thee shall all nations be blessed."
 
 The very first thing for us to do is to believe in Christ. First, we
 must receive the Holy Spirit, who enlightens and sanctifies us so that
 we can begin to do the Law, i.e., to love God and our neighbor. Now, the
 Holy Ghost is not obtained by the Law, but by faith in Christ. In the
 last analysis, to do the Law means to believe in Jesus Christ. The tree
 comes first, and then come the fruits.
 
 The scholastics admit that a mere external and superficial performance
 of the Law without sincerity and good will is plain hypocrisy. Judas
 acted like the other disciples. What was wrong with Judas? Mark what
 Rome answers, "Judas was a reprobate. His motives were perverse,
 therefore his works were hypocritical and no good." Well, well. Rome
 does admit, after all, that works in themselves do not justify unless
 they issue from a sincere heart. Why do our opponents not profess the
 same truth in spiritual matters? There, above all, faith must precede
 everything. The heart must be purified by faith before a person can lift
 a finger to please God.
 
 There are two classes of doers of the Law, true doers and hypocritical
 doers. The true doers of the Law are those who are moved by faith in
 Christ to do the Law. The hypocritical doers of the Law are those who
 seek to obtain righteousness by a mechanical performance of good works
 while their hearts are far removed from God. They act like the foolish
 carpenter who starts with the roof when he builds a house. Instead of
 doing the Law, these law-conscious hypocrites break the Law. They break
 the very first commandment of God by denying His promise in Christ. They
 do not worship God in faith. They worship themselves.
 
 No wonder Paul was able to foretell the abominations that Antichrist
 would bring into the Church. That Antichrists would come, Christ Himself
 prophesied, Matthew 24:5, "For many shall come in my name, saying, I am
 Christ; and shall deceive many." Whoever seeks righteousness by works
 denies God and makes himself God. He is an Antichrist because he
 ascribes to his own works the omnipotent capability of conquering sin,
 death, devil, hell, and the wrath of God. An Antichrist lays claim to
 the honor of Christ. He is an idolater of himself. The law-righteous
 person is the worst kind of infidel.
 
 Those who intend to obtain righteousness by their own efforts do not say
 in so many words: "I am God; I am Christ." But it amounts to that. They
 usurp the divinity and office of Christ. The effect is the same as if
 they said, "I am Christ; I am a Savior. I save myself and others." This
 is the impression the monks give out.
 
 The Pope is the Antichrist, because he is against Christ, because he
 takes liberties with the things of God, because he lords it over the
 temple of God.
 
 I cannot tell you in words how criminal it is to seek righteousness
 before God without faith in Christ, by the works of the Law. It is
 the abomination standing in the holy place. It deposes the Creator and
 deifies the creature.
 
 The real doers of the Law are the true believers. The Holy Spirit
 enables them to love God and their neighbor. But because we have only
 the first-fruits of the Spirit and not the tenth-fruits, we do not
 observe the Law perfectly. This imperfection of ours, however, is not
 imputed to us, for Christ's sake.
 
 Hence, the statement of Moses, "Cursed is every one that continueth not
 in all things which are written in the book of the law to do them," is
 not contrary to Paul. Moses requires perfect doers of the Law. But where
 will you find them? Nowhere. Moses himself confessed that he was not a
 perfect doer of the Law. He said to the Lord: "Pardon our iniquity and
 our sin." Christ alone can make us innocent of any transgression. How
 so? First, by the forgiveness of our sins and the imputation of His
 righteousness. Secondly, by the gift of the Holy Ghost, who engenders
 new life and activity in us.
 
                 Objections to the Doctrine of Faith Disproved
 
 Here we shall take the time to enter upon the objections which our
 opponents raise against the doctrine of faith. There are many passages
 in the Bible that deal with works and the reward of works which our
 opponents cite against us in the belief that these will disprove the
 doctrine of faith which we teach.
 
 The scholastics grant that according to the reasonable order of nature
 being precedes doing. They grant that any act is faulty unless it
 proceeds from a right motive. They grant that a person must be right
 before he can do right. Why don't they grant that the right inclination
 of the heart toward God through faith in Christ must precede works?
 
 In the eleventh chapter of the Epistle to the Hebrews we find a
 catalogue of various works and deeds of the saints of the Bible. David,
 who killed a lion and a bear, and defeated Goliath, is mentioned. In
 the heroic deeds of David the scholastic can discover nothing more than
 outward achievement. But the deeds of David must be evaluated according
 to the personality of David. When we understand that David was a man of
 faith, whose heart trusted in the Lord, we shall understand why he could
 do such heroic deeds. David said: "The Lord that delivered me out of the
 paw of the lion, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out
 of the hand of this Philistine." Again: "Thou comest to me with a sword,
 and with a spear, and with a shield: but I come to thee in the name
 of the Lord of hosts, the God of the armies of Israel, whom thou hast
 defied. This day will the Lord deliver thee into mine hand; and I will
 smite thee, and take thine head from thee." (I Samuel 17:37, 45, 46.)
 Before David could achieve a single heroic deed he was already a man
 beloved of God, strong and constant in faith.
 
 Of Abel it is said in the same Epistle: "By faith Abel offered unto God
 a more excellent sacrifice than Cain." When the scholastics come upon
 the parallel passage in Genesis 4:4 they get no further than the words:
 "And the Lord had respect unto Abel and to his offering." "Aha!" they
 cry. "See, God has respect to offerings. Works do justify." With mud in
 their eyes they cannot see that the text says in Genesis that the Lord
 had respect to the person of Abel first. Abel pleased the Lord because
 of his faith. Because the person of Abel pleased the Lord, the offering
 of Abel pleased the Lord also. The Epistle to the Hebrews expressly
 states: "By faith Abel offered unto God a more excellent sacrifice."
 
 In our dealings with God the work is worth nothing without faith, for
 "without faith it is impossible to please him." (Hebrews 11:6.) The
 sacrifice of Abel was better than the sacrifice of Cain, because Abel
 had faith. As to Cain he had no faith or trust in God's grace, but
 strutted about in his own fancied worth. When God refused to recognize
 Cain's worth, Cain got angry at God and at Abel. The Holy Spirit speaks
 of faith in different ways in the Sacred Scriptures. Sometimes He speaks
 of faith independently of other matters. When the Scriptures speak
 of faith in the absolute or abstract, faith refers to justification
 directly. But when the Scripture speaks of rewards and works it speaks
 of compound or relative faith. We will furnish some examples. Galatians
 5:6, "Faith which worketh by love." Leviticus 18:5, "Which if a man do,
 he shall live in them." Matthew 19:17, "If thou wilt enter into life,
 keep the commandments." Psalm 37:27, "Depart from evil, and do good." In
 these and other passages where mention is made of doing, the Scriptures
 always speak of a faithful doing, a doing inspired by faith. "Do this
 and thou shalt live," means: First have faith in Christ, and Christ will
 enable you to do and to live.
 
 In the Word of God all things that are attributed to works are
 attributable to faith. Faith is the divinity of works. Faith permeates
 all the deeds of the believer, as Christ's divinity permeated His
 humanity. Abraham was accounted righteous because faith pervaded his
 whole personality and his every action.
 
 When you read how the fathers, prophets, and kings accomplished great
 deeds, remember to explain them as the Epistle to the Hebrews accounts
 for them: "Who through faith subdued kingdoms, wrought righteousness,
 obtained promises, stopped the mouths of lions." (Hebrews 11:33.) In
 this way will we correctly interpret all those passages that seem to
 support the righteousness of works. The Law is truly observed only
 through faith. Hence, every "holy," "moral" law-worker is accursed.
 
 Supposing that this explanation will not satisfy the scholastics,
 supposing that they should completely wrap me up in their arguments
 (they cannot do it), I would rather be wrong and give all credit to
 Christ alone. Here is Christ. Paul, Christ's apostle, declares that
 "Christ hath redeemed us from the curse of the law, being made a curse
 for us." (Gal. 3:13.) I hear with my own ears that I cannot be saved
 except by the blood and death of Christ. I conclude, therefore, that it
 is up to Christ to overcome my sins, and not up to the Law, or my own
 efforts. If He is the price of my redemption, if He was made sin for my
 justification, I don't give a care if you quote me a thousand Scripture
 passages for the righteousness of works against the righteousness of
 faith. I have the Author and Lord of the Scriptures on my side. I would
 rather believe Him than all that riffraff of "pious" law-workers.
 
 
   VERSE 11. But that no man is justified by the law in the sight of God,
   it is evident: for, The just shall live by faith.
 
 The Apostle draws into his argument the testimony of the Prophet
 Habakkuk: "The just shall live by his faith." This passage carries much
 weight because it eliminates the Law and the deeds of the Law as factors
 in the process of our justification.
 
 The scholastics misconstrue this passage by saying: "The just shall live
 by faith, if it is a working faith, or a faith formed and performed by
 charitable works." Their annotation is a forgery. To speak of formed or
 unformed faith, a sort of double faith, is contrary to the Scriptures.
 If charitable works can form and perfect faith I am forced to say
 eventually that charitable deeds constitute the essential factor in the
 Christian religion. Christ and His benefits would be lost to us.
 
 
   VERSE 12. And the law is not of faith.
 
 In direct opposition to the scholastics Paul declares: "The law is not
 of faith." What is this charity the scholastics talk so much about? Does
 not the Law command charity? The fact is the Law commands nothing but
 charity, as we may gather from the following Scripture passages: "Thou
 shalt love the Lord thy God with all thine heart, and with all thy soul,
 and with all thy might" (Deut. 6:5.) "Strewing mercy unto thousands of
 them that love me, and keep my commandments." (Exodus 20:6.) "On these
 two commandments hang all the law and the prophets." (Matt. 22:40.) If
 the law requires charity, charity is part of the Law and not of faith.
 Since Christ has displaced the Law which commands charity, it follows
 that charity has been abrogated with the Law as a factor in our
 justification, and only faith is left.
 
 
   VERSE 12. But, The man that doeth them shall live in them.
 
 Paul undertakes to explain the difference between the righteousness of
 the Law and the righteousness of faith. The righteousness of the Law is
 the fulfillment of the Law according to the passage: "The man that doeth
 them shall live in them." The righteousness of faith is to believe the
 Gospel according to the passage: "The just shall live by faith." The
 Law is a statement of debit, the Gospel a statement of credit. By this
 distinction Paul explains why charity which is the commandment of
 the Law cannot justify, because the Law contributes nothing to our
 justification.
 
 Indeed, works do follow after faith, but faith is not therefore a
 meritorious work. Faith is a gift. The character and limitations of the
 Law must be rigidly maintained.
 
 When we believe in Christ we live by faith. When we believe in the Law
 we may be active enough but we have no life. The function of the Law
 is not to give life; the function of the Law is to kill. True, the Law
 says: "The man that doeth them shall live in them." But where is the
 person who can do "them," i.e., love God with all his heart, soul, and
 mind, and his neighbor as himself?
 
 Paul has nothing against those who are justified by faith and therefore
 are true doers of the Law. He opposes those who think they can fulfill
 the Law when in reality they can only sin against the Law by trying to
 obtain righteousness by the Law. The Law demands that we fear, love, and
 worship God with a true faith. The law-workers fail to do this. Instead,
 they invent new modes of worship and new kinds of works which God never
 commanded. They provoke His anger according to the passage: "But in vain
 they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of men."
 (Matthew 15:9.) Hence, the law-righteous workers are downright rebels
 against God, and idolaters who constantly sin against the first
 commandment. In short, they are no good at-all though outwardly they
 seem to be extremely solicitous of the honor of God.
 
 We who are justified by faith as the saints of old, may be under the
 Law, but we are not under the curse of the Law because sin is not
 imputed to us for Christ's sake. If the Law cannot be fulfilled by the
 believers, if sin continues to cling to them despite their love for God,
 what can you expect of people who are not yet justified by faith, who
 are still enemies of God and His Word, like the unbelieving law-workers?
 It goes to show how impossible it is for those who have not been
 justified by faith to fulfill the Law.
 
 
   VERSE 13. Christ hath redeemed us from the curse of the law, being
   made a curse for us: for it is written, Cursed is every one that hangeth
   on a tree.
 
 Jerome and his present-day followers rack their miserable brains over
 this comforting passage in an effort to save Christ from the fancied
 insult of being called a curse. They say: "This quotation from Moses
 does not apply to Christ. Paul is taking liberties with Moses by
 generalizing the statements in Deuteronomy 21:23. Moses has 'he that is
 hanged.' Paul puts it 'every one that hangeth.' On the other hand, Paul
 omits the words 'of God' in his quotation from Moses: 'For he that is
 hanged is accursed of God.' Moses speaks of a criminal who is worthy of
 death." "How," our opponents ask, "can this passage be applied to the
 holy Christ as if He were accursed of God and worthy to be hanged?" This
 piece of exegesis may impress the naive as a zealous attempt to defend
 the honor and glory of Christ. Let us see what Paul has in mind.
 
 Paul does not say that Christ was made a curse for Himself. The accent
 is on the two words "for us." Christ is personally innocent. Personally,
 He did not deserve to be hanged for any crime of His own doing. But
 because Christ took the place of others who were sinners, He was hanged
 like any other transgressor. The Law of Moses leaves no loopholes. It
 says that a transgressor should be hanged. Who are the other sinners?
 We are. The sentence of death and everlasting damnation had long been
 pronounced over us. But Christ took all our sins and died for them on
 the Cross. "He was numbered with the transgressors; and he bare the sin
 of many, and made intercession for the transgressors." (Isaiah 53:12.)
 
 All the prophets of old said that Christ should be the greatest
 transgressor, murderer, adulterer, thief, blasphemer that ever was or
 ever could be on earth. When He took the sins of the whole world upon
 Himself, Christ was no longer an innocent person. He was a sinner
 burdened with the sins of a Paul who was a blasphemer; burdened with the
 sins of a Peter who denied Christ; burdened with the sins of a David who
 committed adultery and murder, and gave the heathen occasion to laugh at
 the Lord. In short, Christ was charged with the sins of all men, that
 He should pay for them with His own blood. The curse struck Him. The Law
 found Him among sinners. He was not only in the company of sinners.
 He had gone so far as to invest Himself with the flesh and blood of
 sinners. So the Law judged and hanged Him for a sinner.
 
 In separating Christ from us sinners and holding Him up as a holy
 exemplar, errorists rob us of our best comfort. They misrepresent Him
 as a threatening tyrant who is ready to slaughter us at the slightest
 provocation.
 
 I am told that it is preposterous and wicked to call the Son of God a
 cursed sinner. I answer: If you deny that He is a condemned sinner, you
 are forced to deny that Christ died. It is not less preposterous to say,
 the Son of God died, than to say, the Son of God was a sinner.
 
 John the Baptist called Him "the lamb of God, which taketh away the sin
 of the world." Being the unspotted Lamb of God, Christ was personally
 innocent. But because He took the sins of the world His sinlessness was
 defiled with the sinfulness of the world. Whatever sins I, you, all of
 us have committed or shall commit, they are Christ's sins as if He had
 committed them Himself. Our sins have to be Christ's sins or we shall
 perish forever.
 
 Isaiah declares of Christ: "The Lord hath laid on him the iniquity of
 us all." We have no right to minimize the force of this declaration. God
 does not amuse Himself with words. What a relief for a Christian to know
 that Christ is covered all over with my sins, your sins, and the sins of
 the whole world.
 
 The papists invented their own doctrine of faith. They say charity
 creates and adorns their faith. By stripping Christ of our sins, by
 making Him sinless, they cast our sins back at us, and make Christ
 absolutely worthless to us. What sort of charity is this? If that is a
 sample of their vaunted charity we want none of it.
 
 Our merciful Father in heaven saw how the Law oppressed us and how
 impossible it was for us to get out from under the curse of the Law. He
 therefore sent His only Son into the world and said to Him: "You are now
 Peter, the liar; Paul, the persecutor; David, the adulterer; Adam, the
 disobedient; the thief on the cross. You, My Son, must pay the world's
 iniquity." The Law growls: "All right. If Your Son is taking the sin of
 the world, I see no sins anywhere else but in Him. He shall die on the
 Cross." And the Law kills Christ. But we go free.
 
 The argument of the Apostle against the righteousness of the Law is
 impregnable. If Christ bears our sins, we do not bear them. But if
 Christ is innocent of our sins and does not bear them, we must bear
 them, and we shall die in our sins. "But thanks be to God, which giveth
 us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ."
 
 Let us see how Christ was able to gain the victory over our enemies. The
 sins of the whole world, past, present, and future, fastened themselves
 upon Christ and condemned Him. But because Christ is God He had an
 everlasting and unconquerable righteousness. These two, the sin of the
 world and the righteousness of God, met in a death struggle. Furiously
 the sin of the world assailed the righteousness of God. Righteousness is
 immortal and invincible. On the other hand, sin is a mighty tyrant
 who subdues all men. This tyrant pounces on Christ. But Christ's
 righteousness is unconquerable. The result is inevitable. Sin is
 defeated and righteousness triumphs and reigns forever.
 
 In the same manner was death defeated. Death is emperor of the world.
 He strikes down kings, princes, all men. He has an idea to destroy all
 life. But Christ has immortal life, and life immortal gained the victory
 over death. Through Christ death has lost her sting. Christ is the Death
 of death.
 
 The curse of God waged a similar battle with the eternal mercy of God in
 Christ. The curse meant to condemn God's mercy. But it could not do it
 because the mercy of God is everlasting. The curse had to give way. If
 the mercy of God in Christ had lost out, God Himself would have lost
 out, which, of course, is impossible.
 
 "Christ," says Paul, "spoiled principalities and powers, He made a show
 of them openly, triumphing over them in it." (Col. 2:15.) They cannot
 harm those who hide in Christ. Sin, death, the wrath of God, hell, the
 devil are mortified in Christ. Where Christ is near the powers of evil
 must keep their distance. St. John says: "And this is the victory that
 overcometh the world, even our faith." (I John 5:4.)
 
 You may now perceive why it is imperative to believe and confess the
 divinity of Christ. To overcome the sin of a whole world, and death,
 and the wrath of God was no work for any creature. The power of sin and
 death could be broken only by a greater power. God alone could abolish
 sin, destroy death, and take away the curse of the Law. God alone could
 bring righteousness, life, and mercy to light. In attributing these
 achievements to Christ the Scriptures pronounce Christ to be God
 forever. The article of justification is indeed fundamental. If we
 remain sound in this one article, we remain sound in all the other
 articles of the Christian faith. When we teach justification by faith in
 Christ we confess at the same time that Christ is God.
 
 I cannot get over the blindness of the Pope's theologians. To imagine
 that the mighty forces of sin, death, and the curse can be vanquished
 by the righteousness of man's paltry works, by fasting, pilgrimages,
 masses, vows, and such gewgaws. These blind leaders of the blind turn
 the poor people over to the mercy of sin, death, and the devil.
 What chance has a defenseless human creature against these powers of
 darkness? They train sinners who are ten times worse than any thief,
 whore, murderer. The divine power of God alone can destroy sin and
 death, and create righteousness and life.
 
 When we hear that Christ was made a curse for us, let us believe it with
 joy and assurance. By faith Christ changes places with us. He gets our
 sins, we get His holiness.
 
 By faith alone can we become righteous, for faith invests us with the
 sinlessness of Christ. The more fully we believe this, the fuller will
 be our joy. If you believe that sin, death, and the curse are void, why,
 they are null, zero. Whenever sin and death make you nervous write it
 down as an illusion of the devil. There is no sin now, no curse, no
 death, no devil because Christ has done away with them. This fact is
 sure. There is nothing wrong with the fact. The defect lies in our lack
 of faith.
 
 In the Apostolic Creed we confess: "I believe in the holy Christian
 Church." That means, I believe that there is no sin, no curse, no evil
 in the Church of God. Faith says: "I believe that." But if you want to
 believe your eyes you will find many shortcomings and offenses in the
 members of the holy Church. You see them succumb to temptation, you see
 them weak in faith, you see them giving way to anger, envy, and other
 evil dispositions. "How can the Church be holy?" you ask. It is with the
 Christian Church as it is with the individual Christian. If I examine
 myself I find enough unholiness to shock me. But when I look at Christ
 in me I find that I am altogether holy. And so it is with the Church.
 
 Holy Writ does not say that Christ was under the curse. It says directly
 that Christ was made a curse. In II Corinthians 5:21 Paul writes: "For
 he (God) hath made him (Christ) to be sin for us, who knew no sin; that
 we might be made the righteousness of God in him." Although this and
 similar passages may be properly explained by saying that Christ was
 made a sacrifice for the curse and for sin, yet in my judgment it is
 better to leave these passages stand as they read: Christ was made sin
 itself; Christ was made the curse itself. When a sinner gets wise
 to himself he does not only feel miserable, he feels like misery
 personified; he does not only feel like a sinner, he feels like sin
 itself.
 
 To finish with this verse: All evils would have overwhelmed us, as they
 shall overwhelm the unbelievers forever, if Christ had not become the
 great transgressor and guilty bearer of all our sins. The sins of the
 world got Him down for a moment. They came around Him like water. Of
 Christ, the Old Testament Prophet complained: "Thy fierce wrath goeth
 over me; thy terrors have cut me off." (Psalm 88 16.) By Christ's
 salvation we have been delivered from the terrors of God to a life of
 eternal felicity.
 
 
   VERSE 14. That the blessing of Abraham might come, on the Gentiles
   through Jesus Christ.
 
 Paul always keeps this text before him: "In thy seed shall all the
 nations of the earth be blessed." The blessing promised unto Abraham
 could come upon the Gentiles only by Christ, the seed of Abraham. To
 become a blessing unto all nations Christ had to be made a curse to take
 away the curse from the nations of the earth. The merit that we plead,
 and the work that we proffer is Christ who was made a curse for us.
 
 Let us become expert in the art of transferring our sins, our death,
 and every evil from ourselves to Christ; and Christ's righteousness and
 blessing from Christ to ourselves.
 
 
   VERSE 14. That we might receive the promise of the Spirit through faith.
 
 "The promise of the Spirit" is Hebrew for "the promised Spirit." The
 Spirit spells freedom from the Law, sin, death, the curse, hell, and the
 judgment of God. No merits are mentioned in connection with this promise
 of the Spirit and all the blessings that go with Him. This Spirit of
 many blessings is received by faith alone. Faith alone builds on the
 promises of God, as Paul says in this verse.
 
 Long ago the prophets visualized the happy changes Christ would effect
 in all things. Despite the fact that the Jews had the Law of God they
 never ceased to look longingly for Christ. After Moses no prophet or
 king added a single law to the Book. Any changes or additions were
 deferred to the time of Christ's coming. Moses told the people: "The
 Lord thy God will raise up unto thee a Prophet from the midst of thee,
 of thy brethren, like unto me; unto him ye shall hearken." (Deut.
 18:15.)
 
 God's people of old felt that the Law of Moses could not be improved
 upon until the Messiah would bring better things than the Law, i.e.,
 grace and remission of sins.
 
 
   VERSE 15. Brethren, I speak after the manner of men; Though it be but
   a man's covenant, yet if it be confirmed, no man disannulleth, or
   addeth thereto.
 
 After the preceding, well-taken argument, Paul offers another based on
 the similarity between a man's testament and God's testament. A man's
 testament seems too weak a premise for the Apostle to argue from in
 confirmation of so important a matter as justification. We ought to
 prove earthly things by heavenly things, and not heavenly things by
 earthly things. But where the earthly thing is an ordinance of God
 we may use it to prove divine matters. In Matthew 7:11 Christ Himself
 argued from earthly to heavenly things when He said: "If ye then, being
 evil, know how to give good gifts to your children; how much more shall
 your Father which is in heaven give good things to them that ask him?"
 
 To come to Paul's argument. Civil law, which is God's ordinance,
 prohibits tampering with any testament of man. Any person's last will
 and testament must be respected. Paul asks: "Why is it that man's last
 will is scrupulously respected and not God's testament? You would not
 think of breaking faith with a man's testament. Why do you not keep
 faith with God's testament?"
 
 The Apostle says that he is speaking after the manner of men. He means
 to say: "I will give you an illustration from the customs of men. If
 a man's last will is respected, and it is, how much more ought the
 testament of God be honored: 'In thy seed shall all the nations of the
 earth be blessed.' When Christ died, this testament was sealed by His
 blood. After His death the testament was opened, it was published to the
 nations. No man ought to alter God's testament as the false apostles do
 who substitute the Law and traditions of men for the testament of God."
 
 As the false prophets tampered with God's testament in the days of Paul,
 so many do in our day. They will observe human laws punctiliously, but
 the laws of God they transgress without the flicker of an eyelid. But
 the time will come when they will find out that it is no joke to pervert
 the testament of God.
 
 
   VERSE 16. Now to Abraham and his seed were the promises made. He
   saith not, And to seeds, as of many; but as of one, And to thy seed,
   which is Christ.
 
 The word testament is another name for the promise that God made unto
 Abraham concerning Christ. A testament is not a law, but an inheritance.
 Heirs do not look for laws and assessments when they open a last will;
 they look for grants and favors. The testament which God made out to
 Abraham did not contain laws. It contained promises of great spiritual
 blessings.
 
 The promises were made in view of Christ, in one seed, not in many
 seeds. The Jews will not accept this interpretation. They insist
 that the singular "seed" is put for the plural "seeds." We prefer the
 interpretation of Paul, who makes a fine case for Christ and for us out
 of the singular "seed," and is after all inspired to do so by the Holy
 Ghost.
 
 
   VERSE 17. And this I say, that the covenant, that was confirmed before
   of God in Christ, the law which was four hundred and thirty years
   after, cannot disannul, that it should make the promise of none effect.
 
 The Jews assert that God was not satisfied with His promises, but after
 four hundred and thirty years He gave the Law. "God," they say, "must
 have mistrusted His own promises, and considered them inadequate for
 salvation. Therefore He added to His promises something better, the Law.
 The Law," they say, "canceled the promises."
 
 Paul answers: "The Law was given four hundred and thirty years after
 the promise was made to Abraham. The Law could not cancel the promise
 because the promise was the testament of God, confirmed by God in Christ
 many years before the Law. What God has once promised He does not take
 back. Every promise of God is a ratified promise."
 
 Why was the Law added to the promise? Not to serve as a medium by which
 the promise might be obtained. The Law was added for these reasons: That
 there might be in the world a special people, rigidly controlled by the
 Law, a people out of which Christ should be born in due time; and that
 men burdened by many laws might sigh and long for Him, their Redeemer,
 the seed of Abraham. Even the ceremonies prescribed by the Law
 foreshadowed Christ. Therefore the Law was never meant to cancel the
 promise of God. The Law was meant to confirm the promise until the time
 should come when God would open His testament in the Gospel of Jesus
 Christ.
 
 God did well in giving the promise so many years before the Law, that it
 may never be said that righteousness is granted through the Law and not
 through the promise. If God had meant for us to be justified by the Law,
 He would have given the Law four hundred and thirty years before the
 promise, at least He would have given the Law at the same time He gave
 the promise. But He never breathed a word about the Law until four
 hundred years after. The promise is therefore better than the Law.
 The Law does not cancel the promise, but faith in the promised Christ
 cancels the Law.
 
 The Apostle is careful to mention the exact number of four hundred and
 thirty years. The wide divergence in the time between the promise
 and the Law helps to clinch Paul's argument that righteousness is not
 obtained by the Law.
 
 Let me illustrate. A man of great wealth adopts a strange lad for his
 son. Remember, he does not owe the lad anything. In due time he appoints
 the lad heir to his entire fortune. Several years later the old man asks
 the lad to do something for him. And the young lad does it. Can the lad
 then go around and say that he deserved the inheritance by his obedience
 to the old man's request? How can anybody say that righteousness is
 obtained by obedience to the Law when the Law was given four hundred and
 thirty years after God's promise of the blessing?
 
 One thing is certain, Abraham was never justified by the Law, for
 the simple reason that the Law was not in his day. If the Law was
 non-existent how could Abraham obtain righteousness by the Law? Abraham
 had nothing else to go by but the promise. This promise he believed
 and that was counted unto him for righteousness. If the father obtained
 righteousness through faith, the children get it the same way.
 
 We use the argument of time also. We say our sins were taken away by the
 death of Christ fifteen hundred years ago, long before there were any
 religious orders, canons, or rules of penance, merits, etc. What did
 people do about their sins before these new inventions were hatched up?
 
 Paul finds his arguments for the righteousness of faith everywhere. Even
 the element of time serves to build his case against the false apostles.
 Let us fortify our conscience with similar arguments. They help us in
 the trials of our faith. They turn our attention from the Law to the
 promises, from sin to righteousness; from death to life.
 
 It is not for nothing that Paul bears down on this argument. He foresaw
 this confusion of the promise and the Law creeping into the Church.
 Accustom yourself to separate Law and Gospel even in regard to time.
 When the Law comes to pay your conscience a visit, say: "Mister Law,
 you come too soon. The four hundred and thirty years aren't up yet. When
 they are up, you come again. Won't you?"
 
 
   VERSE 18. For if the inheritance be of the law, it is no more of
   promise.
 
 In Romans 4:14, the Apostle writes: "For if they which are made of the
 law be heirs, faith is made void, and the promise made of none effect."
 It cannot be otherwise. That the Law is something entirely different
 from the promise is plain. The Law thunders: "Thou shalt, thou shalt
 not." The promise of the "seed" pleads: "Take this gift of God." If the
 inheritance of the gifts of God were obtained by the Law, God would be a
 liar. We would have the right to ask Him: "Why did you make this promise
 in the first place: 'In thy seed shall all the nations of the earth be
 blessed'? Why did you not say: 'In thy works thou shalt be blessed'?"
 
 
   VERSE 18. But God gave it to Abraham by promise.
 
 So much is certain, before the Law ever existed, God gave Abraham the
 inheritance or blessing by the promise. In other words, God granted unto
 Abraham remission of sins, righteousness, salvation, and everlasting
 life. And not only to Abraham but to all believers, because God said:
 "In thy seed shall all the nations of the earth be blessed." The
 blessing was given unconditionally. The Law had no chance to butt in
 because Moses was not yet born. "How then can you say that righteousness
 is obtained by the Law?"
 
 The Apostle now goes to work to explain the province and purpose of the
 Law.
 
 
   VERSE 19. Wherefore then serveth the law?
 
 The question naturally arises: If the Law was not given for
 righteousness or salvation, why was it given? Why did God give the Law
 in the first place if it cannot justify a person?
 
 The Jews believed if they kept the Law they would be saved. When they
 heard that the Gospel proclaimed a Christ who had come into the world to
 save sinners and not the righteous; when they heard that sinners were
 to enter the kingdom of heaven before the righteous, the Jews were very
 much put out. They murmured: "These last have wrought but one hour, and
 thou hast made them equal unto us, which have borne the burden and heat
 of the day." (Matthew 20:12.) They complained that the heathen who
 at one time had been worshipers of idols obtained grace without the
 drudgery of the Law that was theirs.
 
 Today we hear the same complaints. "What was the use of our having lived
 in a cloister, twenty, thirty, forty years; what was the sense of having
 vowed chastity, poverty, obedience; what good are all the masses and
 canonical hours that we read; what profit is there in fasting, praying,
 etc., if any man or woman, any beggar or scour woman is to be made equal
 to us, or even be considered more acceptable unto God than we?"
 
 Reason takes offense at the statement of Paul: "The law was added
 because of transgressions." People say that Paul abrogated the Law, that
 he is a radical, that he blasphemed God when he said that. People say:
 "We might as well live like wild people if the Law does not count. Let
 us abound in sin that grace may abound. Let us do evil that good may
 come of it."
 
 What are we to do? Such scoffing distresses us, but we cannot stop it.
 Christ Himself was accused of being a blasphemer and rebel. Paul and all
 the other apostles were told the same things. Let the scoffers slander
 us, let them spare us not. But we must not on their account keep silent.
 We must speak frankly in order that afflicted consciences may find
 surcease. Neither are we to pay any attention to the foolish and ungodly
 people for abusing our doctrine. They are the kind that would scoff,
 Law or no Law. Our first consideration must be the comfort of troubled
 consciences, that they may not perish with the multitudes.
 
 When he saw that some were offended at his doctrine, while others found
 in it encouragement to live after the flesh, Paul comforted himself with
 the thought that it was his duty to preach the Gospel to the elect of
 God, and that for their sake he must endure all things. Like Paul
 we also do all these things for the sake of God's elect. As for the
 scoffers and skeptics, I am so disgusted with them that in all my life I
 would not open my mouth for them once. I wish that they were back there
 where they belong under the iron heel of the Pope.
 
 People foolish but wise in their conceits jump to the conclusion: If the
 Law does not justify, it is good for nothing. How about that? Because
 money does not justify, would you say that money is good for nothing?
 Because the eyes do not justify, would you have them taken out? Because
 the Law does not justify it does not follow that the Law is without
 value. We must find and define the proper purpose of the Law. We do not
 offhand condemn the Law because we say it does not justify.
 
 We say with Paul that the Law is good if it is used properly. Within its
 proper sphere the Law is an excellent thing. But if we ascribe to the
 Law functions for which it was never intended, we pervert not only
 the Law but also the Gospel. It is the universal impression that
 righteousness is obtained through the deeds of the Law. This impression
 is instinctive and therefore doubly dangerous. Gross sins and vices may
 be recognized or else repressed by the threat of punishment. But this
 sin, this opinion of man's own righteousness refuses to be classified
 as sin. It wants to be esteemed as high-class religion. Hence, it
 constitutes the mighty influence of the devil over the entire world.
 In order to point out the true office of the Law, and thus to stamp out
 that false impression of the righteousness of the Law, Paul answers the
 question: "Wherefore then serveth the Law?" with the words:
 
 
   VERSE 19. It was added because of transgressions.
 
 All things differ. Let everything serve its unique purpose. Let the sun
 shine by day, the moon and the stars by night. Let the sea furnish fish,
 the earth grain, the woods trees, etc. Let the Law also serve its
 unique purpose. It must not step out of character and take the place of
 anything else. What is the function of the Law? "Transgression," answers
 the Apostle.
 
                        The Twofold Purpose of the Law
 
 The Law has a twofold purpose. One purpose is civil. God has ordained
 civil laws to punish crime. Every law is given to restrain sin. Does it
 not then make men righteous? No. In refraining from murder, adultery,
 theft, or other sins, I do so under compulsion because I fear the jail,
 the noose, the electric chair. These restrain me as iron bars restrain
 a lion and a bear. Otherwise they would tear everything to pieces. Such
 forceful restraint cannot be regarded as righteousness, rather as an
 indication of unrighteousness. As a wild beast is tied to keep it from
 running amuck, so the Law bridles mad and furious man to keep him from
 running wild. The need for restraint shows plainly enough that those who
 need the Law are not righteous, but wicked men who are fit to be tied.
 No, the Law does not justify.
 
   The first purpose of the Law, accordingly, is to restrain the wicked.
   The devil gets people into all kinds of scrapes. Therefore God
   instituted governments, parents, laws, restrictions, and civil
   ordinances. At least they help to tie the devil's hands so that he does
   not rage up and down the earth. This civil restraint by the Law is
   intended by God for the preservation of all things, particularly for the
   good of the Gospel that it should not be hindered too much by the
   tumult of the wicked. But Paul is not now treating of this civil use
   and function of the Law.
 
   The second purpose of the Law is spiritual and divine. Paul describes
   this spiritual purpose of the Law in the words, "Because of
   transgressions," i.e., to reveal to a person his sin, blindness, misery,
   his ignorance, hatred, and contempt of God, his death, hell, and
   condemnation.
 
 This is the principal purpose of the Law and its most valuable
 contribution. As long as a person is not a murderer, adulterer, thief,
 he would swear that he is righteous. How is God going to humble such a
 person except by the Law? The Law is the hammer of death, the thunder
 of hell, and the lightning of God's wrath to bring down the proud and
 shameless hypocrites. When the Law was instituted on Mount Sinai it was
 accompanied by lightning, by storms, by the sound of trumpets, to tear
 to pieces that monster called self-righteousness. As long as a person
 thinks he is right he is going to be incomprehensibly proud and
 presumptuous. He is going to hate God, despise His grace and mercy, and
 ignore the promises in Christ. The Gospel of the free forgiveness of
 sins through Christ will never appeal to the self-righteous.
 
 This monster of self-righteousness, this stiff-necked beast, needs a big
 axe. And that is what the Law is, a big axe. Accordingly, the proper use
 and function of the Law is to threaten until the conscience is scared
 stiff.
 
 The awful spectacle at Mount Sinai portrayed the proper use of the Law.
 When the children of Israel came out of Egypt a feeling of singular
 holiness possessed them. They boasted: "We are the people of God.
 All that the Lord hath spoken we will do." (Ex. 19:8) This feeling of
 holiness was heightened when Moses ordered them to wash their clothes,
 to refrain from their wives, and to prepare themselves all around. The
 third day came and Moses led the people out of their tents to the foot
 of the mountain into the presence of the Lord. What happened? When the
 children of Israel saw the whole mountain burning and smoking, the
 black clouds rent by fierce lightning flashing up and down in the inky
 darkness, when they heard the sound of the trumpet blowing louder and
 longer, shattered by the roll of thunder, they were so frightened that
 they begged Moses: "Speak thou with us, and we will hear: but let not
 God speak with us, lest we die." (Ex. 20:19.) I ask you, what good did
 their scrubbing, their snow-white clothes, and their continence do them?
 No good at all. Not a single one could stand in the presence of the
 glorious Lord. Stricken by the terror of God, they fled back into their
 tents, as if the devil were after them.
 
 The Law is meant to produce the same effect today which it produced at
 Mount Sinai long ago. I want to encourage all who fear God, especially
 those who intend to become ministers of the Gospel, to learn from the
 Apostle the proper use of the Law. I fear that after our time the
 right handling of the Law will become a lost art. Even now, although we
 continually explain the separate functions of the Law and the Gospel,
 we have those among us who do not understand how the Law should be used.
 What will it be like when we are dead and gone?
 
 We want it understood that we do not reject the Law as our opponents
 claim. On the contrary, we uphold the Law. We say the Law is good if
 it is used for the purposes for which it was designed, to check civil
 transgression, and to magnify spiritual transgressions. The Law is also
 a light like the Gospel. But instead of revealing the grace of God,
 righteousness, and life, the Law brings sin, death, and the wrath of God
 to light. This is the business of the Law, and here the business of the
 Law ends, and should go no further.
 
 The business of the Gospel, on the other hand, is to quicken, to
 comfort, to raise the fallen. The Gospel carries the news that God for
 Christ's sake is merciful to the most unworthy sinners, if they will
 only believe that Christ by His death has delivered them from sin and
 everlasting death unto grace, forgiveness, and everlasting life. By
 keeping in mind the difference between the Law and the Gospel we let
 each perform its special task. Of this difference between the Law and
 the Gospel nothing can be discovered in the writings of the monks or
 scholastics, nor for that matter in the writings of the ancient fathers.
 Augustine understood the difference somewhat. Jerome and others knew
 nothing of it. The silence in the Church concerning the difference
 between the Law and the Gospel has resulted in untold harm. Unless a
 sharp distinction is maintained between the purpose and function of
 the Law and the Gospel, the Christian doctrine cannot be kept free from
 error.
 
 
   VERSE 19. It was added because of transgressions.
 
 In other words, that transgressions might be recognized as such and
 thus increased. When sin, death, and the wrath of God are revealed to
 a person by the Law, he grows impatient, complains against God, and
 rebels. Before that he was a very holy man; he worshipped and praised
 God; he bowed his knees before God and gave thanks, like the Pharisee.
 But now that sin and death are revealed to him by the Law he wishes
 there were no God. The Law inspires hatred of God. Thus sin is not only
 revealed by the Law; sin is actually increased and magnified by the Law.
 
 The Law is a mirror to show a person what he is like, a sinner who is
 guilty of death, and worthy of everlasting punishment. What is this
 bruising and beating by the hand of the Law to accomplish? This, that we
 may find the way to grace. The Law is an usher to lead the way to grace.
 God is the God of the humble, the miserable, the afflicted. It is
 His nature to exalt the humble, to comfort the sorrowing, to heal the
 broken-hearted, to justify the sinners, and to save the condemned.
 The fatuous idea that a person can be holy by himself denies God
 the pleasure of saving sinners. God must therefore first take
 the sledge-hammer of the Law in His fists and smash the beast of
 self-righteousness and its brood of self-confidence, self-wisdom,
 self-righteousness, and self-help. When the conscience has been
 thoroughly frightened by the Law it welcomes the Gospel of grace with
 its message of a Savior who came into the world, not to break the
 bruised reed, nor to quench the smoking flax, but to preach glad tidings
 to the poor, to heal the broken-hearted, and to grant forgiveness of
 sins to all the captives.
 
 Man's folly, however, is so prodigious that instead of embracing the
 message of grace with its guarantee of the forgiveness of sin for
 Christ's sake, man finds himself more laws to satisfy his conscience.
 "If I live," says he, "I will mend my life. I will do this, I will do
 that." Man, if you don't do the very opposite, if you don't send Moses
 with the Law back to Mount Sinai and take the hand of Christ, pierced
 for your sins, you will never be saved.
 
 When the Law drives you to the point of despair, let it drive you a
 little farther, let it drive you straight into the arms of Jesus who
 says: "Come unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will
 give you rest."
 
 
   VERSE 19. Till the seed should come to whom the promise was made.
 
 The Law is not to have its say indefinitely. We must know how long the
 Law is to put in its licks. If it hammers away too long, no person would
 and could be saved. The Law has a boundary beyond which it must not go.
 How long ought the Law to hold sway? "Till the seed should come to whom
 the promise was made." That may be taken literally to mean until the
 time of the Gospel. "From the days of John the Baptist," says Jesus,
 "until now the kingdom of heaven suffereth violence, and the violent
 take it by force. For all the prophets and the law prophesied until
 John." (Matthew 11:12, 13.) When Christ came the Law and the ceremonies
 of Moses ceased.
 
 Spiritually, it means that the Law is not to operate on a person after
 he has been humbled and frightened by the exposure of his sins and the
 wrath of God. We must then say to the Law: "Mister Law, lay off him. He
 has had enough. You scared him good and proper." Now it is the Gospel's
 turn. Now let Christ with His gracious lips talk to him of better
 things, grace, peace, forgiveness of sins, and eternal life.
 
 
   VERSE 19. And it was ordained by angels in the hand of a mediator.
 
 The Apostle digresses a little from his immediate theme. Something
 occurred to him and he throws it in by the way. It occurred to him
 that the Law differs from the Gospel in another respect, in respect to
 authorship. The Law was delivered by the angels, but the Gospel by the
 Lord Himself. Hence, the Gospel is superior to the Law, as the word of a
 lord is superior to the word of his servant.
 
 The Law was handed down by a being even inferior to the angels, by a
 middleman named Moses. Paul wants us to understand that Christ is the
 mediator of a better testament than mediator Moses of the Law. Moses led
 the people out of their tents to meet God. But they ran away. That is
 how good a mediator Moses was.
 
 Paul says: "How can the Law justify when that whole sanctified people of
 Israel and even mediator Moses trembled at the voice of God? What kind
 of righteousness do you call that when people run away from it and hate
 it the worst way? If the Law could justify, people would love the Law.
 But look at the children of Israel running away from it."
 
 The flight of the children of Israel from Mount Sinai indicates how
 people feel about the Law. They don't like it. If this were the only
 argument to prove that salvation is not by the Law, this one Bible
 history would do the work. What kind of righteousness is this
 law-righteousness when at the commencement exercises of the Law Moses
 and the scrubbed people run away from it so fast that an iron mountain,
 the Red Sea even, could not have stopped them until they were back in
 Egypt once again? If they could not hear the Law, how could they ever
 hope to perform the Law?
 
 If all the world had stood at the mountain, all the world would have
 hated the Law and fled from it as the children of Israel did. The whole
 world is an enemy of the Law. How, then, can anyone be justified by the
 Law when everybody hates the Law and its divine author?
 
 All this goes to show how little the scholastics know about the Law.
 They do not consider its spiritual effect and purpose, which is not
 to justify or to pacify afflicted consciences, but to increase sin, to
 terrify the conscience, and to produce wrath. In their ignorance the
 papists spout about man's good will and right judgment, and man's
 capacity to perform the Law of God. Ask the people of Israel who were
 present at the presentation of the Law on Mount Sinai whether what the
 scholastics say is true. Ask David, who often complains in the Psalms
 that he was cast away from God and in hell, that he was frantic about
 his sin, and sick at the thought of the wrath and judgment of God. No,
 the Law does not justify.
 
 
   VERSE 20. Now a mediator is not a mediator of one.
 
 Here the Apostle briefly compares the two mediators: Moses and Christ.
 "A mediator," says Paul, "is not a mediator of one." He is necessarily
 a mediator of two: The offender and the offended. Moses was such a
 mediator between the Law and the people who were offended at the Law.
 They were offended at the Law because they did not understand its
 purpose. That was the veil which Moses put over his face. The people
 were also offended at the Law because they could not look at the bare
 face of Moses. It shone with the glory of God. When Moses addressed the
 people he had to cover his face with that veil of his. They could not
 listen to their mediator Moses without another mediator, the veil. The
 Law had to change its face and voice. In other words, the Law had to be
 made tolerable to the people.
 
 Thus covered, the Law no longer spoke to the people in its undisguised
 majesty. It became more tolerable to the conscience. This explains
 why men fail to understand the Law properly, with the result that they
 become secure and presumptuous hypocrites. One of two things has to be
 done: Either the Law must be covered with a veil and then it loses its
 full effectiveness, or it must be unveiled and then the full blast of
 its force kills. Man cannot stand the Law without a veil over it. Hence,
 we are forced either to look beyond the Law to Christ, or we go through
 life as shameless hypocrites and secure sinners.
 
 Paul says: "A mediator is not a mediator of one." Moses could not be a
 mediator of God only, for God needs no mediator. Again, Moses could not
 be a mediator of the people only. He was a mediator between God and the
 people. It is the office of a mediator to conciliate the party that is
 offended and to placate the party that is the offender. However, Moses'
 mediation consisted only in changing the tone of the Law to make it more
 tolerable to the people. Moses was merely a mediator of the veil. He
 could not supply the ability to perform the Law.
 
 What do you suppose would have happened if the Law had been given
 without a mediator and the people had been denied the services of a
 go-between? The people would have perished, or in case they had escaped
 they would have required the services of another mediator to preserve
 them alive and to keep the Law in force. Moses came along and he was
 made the mediator. He covered his face with a veil. But that is as much
 as he could do. He could not deliver men's consciences from the terror
 of the Law. The sinner needs a better mediator.
 
 That better mediator is Jesus Christ. He does not change the voice of
 the Law, nor does He hide the Law with a veil. He takes the full blast
 of the wrath of the Law and fulfills its demands most meticulously.
 
 Of this better Mediator Paul says: "A mediator is not a mediator of
 one." We are the offending party; God is the party offended. The offense
 is of such a nature that God cannot pardon it. Neither can we render
 adequate satisfaction for our offenses. There is discord between God and
 us. Could not God revoke His Law? No. How about running away from God?
 It cannot be done. It took Christ to come between us and God and to
 reconcile God to us. How did Christ do it? "Blotting out the handwriting
 of ordinances that was against us, which was contrary to us, and took it
 out of the way, nailing it to his cross." (Col. 2:14.)
 
 This one word, "mediator," is proof enough that the Law cannot justify.
 Otherwise we should not need a mediator.
 
 In Christian theology the Law does not justify. In fact it has the
 contrary effect. The Law alarms us, it magnifies our sins until we
 begin to hate the Law and its divine Author. Would you call this being
 justified by the Law?
 
 Can you imagine a more arrant outrage than to hate God and to abhor His
 Law? What an excellent Law it is. Listen: "I am the Lord thy God, which
 have brought thee out of the land of Egypt, out of the house of bondage.
 Thou shalt have no other gods...showing mercy unto thousands... honor
 thy father and thy mother; that thy days may be long upon the land..."
 (Ex. 20:2, 3, 6, 12.) Are these not excellent laws, perfect wisdom? "Let
 not God speak with us, lest we die," cried the children of Israel. Is it
 not amazing that a person should refuse to hear things that are good
 for him? Any person would be glad to hear, I should think, that he has
 a gracious God who shows mercy unto thousands. Is it not amazing that
 people hate the Law that promotes their safety and welfare, e.g., "Thou
 shalt not kill; thou shalt not commit adultery; thou shalt not steal"?
 
 The Law can do nothing for us except to arouse the conscience. Before
 the Law comes to me I feel no sin. But when the Law comes, sin,
 death, and hell are revealed to me. You would not call this being made
 righteous. You would call it being condemned to death and hell-fire.
 
 
   VERSE 20. But God is one.
 
 God does not offend anybody, therefore He needs no mediator. But we
 offend God, therefore we need a mediator. And we need a better mediator
 than Moses. We need Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 21. Is the law then against the promises of God?
 
 Before he digressed Paul stated that the Law does not justify. Shall we
 then discard the Law? No, no. It supplies a certain need. It supplies
 men with a needed realization of their sinfulness. Now arises another
 question: If the Law does no more than to reveal sin, does it not
 oppose the promises of God? The Jews believed that by the restraint and
 discipline of the Law the promises of God would be hastened, in fact
 earned by them.
 
 Paul answers: "Not so. On the contrary, if we pay too much attention to
 the Law the promises of God will be slowed up. How can God fulfill His
 promises to a people that hates the Law?"
 
 
   VERSE 21. God forbid.
 
 God never said to Abraham: "In thee shall all the nations of the earth
 be blessed because thou hast kept the Law." When Abraham was still
 uncircumcised and without the Law or any law, indeed, when he was still
 an idol worshiper, God said to him: "Get thee out of thy country, etc.;
 I am thy shield, etc.; In thy seed shall all the nations of the earth
 be blessed." These are unconditional promises which God freely made to
 Abraham without respect to works.
 
 This is aimed especially at the Jews who think that the promises of God
 are impeded by their sins. Paul says: "The Lord is not slack concerning
 His promises because of our sins, or hastens His promises because of any
 merit on our part." God's promises are not influenced by our attitudes.
 They rest in His goodness and mercy.
 
 Just because the Law increases sin, it does not therefore obstruct the
 promises of God. The Law confirms the promises, in that it prepares a
 person to look for the fulfillment of the promises of God in Christ.
 
 The proverb has it that Hunger is the best cook. The Law makes afflicted
 consciences hungry for Christ. Christ tastes good to them. Hungry hearts
 appreciate Christ. Thirsty souls are what Christ wants. He invites them:
 "Come unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will give
 you rest." Christ's benefits are so precious that He will dispense them
 only to those who need them and really desire them.
 
 
   VERSE 21. For if there had been a law given which could have given
   life, verily righteousness should have been by the law.
 
 The Law cannot give life. It kills. The Law does not justify a person
 before God; it increases sin. The Law does not secure righteousness; it
 hinders righteousness. The Apostle declares emphatically that the Law of
 itself cannot save.
 
 Despite the intelligibility of Paul's statement, our enemies fail
 to grasp it. Otherwise they would not emphasize free will, natural
 strength, the works of supererogation, etc. To escape the charge of
 forgery they always have their convenient annotation handy, that Paul
 is referring only to the ceremonial and not to the moral law. But Paul
 includes all laws. He expressly says: "If there had been a law given."
 
 There is no law by which righteousness may be obtained, not a single
 one. Why not?
 
 
   VERSE 22. But the Scripture hath concluded all under sin.
 
 Where? First in the promises concerning Christ in Genesis 3:15 and in
 Genesis 22:18, which speak of the seed of the woman and the seed
 of Abraham. The fact that these promises were made unto the fathers
 concerning Christ implies that the fathers were subject to the curse of
 sin and eternal death. Otherwise why the need of promises?
 
 Next, Holy Writ "concludes" all under sin in this passage from Paul:
 "For as many as are of the works of the law are under the curse." Again,
 in the passage which the Apostle quotes from Deuteronomy 27:26, "Cursed
 is every one that continueth not in all things which are written in the
 book of the law to do them." This passage clearly submits all men to the
 curse, not only those who sin openly against the Law, but also those
 who sincerely endeavor to perform the Law, inclusive of monks, friars,
 hermits, etc.
 
 The conclusion is inevitable: Faith alone justified without works. If
 the Law itself cannot justify, much less can imperfect performance of
 the Law or the works of the Law, justify.
 
 
   VERSE 22. That the promise by faith of Jesus Christ might be given to
   them that believe.
 
 The Apostle stated before that "the Scripture hath concluded all under
 sin." Forever? No, only until the promise should be fulfilled. The
 promise, you will recall, is the inheritance itself or the blessing
 promised to Abraham, deliverance from the Law, sin, death, and the
 devil, and the free gift of grace, righteousness, salvation, and eternal
 life. This promise, says Paul, is not obtained by any merit, by any law,
 or by any work. This promise is given. To whom? To those who believe. In
 whom? In Jesus Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 23. But before faith came.
 
 The Apostle proceeds to explain the service which the Law is to render.
 Previously Paul had said that the Law was given to reveal the wrath and
 death of God upon all sinners. Although the Law kills, God brings good
 out of evil. He uses the Law to bring life. God saw that the universal
 illusion of self-righteousness could not be put down in any other way
 but by the Law. The Law dispels all self-illusions. It puts the fear of
 God in a man. Without this fear there can be no thirst for God's mercy.
 God accordingly uses the Law for a hammer to break up the illusion
 of self-righteousness, that we should despair of our own strength and
 efforts at self-justification.
 
 
   VERSE 23. But before faith came, we were kept under the law, shut up
   unto the faith which should afterwards be revealed.
 
 The Law is a prison to those who have not as yet obtained grace. No
 prisoner enjoys the confinement. He hates it. If he could he would smash
 the prison and find his freedom at all cost. As long as he stays in
 prison he refrains from evil deeds. Not because he wants to, but because
 he has to. The bars and the chains restrain him. He does not regret the
 crime that put him in jail. On the contrary, he is mighty sore that he
 cannot rob and kill as before. If he could escape he would go right back
 to robbing and killing.
 
 The Law enforces good behavior, at least outwardly. We obey the Law
 because if we don't we will be punished. Our obedience is inspired by
 fear. We obey under duress and we do it resentfully. Now what kind
 of righteousness is this when we refrain from evil out of fear of
 punishment? Hence, the righteousness of the Law is at bottom nothing but
 love of sin and hatred of righteousness.
 
 All the same, the Law accomplishes this much, that it will outwardly at
 least and to a certain extent repress vice and crime.
 
 But the Law is also a spiritual prison, a veritable hell. When the Law
 begins to threaten a person with death and the eternal wrath of God, a
 man just cannot find any comfort at all. He cannot shake off at will the
 nightmare of terror which the Law stirs up in his conscience. Of this
 terror of the Law the Psalms furnish many glimpses.
 
 The Law is a civil and a spiritual prison. And such it should be. For
 that the Law is intended. Only the confinement in the prison of the Law
 must not be unduly prolonged. It must come to an end. The freedom of
 faith must succeed the imprisonment of the Law.
 
 Happy the person who knows how to utilize the Law so that it serves the
 purposes of grace and of faith. Unbelievers are ignorant of this happy
 knowledge. When Cain was first shut up in the prison of the Law he felt
 no pang at the fratricide he had committed. He thought he could pass
 it off as an incident with a shrug of the shoulder. "Am I my brother's
 keeper?" he answered God flippantly. But when he heard the ominous
 words, "What hast thou done? the voice of thy brother's blood crieth
 unto me from the ground," Cain began to feel his imprisonment. Did he
 know how to get out of prison? No. He failed to call the Gospel to his
 aid. He said: "My punishment is greater than I can bear." He could only
 think of the prison. He forgot that he was brought face to face with
 his crime so that he should hurry to God for mercy and for pardon. Cain
 remained in the prison of the Law and despaired.
 
 As a stone prison proves a physical handicap, so the spiritual prison
 of the Law proves a chamber of torture. But this it should only be until
 faith be revealed. The silly conscience must be educated to this. Talk
 to your conscience. Say: "Sister, you are now in jail all right. But
 you don't have to stay there forever. It is written that we are 'shut up
 unto faith which should afterwards be revealed.' Christ will lead you to
 freedom. Do not despair like Cain, Saul, or Judas. They might have gone
 free if they had called Christ to their aid. Just take it easy, Sister
 Conscience. It's good for you to be locked up for a while. It will teach
 you to appreciate Christ."
 
 How anybody can say that he by nature loves the Law is beyond me. The
 Law is a prison to be feared and hated. Any unconverted person who says
 he loves the Law is a liar. He does not know what he is talking about.
 We love the Law about as well as a murderer loves his gloomy cell, his
 straight-jacket, and the iron bars in front of him. How then can the Law
 justify us?
 
 
   VERSE 23. Shut up unto the faith which should afterwards be revealed.
 
 We know that Paul has reference to the time of Christ's coming. It was
 then that faith and the object of faith were fully revealed. But we
 may apply the historical fact to our inner life. When Christ came
 He abolished the Law and brought liberty and life to light. This He
 continues to do in the hearts of the believers. The Christian has a body
 in whose members, as Paul says, sin dwells and wars. I take sin to
 mean not only the deed but root, tree, fruit, and all. A Christian may
 perhaps not fall into the gross sins of murder, adultery, theft, but he
 is not free from impatience, complaints, hatreds, and blasphemy of God.
 As carnal lust is strong in a young man, in a man of full age the desire
 for glory, and in an old man covetousness, so impatience, doubt,
 and hatred of God often prevail in the hearts of sincere Christians.
 Examples of these sins may be garnered from the Psalms, Job, Jeremiah,
 and all the Sacred Scriptures.
 
 Accordingly each Christian continues to experience in his heart times of
 the Law and times of the Gospel. The times of the Law are discernible by
 heaviness of heart, by a lively sense of sin, and a feeling of despair
 brought on by the Law. These periods of the Law will come again and
 again as long as we live. To mention my own case. There are many times
 when I find fault with God and am impatient with Him. The wrath and the
 judgment of God displease me, my wrath and impatience displease Him.
 Then is the season of the Law, when "the flesh lusteth against the
 Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh."
 
 The time of grace returns when the heart is enlivened by the promise of
 God's mercy. It soliloquizes: "Why art thou cast down, O my soul? and
 why art thou disquieted within me? Can you see nothing but law, sin,
 death, and hell? Is there no grace, no forgiveness, no joy, peace, life,
 heaven, no Christ and God? Trouble me no more, my soul. Hope in God who
 has not spared His own dear Son but has given Him into death for thy
 sins." When the Law carries things too far, say: "Mister Law, you are
 not the whole show. There are other and better things than you. They
 tell me to trust in the Lord."
 
 There is a time for the Law and a time for grace. Let us study to be
 good timekeepers. It is not easy. Law and grace may be miles apart in
 essence, but in the heart, they are pretty close together. In the heart
 fear and trust, sin and grace, Law and Gospel cross paths continually.
 
 Whether reason hears that justification before God is obtained by
 grace alone, it draws the inference that the Law is without value. The
 doctrine of the Law must therefore be studied carefully lest we either
 reject the Law altogether, or are tempted to attribute to the Law a
 capacity to save.
 
 There are three ways in which the Law may be abused. First, by the
 self-righteous hypocrites who fancy that they can be justified by the
 Law. Secondly, by those who claim that Christian liberty exempts a
 Christian from the observance of the Law. "These," says Peter, "use
 their liberty for a cloak of maliciousness," and bring the name and the
 Gospel of Christ into ill repute. Thirdly, the Law is abused by those
 who do not understand that the Law is meant to drive us to Christ. When
 the Law is properly used its value cannot be too highly appraised. It
 will take me to Christ every time.
 
 
   VERSE 24. Wherefore the law was our schoolmaster to bring us unto
   Christ.
 
 This simile of the schoolmaster is striking. Schoolmasters are
 indispensable. But show me a pupil who loves his schoolmaster. How
 little love is lost upon them the Jews showed by their attitude toward
 Moses. They would have been glad to stone Moses to death. (Ex. 17:4.)
 You cannot expect anything else. How can a pupil love a teacher who
 frustrates his desires? And if the pupil disobeys, the schoolmaster
 whips him, and the pupil has to like it and even kiss the rod with which
 he was beaten. Do you think the schoolboy feels good about it? As soon
 as the teacher turns his back, the pupil breaks the rod and throws it
 into the fire. And if he were stronger than the teacher he would not
 take the beatings, but beat up the teacher. All the same, teachers are
 indispensable, otherwise the children would grow up without discipline,
 instruction, and training.
 
 But how long are the scolding and the whippings of the schoolmaster to
 continue? Only for a time, until the boy has been trained to be a worthy
 heir of his father. No father wants his son to be whipped all the time.
 The discipline is to last until the boy has been trained to be his
 father's worthy successor.
 
 The Law is such a schoolmaster. Not for always, but until we have been
 brought to Christ. The Law is not just another schoolmaster. The Law
 is a specialist to bring us to Christ. What would you think of a
 schoolmaster who could only torment and beat a child? Yet of such
 schoolmasters there were plenty in former times, regular bruisers. The
 Law is not that kind of a schoolmaster. It is not to torment us always.
 With its lashings it is only too anxious to drive us to Christ. The Law
 is like the good schoolmaster who trains his children to find pleasure
 in doing things they formerly detested.
 
 
   VERSE 24. That we might be justified by faith.
 
 The Law is not to teach us another Law. When a person feels the full
 force of the Law he is likely to think: I have transgressed all the
 commandments of God; I am guilty of eternal death. If God will spare
 me I will change and live right from now on. This natural but entirely
 wrong reaction to the Law has bred the many ceremonies and works devised
 to earn grace and remission of sins.
 
 The Law means to enlarge my sins, to make me small, so that I may
 be justified by faith in Christ. Faith is neither law nor word; but
 confidence in Christ "who is the end of the law." How so is Christ the
 end of the Law? Not in this way that He replaced the old Law with new
 laws. Nor is Christ the end of the Law in a way that makes Him a hard
 judge who has to be bribed by works as the papists teach. Christ is
 the end or finish of the Law to all who believe in Him. The Law can no
 longer accuse or condemn them.
 
 But what does the Law accomplish for those who have been justified by
 Christ? Paul answers this question next.
 
 
   VERSE 25. But after that faith is come, we are no longer under a
   schoolmaster.
 
 The Apostle declares that we are free from the Law. Christ fulfilled the
 Law for us. We may live in joy and safety under Christ. The trouble
 is, our flesh will not let us believe in Christ with all our heart. The
 fault lies not with Christ, but with us. Sin clings to us as long as we
 live and spoils our happiness in Christ. Hence, we are only partly free
 from the Law. "With the mind I myself serve the law of God; but with the
 flesh the law of sin." (Romans 7:25.)
 
 As far as the conscience is concerned it may cheerfully ignore the Law.
 But because sin continues to dwell in the flesh, the Law waits around
 to molest our conscience. More and more, however, Christ increases our
 faith and in the measure in which our faith is increased, sin, Law, and
 flesh subside.
 
 If anybody objects to the Gospel and the sacraments on the ground that
 Christ has taken away our sins once and for always, you will know what
 to answer. You will answer: Indeed, Christ has taken away my sins. But
 my flesh, the world, and the devil interfere with my faith. The little
 light of faith in my heart does not shine all over me at once. It is a
 gradual diffusion. In the meanwhile I console myself with the thought
 that eventually my flesh will be made perfect in the resurrection.
 
 
   VERSE 26. For we are all the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus.
 
 Paul as a true apostle of faith always has the word "faith" on the tip
 of his tongue. By faith, says he, we are the children of God. The Law
 cannot beget children of God. It cannot regenerate us. It can only
 remind us of the old birth by which we were born into the kingdom of the
 devil. The best the Law can do for us is to prepare us for a new birth
 through faith in Christ Jesus. Faith in Christ regenerates us into the
 children of God. St. John bears witness to this in his Gospel: "As many
 as received him, to them gave he power to become the sons of God, even
 to them that believe on his name." (John 1:12.) What tongue of man or
 angel can adequately extol the mercy of God toward us miserable sinners
 in that He adopted us for His own children and fellow-heirs with His Son
 by the simple means of faith in Christ Jesus!
 
 
   VERSE 27. For as many of you as have been baptized into Christ have
   put on Christ.
 
 To "put on Christ" may be understood in two ways, according to the Law
 and according to the Gospel. According to the Law as in Romans 13:14,
 "Put ye on the Lord Jesus Christ," which means to follow the example of
 Christ.
 
 To put on Christ according to the Gospel means to clothe oneself with
 the righteousness, wisdom, power, life, and Spirit of Christ. By nature
 we are clad in the garb of Adam. This garb Paul likes to call "the old
 man." Before we can become the children of God this old man must be put
 off, as Paul says, Ephesians 4:29. The garment of Adam must come off
 like soiled clothes. Of course, it is not as simple as changing one's
 clothes. But God makes it simple. He clothes us with the righteousness
 of Christ by means of Baptism, as the Apostle says in this verse: "As
 many of you as have been baptized into Christ have put on Christ."
 With this change of garments a new birth, a new life stirs in us. New
 affections toward God spring up in the heart. New determinations affect
 our will. All this is to put on Christ according to the Gospel. Needless
 to say, when we have put on the robe of the righteousness of Christ we
 must not forget to put on also the mantle of the imitation of Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 28. There is neither Jew nor Greek, there is neither bond nor
   free, there is neither male nor female; for ye are all one in Christ
   Jesus.
 The list might be extended indefinitely: There is neither preacher nor
 hearer, neither teacher nor scholar, neither master nor servant, etc. In
 the matter of salvation, rank, learning, righteousness, influence count
 for nothing.
 
 With this statement Paul deals a death blow to the Law. When a person
 has put on Christ nothing else matters. Whether a person is a Jew, a
 punctilious and circumcised observer of the Law of Moses, or whether
 a person is a noble and wise Greek does not matter. Circumstances,
 personal worth, character, achievements have no bearing upon
 justification. Before God they count for nothing. What counts is that we
 put on Christ.
 
 Whether a servant performs his duties well; whether those who are in
 authority govern wisely; whether a man marries, provides for his family,
 and is an honest citizen; whether a woman is chaste, obedient to her
 husband, and a good mother: all these advantages do not qualify a person
 for salvation. These virtues are commendable, of course; but they do
 not count points for justification. All the best laws, ceremonies,
 religions, and deeds of the world cannot take away sin guilt, cannot
 dispatch death, cannot purchase life.
 
 There is much disparity among men in the world, but there is no such
 disparity before God. "For all have sinned, and come short of the glory
 of God." (Romans 3:23.) Let the Jews, let the Greeks, let the whole
 world keep silent in the presence of God. Those who are justified are
 justified by Christ. Without faith in Christ the Jew with his laws, the
 monk with his holy orders, the Greek with his wisdom, the servant with
 his obedience, shall perish forever.
 
 
   VERSE 28. For ye are all one in Christ Jesus.
 
 There is much imparity among men in the world. And it is a good thing.
 If the woman would change places with the man, if the son would change
 places with the father, the servant with the master, nothing but
 confusion would result. In Christ, however, all are equal. We all have
 one and the same Gospel, "one faith, one baptism, one God and Father of
 all," one Christ and Savior of all. The Christ of Peter, Paul, and all
 the saints is our Christ. Paul can always be depended on to add the
 conditional clause, "In Christ Jesus." If we lose sight of Christ, we
 lose out.
 
 
   VERSE 29. And if ye be Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs
   according to the promise.
 
 "If ye be Christ's" means, if you believe in Christ. If you believe in
 Christ, then are you the children of Abraham indeed. Through our faith
 in Christ Abraham gains paternity over us and over the nations of the
 earth according to the promise: "In thy seed shall all the nations of
 the earth be blessed." Through faith we belong to Christ and Christ to
 us.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 4
 
 
   VERSE 1. Now I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth
   nothing from a servant, though he be Lord of all;
 
   VERSE 2. But is under tutors and governors until the time appointed
   of the father.
 
 THE Apostle had apparently finished his discourse on justification when
 this illustration of the youthful heir occurred to him. He throws it in
 for good measure. He knows that plain people are sooner impressed by an
 apt illustration than by learned discussion.
 
 "I want to give you another illustration from everyday life," he writes
 to the Galatians. "As long as an heir is under age he is treated very
 much like a servant. He is not permitted to order his own affairs. He
 is kept under constant surveillance. Such discipline is good for him,
 otherwise he would waste his inheritance in no time. This discipline,
 however, is not to last forever. It is to last only until 'the time
 appointed of the father.'"
 
 
   VERSE 3. Even so we, when we were children, were in bondage
   under the elements of the world.
 
 As children of the Law we were treated like servants and prisoners. We
 were oppressed and condemned by the Law. But the tyranny of the Law is
 not to last forever. It is to last only until "the time appointed of the
 father," until Christ came and redeemed us.
 
 
   VERSE 3. Under the elements of the world.
 
 By the elements of the world the Apostle does not understand the
 physical elements, as some have thought. In calling the Law "the
 elements of the world" Paul means to say that the Law is something
 material, mundane, earthly. It may restrain evil, but it does not
 deliver from sin. The Law does not justify; it does not bring a person
 to heaven. I do not obtain eternal life because I do not kill, commit
 adultery, steal, etc. Such mere outward decency does not constitute
 Christianity. The heathen observe the same restraints to avoid
 punishment or to secure the advantages of a good reputation. In the last
 analysis such restraint is simple hypocrisy. When the Law exercises
 its higher function it accuses and condemns the conscience. All these
 effects of the Law cannot be called divine or heavenly. These effects
 are elements of the world.
 
 In calling the Law the elements of the world Paul refers to the whole
 Law, principally to the ceremonial law which dealt with external
 matters, as meat, drink, dress, places, times, feasts, cleansings,
 sacrifices, etc. These are mundane matters which cannot save the sinner.
 Ceremonial laws are like the statutes of governments dealing with purely
 civil matters, as commerce, inheritance, etc. As for the pope's church
 laws forbidding marriage and meats, Paul calls them elsewhere the
 doctrines of devils. You would not call such laws elements of heaven.
 
 The Law of Moses deals with mundane matters. It holds the mirror to
 the evil which is in the world. By revealing the evil that is in us it
 creates a longing in the heart for the better things of God. The Law
 forces us into the arms of Christ, "who is the end of the law for
 righteousness to every one that believeth." (Romans 1:4.) Christ
 relieves the conscience of the Law. In so far as the Law impels us to
 Christ it renders excellent service.
 
 I do not mean to give the impression that the Law should be despised.
 Neither does Paul intend to leave that impression. The Law ought to be
 honored. But when it is a matter of justification before God, Paul had
 to speak disparagingly of the Law, because the Law has nothing to
 do with justification. If it thrusts its nose into the business of
 justification we must talk harshly to the Law to keep it in its place.
 The conscience ought not to be on speaking terms with the Law. The
 conscience ought to know only Christ. To say this is easy, but in times
 of trial, when the conscience writhes in the presence of God, it is not
 so easy to do. As such times we are to believe in Christ as if there
 were no Law or sin anywhere, but only Christ. We ought to say to the
 Law: "Mister Law, I do not get you. You stutter so much. I don't think
 that you have anything to say to me."
 
 When it is not a question of salvation or justification with us, we are
 to think highly of the Law and call it "holy, just, and good." (Romans
 7:12) The Law is of no comfort to a stricken conscience. Therefore it
 should not be allowed to rule in our conscience, particularly in view
 of the fact that Christ paid so great a price to deliver the conscience
 from the tyranny of the Law. Let us understand that the Law and Christ
 are impossible bedfellows. The Law must leave the bed of the conscience,
 which is so narrow that it cannot hold two, as Isaiah says, chapter 28,
 verse 20.
 
 Only Paul among the apostles calls the Law "the elements of the world,
 weak and beggarly elements, the strength of sin, the letter that
 killeth," etc. The other apostles do not speak so slightingly of the
 Law. Those who want to be first-class scholars in the school of Christ
 want to pick up the language of Paul. Christ called him a chosen vessel
 and equipped with a facility of expression far above that of the other
 apostles, that he as the chosen vessel should establish the doctrine of
 justification in clear-cut words.
 
 
   VERSES 4, 5. But when the fullness of the time was come, God sent
   forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, to redeem them
   that were under the law.
 
 "The fullness of the time" means when the time of the Law was fulfilled
 and Christ was revealed. Note how Paul explains Christ. "Christ," says
 he, "is the Son of God and the son of a woman. He submitted Himself
 under the Law to redeem us who were under the Law." In these words the
 Apostle explains the person and office of Christ. His person is divine
 and human. "God sent forth His Son, made of a woman." Christ therefore
 is true God and true man. Christ's office the Apostle describes in the
 words: "Made under the law, to redeem them that were under the law."
 
 Paul calls the Virgin Mary a woman. This has been frequently deplored
 even by some of the ancient fathers who felt that Paul should have
 written "virgin" instead of woman. But Paul is now treating of faith and
 Christian righteousness, of the person and office of Christ, not of
 the virginity of Mary. The inestimable mercy of God is sufficiently set
 forth by the fact that His Son was born of a woman. The more general
 term "woman" indicates that Christ was born a true man. Paul does not
 say that Christ was born of man and woman, but only of woman. That he
 has a virgin in mind is obvious.
 
 This passage furthermore declares that Christ's purpose in coming was
 the abolition of the Law, not with the intention of laying down new
 laws, but "to redeem them that were under the law." Christ himself
 declared: "I judge no man." (John 8:15.) Again, "I came not to judge the
 world, but to save the world." (John 12:47.) In other words: "I came
 not to bring more laws, or to judge men according to the existing Law. I
 have a higher and better office. I came to judge and to condemn the Law,
 so that it may no more judge and condemn the world."
 
 How did Christ manage to redeem us? "He was made under the law." When
 Christ came He found us all in prison. What did He do about it? Although
 He was the Lord of the Law, He voluntarily placed Himself under the Law
 and permitted it to exercise dominion over Him, indeed to accuse and to
 condemn Him. When the Law takes us into judgment it has a perfect right
 to do so. "For we are by nature the children of wrath, even as others."
 (Eph. 2:3.) Christ, however, "did no sin, neither was guile found in his
 mouth." (I Pet. 2:22.) Hence the Law had no jurisdiction over Him. Yet
 the Law treated this innocent, just, and blessed Lamb of God as cruelly
 as it treated us. It accused Him of blasphemy and treason. It made Him
 guilty of the sins of the whole world. It overwhelmed him with such
 anguish of soul that His sweat was as blood. The Law condemned Him to
 the shameful death on the Cross.
 
 It is truly amazing that the Law had the effrontery to turn upon its
 divine Author, and that without a show of right. For its insolence the
 Law in turn was arraigned before the judgment seat of God and condemned.
 Christ might have overcome the Law by an exercise of His omnipotent
 authority over the Law. Instead, He humbled Himself under the Law for
 and together with them that were under the Law. He gave the Law license
 to accuse and condemn Him. His present mastery over the Law was obtained
 by virtue of His Sonship and His substitutionary victory.
 
 Thus Christ banished the Law from the conscience. It dare no longer
 banish us from God. For that matter,--the Law continues to reveal sin.
 It still raises its voice in condemnation. But the conscience finds
 quick relief in the words of the Apostle: "Christ has redeemed us from
 the law." The conscience can now hold its head high and say to the Law:
 "You are not so holy yourself. You crucified the Son of God. That was an
 awful thing for you to do. You have lost your influence forever."
 
 The words, "Christ was made under the law," are worth all the attention
 we can bestow on them. They declare that the Son of God did not only
 fulfill one or two easy requirements of the Law, but that He endured
 all the tortures of the Law. The Law brought all its fright to bear upon
 Christ until He experienced anguish and terror such as nobody else
 ever experienced. His bloody sweat. His need of angelic comfort, His
 tremulous prayer in the garden, His lamentation on the Cross, "My God,
 my God, why hast thou forsaken me?" bear eloquent witness to the sting
 of the Law. He suffered "to redeem them that were under the law."
 
 The Roman conception of Christ as a mere lawgiver more stringent than
 Moses, is quite contrary to Paul's teaching. Christ, according to Paul,
 was not an agent of the Law but a patient of the Law. He was not a
 law-giver, but a law-taker.
 
 True enough, Christ also taught and expounded the Law. But it was
 incidental. It was a sideline with Him. He did not come into the world
 for the purpose of teaching the Law, as little as it was the purpose of
 His coming to perform miracles. Teaching the Law and performing miracles
 did not constitute His unique mission to the world. The prophets also
 taught the Law and performed miracles. In fact, according to the promise
 of Christ, the apostles performed greater miracles than Christ Himself.
 (John 14:12.) The true purpose of Christ's coming was the abolition of
 the Law, of sin, and of death.
 
 If we think of Christ as Paul here depicts Him, we shall never go wrong.
 We shall never be in danger of misconstruing the meaning of the Law. We
 shall understand that the Law does not justify. We shall understand why
 a Christian observes laws: For the peace of the world, out of gratitude
 to God, and for a good example that others may be attracted to the
 Gospel.
 
 
   VERSE 5. That we might receive the adoption of sons.
 
 Paul still has for his text Genesis 22:18, "In thy seed shall all the
 nations of the earth be blessed." In the course of his Epistle he calls
 this promise of the blessing righteousness, life, deliverance from the
 Law, the testament, etc. Now he also calls the promise of blessing "the
 adoption of sons," the inheritance of everlasting life.
 
 What ever induced God to adopt us for His children and heirs? What claim
 can men who are subservient to sin, subject to the curse of the Law,
 and worthy of everlasting death, have on God and eternal life? That
 God adopted us is due to the merit of Jesus Christ, the Son of God, who
 humbled Himself under the Law and redeemed us law-ridden sinners.
 
 
   VERSE 6. And because ye are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his
   Son into your hearts.
 
 In the early Church the Holy Spirit was sent forth in visible form. He
 descended upon Christ in the form of a dove (Matt. 3:16), and in the
 likeness of fire upon the apostles and other believers. (Acts 2:3.) This
 visible outpouring of the Holy Spirit was necessary to the establishment
 of the early Church, as were also the miracles that accompanied the gift
 of the Holy Ghost. Paul explained the purpose of these miraculous gifts
 of the Spirit in I Corinthians 14:22, "Tongues are for a sign, not to
 them that believe, but to them that believe not." Once the Church had
 been established and properly advertised by these miracles, the visible
 appearance of the Holy Ghost ceased.
 
 Next, the Holy Ghost is sent forth into the hearts of the believers,
 as here stated, "God sent the Spirit of his Son into your hearts." This
 sending is accomplished by the preaching of the Gospel through which the
 Holy Spirit inspires us with fervor and light, with new judgment, new
 desires, and new motives. This happy innovation is not a derivative of
 reason or personal development, but solely the gift and operation of the
 Holy Ghost.
 
 This renewal by the Holy Spirit may not be conspicuous to the world, but
 it is patent to us by our better judgment, our improved speech, and our
 unashamed confession of Christ. Formerly we did not confess Christ to
 be our only merit, as we do now in the light of the Gospel. Why, then,
 should we feel bad if the world looks upon us as ravagers of religion
 and insurgents against constituted authority? We confess Christ and our
 conscience approves of it. Then, too, we live in the fear of God. If we
 sin, we sin not on purpose, but unwittingly, and we are sorry for it.
 Sin sticks in our flesh, and the flesh gets us into sin even after
 we have been imbued by the Holy Ghost. Outwardly there is no great
 difference between a Christian and any honest man. The activities of
 a Christian are not sensational. He performs his duty according to his
 vocation. He takes good care of his family, and is kind and helpful to
 others. Such homely, everyday performances are not much admired. But the
 setting-up exercises of the monks draw great applause. Holy works, you
 know. Only the acts of a Christian are truly good and acceptable to God,
 because they are done in faith, with a cheerful heart, out of gratitude
 to Christ.
 
 We ought to have no misgivings about whether the Holy Ghost dwells in
 us. We are "the temple of the Holy Ghost." (I Cor. 3:16.) When we have
 a love for the Word of God, and gladly hear, talk, write, and think of
 Christ, we are to know that this inclination toward Christ is the gift
 and work of the Holy Ghost. Where you come across contempt for the Word
 of God, there is the devil. We meet with such contempt for the Word of
 God mostly among the common people. They act as though the Word of God
 does not concern them. Wherever you find a love for the Word, thank God
 for the Holy Spirit who infuses this love into the hearts of men. We
 never come by this love naturally, neither can it be enforced by laws.
 It is the gift of the Holy Spirit.
 
 The Roman theologians teach that no man can know for a certainty whether
 he stands in the favor of God or not. This teaching forms one of the
 chief articles of their faith. With this teaching they tormented men's
 consciences, excommunicated Christ from the Church, and limited the
 operations of the Holy Ghost.
 
 St. Augustine observed that "every man is certain of his faith, if he
 has faith." This the Romanists deny. "God forbid," they exclaim piously,
 "that I should ever be so arrogant as to think that I stand in grace,
 that I am holy, or that I have the Holy Ghost." We ought to feel sure
 that we stand in the grace of God, not in view of our own worthiness,
 but through the good services of Christ. As certain as we are that
 Christ pleases God, so sure ought we to be that we also please God,
 because Christ is in us. And although we daily offend God by our sins,
 yet as often as we sin, God's mercy bends over us. Therefore sin cannot
 get us to doubt the grace of God. Our certainty is of Christ, that
 mighty Hero who overcame the Law, sin, death, and all evils. So long as
 He sits at the right hand of God to intercede for us, we have nothing to
 fear from the anger of God.
 
 This inner assurance of the grace of God is accompanied by outward
 indications such as gladly to hear, preach, praise, and to confess
 Christ, to do one's duty in the station in which God has placed us, to
 aid the needy, and to comfort the sorrowing. These are the affidavits of
 the Holy Spirit testifying to our favorable standing with God.
 
 If we could be fully persuaded that we are in the good grace of God,
 that our sins are forgiven, that we have the Spirit of Christ, that we
 are the beloved children of God, we would be ever so happy and grateful
 to God. But because we often feel fear and doubt we cannot come to that
 happy certainty.
 
 Train your conscience to believe that God approves of you. Fight it out
 with doubt. Gain assurance through the Word of God. Say: "I am all right
 with God. I have the Holy Ghost. Christ, in whom I do believe, makes
 me worthy. I gladly hear, read, sing, and write of Him. I would like
 nothing better than that Christ's Gospel be known throughout the world
 and that many, many be brought to faith in Him."
 
 
   VERSE 6. Crying, Abba, Father.
 
 Paul might have written, "God sent forth the Spirit of his Son into
 your hearts, calling Abba, Father." Instead, he wrote, "Crying, Abba,
 Father." In the eighth chapter of the Epistle to the Romans the Apostle
 describes this crying of the Spirit as "groanings which cannot be
 uttered." He writes in the 26th verse: "Likewise the Spirit also helpeth
 our infirmities: for we know not what we should pray for as we ought:
 but the Spirit itself maketh intercession for us with groanings which
 cannot be uttered."
 
 The fact that the Spirit of Christ in our hearts cries unto God and
 makes intercession for us with groanings should reassure us greatly.
 However, there are many factors that prevent such full reassurance on
 our part. We are born in sin. To doubt the good will of God is an inborn
 suspicion of God with all of us. Besides, the devil, our adversary,
 goeth about seeking to devour us by roaring: "God is angry at you and
 is going to destroy you forever." In all these difficulties we have only
 one support, the Gospel of Christ. To hold on to it, that is the trick.
 Christ cannot be perceived with the senses. We cannot see Him. The heart
 does not feel His helpful presence. Especially in times of trials
 a Christian feels the power of sin, the infirmity of his flesh, the
 goading darts of the devil, the agues of death, the scowl and judgment
 of God. All these things cry out against us. The Law scolds us, sin
 screams at us, death thunders at us, the devil roars at us. In the midst
 of the clamor the Spirit of Christ cries in our hearts: "Abba, Father."
 And this little cry of the Spirit transcends the hullabaloo of the Law,
 sin, death, and the devil, and finds a hearing with God.
 
 The Spirit cries in us because of our weakness. Because of our infirmity
 the Holy Ghost is sent forth into our hearts to pray for us according to
 the will of God and to assure us of the grace of God.
 
 Let the Law, sin, and the devil cry out against us until their outcry
 fills heaven and earth. The Spirit of God outcries them all. Our feeble
 groans, "Abba, Father," will be heard of God sooner than the combined
 racket of hell, sin, and the Law.
 
 We do not think of our groanings as a crying. It is so faint we do not
 know we are groaning. "But he," says Paul, "that searcheth the hearts
 knoweth what is the mind of the Spirit." (Romans 8:27.) To this Searcher
 of hearts our feeble groaning, as it seems to us, is a loud shout for
 help in comparison with which the howls of hell, the din of the devil,
 the yells of the Law, the shouts of sin are like so many whispers.
 
 In the fourteenth chapter of Exodus the Lord addresses Moses at the Red
 Sea: "Wherefore criest thou unto me?" Moses had not cried unto the Lord.
 He trembled so he could hardly talk. His faith was at low ebb. He saw
 the people of Israel wedged between the Sea and the approaching armies
 of Pharaoh. How were they to escape? Moses did not know what to say. How
 then could God say that Moses was crying to Him? God heard the groaning
 heart of Moses and the groans to Him sounded like loud shouts for help.
 God is quick to catch the sigh of the heart.
 
 Some have claimed that the saints are without infirmities. But Paul
 says: "The Spirit helpeth our infirmities, and maketh intercession for
 us with groanings which cannot be uttered." We need the help of the
 Holy Spirit because we are weak and infirm. And the Holy Spirit never
 disappoints us. Confronted by the armies of Pharaoh, retreat cut off by
 the waters of the Red Sea, Moses was in a bad spot. He felt himself to
 blame. The devil accused him: "These people will all perish, for they
 cannot escape. And you are to blame because you led the people out of
 Egypt. You started all this." And then the people started in on Moses.
 "Because there were no graves in Egypt, hast thou taken us away to die
 in the wilderness? For it had been better for us to serve the Egyptians,
 than that we should die in the wilderness." (Ex. 14:11, 12.) But the
 Holy Ghost was in Moses and made intercession for him with unutterable
 groanings, sighings unto the Lord: "O Lord, at Thy commandment have I
 led forth this people. So help me now."
 
 The Spirit intercedes for us not in many words or long prayers, but with
 groanings, with little sounds like "Abba." Small as this word is, it
 says ever so much. It says: "My Father, I am in great trouble and you
 seem so far away. But I know I am your child, because you are my Father
 for Christ's sake. I am loved by you because of the Beloved." This
 one little word "Abba" surpasses the eloquence of a Demosthenes and a
 Cicero.
 
 I have spent much time on this verse in order to combat the cruel
 teaching of the Roman church, that a person ought to be kept in a state
 of uncertainty concerning his status with God. The monasteries recruit
 the youth on the plea that their "holy" orders will assuredly recruit
 them for heaven. But once inside the monastery the recruits are told to
 doubt the promises of God.
 
 In support of their error the papists quote the saying of Solomon: "The
 righteous, and the wise, and their works, are in the hand of God: no
 man knoweth either love or hatred by all that is before them." (Eccles.
 9:1.) They take this hatred to mean the wrath of God to come. Others
 take it to mean God's present anger. None of them seem to understand
 this passage from Solomon. On every page the Scriptures urge us to
 believe that God is merciful, loving, and patient; that He is faithful
 and true, and that He keeps His promises. All the promises of God
 were fulfilled in the gift of His only-begotten Son, that "whosoever
 believeth in him should not perish, but have everlasting life." The
 Gospel is reassurance for sinners. Yet this one saying from Solomon,
 misinterpreted at that, is made to count for more than all the many
 promises of all the Scriptures.
 
 If our opponents are so uncertain about their status with God, and even
 go so far as to say that the conscience ought to be kept in a state of
 doubt, why is it that they persecute us as vile heretics? When it comes
 to persecuting us they do not seem to be in doubt and uncertainty one
 minute.
 
 Let us not fail to thank God for delivering us from the doctrine of
 doubt. The Gospel commands us to look away from our own good works to
 the promises of God in Christ, the Mediator. The pope commands us to
 look away from the promises of God in Christ to our own merit. No wonder
 they are the eternal prey of doubt and despair. We depend upon God for
 salvation. No wonder that our doctrine is certified, because it does not
 rest in our own strength, our own conscience, our own feelings, our own
 person, our own works. It is built on a better foundation. It is built
 on the promises and truth of God.
 
 Besides, the passage from Solomon does not treat of the hatred and love
 of God towards men. It merely rebukes the ingratitude of men. The more
 deserving a person is, the less he is appreciated. Often those who
 should be his best friends, are his worst enemies. Those who least
 deserve the praise of the world, get most. David was a holy man and
 a good king. Nevertheless he was chased from his own country. The
 prophets, Christ, the apostles, were slain. Solomon in this passage does
 not speak of the love and hatred of God, but of love and hatred among
 men. As though Solomon wanted to say: "There are many good and wise men
 whom God uses for the advancement of mankind. Seldom, if ever, are their
 efforts crowned with gratitude. They are usually repaid with hatred and
 ingratitude."
 
 We are being treated that way. We thought we would find favor with men
 for bringing them the Gospel of peace, life, and eternal salvation.
 Instead of favor, we found fury. At first, yes, many were delighted with
 our doctrine and received it gladly. We counted them as our friends and
 brethren, and were happy to think that they would help us in sowing the
 seed of the Gospel. But they revealed themselves as false brethren and
 deadly enemies of the Gospel. If you experience the ingratitude of
 men, don't let it get you down. Say with Christ: "They hated me without
 cause." And, "For my love they are my adversaries; but I give myself
 unto prayer." (Ps. 109:4.)
 
 Let us never doubt the mercy of God in Christ Jesus, but make up our
 minds that God is pleased with us, that He looks after us, and that we
 have the Holy Spirit who prays for us.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Wherefore thou art no more a servant, but a son.
 
 This sentence clinches Paul's argument. He says: "With the Holy Spirit
 in our hearts crying, 'Abba, Father,' there can be no doubt that God has
 adopted us for His children and that our subjection to the Law has come
 to an end." We are now the free children of God. We may now say to the
 Law: "Mister Law, you have lost your throne to Christ. I am free now and
 a son of God. You cannot curse me any more." Do not permit the Law to
 lie in your conscience. Your conscience belongs to Christ. Let Christ be
 in it and not the Law.
 
 As the children of God we are the heirs of His eternal heaven. What
 a wonderful gift heaven is, man's heart cannot conceive, much less
 describe. Until we enter upon our heavenly inheritance we are only to
 have our little faith to go by. To man's reason our faith looks rather
 forlorn. But because our faith rests on the promises of the infinite
 God, His promises are also infinite, so much so that nothing can accuse
 or condemn us.
 
 
   VERSE 7. And if a son, then an heir of God through Christ.
 
 A son is an heir, not by virtue of high accomplishments, but by virtue
 of his birth. He is a mere recipient. His birth makes him an heir,
 not his labors. In exactly the same way we obtain the eternal gifts of
 righteousness, resurrection, and everlasting life. We obtain them not
 as agents, but as beneficiaries. We are the children and heirs of God
 through faith in Christ. We have Christ to thank for everything.
 
 We are not the heirs of some rich and mighty man, but heirs of God, the
 almighty Creator of all things. If a person could fully appreciate what
 it means to be a son and heir of God, he would rate the might and wealth
 of nations small change in comparison with his heavenly inheritance.
 What is the world to him who has heaven? No wonder Paul greatly desired
 to depart and to be with Christ. Nothing would be more welcome to
 us than early death, knowing that it would spell the end of all our
 miseries and the beginning of all our happiness. Yes, if a person could
 perfectly believe this he would not long remain alive. The anticipation
 of his joy would kill him.
 
 But the law of the members strives against the law of the mind, and
 makes perfect joy and faith impossible. We need the continued help and
 comfort of the Holy Spirit. We need His prayers. Paul himself cried out:
 "O wretched man that I am! Who shall deliver me from the body of this
 death?" The body of this death spoiled the joy of his spirit. He did
 not always entertain the sweet and glad expectation of his heavenly
 inheritance. He often felt miserable.
 
 This goes to show how hard it is to believe. Faith is feeble, because
 the flesh wars against the spirit. If we could have perfect faith, our
 loathing for this life in the world would be complete. We would not be
 so careful about this life. We would not be so attached to the world and
 the things of the world. We would not feel so good when we have them; we
 would not feel so bad when we lose them. We would be far more humble and
 patient and kind. But our faith is weak, because our spirit is weak. In
 this life we can have only the first-fruits of the Spirit, as Paul says.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Through Christ.
 
 The Apostle always has Christ on the tip of his tongue. He foresaw that
 nothing would be less known in the world some day than the Gospel of
 Christ. Therefore he talks of Christ continually. As often as he speaks
 of righteousness, grace, the promise, the adoption, and the inheritance
 of heaven, he adds the words, "In Christ," or "Through Christ," to show
 that these blessings are not to be had by the Law, or the deeds of
 the Law, much less by our own exertions, or by the observance of human
 traditions, but only by and through and in Christ.
 
 
   VERSES 8 and 9. Howbeit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service
   unto them which by nature are no gods. But now, after that ye have
   known God, or rather are known of God, how turn ye again to the weak
   and beggarly elements, whereunto ye desire again to be in bondage?
 
 This concludes Paul's discourse on justification. From now to the end of
 the Epistle the Apostle writes mostly of Christian conduct. But before
 he follows up his doctrinal discourse with practical precepts he once
 more reproves the Galatians. He is deeply displeased with them for
 relinquishing their divine doctrine. He tells them: "You have taken on
 teachers who intend to recommit you to the Law. By my doctrine I called
 you out of the darkness of ignorance into the wonderful light of the
 knowledge of God. I led you out of bondage into the freedom of the sons
 of God, not by the prescription of laws, but by the gift of heavenly and
 eternal blessings through Christ Jesus. How could you so soon forsake
 the light and return to darkness? How could you so quickly stray from
 grace into the Law, from freedom into bondage?"
 
 The example of the Galatians, of Anabaptists, and other sectarians in
 our day bears testimony to the ease with which faith may be lost. We
 take great pains in setting forth the doctrine of faith by preaching
 and by writing. We are careful to apply the Gospel and the Law in their
 proper turn. Yet we make little headway because the devil seduces people
 into misbelief by taking Christ out of their sight and focusing their
 eyes upon the Law.
 
 But why does Paul accuse the Galatians of reverting to the weak and
 beggarly elements of the Law when they never had the Law? Why does he
 not say to them: "At one time you Galatians did not know God. You then
 served idols that were no gods. But now that you have come to know the
 true God, why do you go back to the worship of idols?" Paul seems to
 identify their defection from the Gospel to the Law with their former
 idolatry. Indeed he does. Whoever gives up the article of justification
 does not know the true God. It is one and the same thing whether a
 person reverts to the Law or to the worship of idols. When the article
 of justification is lost, nothing remains except error, hypocrisy,
 godlessness, and idolatry.
 
 God will and can be known in no other way than in and through Christ
 according to the statement of John 1:18, "The only begotten Son, which
 is in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him." Christ is the only
 means whereby we can know God and His will. In Christ we perceive that
 God is not a cruel judge, but a most loving and merciful Father who to
 bless and to save us "spared not his own Son, but gave him up for us
 all." This is truly to know God.
 
 Those who do not know God in Christ arrive at this erroneous conclusion:
 "I will serve God in such and such a way. I will join this or that
 order. I will be active in this or that charitable endeavor. God will
 sanction my good intentions and reward me with everlasting life. For is
 He not a merciful and generous Father who gives good things even to the
 unworthy and ungrateful? How much more will He grant unto me everlasting
 life as a due payment in return for my many good deeds and merits." This
 is the religion of reason. This is the natural religion of the world.
 "The natural man receiveth not the things of the Spirit of God." (I Cor.
 2:14.) "There is none that understandeth, there is none that seeketh
 after God." (Romans 3:11.) Hence, there is really no difference between
 a Jew, a Mohammedan, and any other old or new heretic. There may be a
 difference of persons, places, rites, religions, ceremonies, but as far
 as their fundamental beliefs are concerned they are all alike.
 
 Is it therefore not extreme folly for Rome and the Mohammedans to fight
 each other about religion? How about the monks? Why should one monk
 want to be accounted more holy than another monk because of some silly
 ceremony, when all the time their basic beliefs are asnmuch alike as one
 egg is like the other? They all imagine, if we do this or that work, God
 will have mercy on us; if not, God will be angry.
 
 God never promised to save anybody for his religious observance of
 ceremonies and ordinances. Those who rely upon such things do serve a
 god, but it is their own invention of a god, and not the true God. The
 true God has this to say: No religion pleases Me whereby the Father is
 not glorified through His Son Jesus. All who give their faith to this
 Son of Mine, to them I am God and Father. I accept, justify, and save
 them. All others abide under My curse because they worship creatures
 instead of Me.
 
 Without the doctrine of justification there can be only ignorance of
 God. Those who refuse to be justified by Christ are idolaters. They
 remain under the Law, sin, death, and the power of the devil. Everything
 they do is wrong.
 
 Nowadays there are many such idolaters who want to be counted among
 the true confessors of the Gospel. They may even teach that men are
 delivered from their sins by the death of Christ. But because they
 attach more importance to charity than to faith in Christ they dishonor
 Him and pervert His Word. They do not serve the true God, but an idol of
 their own invention. The true God has never yet smiled upon a person for
 his charity or virtues, but only for the sake of Christ's merits.
 
 The objection is frequently raised that the Bible commands that we
 should love God with all our heart. True enough. But because God
 commands it, it does not follow that we do it. If we could love God with
 all our heart we should undoubtedly be justified by our obedience, for
 it is written, "Which if a man do, he shall live in them." (Lev. 18:5.)
 But now comes the Gospel and says: "Because you do not do these things,
 you cannot live in them." The words, "Thou shalt love the Lord, thy
 God," require perfect obedience, perfect fear, perfect trust, and
 perfect love. But where are the people who can render perfection? Hence,
 this commandment, instead of justifying men, only accuses and condemns
 them. "Christ is the end of the law for righteousness to every one that
 believeth" (Romans 10:1.)
 
 How may these two contradictory statements of the Apostle, "Ye knew not
 God," and "Ye worshipped God," be reconciled? I answer: By nature all
 men know that there is a God, "because that which may be known of God
 is manifest in them, for God hath showed it unto them. For the invisible
 things of him from the creation of the world are clearly seen." (Romans
 1:19, 20.) Furthermore, the different religions to be found among
 all nations at all times bear witness to the fact that all men have a
 certain intuitive knowledge of God.
 
 If all men know God how can Paul say that the Galatians did not know
 God prior to the hearing of the Gospel? I answer: There is a twofold
 knowledge of God, general and particular. All men have the general
 and instinctive recognition that there is a God who created heaven and
 earth, who is just and holy, and who punishes the wicked. How God feels
 about us, what His intentions are, what He will do for us, or how He
 will save us, that men cannot know instinctively. It must be revealed to
 them. I may know a person by sight, and still not know him, because I do
 not know how he feels about me. Men know instinctively that there is a
 God. But what His will is toward them, they do not know. It is written:
 "There is none that understandeth God." (Romans 3:11.) Again, "No man
 hath seen God." (John 1:18.) Now, what good does it do you if you know
 that there is a God, if you do not know how He feels about you, or
 what He wants of you? People have done a good deal of guessing. The Jew
 imagines he is doing the will of God if he concentrates on the Law of
 Moses. The Mohammedan thinks his Koran is the will of God. The monk
 fancies he is doing the will of God if he performs his vows. But they
 deceive themselves and become "vain in their imaginations," as Paul
 says, Romans 1:21. Instead of worshipping the true God, they worship the
 vain imaginations of their foolish hearts.
 
 What Paul means by saying to the Galatians, "When ye knew not God," is
 simply this: "There was a time when you did not know the will of God in
 Christ, but you worshipped gods of your own invention, thinking that you
 had to perform this or that labor." Whether you understand the "elements
 of the world" to mean the Law of Moses, or the religions of the heathen
 nations, it makes no difference. Those who lapse from the Gospel to the
 Law are no better off than those who lapse from grace into idolatry.
 Without Christ all religion is idolatry. Without Christ men will
 entertain false ideas about God, call their ideas what you like, the
 laws of Moses, the ordinances of the Pope, the Koran of the Mohammedans,
 or what have you.
 
 
   VERSE 9. But now, after that ye have known God.
 
 "Is it not amazing," cries Paul, "that you Galatians who knew God
 intimately by the hearing of the Gospel, should all of a sudden
 revert from the true knowledge of His will in which I thought you were
 confirmed, to the weak and beggarly elements of the Law which can only
 enslave you again?"
 
 
   VERSE 9. Or rather are known of God.
 
 The Apostle turns the foregoing sentence around. He fears the Galatians
 have lost God altogether. "Alas," he cries, "have you come to this, that
 you no longer know God? What else am I to think? Nevertheless, God knows
 you." Our knowledge of God is rather passive than active. God knows us
 better than we know God. "Ye are known of God" means that God brings His
 Gospel to our attention, and endows us with faith and the Holy Spirit.
 Even in these words the Apostle denies the possibility of our knowing
 God by the performance of the Law. "No man knoweth who the Father is,
 but the Son, and he to whom the Son will reveal him." (Luke 10:22.) "By
 his knowledge shall my righteous servant justify many; for he shall bear
 their iniquities." (Isaiah 53:11.)
 
 The Apostle frankly expresses his surprise to the Galatians that they
 who had known God intimately through the Gospel, should so easily be
 persuaded by the false apostles to return to the weak and beggarly
 elements of the Law. I would not be surprised to see my church perverted
 by some fanatic through one or two sermons. We are no better than the
 apostles who had to witness the subversion of the churches which they
 had planted with their own hands. Nevertheless, Christ will reign to the
 end of the world, and that miraculously, as He did during the Dark Ages.
 
 Paul seems to think rather ill of the Law. He calls it the elements
 of the world, the weak and beggarly elements of the world. Was it not
 irreverent for him to speak that way about the holy Law of God? The Law
 ought to prepare the way of Christ into the hearts of men. That is the
 true purpose and function of the Law. But if the Law presumes to usurp
 the place and function of the Gospel, it is no longer the holy Law of
 God, but a pseudo-Gospel.
 
 If you care to amplify this matter you may add the observation that
 the Law is a weak and beggarly element because it makes people weak and
 beggarly. The Law has no power and affluence to make men strong and rich
 before God. To seek to be justified by the Law amounts to the same
 thing as if a person who is already weak and feeble should try to find
 strength in weakness, or as if a person with the dropsy should seek a
 cure by exposing himself to the pestilence, or as if a leper should go
 to a leper, and a beggar to a beggar to find health and wealth.
 
 Those who seek to be justified by the Law grow weaker and more destitute
 right along. They are weak and bankrupt to begin with. They are by
 nature the children of wrath. Yet for salvation they grasp at the straw
 of the Law. The Law can only aggravate their weakness and poverty. The
 Law makes them ten times weaker and poorer than they were before.
 
 I and many others have experienced the truth of this. I have known monks
 who zealously labored to please God for salvation, but the more they
 labored the more impatient, miserable, uncertain, and fearful they
 became. What else can you expect? You cannot grow strong through
 weakness and rich through poverty. People who prefer the Law to the
 Gospel are like Aesop's dog who let go of the meat to snatch at
 the shadow of the water. There is no satisfaction in the Law. What
 satisfaction can there be in collecting laws with which to torment
 oneself and others? One law breeds ten more until their number is
 legion.
 
 Who would have thought it possible that the Galatians, taught as they
 were by that efficient apostle and teacher, Paul, could so quickly be
 led astray by the false apostles? To fall away from the Gospel is an
 easy matter because few people appreciate what an excellent treasure the
 knowledge of Christ really is. People are not sufficiently exercised in
 their faith by afflictions. They do not wrestle against sin. They live
 in security without conflict. Because they have never been tried in the
 furnace of affliction they are not properly equipped with the armor of
 God and know not how to use the sword of the Spirit. As long as they
 are being shepherded by faithful pastors, all is well. But when their
 faithful shepherds are gone and wolves disguised as sheep break into the
 fold, back they go to the weak and beggarly elements of the Law.
 
 Whoever goes back to the Law loses the knowledge of the truth, fails in
 the recognition of his sinfulness, does not know God, nor the devil,
 nor himself, and does not understand the meaning and purpose of the Law.
 Without the knowledge of Christ a man will always argue that the Law is
 necessary for salvation, that it will strengthen the weak and enrich the
 poor. Wherever this opinion holds sway the promises of God are denied,
 Christ is demoted, hypocrisy and idolatry are established.
 
 
   VERSE 9. Whereunto ye desire again to be in bondage.
 
 The Apostle pointedly asks the Galatians whether they desire to be in
 bondage again to the Law. The Law is weak and poor, the sinner is weak
 and poor--two feeble beggars trying to help each other. They cannot do
 it. They only wear each other out. But through Christ a weak and poor
 sinner is revived and enriched unto eternal life.
 
 
   VERSE 10. Ye observe days, and months, and times, and years.
 
 The Apostle Paul knew what the false apostles were teaching the
 Galatians: The observance of days, and months, and times, and years. The
 Jews had been obliged to keep holy the Sabbath Day, the new moons, the
 feast of the passover, the feast of tabernacles, and other feasts. The
 false apostles constrained the Galatians to observe these Jewish feasts
 under threat of damnation. Paul hastens to tell the Galatians that
 they were exchanging their Christian liberty for the weak and beggarly
 elements of the world.
 
 
   VERSE 11. I am afraid of you, lest I have bestowed upon you labor in
   vain.
 
 It grieves the Apostle to think that he might have preached the Gospel
 to the Galatians in vain. But this statement expresses more than grief.
 Behind his apparent disappointment at their failure lurks the sharp
 reprimand that they had forsaken Christ and that they were proving
 themselves to be obstinate unbelievers. But he does not openly condemn
 them for fear that oversharp criticism might alienate them altogether.
 He therefore changes the tone of his voice and speaks kindly to them.
 
 
   VERSE 12. Be as I am; for I am as ye are.
 
 Up to this point Paul has been occupied with the doctrinal aspect of
 the apostasy of the Galatians. He did not conceal his disappointment at
 their lack of stability. He had rebuked them. He had called them fools,
 crucifiers of Christ, etc. Now that the more important part of his
 Epistle has been finished, he realizes that he has handled the Galatians
 too roughly. Anxious lest he should do more harm than good, he is
 careful to let them see that his criticism proceeds from affection and
 a true apostolic concern for their welfare. He is eager to mitigate his
 sharp words with gentle sentiments in order to win them again.
 
 Like Paul, all pastors and ministers ought to have much sympathy for
 their poor straying sheep, and instruct them in the spirit of meekness.
 They cannot be straightened out in any other way. Oversharp criticism
 provokes anger and despair, but no repentance. And here let us note, by
 the way, that true doctrine always produces concord. When men embrace
 errors, the tie of Christian love is broken.
 
 At the beginning of the Reformation we were honored as the true
 ministers of Christ. Suddenly certain false brethren began to hate us.
 We had given them no offense, no occasion to hate us. They knew then as
 they know now that ours is the singular desire to publish the Gospel
 of Christ everywhere. What changed their attitude toward us? False
 doctrine. Seduced into error by the false apostles, the Galatians
 refused to acknowledge St. Paul as their pastor. The name and doctrine
 of Paul became obnoxious to them. I fear this Epistle recalled very few
 from their error.
 
 Paul knew that the false apostles would misconstrue his censure of the
 Galatians to their own advantage and say: "So this is your Paul whom you
 praise so much. What sweet names he is calling you in his letter.
 When he was with you he acted like a father, but now he acts like a
 dictator." Paul knew what to expect of the false apostles and therefore
 he is worried. He does not know what to say. It is hard for a man to
 defend his cause at a distance, especially when he has reason to think
 that he personally has fallen into disfavor.
 
 
   VERSE 12. Be as I am; for I am as ye are.
 
 In beseeching the Galatians to be as he is, Paul expresses the hope
 that they might hold the same affection for him that he holds for them.
 "Perhaps I have been a little hard with you. Forgive it. Do not judge my
 heart according to my words."
 
 We request the same consideration for ourselves. Our way of writing is
 incisive and straightforward. But there is no bitterness in our heart.
 We seek the honor of Christ and the welfare of men. We do not hate
 the Pope as to wish him ill. We do not desire the death of our false
 brethren. We desire that they may turn from their evil ways to Christ
 and be saved with us. A teacher chastises the pupil to reform him.
 The rod hurts, but correction is necessary. A father punishes his son
 because he loves his son. If he did not love the lad he would not punish
 him but let him have his own way in everything until he comes to harm.
 Paul beseeches the Galatians to look upon his correction as a sign that
 he really cared for them. "Now no chastening for the present seemeth
 to be joyous, but grievous; nevertheless, afterward it yieldeth the
 peaceable fruit of righteousness unto them which are exercised thereby."
 (Heb. 12:11.)
 
 Although Paul seeks to soften the effect of his reproachful words, he
 does not take them back. When a physician administers a bitter potion to
 a patient, he does it to cure the patient. The fact that the medicine
 is bitter is no fault of the physician. The malady calls for a bitter
 medicine. Paul wants the Galatians to judge his words according to the
 situation that made them necessary.
 
 
   VERSE 12. Brethren, I beseech you...Ye have not injured me at all.
 
 Would you call it beseeching the Galatians to call them "bewitched,"
 "disobedient," "crucifiers of Christ"? The Apostle calls it an earnest
 beseeching. And so it is. When a father corrects his son it means as if
 he were saying, "My son, I beseech you, be a good boy."
 
 
   VERSE 12. Ye have not injured me at all.
 
 "I am not angry with you," says Paul. "Why should I be angry with you,
 since you have done me no injury at all?"
 
 To this the Galatians reply: "Why, then, do you say that we are
 perverted, that we have forsaken the true doctrine, that we are foolish,
 bewitched, etc., if you are not angry? We must have offended you
 somehow."
 
 Paul answers: "You Galatians have not injured me. You have injured
 yourselves. I chide you not because I wish you ill. I have no reason
 to wish you ill. God is my witness, you have done me no wrong. On the
 contrary, you have been very good to me. The reason I write to you is
 because I love you."
 
 The bitter potion must be sweetened with honey and sugar to make it
 palatable. When parents have punished their children they give them
 apples, pears, and other good things to show them that they mean well.
 
 
   VERSES 13, 14. Ye know how through infirmity of the flesh I preached the
 gospel unto you at the first. And my temptation which was in my flesh ye
 despised not, nor rejected; but received me as an angel of God, even as
 Christ Jesus.
 
 "You Galatians were very good to me. When I began to preach the Gospel
 to you in the infirmity of my flesh and in great temptation you were
 not at all offended. On the contrary, you were so loving, so kind, so
 friendly towards me, you received me like an angel, like Jesus Himself."
 
 Indeed, the Galatians are to be commended for receiving the Gospel from
 a man as unimposing and afflicted all around as Paul was. Wherever
 he preached the Gospel, Jews and Gentiles raved against him. All the
 influential and religious people of his day denounced him. But the
 Galatians did not mind it. That was greatly to their honor. And Paul
 does not neglect to praise them for it. This praise Paul bestows on none
 of the other churches to which he wrote.
 
 St. Jerome and others of the ancient fathers allege this infirmity of
 Paul's to have been some physical defect, or concupiscence. Jerome and
 the other diagnosticians lived at a time when the Church enjoyed peace
 and prosperity, when the bishops increased in wealth and standing, when
 pastors and bishops no longer sat over the Word of God. No wonder they
 failed to understand Paul.
 
 When Paul speaks of the infirmity of his flesh he does not mean some
 physical defect or carnal lust, but the sufferings and afflictions which
 he endured in his body. What these infirmities were he himself explains
 in II Corinthians 12:9, 10: "Most gladly therefore will I rather glory
 in my infirmities, that the power of Christ may rest upon me. Therefore
 I take pleasure in infirmities, in reproaches, in necessities, in
 persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for when I am weak,
 then am I strong." And in the eleventh chapter of the same Epistle the
 Apostle writes: "In labors more abundant, in stripes above measure, in
 prisons more frequent, in deaths oft. Of the Jews five times received
 I forty stripes save one. Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I
 stoned, thrice I suffered shipwreck," etc. (II Cor. 11:23-25.) By the
 infirmity of his flesh Paul meant these afflictions and not some chronic
 disease. He reminds the Galatians how he was always in peril at the
 hands of the Jews, Gentiles, and false brethren, how he suffered hunger
 and want.
 
 Now, the afflictions of the believers always offend people. Paul knew it
 and therefore has high praise for the Galatians because they overlooked
 his afflictions and received him like an angel. Christ forewarned the
 faithful against the offense of the Cross, saying: "Blessed is he,
 whosoever shall not be offended in me." (Matt. 11:6.) Surely it is no
 easy thing to confess Him Lord of all and Savior of the world who was a
 reproach of men, and despised of the people, and the laughing stock of
 the world. (Ps. 22:7.) I say, to value this poor Christ, so spitefully
 scorned, spit upon, scourged, and crucified, more than the riches of
 the richest, the strength of the strongest, the wisdom of the wisest, is
 something. It is worth being called blessed.
 
 Paul not only had outward afflictions but also inner, spiritual
 afflictions. He refers to these in II Corinthians 7:6, "Without were
 fightings, within were fears." In his letter to the Philippians Paul
 makes mention of the restoration of Epaphroditus as a special act of
 mercy on the part of God, "lest I should have sorrow upon sorrow."
 
 Considering the many afflictions of Paul, we are not surprised to hear
 him loudly praising the Galatians for not being offended at him as
 others were. The world thinks us mad because we go about to comfort, to
 help, to save others while we ourselves are in distress. People tell us:
 "Physician, heal thyself." (Luke 4:23.)
 
 The Apostle tells the Galatians that he will keep their kindness in
 perpetual remembrance. Indirectly, he also reminds them how much they
 had loved him before the invasion of the false apostles, and gives them
 a hint that they should return to their first love for him.
 
 
   VERSE 15. Where is then the blessedness ye spake of?
 
 "How much happier you used to be. And how you Galatians used to tell
 me that you were blessed. And how much did I not praise and commend you
 formerly." Paul reminds them of former and better times in an effort to
 mitigate his sharp reproaches, lest the false apostles should slander
 him and misconstrue his letter to his disadvantage and to their own
 advantage. Such snakes in the grass are equal to anything. They will
 pervert words spoken from a sincere heart and twist them to mean just
 the opposite of what they were intended to convey. They are like spiders
 that suck venom out of sweet and fragrant flowers. The poison is not in
 the flowers, but it is the nature of the spider to turn what is good and
 wholesome into poison.
 
 
   VERSE 15. For I bear you record, that, if it had been possible, ye
   would have plucked out your own eyes, and have given them to me.
 
 The Apostle continues his praise of the Galatians. "You did not only
 treat me very courteously. If it had been necessary you would have
 plucked out your eyes and sacrificed your lives for me." And in very
 fact the Galatians sacrificed their lives for Paul. By receiving and
 maintaining Paul they called upon their own heads the hatred and malice
 of all the Jews and Gentiles.
 
 Nowadays the name of Luther carries the same stigma. Whoever praises
 Luther is a worse sinner than an idolater, perjurer, or thief.
 
 
   VERSE 16. Am I therefore become your enemy, because I tell you the
   truth?
 
 Paul's reason for praising the Galatians is to avoid giving them the
 impression as if he were their enemy because he had reprimanded them.
 
 A true friend will admonish his erring brother, and if the erring
 brother has any sense at all he will thank his friend. In the world
 truth produces hatred. Whoever speaks the truth is counted an enemy.
 But among friends it is not so, much less among Christians. The Apostle
 wants his Galatians to know that just because he had told them the
 truth they are not to think that he dislikes them. "I told you the truth
 because I love you."
 
 
   VERSE 17. They zealously affect you, but not well.
 
 Paul takes the false apostles to task for their flattery. Satan's
 satellites softsoap the people. Paul calls it "by good words and fair
 speeches to deceive the hearts of the simple." (Romans 16:18.)
 
 They tell me that by my stubbornness in this doctrine of the Sacrament I
 am destroying the harmony of the church. They say it would be better if
 we would make some slight concession rather than cause such commotion
 and controversy in the Church regarding an article which is not even one
 of the fundamental doctrines. My reply is, cursed be any love or harmony
 which demands for its preservation that we place the Word of God in
 jeopardy!
 
 
   VERSE 17. Yea, they would exclude you, that ye might affect them.
 
 "Do you Galatians know why the false apostles are so zealous about you?
 They expect you to reciprocate. And that would leave me out. If their
 zeal were right they would not mind your loving me. But they hate my
 doctrine and want to stamp it out. In order to bring this to pass they
 go about to alienate your hearts from me and to make me obnoxious to
 you." In this way Paul brings the false apostles into suspicion. He
 questions their motives. He maintains that their zeal is mere pretense
 to deceive the Galatians. Our Savior Christ also warned us, saying:
 "Beware of false prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing."
 (Matt. 7:15.)
 
 Paul was considerably disturbed by the commissions and changes that
 followed in the wake of his preaching. He was accused of being "a
 pestilent fellow, a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the
 world." (Acts 24:5.) In Philippi the townspeople cried that he troubled
 their city and taught customs which were not lawful for them to receive.
 (Acts 16:20, 21.)
 
 All troubles, calamities, famines, wars were laid to the charge of the
 Gospel of the apostles. However, the apostles were not deterred by such
 calumnies from preaching the Gospel. They knew that they "ought to obey
 God rather than men," and that it was better for the world to be upset
 than to be ignorant of Christ.
 
 Do you think for a moment that these reactions did not worry the
 apostles? They were not made of iron. They foresaw the revolutionary
 character of the Gospel. They also foresaw the dissensions that would
 creep into the Church. It was bad news for Paul when he heard that the
 Corinthians were denying the resurrection of the dead, that the churches
 he had planted were experiencing all kinds of difficulties, and that the
 Gospel was being supplanted by false doctrines.
 
 But Paul also knew that the Gospel was not to blame. He did not resign
 his office because he knew that the Gospel he preached was the power of
 God unto salvation to every one that believes.
 
 The same criticism which was leveled at the apostles is leveled at us.
 The doctrine of the Gospel, we are told, is the cause of all the present
 unrest in the world. There is no wrong that is not laid to our charge.
 But why? We do not spread wicked lies. We preach the glad tidings of
 Christ. Our opponents will bear us out when we say that we never fail to
 urge respect for the constituted authorities, because that is the will
 of God.
 
 All of these vilifications cannot discourage us. We know that there is
 nothing the devil hates worse than the Gospel. It is one of his little
 tricks to blame the Gospel for every evil in the world. Formerly, when
 the traditions of the fathers were taught in the Church, the devil was
 not excited as he is now. It goes to show that our doctrine is of God,
 else "behemoth would lie under shady trees, in the covert of the reed,
 and fens." The fact that he is again walking about as a roaring lion to
 stir up riots and disorders is a sure sign that he has begun to feel the
 effect of our preaching.
 
 
   VERSE 18. But it is good to be zealously affected always in a good
   thing, and not only when I am present with you.
 
 "When I was present with you, you loved me, although I preached the
 Gospel to you in the infirmity of my flesh. The fact that I am now
 absent from you ought not to change your attitude towards me. Although I
 am absent in the flesh, I am with you in spirit and in my doctrine which
 you ought to retain by all means because through it you received the
 Holy Spirit."
 
 
   VERSE 19. My little children, of whom I travail in birth again until
   Christ be formed in you.
 
 With every single word the Apostle seeks to regain the confidence of the
 Galatians. He now calls them lovingly his little children. He adds the
 simile: "Of whom I travail in birth again." As parents reproduce their
 physical characteristics in their children, so the apostles reproduced
 their faith in the hearts of the hearers, until Christ was formed in
 them. A person has the form of Christ when he believes in Christ to the
 exclusion of everything else. This faith in Christ is engendered by the
 Gospel as the Apostle declares in I Corinthians 4:15: "In Christ Jesus
 I have begotten you through the Gospel"; and in II Corinthians 3:3, "Ye
 are the epistle of Christ ministered by us, written not with ink, but
 with the Spirit of the living God." The Word of God falling from the
 lips of the apostle or minister enters into the heart of the hearer.
 The Holy Ghost impregnates the Word so that it brings forth the fruit of
 faith. In this manner every Christian pastor is a spiritual father who
 forms Christ in the hearts of his hearers.
 
 At the same time Paul indicts the false apostles. He says: "I have
 begotten you Galatians through the Gospel, giving you the form of
 Christ. But these false apostles are giving you a new form, the form of
 Moses." Note the Apostle does not say, "Of whom I travail in birth again
 until I be formed in you," but "until Christ be formed in you." The
 false apostles had torn the form of Christ out of the hearts of the
 Galatians and substituted their own form. Paul endeavors to reform them,
 or rather reform Christ in them.
 
 
   VERSE 20. I desire to be present with you now, and to change my voice.
 
 A common saying has it that a letter is a dead messenger. Something is
 lacking in all writing. You can never be sure how the written page will
 affect the reader, because his mood, his circumstances, his affections
 are so changeable. It is different with the spoken word. If it is
 harsh and ill-timed it can always be remodeled. No wonder the Apostle
 expresses the wish that he could speak to the Galatians in person. He
 could change his voice according to their attitude. If he saw that they
 were repentant he could soften the tone of his voice. If he saw that
 they were stubborn he could speak to them more earnestly. This way he
 did not know how to deal with them by letter. If his Epistle is too
 severe it will do more damage than good. If it is too gentle, it will
 not correct conditions. But if he could be with them in person he could
 change his voice as the occasion demanded.
 
 
   VERSE 20. For I stand in doubt of you.
 
 "I do not know how to take you. I do not know how to approach you by
 letter." In order to make sure that he leaves no stone unturned in his
 effort to recall them to the Gospel of Christ, he chides, entreats,
 praises, and blames the Galatians, trying every way to hit the right
 note and tone of voice.
 
 
   VERSE 21. Tell me, ye that desire to be under the law, do ye not hear
   the law?
 
 Here Paul would have closed his Epistle because he did not know
 what else to say. He wishes he could see the Galatians in person and
 straighten out their difficulties. But he is not sure whether the
 Galatians have fully understood the difference between the Gospel and
 the Law. To make sure, he introduces another illustration. He knows
 people like illustrations and stories. He knows that Christ Himself made
 ample use of parables.
 
 Paul is an expert at allegories. They are dangerous things. Unless a
 person has a thorough knowledge of Christian doctrine he had better
 leave allegories alone.
 
 The allegory which Paul is about to bring is taken from the Book of
 Genesis which he calls the Law. True, that book contains no mention of
 the Law. Paul simply follows the custom of the Jews who included the
 first book of Moses in the collective term, "Law." Jesus even included
 the Psalms.
 
 
   VERSES 22, 23. For it is written, that Abraham had two sons, the one
   by a bondmaid, the other by a freewoman. But he who was of the
   bondwoman was born after the flesh; but he of the freewoman was
   by promise.
 
 This is Paul's allegory. Abraham had two sons: Ishmael by Hagar, and
 Isaac by Sarah. They were both the true sons of Abraham, with this
 difference, that Ishmael was born after the flesh, i.e., without the
 commandment and promise of God, while Isaac was born according to the
 promise.
 
 With the permission of Sarah, Abraham took Hagar, Sarah's bondwoman, to
 wife. Sarah knew that God had promised to make her husband Abraham the
 father of a nation, and she hoped that she would be the mother of this
 promised nation. But with the passage of the years her hope died out. In
 order that the promise of God should not be annulled by her barrenness
 this holy woman resigned her right and honor to her maid. This was no
 easy thing for her to do. She abased herself. She thought: "God is no
 liar. What He has promised He will perform. But perhaps God does not
 want me to be the mother of Abraham's posterity. Perhaps He prefers
 Hagar for the honor."
 
 Ishmael was thus born without a special word or promise of God, at the
 mere request of Sarah. God did not command Abraham to take Hagar, nor
 did God promise to bless the coalition. It is evident that Ishmael was
 the son of Abraham after the flesh, and not after the promise.
 
 In the ninth chapter of the Epistle to the Romans St. Paul advances
 the same argument which he amplifies into an allegory in writing to the
 Galatians. There he argues that all the children of Abraham are not the
 children of God. For Abraham had two kinds of children, children born of
 the promise, like Isaac, and other children born without the promise,
 as Ishmael. With this argument Paul squelched the proud Jews who gloried
 that they were the children of God because they were the seed and the
 children of Abraham. Paul makes it clear enough that it takes more
 than an Abrahamic pedigree to be a child of God. To be a child of God
 requires faith in Christ.
 
 
   VERSE 24. Which things are an allegory.
 
 Allegories are not very convincing, but like pictures they visualize a
 matter. If Paul had not brought in advance indisputable arguments for
 the righteousness of faith over against the righteousness of works this
 allegory would do little good. Having first fortified his case with
 invincible arguments, he can afford to inject this allegory to add
 impressiveness and beauty to his presentation.
 
 
   VERSES 24, 25. For these are the two covenants; the one from the mount
   Sinai, which gendereth to bondage, which is Agar. For this Agar is mount
   Sinai in Arabia.
 
 In this allegory Abraham represents God. Abraham had two sons, born
 respectively of Hagar and Sarah. The two women represent the two
 Testaments. The Old Testament is Mount Sinai, the bondwoman, Hagar. The
 Arabians call Mount Sinai Agar. It may be that the similarity of these
 two names gave Paul his idea for this allegory. As Hagar bore Abraham
 a son who was not an heir but a servant, so Sinai, the Law, the
 allegorical Hagar, bore God a carnal and servile people of the Law
 without promise. The Law has a promise but it is a conditional promise,
 depending upon whether people fulfill the Law.
 
 The Jews regarded the conditional promises of the Law as if they were
 unconditional. When the prophets foretold the destruction of Jerusalem,
 the Jews stoned them as blasphemers of God. They never gave it any
 thought that there was a condition attached to the Law which reads: "If
 you keep the commandments it shall be well with thee."
 
 
   VERSE 25. And answereth to Jerusalem which now is, and is in bondage
   with her children.
 
 A little while ago Paul called Mount Sinai, Hagar. He would now gladly
 make Jerusalem the Sarah of the New Testament, but he cannot. The
 earthly Jerusalem is not Sarah, but a part of Hagar. Hagar lives there
 in the home of the Law, the Temple, the priesthood, the ceremonies, and
 whatever else was ordained in the Law at Mount Sinai.
 
 I would have been tempted to call Jerusalem, Sarah, or the New
 Testament. I would have been pleased with this turn of the allegory. It
 goes to show that not everybody has the gift of allegory. Would you not
 think it perfectly proper to call Sinai Hagar and Jerusalem Sarah? True,
 Paul does call Sarah Jerusalem. But he has the spiritual and heavenly
 Jerusalem in mind, not the earthly Jerusalem. Sarah represents that
 spiritual Jerusalem where there is no Law but only the promise, and
 where the inhabitants are free.
 
 To show that the Law has been quite abolished, the earthly Jerusalem was
 completely destroyed with all her ornaments, temples, and ceremonies.
 
 
   VERSE 26. But Jerusalem which is above is free, which is the mother of
   us all.
 
 The earthly Jerusalem with its ordinances and laws represents Hagar
 and her offspring. They are slaves to the Law, sin and death. But the
 heavenly Jerusalem is Sarah, the free woman. This heavenly Jerusalem is
 the Church, that is to say the number of all believers throughout the
 world, having one and the same Gospel, one and the same faith in Christ,
 one and the same Holy Ghost, and the same sacraments.
 
 Do not mistake this one word "above" to refer to the triumphant Church
 in heaven, but to the militant Church on earth. In Philippians 3:20, the
 Apostle uses the phrase: "Our conversation is in heaven," not locally in
 heaven, but in spirit. When a believer accepts the heavenly gifts of the
 Gospel he is in heaven. So also in Ephesians 1:3, "Who hath blessed us
 with all spiritual blessings in heavenly places in Christ." Jerusalem
 here means the universal Christian Church on earth.
 
 Sarah, the Church, as the bride of Christ bears free children who are
 not subject to the Law.
 
 
   VERSE 27. For it is written, Rejoice, thou barren that bearest not;
   break forth and cry, thou that travailest not: for the desolate hath
   many more children than she which hath an husband.
 
 Paul quotes the allegorical prophecy of Isaiah to the effect that the
 mother of many children must die desolately, while the barren woman
 shall have an abundance of children. (Isaiah 54:1.) He applies this
 prophecy to Hagar and Sarah, to the Law and the Gospel. The Law as the
 husband of the fruitful woman procreates many children. For men of all
 ages have had the idea that they are right when they follow after the
 Law and outwardly perform its requirements.
 
 Although the Law has many children, they are not free. They are slaves.
 As servants they cannot have a share in the inheritance, but are driven
 from the house as Ishmael was cast out of the house of Abraham. In fact
 the servants of the Law are even now barred from the kingdom of light
 and liberty, for "he that believeth not, is condemned already." (John
 3:18.) As the servants of the Law they remain under the curse of the
 Law, under sin and death, under the power of the devil, and under the
 wrath and judgment of God.
 
 On the other hand, Sarah, the free Church, seems barren. The Gospel of
 the Cross which the Church proclaims does not have the appeal that the
 Law has for men, and therefore it does not find many adherents. The
 Church does not look prosperous. Unbelievers have always predicted the
 death of the Church. The Jews were quite certain that the Church would
 not long endure. They said to Paul: "As concerning this sect, we know
 that everywhere it is spoken against." (Acts 28:22.) No matter how
 barren and forsaken, how weak and desolate the Church may seem, she
 alone is really fruitful before God. By the Gospel she procreates an
 infinite number of children that are free heirs of everlasting life.
 
 The Law, "the old husband," is really dead. But not all people know it,
 or want to know it. They labor and bear the burden and the heat of the
 day, and bring forth many children, children that are bastards like
 themselves, children born to be put out of the house like Ishmael to
 perish forever. Accursed be that doctrine, life, and religion which
 endeavors to obtain righteousness before God by the Law and its creeds.
 
 The scholastics think that the judicial and ceremonial laws of Moses
 were abolished by the coming of Christ, but not the moral law. They are
 blind. When Paul declares that we are delivered from the curse of the
 Law he means the whole Law, particularly the moral law which more than
 the other laws accuses, curses, and condemns the conscience. The Ten
 Commandments have no right to condemn that conscience in which Jesus
 dwells, for Jesus has taken from the Ten Commandments the right and
 power to curse us.
 
 Not as if the conscience is now insensitive to the terrors of the Law,
 but the Law cannot drive the conscience to despair. "There is now no
 condemnation to them which are in Christ Jesus." (Romans 8:1.) "If the
 Son shall make you free, ye shall be free indeed." (John 8:36.)
 
 You will complain: "But I am not doing anything." That is right. You
 cannot do a thing to be delivered from the tyranny of the Law. But
 listen to the glad tidings which the Holy Ghost brings to you in the
 words of the prophet: "Rejoice, thou barren." As Christ is greater than
 the Law, so much more excellent is the righteousness of Christ than the
 righteousness of the Law.
 
 In one more respect the Law has been abolished. The civil laws of Moses
 do not concern us, and should not be put back in force. That does not
 mean that we are exempt from obedience to the civil laws under which we
 live. On the contrary, the Gospel commands Christians to obey government
 "not only for wrath, but also for conscience sake." (Romans 13:5.)
 
 Neither do the ordinances of Moses or those of the Pope concern us. But
 because life cannot go on without some ordinances, the Gospel permits
 regulations to be made in the Church in regard to special days, times,
 places, etc., in order that the people may know upon what day, at what
 hour, and in what place to assemble for the Word of God. Such directions
 are desirable that "all things be done decently and in order." (I Cor.
 14:40.) These directions may be changed or omitted altogether, as long
 as no offense is given to the weak.
 
 Paul, however, refers particularly to the abolition of the moral law. If
 faith alone in Christ justifies, then the whole Law is abolished without
 exception. And this the Apostle proves by the testimony of Isaiah, who
 bids the barren to rejoice because she will have many children, whereas
 she that has a husband and many children will be forsaken.
 
 Isaiah calls the Church barren because her children are born without
 effort by the Word of faith through the Spirit of God. It is a matter of
 birth, not of exertion. The believer too works, but not in an effort to
 become a son and an heir of God. He is that before he goes to work. He
 is born a son and an heir. He works for the glory of God and the welfare
 of his fellowmen.
 
 
   VERSE 28. Now we, brethren, as Isaac was, are the children of promise.
 
 The Jews claimed to be the children of God because they were the
 children of Abraham. Jesus answered them, John 8:39, 40, "If ye were
 Abraham's children, ye would do the works of Abraham. But now ye seek to
 kill me, a man that hath told you the truth." And in verse 42: "If God
 were your Father, ye would love me." In other words: "You are not the
 children of God. If you were, you would know and love me. Brothers born
 and living together in the same house recognize each other. You do not
 recognize me. You are of your father, the devil."
 
 We are not like these Jews, the children of the bondwoman, the Law, who
 were cast out of the house by Jesus. We are children of the promise like
 Isaac, born of grace and faith unto an everlasting inheritance.
 
 
   VERSE 29. But as that he that was born after the flesh persecuted him
   that was born after the Spirit, even so it is now.
 
 This is a cheering thought. We who are born of the Gospel, and live in
 Christ, and rejoice in our inheritance, have Ishmael for our enemy. The
 children of the Law will always persecute the children of the Gospel.
 This is our daily experience. Our opponents tell us that everything was
 at peace before the Gospel was revived by us. Since then the whole world
 has been upset. People blame us and the Gospel for everything, for
 the disobedience of subjects to their rulers, for wars, plagues, and
 famines, for revolutions, and every other evil that can be imagined.
 No wonder our opponents think they are doing God a favor by hating and
 persecuting us. Ishmael will persecute Isaac.
 
 We invite our opponents to tell us what good things attended the
 preaching of the Gospel by the apostles. Did not the destruction of
 Jerusalem follow on the heels of the Gospel? And how about the overthrow
 of the Roman Empire? Did not the whole world seethe with unrest as the
 Gospel was preached in the whole world? We do not say that the Gospel
 instigated these upheavals. The iniquity of man did it.
 
 Our opponents blame our doctrine for the present turmoil. But ours is a
 doctrine of grace and peace. It does not stir up trouble. Trouble starts
 when the people, the nations and their rulers of the earth rage and take
 counsel together against the Lord, and against His anointed. (Psalm 2.)
 But all their counsels shall be brought to naught. "He that sitteth in
 the heavens shall laugh: the Lord shall have them in derision." (Psalm
 2:4.) Let them cry out against us as much as they like. We know that
 they are the cause of all their own troubles.
 
 As long as we preach Christ and confess Him to be our Savior, we must be
 content to be called vicious trouble makers. "These that have turned the
 world upside down are come hither also; and these all do contrary to the
 decrees of Caesar," so said the Jews of Paul and Silas. (Acts 17:6, 7.)
 Of Paul they said: "We have found this man a pestilent fellow, and
 a mover of sedition among all the Jews throughout the world, and a
 ringleader of the sect of the Nazarenes." The Gentiles uttered similar
 complaints: "These men do exceedingly trouble our city."
 
 This man Luther is also accused of being a pestilent fellow who troubles
 the papacy and the Roman empire. If I would keep silent, all would be
 well, and the Pope would no more persecute me. The moment I open my
 mouth the Pope begins to fume and to rage. It seems we must choose
 between Christ and the Pope. Let the Pope perish.
 
 Christ foresaw the reaction of the world to the Gospel. He said: "I
 am come to send fire on the earth, and what will I, if it be already
 kindled?" (Luke 12:49.)
 
 Do not take the statement of our opponents seriously, that no good can
 come of the preaching of the Gospel. What do they know? They would not
 recognize the fruits of the Gospel if they saw them.
 
 At any rate, our opponents cannot accuse us of adultery, murder, theft,
 and such crimes. The worst they can say about us is that we have the
 Gospel. What is wrong with the Gospel? We teach that Christ, the Son
 of God, has redeemed us from sin and everlasting death. This is not our
 doctrine. It belongs to Christ. If there is anything wrong with it, it
 is not our fault. If they want to condemn Christ for being our Savior
 and Redeemer, that is their lookout. We are mere onlookers, watching to
 see who will win the victory, Christ or His opponents.
 
 On one occasion Jesus remarked: "If ye were of the world, the world
 would love his own, but because ye are not of the world, but I have
 chosen you out of the world, therefore the world hateth you." (John
 15:19.) In other words: "I am the cause of all your troubles. I am the
 one for whose sake you are killed. If you did not confess my name, the
 world would not hate you. The servant is not greater than his lord. If
 they have persecuted me, they will also persecute you."
 
 Christ takes all the blame. He says: "You have not incurred the hatred
 and persecutions of the world. I have. But be of good cheer; I have
 overcome the world."
 
 
   VERSE 30. Nevertheless what saith the Scripture? Cast out the
   bondwoman and her son: for the son of the bondwoman shall not be heir
   with the son of the free woman.
 
 Sarah's demand that the bondwoman and her son be cast out of the house
 was undoubtedly a blow to Abraham. He felt sorry for his son Ishmael.
 The Scripture explicitly states Abraham's grief in the words: "And the
 thing was very grievous in Abraham's sight, because of his son." (Gen.
 21:11.) But God approved Sarah's action and said to Abraham: "Let it
 not be grievous in thy sight because of the lad, and because of thy
 bondwoman; in all that Sarah hath said unto thee, hearken unto her
 voice; for in Isaac shall thy seed be called." (Gen. 21:12.)
 
 The Holy Ghost contemptuously calls the admirers of the Law the children
 of the bondwoman. "If you do not know your mother, I will tell you what
 kind of a woman she is. She is a slave. And you are slaves. You are
 slaves of the Law and therefore slaves of sin, death, and everlasting
 damnation. You are not fit to be heirs. You are put out of the house."
 
 This is the sentence which God pronounces upon the Ishmaelites, the
 papists, and all others who trust in their own merits, and persecute
 the Church of Christ. Because they are slaves and persecutors of the
 children of the free woman, they shall be cast out of the house of
 God forever. They shall have no inheritance with the children of the
 promise. This sentence stands forever.
 
 This sentence affects not only those popes, cardinals bishops, and
 monks who were notoriously wicked and made their bellies their Gods.
 It strikes, also, those who lived in all sincerity to please God and to
 merit the forgiveness of their sins through a life of self-denial. Even
 these will be cast out, because they are children of the bondwoman.
 
 Our opponents do not defend their own moral delinquency. The better ones
 deplore and abhor it. But they defend and uphold their doctrine of
 works which is of the devil. Our quarrel is not with those who live in
 manifest sins. Our quarrel is with those among them who think they live
 like angels, claiming that they do not only perform the Ten Commandments
 of God, but also the sayings of Christ, and many good works that God
 does not expect of them. We quarrel with them because they refuse to
 have Jesus' merit count alone for righteousness.
 
 St. Bernard was one of the best of the medieval saints. He lived a
 chaste and holy life. But when it came to dying he did not trust in his
 chaste life for salvation. He prayed: "I have lived a wicked life. But
 Thou, Lord Jesus, hast a heaven to give unto me. First, because Thou art
 the Son of God. Secondly, because Thou hast purchased heaven for me by
 Thy suffering and death. Thou givest heaven to me, not because I earned
 it, but because Thou hast earned it for me." If any of the Romanists
 are saved it is because they forget their good deeds and merits and feel
 like Paul: "Not having mine own righteousness which is of the law, but
 that which is through the faith of Christ." (Phil. 3:9.)
 
 
   VERSE 31. So then, brethren, we are not children of the bondwoman, but
   of the free.
 
 With this sentence the Apostle Paul concludes his allegory of the barren
 Church. This sentence forms a clear rejection of the righteousness of
 the Law and a confirmation of the doctrine of justification. In the next
 chapter Paul lays special stress upon the freedom which the children of
 the free woman enjoy. He treats of Christian liberty, the knowledge of
 which is very necessary. The liberty which Christ purchased for us is a
 bulwark to us in our battle against spiritual tyranny. Therefore we must
 carefully study this doctrine of Christian liberty, not only for the
 confirmation of the doctrine of justification, but also for the comfort
 and encouragement of those who are weak in faith.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 5
 
 
 IN this chapter the Apostle Paul presents the doctrine of Christian
 liberty in a final effort to persuade the Galatians to give up the
 nefarious doctrine of the false apostles. To accomplish his purpose he
 adduces threats and promises, trying in every way possible to keep them
 in the liberty which Christ purchased for them.
 
 
   VERSE 1. Stand fast therefore in the liberty wherewith Christ hath made
   us free.
 
 "Be steadfast, not careless. Lie not down and sleep, but stand up. Be
 watchful. Hold fast the liberty wherewith Christ hath made you free."
 Those who loll cannot keep this liberty. Satan hates the light of the
 Gospel. When it begins to shine a little he fights against it with might
 and main.
 
 What liberty does Paul mean? Not civil liberty (for which we have the
 government to thank), but the liberty which Christ has procured for us.
 
 At one time the emperor was compelled to grant to the bishop of Rome
 certain immunities and privileges. This is civil liberty. That liberty
 exempts the clergy from certain public charges. Then there is also
 another kind of "liberty," when people obey neither the laws of God nor
 the laws of men, but do as they please. This carnal liberty the people
 want in our day. We are not now speaking of this liberty. Neither are we
 speaking of civil liberty.
 
 Paul is speaking of a far better liberty, the liberty "wherewith Christ
 hath made us free," not from material bonds, not from the Babylonian
 captivity, not from the tyranny of the Turks, but from the eternal wrath
 of God.
 
 Where is this liberty?
 
 In the conscience.
 
 Our conscience is free and quiet because it no longer has to fear the
 wrath of God. This is real liberty, compared with which every other kind
 of liberty is not worth mentioning. Who can adequately express the boon
 that comes to a person when he has the heart-assurance that God will
 nevermore be angry with him, but will forever be merciful to him for
 Christ's sake? This is indeed a marvelous liberty, to have the sovereign
 God for our Friend and Father who will defend, maintain, and save us in
 this life and in the life to come.
 
 As an outgrowth of this liberty, we are at the same time free from the
 Law, sin, death, the power of the devil, hell, etc. Since the wrath of
 God has been assuaged by Christ no Law, sin, or death may now accuse and
 condemn us. These foes of ours will continue to frighten us, but not too
 much. The worth of our Christian liberty cannot be exaggerated.
 
 Our conscience must be trained to fall back on the freedom purchased
 for us by Christ. Though the fears of the Law, the terrors of sin, the
 horror of death assail us occasionally, we know that these feelings
 shall not endure, because the prophet quotes God as saying: "In a
 little wrath I hid my face from thee for a moment: but with everlasting
 kindness will I have mercy on thee." (Isa. 54:8.)
 
 We shall appreciate this liberty all the more when we bear in mind
 that it was Jesus Christ, the Son of God, who purchased it with His own
 blood. Hence, Christ's liberty is given us not by the Law, or for our
 own righteousness, but freely for Christ's sake. In the eighth chapter
 of the Gospel of St. John, Jesus declares: "If the Son shall make you
 free, ye shall be free indeed." He only stands between us and the evils
 which trouble and afflict us and which He has overcome for us.
 
 Reason cannot properly evaluate this gift. Who can fully appreciate
 the blessing of the forgiveness of sins and of everlasting life? Our
 opponents claim that they also possess this liberty. But they do not.
 When they are put to the test all their self-confidence slips from them.
 What else can they expect when they trust in works and not in the Word
 of God?
 
 Our liberty is founded on Christ Himself, who sits at the right hand of
 God and intercedes for us. Therefore our liberty is sure and valid
 as long as we believe in Christ. As long as we cling to Him with a
 steadfast faith we possess His priceless gifts. But if we are careless
 and indifferent we shall lose them. It is not without good reason
 that Paul urges us to watch and to stand fast. He knew that the devil
 delights in taking this liberty away from us.
 
 
   VERSE 1. And be not entangled again with the yoke of bondage.
 
 Because reason prefers the righteousness of the Law to the righteousness
 of faith, Paul calls the Law a yoke, a yoke of bondage. Peter also
 calls it a yoke. "Why tempt ye God, to put a yoke upon the neck of the
 disciples which neither our fathers nor we were able to bear?" (Acts
 15:10.)
 
 In this passage Paul again disparages the pernicious notion that the
 Law is able to make men righteous before God, a notion deeply rooted in
 man's reason. All mankind is so wrapped up in this idea that it is hard
 to drag it out of people. Paul compares those who seek to be justified
 by the Law to oxen that are hitched to the yoke. Like oxen that toil in
 the yoke all day, and in the evening are turned out to graze along the
 dusty road, and at last are marked for slaughter when they no longer
 can draw the burden, so those who seek to be justified by the Law are
 "entangled with the yoke of bondage," and when they have grown old
 and broken-down in the service of the Law they have earned for their
 perpetual reward God's wrath and everlasting torment.
 
 We are not now treating of an unimportant matter. It is a matter that
 involves everlasting liberty or everlasting slavery. For as a liberation
 from God's wrath through the kind office of Christ is not a passing
 boon, but a permanent blessing, so also the yoke of the Law is not a
 temporary but an everlasting affliction.
 
 Rightly are the doers of the Law called devil's martyrs. They take more
 pains to earn hell than the martyrs of Christ to obtain heaven. Theirs
 is a double misfortune. First they torture themselves on earth with
 self-inflicted penances and finally when they die they gain the reward
 of eternal damnation.
 
 
   VERSE 2. Behold, I Paul say unto you, that if ye be circumcised, Christ
   shall profit you nothing.
 
 Paul is incensed at the thought of the tyranny of the Law. His
 antagonism to the Law is a personal matter with him. "Behold, I, Paul,"
 he says, "I who have received the Gospel not from men, but by the
 revelation of Jesus Christ: I who have been commissioned from above
 to preach the Gospel to you: I Paul say to you, If you submit to
 circumcision Christ will profit you nothing." Paul emphatically declares
 that for the Galatians to be circumcised would mean for them to lose the
 benefits of Christ's suffering and death. This passage may well serve as
 a criterion for all the religions. To teach that besides faith in Christ
 other devices like works, or the observance of rules, traditions,
 or ceremonies are necessary for the attainment of righteousness and
 everlasting life, is to make Christ and His salvation of no benefit to
 anybody.
 
 This passage is an indictment of the whole papacy. All priests, monks,
 and nuns--and I am now speaking of the best of them--who repose their
 hope for salvation in their own works, and not in Christ, whom they
 imagine to be an angry judge, hear this sentence pronounced against them
 that Christ shall profit them nothing. If one can earn the forgiveness
 of sins and everlasting life through one's own efforts to what purpose
 was Christ born? What was the purpose of His suffering and death, His
 resurrection, His victory over sin, death, and the devil, if men may
 overcome these evils by their own endeavor? Tongue cannot express, nor
 heart conceive what a terrible thing it is to make Christ worthless.
 
 The person who is not moved by these considerations to leave the Law and
 the confidence in his own righteousness for the liberty in Christ, has a
 heart that is harder than stone and iron.
 
 Paul does not condemn circumcision in itself. Circumcision is not
 injurious to the person who does not ascribe any particular importance
 to it. Neither are works injurious provided a person does not attach
 any saving value to them. The Apostle does not say that works are
 objectionable, but to build one's hopes for righteousness on works is
 disastrous, for that makes Christ good for nothing.
 
 Let us bear this in mind when the devil accuses our conscience. When
 that dragon accuses us of having done no good at all, but only evil, say
 to him: "You trouble me with the remembrance of my past sins; you remind
 me that I have done no good. But this does not bother me, because if I
 were to trust in my own good deeds, or despair because I have done no
 good deeds, Christ would profit me neither way. I am not going to make
 him unprofitable to me. This I would do, if I should presume to purchase
 for myself the favor of God and everlasting life by my good deeds, or if
 I should despair of my salvation because of my sins."
 
 
   VERSE 3. For I testify again to every man that is circumcised, that he
   is a debtor to do the whole law.
 
 The first fault with circumcision is that it makes Christ unprofitable.
 The second fault is that it obligates those who are circumcised to
 observe the whole Law. Paul is so very much in earnest about this matter
 that he confirms it with an oath. "I testify," he says, "I swear by the
 living God." Paul's statement may be explained negatively to mean: "I
 testify to every man who is being circumcised that he cannot perform
 the Law in any point. In the very act of circumcision he is not being
 circumcised, and in the very act of fulfilling the Law he fulfills it
 not." This seems to be the simple meaning of Paul's statement. Later on
 in the sixth chapter he explicitly states, "They themselves which are
 circumcised keep not the law. The fact that you are circumcised does
 not mean you are righteous and free from the Law. The truth is that by
 circumcision you have become debtors and servants of the Law. The more
 you endeavor to perform the Law, the more you will become tangled up in
 the yoke of the Law."
 
 The truth of this I have experienced in myself and in others. I have
 seen many work themselves down to the bones in their hungry effort to
 obtain peace of conscience. But the harder they tried the more they
 worried. Especially in the presence of death they were so uneasy that I
 have seen murderers die with better grace and courage.
 
 This holds true also in regard to the church regulations. When I was a
 monk I tried ever so hard to live up to the strict rules of my order.
 I used to make a list of my sins, and I was always on the way to
 confession, and whatever penances were enjoined upon me I performed
 religiously. In spite of it all, my conscience was always in a fever of
 doubt. The more I sought to help my poor stricken conscience the
 worse it got. The more I paid attention to the regulations the more I
 transgressed them.
 
 Hence those that seek to be justified by the Law are much further away
 from the righteousness of life than the publicans, sinners, and harlots.
 They know better than to trust in their own works. They know that they
 cannot ever hope to obtain forgiveness by their sins.
 
 Paul's statement in this verse may be taken to mean that those who
 submit to circumcision are thereby submitting to the whole Law. To obey
 Moses in one point requires obedience to him in all points. It does no
 good to say that only circumcision is necessary, and not the rest
 of Moses' laws. The same reasons that obligate a person to accept
 circumcision also obligate a person to accept the whole Law. Thus to
 acknowledge the Law is tantamount to declaring that Christ is not yet
 come. And if Christ is not yet come, then all the Jewish ceremonies and
 laws concerning meats, places, and times are still in force, and Christ
 must be awaited as one who is still to come. The whole Scripture,
 however, testifies that Christ has come, that by His death He has
 abolished the Law, and that He has fulfilled all things which the
 prophets have foretold about Him.
 
 Some would like to subjugate us to certain parts of the Mosaic Law. But
 this is not to be permitted under any circumstances. If we permit Moses
 to rule over us in one thing, we must obey him in all things.
 
 
   VERSE 4. Christ is become of no effect unto you, whosoever of you are
   justified by the law; ye are fallen from grace.
 
 Paul in this verse discloses that he is not speaking so much of
 circumcision as the trust which men repose in the outward act. We can
 hear him say: "I do not condemn the Law in itself; what I condemn is
 that men seek to be justified by the Law, as if Christ were still to
 come, or as if He alone were unable to justify sinners. It is this that
 I condemn, because it makes Christ of no effect. It makes you void of
 Christ so that Christ is not in you, nor can you be partakers of the
 knowledge, the spirit, the fellowship, the liberty, the life, or the
 achievements of Christ. You are completely separated from Him, so much
 so that He has nothing to do with you any more, or for that matter you
 with Him." Can anything worse be said against the Law? If you think
 Christ and the Law can dwell together in your heart, you may be sure
 that Christ dwells not in your heart. For if Christ is in your heart He
 neither condemns you, nor does He ever bid you to trust in your own good
 works. If you know Christ at all, you know that good works do not serve
 unto righteousness, nor evil works unto condemnation. I do not want to
 withhold from good works their due praise, nor do I wish to encourage
 evil works. But when it comes to justification, I say, we must
 concentrate upon Christ alone, or else we make Him non-effective. You
 must choose between Christ and the righteousness of the Law. If you
 choose Christ you are righteous before God. If you stick to the Law,
 Christ is of no use to you.
 
 
   VERSE 4. Ye are fallen from grace.
 
 That means you are no longer in the kingdom or condition of grace. When
 a person on board ship falls into the sea and is drowned it makes no
 difference from which end or side of the ship he falls into the water.
 Those who fall from grace perish no matter how they go about it. Those
 who seek to be justified by the Law are fallen from grace and are in
 grave danger of eternal death. If this holds true in the case of those
 who seek to be justified by the moral Law, what will become of those,
 I should like to know, who endeavor to be justified by their own
 regulations and vows? They will fall to the very bottom of hell. "Oh,
 no," they say, "we will fly straight into heaven. If you live according
 to the rules of Saint Francis, Saint Dominick, Saint Benedict, you will
 obtain the peace and mercy of God. If you perform the vows of chastity,
 obedience, etc., you will be rewarded with everlasting life." Let these
 playthings of the devil go to the place where they came from and listen
 to what Paul has to say in this verse in accordance with Christ's own
 teaching: "He that believeth in the Son of God, hath everlasting life;
 but he that believeth not in the Son shall not see life, but the wrath
 of God abideth in him."
 
 The words, "Ye are fallen from grace," must not be taken lightly. They
 are important. To fall from grace means to lose the atonement, the
 forgiveness of sins, the righteousness, liberty, and life which Jesus
 has merited for us by His death and resurrection. To lose the grace of
 God means to gain the wrath and judgment of God, death, the bondage of
 the devil, and everlasting condemnation.
 
 
   VERSE 6. For we through the Spirit wait for the hope of righteousness
   by faith.
 
 Paul concludes the whole matter with the above statement. "You want to
 be justified by the Law, by circumcision, and by works. We cannot see
 it. To be justified by such means would make Christ of no value to us.
 We would be obliged to perform the whole law. We rather through the
 Spirit wait for the hope of righteousness." The Apostle is not satisfied
 to say "justified by faith." He adds hope to faith.
 
 Holy Writ speaks of hope in two ways: as the object of the emotion, and
 hope as the emotion itself. In the first chapter of the Epistle to the
 Colossians we have an instance of its first use: "For the hope which is
 laid up for you in heaven," i.e., the thing hoped for. In the sense of
 emotion we quote the passage from the eighth chapter of the Epistle to
 the Romans: "For we are saved by hope." As Paul uses the term "hope"
 here in writing to the Galatians, we may take it in either of its two
 meanings. We may understand Paul to say, "We wait in spirit, through
 faith, for the righteousness that we hope for, which in due time will be
 revealed to us." Or we may understand Paul to say: "We wait in Spirit,
 by faith for righteousness with great hope and desire." True, we are
 righteous, but our righteousness is not yet revealed; as long as we live
 here sin stays with us, not to forget the law in our members striving
 against the law of our mind. When sin rages in our body and we through
 the Spirit wrestle against it, then we have cause for hope. We are not
 yet perfectly righteous. Perfect righteousness is still to be attained.
 Hence we hope for it.
 
 This is sweet comfort for us. And we are to make use of it in comforting
 the afflicted. We are to say to them: "Brother, you would like to feel
 God's favor as you feel your sin. But you are asking too much. Your
 righteousness rests on something much better than feelings. Wait and
 hope until it will be revealed to you in the Lord's own time. Don't go
 by your feelings, but go by the doctrine of faith, which pledges Christ
 to you."
 
 The question occurs to us, What difference is there between faith and
 hope? We find it difficult to see any difference. Faith and hope are
 so closely linked that they cannot be separated. Still there is a
 difference between them.
 
   First, hope and faith differ in regard to their sources. Faith
   originates in the understanding, while hope rises in the will.
 
   Secondly, they differ in regard to their functions. Faith says what is
   to be done. Faith teaches, describes, directs. Hope exhorts the mind
   to be strong and courageous.
 
   Thirdly, they differ in regard to their objectives. Faith concentrates
   on the truth. Hope looks to the goodness of God.
 
   Fourthly, they differ in sequence. Faith is the beginning of life before
   tribulation. (Hebrews 11.) Hope comes later and is born of tribulation.
   (Romans 5.)
 
   Fifthly, they differ in regard to their effects. Faith is a judge. It
   judges errors. Hope is a soldier. It fights against tribulations, the
   Cross, despondency, despair, and waits for better things to come in the
   midst of evil.
 Without hope faith cannot endure. On the other hand, hope without faith
 is blind rashness and arrogance because it lacks knowledge. Before
 anything else a Christian must have the insight of faith, so that the
 intellect may know its directions in the day of trouble and the heart
 may hope for better things. By faith we begin, by hope we continue.
 
 This passage contains excellent doctrine and much comfort. It declares
 that we are justified not by works, sacrifices, or ceremonies, but by
 Christ alone. The world may judge certain things to be ever so good;
 without Christ they are all wrong. Circumcision and the law and good
 works are carnal. "We," says Paul, "are above such things. We possess
 Christ by faith and in the midst of our afflictions we hopefully wait
 for the consummation of our righteousness."
 
 You may say, "The trouble is I don't feel as if I am righteous." You
 must not feel, but believe. Unless you believe that you are righteous,
 you do Christ a great wrong, for He has cleansed you by the washing
 of regeneration, He died for you so that through Him you may obtain
 righteousness and everlasting life.
 
 
   VERSE 6. For in Jesus Christ neither circumcision availeth any thing,
   nor uncircumcision, but faith which worketh by love.
 
 Faith must of course be sincere. It must be a faith that performs good
 works through love. If faith lacks love it is not true faith. Thus
 the Apostle bars the way of hypocrites to the kingdom of Christ on
 all sides. He declares on the one hand, "In Christ Jesus circumcision
 availeth nothing," i.e., works avail nothing, but faith alone, and that
 without any merit whatever, avails before God. On the other hand, the
 Apostle declares that without fruits faith serves no purpose. To think,
 "If faith justifies without works, let us work nothing," is to despise
 the grace of God. Idle faith is not justifying faith. In this terse
 manner Paul presents the whole life of a Christian. Inwardly it consists
 in faith towards God, outwardly in love towards our fellow-men.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Ye did run well; who did hinder you that ye should not obey
   the truth?
 
 This is plain speaking. Paul asserts that he teaches the same truth now
 which he has always taught, and that the Galatians ran well as long as
 they obeyed the truth. But now, misled by the false apostles, they no
 longer run. He compares the Christian life to a race. When everything
 runs along smoothly the Hebrews spoke of it as a race. "Ye did run
 well," means that everything went along smoothly and happily with the
 Galatians. They lived a Christian life and were on the right way to
 everlasting life. The words, "Ye did run well," are encouraging indeed.
 Often our lives seem to creep rather than to run. But if we abide in the
 true doctrine and walk in the spirit, we have nothing to worry about.
 God judges our lives differently. What may seem to us a life slow in
 Christian development may seem to God a life of rapid progression in
 grace.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Who did hinder you that ye should not obey the truth?
 The Galatians were hindered in the Christian life when they turned
 from faith and grace to the Law. Covertly the Apostle blames the false
 apostles for impeding the Christian progress of the Galatians. The false
 apostles persuaded the Galatians to believe that they were in error and
 that they had made little or no progress under the influence of Paul.
 Under the baneful influence of the false apostles the Galatians thought
 they were well off and advancing rapidly in Christian knowledge and
 living.
 
 
   VERSE 8. This persuasion cometh not of him that calleth you.
 
 Paul explains how those who had been deceived by false teachers may be
 restored to spiritual health. The false apostles were amiable fellows.
 Apparently they surpassed Paul in learning and godliness. The Galatians
 were easily deceived by outward appearances. They supposed they were
 being taught by Christ Himself. Paul proved to them that their new
 doctrine was not of Christ, but of the devil. In this way he succeeded
 in regaining many. We also are able to win back many from the errors
 into which they were seduced by showing that their beliefs are
 imaginary, wicked, and contrary to the Word of God.
 
 The devil is a cunning persuader. He knows how to enlarge the smallest
 sin into a mountain until we think we have committed the worst crime
 ever committed on earth. Such stricken consciences must be comforted and
 set straight as Paul corrected the Galatians by showing them that their
 opinion is not of Christ because it runs counter to the Gospel, which
 describes Christ as a meek and merciful Savior.
 
 Satan will circumvent the Gospel and explain Christ in this his own
 diabolical way: "Indeed Christ is meek, gentle, and merciful, but only
 to those who are holy and righteous. If you are a sinner you stand no
 chance. Did not Christ say that unbelievers are already damned? And did
 not Christ perform many good deeds, and suffer many evils patiently,
 bidding us to follow His example? You do not mean to say that your life
 is in accord with Christ's precepts or example? You are a sinner. You
 are no good at all."
 
 Satan is to be answered in this way: The Scriptures present Christ in a
 twofold aspect. First, as a gift. "He of God is made unto us wisdom, and
 righteousness, and sanctification and redemption." (I Cor. 1:30.) Hence
 my many and grievous sins are nullified if I believe in Him. Secondly,
 the Scriptures present Christ for our example. As an exemplar He is to
 be placed before me only at certain times. In times of joy and gladness
 that I may have Him as a mirror to reflect upon my shortcomings. But in
 the day of trouble I will have Christ only as a gift. I will not listen
 to anything else, except that Christ died for my sins.
 
 To those that are cast down on account of their sins Christ must be
 introduced as a Savior and Gift, and not as an example. But to sinners
 who live in a false assurance, Christ must be introduced as an example.
 The hard sayings of Scripture and the awful judgments of God upon sin
 must be impressed upon them. Defy Satan in times of despair. Say: "O
 cursed Satan, you choose a nice time to talk to me about doing and
 working when you know very well that I am in trouble over my sins. I
 will not listen to you. I will listen to Christ, who says that He came
 into the world to save sinners. This is the true Christ and there is
 none other. I can find plenty of examples for a holy life in Abraham,
 Isaiah, John the Baptist, Paul, and other saints. But they cannot
 forgive my sins. They cannot save me. They cannot procure for me
 everlasting life. Therefore I will not have you for my teacher, O
 Satan."
 
 
   VERSE 9. A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump.
 
 Paul's concern for them meant nothing to some of the Galatians. Many had
 disowned him as their teacher and gone over to the false apostles.
 No doubt the false apostles took every occasion to defame Paul as a
 stubborn and contemptuous fellow who thought nothing of disrupting the
 unity of the churches for no other reason than his selfish pride and
 jealousy.
 
 Others of the Galatians perhaps saw no harm in deviating a trifle from
 the doctrine of justification and faith. When they noticed that Paul
 made so much ado about a matter that seemed of no particular importance
 to them they raised their eyebrows and thought within themselves: "What
 if we did deviate a little from the doctrine of Paul? What if we are
 a little to blame? He ought to overlook the whole matter, and not make
 such an issue out of it, lest the unity of the churches be disturbed."
 To this Paul replies: "A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump."
 
 Our opponents record the same complaints about us. They put us down as
 contentious, ill-tempered faultfinders. But these are the crafty passes
 of the devil, with which he seeks to overthrow our faith. We answer with
 Paul: "A little leaven leaveneth the whole lump."
 
 Small faults grow into big faults. To tolerate a trifling error
 inevitably leads to crass heresy. The doctrine of the Bible is not ours
 to take or to allow liberties with. We have no right to change even a
 tittle of it. When it comes to life we are ready to do, to suffer, to
 forgive anything our opponents demand as long as faith and doctrine
 remain pure and uncorrupt. The Apostle James says, "For whosoever shall
 keep the whole law and yet offend in one point, he is guilty of all."
 This passage supports us over against our critics who claim that we
 disregard all charity to the great injury of the churches. We protest we
 desire nothing more than peace with all men. If they would only permit
 us to keep our doctrine of faith! The pure doctrine takes precedence
 before charity, apostles, or an angel from heaven.
 
 Let others praise charity and concord to the skies; we magnify the
 authority of the Word and faith. Charity may be neglected at times
 without peril, but not the Word and faith. Charity suffers all things,
 it gives in. Faith suffers nothing; it never yields. Charity is often
 deceived but is never put out because it has nothing to lose; it
 continues to do well even to the ungrateful. When it comes to faith
 and salvation in the midst of lies and errors that parade as truth and
 deceive many, charity has no voice or vote. Let us not be influenced
 by the popular cry for charity and unity. If we do not love God and His
 Word what difference does it make if we love anything at all?
 
 Paul, therefore, admonishes both teachers and hearers not to esteem
 lightly the doctrine of faith as if it were a toy with which to amuse
 oneself in idle hours.
 
 
   VERSE 10. l have confidence in you through the Lord.
 
 "I have taught, admonished, and reproved you enough. I hope the best for
 you."
 
 The question occurs to us whether Paul did well to trust the Galatians.
 Does not Holy Writ forbid us to trust in men? Faith trusts in God and is
 never wrong. Charity trusts in men and is often wrong. This charitable
 trust in man is necessary to life. Without it life would be impossible
 in the world. What kind of life would ours be if nobody could trust
 anybody else? True Christians are more ready to believe in men than the
 children of this world. Such charitable confidence is the fruit of the
 Spirit. Paul had such trust in the Galatians although they had forsaken
 his doctrine. He trusts them "through the Lord," insofar as they were in
 Christ and Christ in them. Once they had forsaken Christ altogether, the
 Apostle will trust the Galatians no longer.
 
 
   VERSE 10. That ye will be none otherwise minded.
 
 "Not minded otherwise than I have taught you. In other words, I have
 confidence that you will accept no doctrine that is contrary to the one
 you have learned from me."
 
 
   VERSE 10. But he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment, whosoever
   he be.
 
 Paul assumes the role of a judge and condemns the false apostles as
 troublers of the Galatians. He wants to frighten the Galatians with his
 severe judgments of the false apostles into avoiding false doctrine like
 a contagious disease. We can hear him say to the Galatians: "Why do you
 give these pestilent fellows a hearing in the first place? They only
 trouble you. The doctrine they bring causes your conscience only
 trouble."
 
 The clause, "whosoever he be," seems to indicate that the false apostles
 in outward appearance at least were very good and devout men. It may be
 that among them was some outstanding disciple of the apostles, a man
 of fame and authority. The Apostle must have been faced by this very
 situation, otherwise his vehemence would have been uncalled for. No
 doubt many of the Galatians were taken back with the vehemency of the
 Apostle. They perhaps thought: why should he be so stubborn in such
 small matters? Why is he so quick to pronounce damnation upon his
 brethren in the ministry?
 
 I cannot say it often enough, that we must carefully differentiate
 between doctrine and life. Doctrine is a piece of heaven, life is a
 piece of earth. Life is sin, error, uncleanness, misery, and charity
 must forbear, believe, hope, and suffer all things. Forgiveness of
 sins must be continuous so that sin and error may not be defended and
 sustained. But with doctrine there must be no error, no need of pardon.
 There can be no comparison between doctrine and life. The least little
 point of doctrine is of greater importance than heaven and earth.
 Therefore we cannot allow the least jot of doctrine to be corrupted.
 We may overlook the offenses and errors of life, for we daily sin much.
 Even the saints sin, as they themselves confess in the Lord's Prayer and
 in the Creed. But our doctrine, God be praised, is pure, because all the
 articles of our faith are grounded on the Holy Scriptures.
 
 
   VERSE 11. And I, brethren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet
   suffer persecution? then is the offense of the cross ceased.
 
 In his great desire to recall the Galatians, Paul draws himself into
 the argument. He says: "Because I refuse to recognize circumcision as
 a factor in our salvation, I have brought upon myself the hatred and
 persecution of my whole nation. If I were to acknowledge circumcision
 the Jews would cease to persecute me; in fact they would love and praise
 me. But because I preach the Gospel of Christ and the righteousness of
 faith I must suffer persecution. The false apostles know how to avoid
 the Cross and the deadly hatred of the Jewish nation. They preach
 circumcision and thus retain the favor of the Jews. If they had their
 way they would ignore all differences in doctrine and preserve unity at
 all cost. But their unionistic dreams cannot be realized without loss
 to the pure doctrine of the Cross. It would be too bad if the offense
 of the Cross were to cease." To the Corinthians he expressed the same
 conviction: "Christ sent me...to preach the gospel: not with wisdom of
 words, lest the cross of Christ should be made of none effect." (I Cor.
 1:17.)
 
 Here someone may be tempted to call the Christians crazy. Deliberately
 to court danger by preaching and confessing the truth, and thus to bring
 upon ourselves the hatred and enmity of the whole world, is this not
 madness? But Paul does not mind the enmity of the world. It made him all
 the bolder to confess Christ. The enmity of the world in his estimation
 augurs well for the success and growth of the Church, which fares best
 in times of persecution. When the offense of the Cross ceases, when the
 rage of the enemies of the Cross abates, when everything is quiet, it is
 a sign that the devil is the door-keeper of the Church and that the pure
 doctrine of God's Word has been lost.
 
 Saint Bernard observed that the Church is in best shape when Satan
 assaults it on every side by trickery and violence; and in worst shape
 when it is at peace. In support of his statement he quotes the passage
 from the song of Hezekiah: "Behold, for peace I had great bitterness."
 Paul looks with suspicion upon any doctrine that does not provoke
 antagonism.
 
 Persecution always follows on the heels of the Word of God as the
 Psalmist experienced. "I believe, therefore have I spoken: I was greatly
 afflicted." (Ps. 116:10.) The Christians are accused and slandered
 without mercy. Murderers and thieves receive better treatment than
 Christians. The world regards true Christians as the worst offenders,
 for whom no punishment can be too severe. The world hates the Christians
 with amazing brutality, and without compunction commits them to the most
 shameful death, congratulating itself that it has rendered God and the
 cause of peace a distinct service by ridding the world of the undesired
 presence of these Christians. We are not to let such treatment cause
 us to falter in our adherence to Christ. As long as we experience such
 persecutions we know all is well with the Gospel.
 
 Jesus held out the same comfort to His disciples in the fifth chapter
 of St. Matthew. "Blessed are ye, when men shall revile you and persecute
 you, and shall say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake.
 Rejoice, and be exceeding glad; for great is your reward in heaven." The
 Church must not come short of this joy. I would not want to be at peace
 with the pope, the bishops, the princes, and the sectarians, unless they
 consent to our doctrine. Unity with them would be an unmistakable sign
 that we have lost the true doctrine. Briefly, as long as the Church
 proclaims the doctrine she must suffer persecution, because the Gospel
 declares the mercy and glory of God. This in turn stirs up the devil,
 because the Gospel shows him up for what he is, the devil, and not
 God. Therefore as long as the Gospel holds sway persecution plays the
 accompaniment, or else there is something the matter with the devil.
 When he is hit you will know it by the havoc he raises everywhere.
 
 So do not be surprised or offended when hell breaks loose. Look upon it
 as a happy indication that all is well with the Gospel of the Cross. God
 forbid that the offense of the Cross should ever be removed. This would
 be the case if we were to preach what the prince of this world and his
 followers would be only too glad to hear, the righteousness of works.
 You would never know the devil could be so gentle, the world so sweet,
 the Pope so gracious, and the princes so charming. But because we seek
 the advantage and honor of Christ, they persecute us all around.
 
 
   VERSE 12. I would they were even cut off which trouble you.
 
 It hardly seems befitting an apostle, not only to denounce the false
 apostles as troublers of the Church, and to consign them to the devil,
 but also to wish that they were utterly cut off--what else would you
 call it but plain cursing? Paul, I suppose, is alluding to the rite of
 circumcision. As if he were saying to the Galatians: "The false apostles
 compel you to cut off the foreskin of your flesh. Well, I wish they
 themselves were utterly cut off by the roots."
 
 We had better answer at once the question, whether it is right for
 Christians to curse. Certainly not always, nor for every little cause.
 But when things have come to such a pass that God and His Word are
 openly blasphemed, then we must say: "Blessed be God and His Word, and
 cursed be everything that is contrary to God and His Word, even though
 it should be an apostle, or an angel from heaven."
 
 This goes to show again how much importance Paul attached to the least
 points of Christian doctrine, that he dared to curse the false apostles,
 evidently men of great popularity and influence. What right, then, have
 we to make little of doctrine? No matter how nonessential a point of
 doctrine may seem, if slighted it may prove the gradual disintegration
 of the truths of our salvation.
 
 Let us do everything to advance the glory and authority of God's Word.
 Every tittle of it is greater than heaven and earth. Christian charity
 and unity have nothing to do with the Word of God. We are bold to curse
 and condemn all men who in the least point corrupt the Word of God, "for
 a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump."
 
 Paul does right to curse these troublers of the Galatians, wishing that
 they were cut off and rooted out of the Church of God and that their
 doctrine might perish forever. Such cursing is the gift of the Holy
 Ghost. Thus Peter cursed Simon the sorcerer, "Thy money perish with
 thee." Many instances of this holy cursing are recorded in the sacred
 Scriptures, especially in the Psalms, e.g., "Let death seize upon them,
 and let them go down quick into hell." (Ps. 55:15.)
 
                          THE DOCTRINE OF GOOD WORKS
 
 Now come all kinds of admonitions and precepts. It was the custom of the
 apostles that after they had taught faith and instructed the conscience
 they followed it up with admonitions unto good works, that the believers
 might manifest the duties of love toward each other. In order to avoid
 the appearance as if Christianity militated against good works or
 opposed civil government, the Apostle also urges us to give ourselves
 unto good works, to lead an honest life, and to keep faith and love with
 one another. This will give the lie to the accusations of the world that
 we Christians are the enemies of decency and of public peace. The fact
 is we Christians know better what constitutes a truly good work than all
 the philosophers and legislators of the world because we link believing
 with doing.
 
 
   VERSE 13. For, brethren, ye have been called unto liberty; only use not
 liberty for an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another.
 
 In other words: "You have gained liberty through Christ, i.e., You are
 above all laws as far as conscience is concerned. You are saved. Christ
 is your liberty and life. Therefore law, sin, and death may not hurt
 you or drive you to despair. This is the constitution of your priceless
 liberty. Now take care that you do not use your wonderful liberty for an
 occasion of the flesh."
 
 Satan likes to turn this liberty which Christ has gotten for us into
 licentiousness. Already the Apostle Jude complained in his day: "There
 are certain men crept in unawares...turning the grace of our God into
 lasciviousness." (Jude 4.) The flesh reasons: "If we are without the
 law, we may as well indulge ourselves. Why do good, why give alms, why
 suffer evil when there is no law to force us to do so?"
 
 This attitude is common enough. People talk about Christian liberty and
 then go and cater to the desires of covetousness, pleasure, pride, envy,
 and other vices. Nobody wants to fulfill his duties. Nobody wants to
 help out a brother in distress. This sort of thing makes me so impatient
 at times that I wish the swine who trampled precious pearls under foot
 were back once again under the tyranny of the Pope. You cannot wake up
 the people of Gomorrah with the gospel of peace.
 
 Even we creatures of the world do not perform our duties as zealously in
 the light of the Gospel as we did before in the darkness of ignorance,
 because the surer we are of the liberty purchased for us by Christ, the
 more we neglect the Word, prayer, well-doing, and suffering. If Satan
 were not continually molesting us with trials, with the persecution of
 our enemies, and the ingratitude of our brethren, we would become so
 careless and indifferent to all good works that in time we would lose
 our faith in Christ, resign the ministry of the Word, and look for an
 easier life. Many of our ministers are beginning to do that very thing.
 They complain about the ministry, they maintain they cannot live on
 their salaries, they whimper about the miserable treatment they receive
 at the hand of those whom they delivered from the servitude of the law
 by the preaching of the Gospel. These ministers desert our poor and
 maligned Christ, involve themselves in the affairs of the world, seek
 advantages for themselves and not for Christ. With what results they
 shall presently find out.
 
 Since the devil lies in ambush for those in particular who hate the
 world, and seeks to deprive us of our liberty of the spirit or to
 brutalize it into the liberty of the flesh, we plead with our brethren
 after the manner of Paul, that they may never use this liberty of the
 spirit purchased for us by Christ as an excuse for carnal living, or as
 Peter expresses it, I Peter 2:16, "for a cloak of maliciousness."
 
 In order that Christians may not abuse their liberty the Apostle
 encumbers them with the rule of mutual love that they should serve
 each other in love. Let everybody perform the duties of his station and
 vocation diligently and help his neighbor to the limit of his capacity.
 
 Christians are glad to hear and obey this teaching of love. When others
 hear about this Christian liberty of ours they at once infer, "If I am
 free, I may do what I like. If salvation is not a matter of doing why
 should we do anything for the poor?" In this crude manner they turn the
 liberty of the spirit into wantonness and licentiousness. We want them
 to know, however, that if they use their lives and possessions after
 their own pleasure, if they do not help the poor, if they cheat their
 fellow-men in business and snatch and scrape by hook and by crook
 everything they can lay their hands on, we want to tell them that they
 are not free, no matter how much they think they are, but they are the
 dirty slaves of the devil, and are seven times worse than they ever were
 as the slaves of the Pope.
 
 As for us, we are obliged to preach the Gospel which offers to all men
 liberty from the Law, sin, death, and God's wrath. We have no right
 to conceal or revoke this liberty proclaimed by the Gospel. And so we
 cannot do anything with the swine who dive headlong into the filth of
 licentiousness. We do what we can, we diligently admonish them to love
 and to help their fellow-men. If our admonitions bear no fruit, we
 leave them to God, who will in His own good time take care of these
 disrespecters of His goodness. In the meanwhile we comfort ourselves
 with the thought that our labors are not lost upon the true believers.
 They appreciate this spiritual liberty and stand ready to serve others
 in love and, though their number is small, the satisfaction they give
 us far outweighs the discouragement which we receive at the hands of the
 large number of those who misuse this liberty.
 
 Paul cannot possibly be misunderstood for he says: "Brethren, ye have
 been called unto liberty." In order that nobody might mistake the
 liberty of which he speaks for the liberty of the flesh, the Apostle
 adds the explanatory note, "only use not liberty for an occasion to the
 flesh, but by love serve one another." Paul now explains at the hand of
 the Ten Commandments what it means to serve one another in love.
 
 
   VERSE 14. For all the law is fulfilled in one word, even in this, thou
   shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.
 
 It is customary with Paul to lay the doctrinal foundation first and then
 to build on it the gold, silver, and gems of good deeds. Now there is
 no other foundation than Jesus Christ. Upon this foundation the
 Apostle erects the structure of good works which he defines in this one
 sentence: "Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself."
 
 In adding such precepts of love the Apostle embarrasses the false
 apostles very much, as if he were saying to the Galatians: "I have
 described to you what spiritual life is. Now I will also teach you what
 truly good works are. I am doing this in order that you may understand
 that the silly ceremonies of which the false apostles make so much are
 far inferior to the works of Christian love." This is the hall-mark of
 all false teachers, that they not only pervert the pure doctrine but
 also fail in doing good. Their foundation vitiated, they can only build
 wood, hay, and stubble. Oddly enough, the false apostles who were such
 earnest champions of good works never required the work of charity, such
 as Christian love and the practical charity of a helpful tongue, hand,
 and heart. Their only requirement was that circumcision, days, months,
 years, and times should be observed. They could not think of any other
 good works.
 
 The Apostle exhorts all Christians to practice good works after they
 have embraced the pure doctrine of faith, because even though they have
 been justified they still have the old flesh to refrain them from doing
 good. Therefore it becomes necessary that sincere preachers cultivate
 the doctrine of good works as diligently as the doctrine of faith, for
 Satan is a deadly enemy of both. Nevertheless faith must come first
 because without faith it is impossible to know what a God-pleasing deed
 is.
 
 Let nobody think that he knows all about this commandment, "Thou shalt
 love thy neighbour as thyself." It sounds short and easy, but show me
 the man who can teach, learn, and do this commandment perfectly. None
 of us heed, or urge, or practice this commandment properly. Though
 the conscience hurts when we fail to fulfill this commandment in every
 respect we are not overwhelmed by our failure to bear our neighbor
 sincere and brotherly love.
 
 The words, "for all the law is fulfilled in one word," entail a
 criticism of the Galatians. "You are so taken up by your superstitions
 and ceremonies that serve no good purpose, that you neglect the most
 important thing, love." St. Jerome says: "We wear our bodies out with
 watching, fasting, and labor and neglect charity, the queen of all good
 works." Look at the monks, who meticulously fast, watch, etc. To skip
 the least requirement of their order would be a crime of the first
 magnitude. At the same time they blithely ignored the duties of charity
 and hated each other to death. That is no sin, they think.
 
 The Old Testament is replete with examples that indicate how much God
 prizes charity. When David and his companions had no food with which
 to still their hunger they ate the showbread which lay-people were
 forbidden to eat. Christ's disciples broke the Sabbath law when they
 plucked the ears of corn. Christ himself broke the Sabbath (as the Jews
 claimed) by healing the sick on the Sabbath. These incidents indicate
 that love ought to be given consideration above all laws and ceremonies.
 
 
   VERSE 14. For all the Law is fulfilled in one word.
 
 We can imagine the Apostle saying to the Galatians: "Why do you get so
 worked up over ceremonies, meats, days, places, and such things? Leave
 off this foolishness and listen to me. The whole Law is comprehended in
 this one sentence, 'Thou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself.' God is
 not particularly interested in ceremonies, nor has He any use for them.
 The one thing He requires of you is that you believe in Christ whom
 He hath sent. If in addition to faith, which comes first as the most
 acceptable service unto God, you want to add laws, then you want to know
 that all laws are comprehended in this short commandment, 'Thou shalt
 love thy neighbour as thyself.'"
 
 Paul knows how to explain the law of God. He condenses all the laws of
 Moses into one brief sentence. Reason takes offense at the brevity with
 which Paul treats the Law. Therefore reason looks down upon the doctrine
 of faith and its truly good works. To serve one another in love, i.e.,
 to instruct the erring, to comfort the afflicted, to raise the
 fallen, to help one's neighbor in every possible way, to bear with his
 infirmities, to endure hardships, toil, ingratitude in the Church and
 in the world, and on the other hand to obey government, to honor one's
 parents, to be patient at home with a nagging wife and an unruly family,
 these things are not at all regarded as good works. The fact is, they
 are such excellent works that the world cannot possibly estimate them at
 their true value.
 
 It is tersely spoken: "Love thy neighbour as thyself." But what more
 needs to be said? You cannot find a better or nearer example than
 your own. If you want to know how you ought to love your neighbor, ask
 yourself how much you love yourself. If you were to get into trouble or
 danger, you would be glad to have the love and help of all men. You
 do not need any book of instructions to teach you how to love your
 neighbor. All you have to do is to look into your own heart, and it will
 tell you how you ought to love your neighbor as yourself.
 
 My neighbor is every person, especially those who need my help, as
 Christ explained in the tenth chapter of Luke. Even if a person has done
 me some wrong, or has hurt me in any way, he is still a human being with
 flesh and blood. As long as a person remains a human being, so long is
 he to be an object of our love.
 
 Paul therefore urges his Galatians and, incidentally, all believers
 to serve each other in love. "You Galatians do not have to accept
 circumcision. If you are so anxious to do good works, I will tell you in
 one word how you can fulfill all laws. 'By love serve one another.' You
 will never lack people to whom you may do good. The world is full of
 people who need your help."
 
 
   VERSE 15. But if ye bite and devour one another take heed that ye be
   not consumed one of another.
 
 When faith in Christ is overthrown peace and unity come to an end in the
 church. Diverse opinions and dissensions about doctrine and life spring
 up, and one member bites and devours the other, i.e., they condemn each
 other until they are consumed. To this the Scriptures and the experience
 of all times bear witness. The many sects at present have come into
 being because one sect condemns the other. When the unity of the spirit
 has been lost there can be no agreement in doctrine or life. New errors
 must appear without measure and without end.
 
 For the avoidance of discord Paul lays down the principle: "Let every
 person do his duty in the station of life into which God has called
 him. No person is to vaunt himself above others or find fault with the
 efforts of others while lauding his own. Let everybody serve in love."
 
 It is not an easy matter to teach faith without works, and still to
 require works. Unless the ministers of Christ are wise in handling the
 mysteries of God and rightly divide the word, faith and good works may
 easily be confused. Both the doctrine of faith and the doctrine of good
 works must be diligently taught, and yet in such a way that both the
 doctrines stay within their God-given sphere. If we only teach works, as
 our opponents do, we shall lose the faith. If we only teach faith people
 will come to think that good works are superfluous.
 
 
   VERSE 16. This I say then, Walk in the Spirit, and ye shall not
   fulfill the lust of the flesh.
 
 "I have not forgotten what I told you about faith in the first part of
 my letter. Because I exhort you to mutual love you are not to think that
 I have gone back on my teaching of justification by faith alone. I
 am still of the same opinion. To remove every possibility for
 misunderstanding I have added this explanatory note: 'Walk in the
 Spirit, and ye shall not fulfill the lust of the flesh.'"
 
 With this verse Paul explains how he wants this sentence to be
 understood: "By love serve one another. When I bid you to love one
 another, this is what I mean and require, 'Walk in the Spirit.' I know
 very well you will not fulfill the Law, because you are sinners as long
 as you live. Nevertheless, you should endeavor to walk in the spirit,"
 i.e., fight against the flesh and follow the lead of the Holy Ghost.
 
 It is quite apparent that Paul had not forgotten the doctrine of
 justification, for in bidding the Galatians to walk in the Spirit he at
 the same time denies that good works can justify. "When I speak of the
 fulfilling of the Law I do not mean to say that you are justified by the
 Law. All I mean to say is that you should take the Spirit for your guide
 and resist the flesh. That is the most you shall ever be able to do.
 Obey the Spirit and fight against the flesh."
 
 
    VERSE 16. And ye shall not fulfill the lust of the flesh.
 
 The lust of the flesh is not altogether extinct in us. It rises up again
 and again and wrestles with the Spirit. No flesh, not even that of the
 true believer, is so completely under the influence of the Spirit that
 it will not bite or devour, or at least neglect, the commandment of
 love. At the slightest provocation it flares up, demands to be revenged,
 and hates a neighbor like an enemy, or at least does not love him as
 much as he ought to be loved.
 
 Therefore the Apostle establishes this rule of love for the believers.
 Serve one another in love. Bear the infirmities of your brother. Forgive
 one another. Without such bearing and forbearing, giving and forgiving,
 there can be no unity because to give and to take offense are
 unavoidably human.
 
 Whenever you are angry with your brother for any cause, repress your
 violent emotions through the Spirit. Bear with his weakness and love
 him. He does not cease to be your neighbor or brother because he
 offended you. On the contrary, he now more than ever before requires
 your loving attention.
 
 The scholastics take the lust of the flesh to mean carnal lust. True,
 believers too are tempted with carnal lust. Even the married are not
 immune to carnal lusts. Men set little value upon that which they have
 and covet what they have not, as the poet says:
 
   "The things most forbidden we always desire, And things most denied
    we seek to acquire."
 
 I do not deny that the lust of the flesh includes carnal lust. But
 it takes in more. It takes in all the corrupt desires with which the
 believers are more or less infected, as pride, hatred, covetousness,
 impatience. Later on Paul enumerates among the works of the flesh even
 idolatry and heresy. The apostle's meaning is clear. "I want you to love
 one another. But you do not do it. In fact you cannot do it, because of
 your flesh. Hence we cannot be justified by deeds of love. Do not for
 a moment think that I am reversing myself on my stand concerning faith.
 Faith and hope must continue. By faith we are justified, by hope we
 endure to the end. In addition we serve each other in love because true
 faith is not idle. Our love, however, is faulty. In bidding you to
 walk in the Spirit I indicate to you that our love is not sufficient to
 justify us. Neither do I demand that you should get rid of the flesh,
 but that you should control and subdue it."
 
 
   VERSE 17. For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit and the Spirit
   against the flesh.
 
 When Paul declares that "the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the
 Spirit against the flesh," he means to say that we are not to think,
 speak or do the things to which the flesh incites us. "I know," he says,
 "that the flesh courts sin. The thing for you to do is to resist the
 flesh by the Spirit. But if you abandon the leadership of the Spirit for
 that of the flesh, you are going to fulfill the lust of the flesh and
 die in your sins."
 
 
   VERSE 17. And these are contrary the one to the other; so that ye
   cannot do the things that ye would.
 
 These two leaders, the flesh and the Spirit, are bitter opponents. Of
 this opposition the Apostle writes in the seventh chapter of the Epistle
 to the Romans: "I see another law in my members, warring against the law
 of my mind, and bringing me into the captivity to the law of sin which
 is in my members. O wretched man that I am! who shall deliver me from
 the body of this death?"
 
 The scholastics are at a loss to understand this confession of Paul and
 feel obliged to save his honor. That the chosen vessel of Christ should
 have had the law of sin in his members seems to them incredible and
 absurd. They circumvent the plain-spoken statement of the Apostle
 by saying that he was speaking for the wicked. But the wicked never
 complain of inner conflicts, or of the captivity of sin. Sin has its
 unrestricted way with them. This is Paul's very own complaint and the
 identical complaint of all believers.
 
 Paul never denied that he felt the lust of the flesh. It is likely that
 at times he felt even the stirrings of carnal lust, but there is no
 doubt that he quickly suppressed them. And if at any time he felt angry
 or impatient, he resisted these feelings by the Spirit. We are not going
 to stand by idly and see such a comforting statement as this explained
 away. The scholastics, monks, and others of their ilk fought only
 against carnal lust and were proud of a victory which they never
 obtained. In the meanwhile they harbored within their breasts pride,
 hatred, disdain, self-trust, contempt of the Word of God, disloyalty,
 blasphemy, and other lusts of the flesh. Against these sins they never
 fought because they never took them for sins.
 
 Christ alone can supply us with perfect righteousness. Therefore we must
 always believe and always hope in Christ. "Whosoever believeth shall not
 be ashamed." (Rom. 9:33.)
 
 Do not despair if you feel the flesh battling against the Spirit or if
 you cannot make it behave. For you to follow the guidance of the
 Spirit in all things without interference on the part of the flesh is
 impossible. You are doing all you can if you resist the flesh and do not
 fulfill its demands.
 
 When I was a monk I thought I was lost forever whenever I felt an
 evil emotion, carnal lust, wrath, hatred, or envy. I tried to quiet my
 conscience in many ways, but it did not work, because lust would always
 come back and give me no rest. I told myself: "You have permitted this
 and that sin, envy, impatience, and the like. Your joining this holy
 order has been in vain, and all your good works are good for nothing."
 If at that time I had understood this passage, "The flesh lusteth
 against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh," I could have
 spared myself many a day of self-torment. I would have said to myself:
 "Martin, you will never be without sin, for you have flesh. Despair not,
 but resist the flesh."
 
 I remember how Doctor Staupitz used to say to me: "I have promised God
 a thousand times that I would become a better man, but I never kept my
 promise. From now on I am not going to make any more vows. Experience
 has taught me that I cannot keep them. Unless God is merciful to me for
 Christ's sake and grants unto me a blessed departure, I shall not be
 able to stand before Him." His was a God-pleasing despair. No true
 believer trusts in his own righteousness, but says with David, "Enter
 not into judgment with thy servant; for in thy sight shall no man
 living be justified." (Ps. 143:2) Again, "If thou, Lord, shouldest mark
 iniquities, O Lord, who shall stand?" (Ps. 130:3.)
 
 No man is to despair of salvation just because he is aware of the lust
 of the flesh. Let him be aware of it so long as he does not yield to it.
 The passion of lust, wrath, and other vices may shake him, but they are
 not to get him down. Sin may assail him, but he is not to welcome it.
 Yes, the better Christian a man is, the more he will experience the heat
 of the conflict. This explains the many expressions of regret in the
 Psalms and in the entire Bible. Everybody is to determine his peculiar
 weakness and guard against it. Watch and wrestle in spirit against your
 weakness. Even if you cannot completely overcome it, at least you ought
 to fight against it.
 
 According to this description a saint is not one who is made of wood and
 never feels any lusts or desires of the flesh. A true saint confesses
 his righteousness and prays that his sins may be forgiven. The whole
 Church prays for the forgiveness of sins and confesses that it believes
 in the forgiveness of sins. If our antagonists would read the Scriptures
 they would soon discover that they cannot judge rightly of anything,
 either of sin or of holiness.
 
 
   VERSE 18. But if ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law.
 
 Here someone may object: "How come we are not under the law? You
 yourself say, Paul, that we have the flesh which wars against the
 Spirit, and brings us into subjection."
 
 But Paul says not to let it trouble us. As long as we are led by the
 Spirit, and are willing to obey the Spirit who resists the flesh, we are
 not under the Law. True believers are not under the Law. The Law cannot
 condemn them although they feel sin and confess it.
 
 Great then is the power of the Spirit. Led by the Spirit, the Law cannot
 condemn the believer though he commits real sin. For Christ in whom
 we believe is our righteousness. He is without sin, and the Law cannot
 accuse Him. As long as we cling to Him we are led by the Spirit and are
 free from the Law. Even as he teaches good works, the Apostle does not
 lose sight of the doctrine of justification, but shows at every turn
 that it is impossible for us to be justified by works.
 
 The words, "If ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law,"
 are replete with comfort. It happens at times that anger, hatred,
 impatience, carnal desire, fear, sorrow, or some other lust of the flesh
 so overwhelms a man that he cannot shake them off, though he try ever so
 hard. What should he do? Should he despair? God forbid. Let him say to
 himself: "My flesh seems to be on a warpath against the Spirit again.
 Go to it, flesh, and rage all you want to. But you are not going to have
 your way. I follow the leading of the Spirit."
 
 When the flesh begins to cut up the only remedy is to take the sword of
 the Spirit, the word of salvation, and fight against the flesh. If you
 set the Word out of sight, you are helpless against the flesh. I know
 this to be a fact. I have been assailed by many violent passions, but as
 soon as I took hold of some Scripture passage, my temptations left me.
 Without the Word I could not have helped myself against the flesh.
 
 
   VERSE 19. Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are these.
 
 Paul is saying: "That none of you may hide behind the plea of ignorance
 I will enumerate first the works of the flesh, and then also the works
 of the Spirit."
 
 There were many hypocrites among the Galatians, as there are also among
 us, who pretend to be Christians and talk much about the Spirit, but
 they walk not according to the Spirit; rather according to the flesh.
 Paul is out to show them that they are not as holy as they like to have
 others think they are.
 
 Every period of life has its own peculiar temptations. Not one true
 believer whom the flesh does not again and again incite to impatience,
 anger, pride. But it is one thing to be tempted by the flesh, and
 another thing to yield to the flesh, to do its bidding without fear or
 remorse, and to continue in sin.
 
 Christians also fall and perform the lusts of the flesh. David fell
 horribly into adultery. Peter also fell grievously when he denied
 Christ. However great these sins were, they were not committed to spite
 God, but from weakness. When their sins were brought to their attention
 these men did not obstinately continue in their sin, but repented. Those
 who sin through weakness are not denied pardon as long as they rise
 again and cease to sin. There is nothing worse than to continue in sin.
 If they do not repent, but obstinately continue to fulfill the desires
 of the flesh, it is a sure sign that they are not sincere.
 
 No person is free from temptations. Some are tempted in one way, others
 in another way. One person is more easily tempted to bitterness and
 sorrow of spirit, blasphemy, distrust, and despair. Another is more
 easily tempted to carnal lust, anger, envy, covetousness. But no matter
 to which sins we are disposed, we are to walk in the Spirit and resist
 the flesh. Those who are Christ's own crucify their flesh.
 
 Some of the old saints labored so hard to attain perfection that they
 lost the capacity to feel anything. When I was a monk I often wished
 I could see a saint. I pictured him as living in the wilderness,
 abstaining from meat and drink and living on roots and herbs and cold
 water. This weird conception of those awesome saints I had gained out
 of the books of the scholastics and church fathers. But we know now
 from the Scriptures who the true saints are. Not those who live a single
 life, or make a fetish of days, meats, clothes, and such things. The
 true saints are those who believe that they are justified by the death
 of Christ. Whenever Paul writes to the Christians here and there he
 calls them the holy children and heirs of God. All who believe in
 Christ, whether male or female, bond or free, are saints; not in view of
 their own works, but in view of the merits of God which they appropriate
 by faith. Their holiness is a gift and not their own personal
 achievement.
 
 Ministers of the Gospel, public officials, parents, children, masters,
 servants, etc., are true saints when they take Christ for their wisdom,
 righteousness, sanctification, and redemption, and when they fulfill
 the duties of their several vocations according to the standard of God's
 Word and repress the lust and desires of the flesh by the Spirit. Not
 everybody can resist temptations with equal facility. Imperfections are
 bound to show up. But this does not prevent them from being holy. Their
 unintentional lapses are forgiven if they pull themselves together by
 faith in Christ. God forbid that we should sit in hasty judgment on
 those who are weak in faith and life, as long as they love the Word of
 God and make use of the supper of the Lord.
 
 I thank God that He has permitted me to see (what as a monk I so
 earnestly desired to see) not one but many saints, whole multitudes of
 true saints. Not the kind of saints the papists admire, but the kind of
 saints Christ wants. I am sure I am one of Christ's true saints. I am
 baptized. I believe that Christ my Lord has redeemed me from all my
 sins, and invested me with His own eternal righteousness and holiness.
 To hide in caves and dens, to have a bony body, to wear the hair long
 in the mistaken idea that such departures from normalcy will obtain
 some special regard in heaven is not the holy life. A holy life is to
 be baptized and to believe in Christ, and to subdue the flesh with the
 Spirit.
 
 To feel the lusts of the flesh is not without profit to us. It prevents
 us from being vain and from being puffed up with the wicked opinion of
 our own work-righteousness. The monks were so inflated with the opinion
 of their own righteousness, they thought they had so much holiness
 that they could afford to sell some of it to others, although their
 own hearts convinced them of unholiness. The Christian feels the unholy
 condition of his heart, and it makes him feel so low that he cannot
 trust in his good works. He therefore goes to Christ to find perfect
 righteousness. This keeps a Christian humble.
 
 
   VERSES 19, 20. Now the works of the flesh are manifest, which are
   these: adultery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, idolatry,
   witchcraft...
 
 Paul does not enumerate all the works of the flesh, but only certain
 ones. First, he mentions various kinds of carnal lusts, as adultery,
 fornication, wantonness, etc. But carnal lust is not the only work of
 the flesh, and so he counts among the works of the flesh also idolatry,
 witchcraft, hatred, and the like. These terms are so familiar that they
 do not require lengthy explanations.
 
                                   IDOLATRY
 
 The best religion, the most fervent devotion without Christ is plain
 idolatry. It has been considered a holy act when the monks in their
 cells meditate upon God and His works, and in a religious frenzy kneel
 down to pray and to weep for joy. Yet Paul calls it simply idolatry.
 Every religion which worships God in ignorance or neglect of His Word
 and will is idolatry.
 
 They may think about God, Christ, and heavenly things, but they do it
 after their own fashion and not after the Word of God. They have an idea
 that their clothing, their mode of living, and their conduct are holy
 and pleasing to Christ. They not only expect to pacify Christ by the
 strictness of their life, but also expect to be rewarded by Him for
 their good deeds. Hence their best "spiritual" thoughts are wicked
 thoughts. Any worship of God, any religion without Christ is idolatry.
 In Christ alone is God well pleased.
 
 I have said before that the works of the flesh are manifest. But
 idolatry puts on such a good front and acts so spiritual that the sham
 of it is recognized only by true believers.
 
                                  WITCHCRAFT
 
 This sin was very common before the light of the Gospel appeared. When I
 was a child there were many witches and sorcerers around who "bewitched"
 cattle, and people, particularly children, and did much harm. But now
 that the Gospel is here you do not hear so much about it because the
 Gospel drives the devil away. Now he bewitches people in a worse way
 with spiritual sorcery.
 
 Witchcraft is a brand of idolatry. As witches used to bewitch cattle and
 men, so idolaters, i.e., all the self-righteous, go around to bewitch
 God and to make Him out as one who justifies men not by grace through
 faith in Christ but by the works of men's own choosing. They bewitch
 and deceive themselves. If they continue in their wicked thoughts of God
 they will die in their idolatry.
 
                                     SECTS
 
 Under sects Paul here understands heresies. Heresies have always
 been found in the church. What unity of faith can exist among all the
 different monks and the different orders? None whatever. There is no
 unity of spirit, no agreement of minds, but great dissension in the
 papacy. There is no conformity in doctrine, faith, and life. On the
 other hand, among evangelical Christians the Word, faith, religion,
 sacraments, service, Christ, God, heart, and mind are common to all.
 This unity is not disturbed by outward differences of station or of
 occupation.
 
                             DRUNKENNESS, GLUTTONY
 
 Paul does not say that eating and drinking are works of the flesh, but
 intemperance in eating and drinking, which is a common vice nowadays, is
 a work of the flesh. Those who are given to excess are to know that they
 are not spiritual but carnal. Sentence is pronounced upon them that they
 shall not inherit the kingdom of heaven. Paul desires that Christians
 avoid drunkenness and gluttony, that they live temperate and sober
 lives, in order that the body may not grow soft and sensual.
 
 
   VERSE 21. Of the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in
   the past, that they which do such things shall not inherit the kingdom
   of God.
 
 This is a hard saying, but very necessary for those false Christians and
 hypocrites who speak much about the Gospel, about faith, and the Spirit,
 yet live after the flesh. But this hard sentence is directed chiefly at
 the heretics who are large with their own self-importance, that they may
 be frightened into taking up the fight of the Spirit against the flesh.
 
 
   VERSES 22, 23. But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy, peace,
   longsuffering, gentleness, goodness, faith, meekness, temperance.
 
 The Apostle does not speak of the works of the Spirit as he spoke of the
 works of the flesh, but he attaches to these Christian virtues a better
 name. He calls them the fruits of the Spirit.
 
                                     LOVE
 
 It would have been enough to mention only the single fruit of love, for
 love embraces all the fruits of the Spirit. In I Corinthians 13, Paul
 attributes to love all the fruits of the Spirit: "Charity suffereth
 long, and is kind," etc. Here he lets love stand by itself among other
 fruits of the Spirit to remind the Christians to love one another, "in
 honor preferring one another," to esteem others more than themselves
 because they have Christ and the Holy Ghost within them.
 
                                      JOY
 
 Joy means sweet thoughts of Christ, melodious hymns and psalms, praises
 and thanksgiving, with which Christians instruct, inspire, and refresh
 themselves. God does not like doubt and dejection. He hates dreary
 doctrine, gloomy and melancholy thought. God likes cheerful hearts. He
 did not send His Son to fill us with sadness, but to gladden our hearts.
 For this reason the prophets, apostles, and Christ Himself urge, yes,
 command us to rejoice and be glad. "Rejoice greatly, O daughter of Zion;
 shout, O daughter of Jerusalem; behold, thy king cometh unto thee."
 (Zech. 9:9.) In the Psalms we are repeatedly told to be "joyful in the
 Lord." Paul says: "Rejoice in the Lord always." Christ says: "Rejoice,
 for your names are written in heaven."
 
                                     PEACE
 
 Peace towards God and men. Christians are to be peaceful and quiet. Not
 argumentative, not hateful, but thoughtful and patient. There can be no
 peace without longsuffering, and therefore Paul lists this virtue next.
 
                                 LONGSUFFERING
 
 Longsuffering is that quality which enables a person to bear adversity,
 injury, reproach, and makes them patient to wait for the improvement
 of those who have done him wrong. When the devil finds that he cannot
 overcome certain persons by force he tries to overcome them in the long
 run. He knows that we are weak and cannot stand anything long. Therefore
 he repeats his temptation time and again until he succeeds. To withstand
 his continued assaults we must be longsuffering and patiently wait for
 the devil to get tired of his game.
 
                                  GENTLENESS
 
 Gentleness in conduct and life. True followers of the Gospel must not
 be sharp and bitter, but gentle, mild, courteous, and soft-spoken, which
 should encourage others to seek their company. Gentleness can overlook
 other people's faults and cover them up. Gentleness is always glad to
 give in to others. Gentleness can get along with forward and difficult
 persons, according to the old pagan saying: "You must know the manners
 of your friends, but you must not hate them." Such a gentle person was
 our Savior Jesus Christ, as the Gospel portrays Him. Of Peter it is
 recorded that he wept whenever he remembered the sweet gentleness of
 Christ in His daily contact with people. Gentleness is an excellent
 virtue and very useful in every walk of life.
 
                                   GOODNESS
 
 A person is good when he is willing to help others in their need.
 
 
                                     FAITH
 
 In listing faith among the fruits of the Spirit, Paul obviously does not
 mean faith in Christ, but faith in men. Such faith is not suspicious of
 people but believes the best. Naturally the possessor of such faith will
 be deceived, but he lets it pass. He is ready to believe all men, but he
 will not trust all men. Where this virtue is lacking men are suspicious,
 forward, and wayward and will believe nothing nor yield to anybody. No
 matter how well a person says or does anything, they will find fault
 with it, and if you do not humor them you can never please them. It is
 quite impossible to get along with them. Such faith in people therefore,
 is quite necessary. What kind of life would this be if one person could
 not believe another person?
 
                                   MEEKNESS
 
 A person is meek when he is not quick to get angry. Many things occur in
 daily life to provoke a person's anger, but the Christian gets over his
 anger by meekness.
 
                                  TEMPERANCE
 
 Christians are to lead sober and chaste lives. They should not be
 adulterers, fornicators, or sensualists. They should not be quarrelers
 or drunkards. In the first and second chapters of the Epistle to Titus,
 the Apostle admonishes bishops, young women, and married folks to be
 chaste and pure.
 
 
   VERSE 23. Against such there is no law.
 
 There is a law, of course, but it does not apply to those who bear these
 fruits of the Spirit. The Law is not given for the righteous man. A true
 Christian conducts himself in such a way that he does not need any law
 to warn or to restrain him. He obeys the Law without compulsion. The Law
 does not concern him. As far as he is concerned there would not have to
 be any Law.
 
 
   VERSE 24. And they that are Christ's have crucified the flesh with the
   affections and lusts.
 
 True believers are no hypocrites. They crucify the flesh with its evil
 desires and lusts. Inasmuch as they have not altogether put off the
 sinful flesh they are inclined to sin. They do not fear or love God
 as they should. They are likely to be provoked to anger, to envy, to
 impatience, to carnal lust, and other emotions. But they will not do the
 things to which the flesh incites them. They crucify the flesh with its
 evil desires and lusts by fasting and exercise and, above all, by a walk
 in the Spirit.
 
 To resist the flesh in this manner is to nail it to the Cross. Although
 the flesh is still alive it cannot very well act upon its desires
 because it is bound and nailed to the Cross.
 
 
   VERSE 25. If we live in the Spirit, let us also walk in the Spirit.
 A little while ago the Apostle had condemned those who are envious and
 start heresies and schisms. As if he had forgotten that he had already
 berated them, the Apostle once more reproves those who provoke and
 envy others. Was not one reference to them sufficient? He repeats his
 admonition in order to emphasize the viciousness of pride that had
 caused all the trouble in the churches of Galatia, and has always caused
 the Church of Christ no end of difficulties. In his Epistle to Titus
 the Apostle states that a vainglorious man should not be ordained as a
 minister, for pride, as St. Augustine points out, is the mother of all
 heresies.
 
 Now vainglory has always been a common poison in the world. There is no
 village too small to contain someone who wants to be considered wiser or
 better than the rest. Those who have been bitten by pride usually stand
 upon the reputation for learning and wisdom. Vainglory is not nearly so
 bad in a private person or even in an official as it is in a minister.
 
 When the poison of vainglory gets into the Church you have no idea
 what havoc it can cause. You may argue about knowledge, art, money,
 countries, and the like without doing particular harm. But you cannot
 quarrel about salvation or damnation, about eternal life and eternal
 death without grave damage to the Church. No wonder Paul exhorts all
 ministers of the Word to guard against this poison. He writes: "If we
 live in the Spirit." Where the Spirit is, men gain new attitudes. Where
 formerly they were vainglorious, spiteful and envious, they now become
 humble, gentle and patient. Such men seek not their own glory, but
 the glory of God. They do not provoke each other to wrath or envy, but
 prefer others to themselves.
 
 As dangerous to the Church as this abominable pride is, yet there is
 nothing more common. The trouble with the ministers of Satan is that
 they look upon the ministry as a stepping-stone to fame and glory, and
 right there you have the seed for all sorts of dissensions.
 
 Because Paul knew that the vainglory of the false Apostles had caused
 the churches of Galatia endless trouble, he makes it his business to
 suppress this abominable vice. In his absence the false apostles went
 to work in Galatia. They pretended that they had been on intimate terms
 with the apostles, while Paul had never seen Christ in person or
 had much contact with the rest of the apostles. Because of this they
 delivered him, rejected his doctrine, and boosted their own. In this way
 they troubled the Galatians and caused quarrels among them until they
 provoked and envied each other; which goes to show that neither the
 false apostles nor the Galatians walked after the Spirit, but after the
 flesh.
 
 The Gospel is not there for us to aggrandize ourselves. The Gospel is
 to aggrandize Christ and the mercy of God. It holds out to men eternal
 gifts that are not gifts of our own manufacture. What right have we to
 receive praise and glory for gifts that are not of our own making?
 
 No wonder that God in His special grace subjects the ministers of the
 Gospel to all kinds of afflictions, otherwise they could not cope
 with this ugly beast called vainglory. If no persecution, no cross,
 or reproach trailed the doctrine of the Gospel, but only praise and
 reputation, the ministers of the Gospel would choke with pride. Paul
 had the Spirit of Christ. Nevertheless there was given unto him the
 messenger of Satan to buffet him in order that he should not come
 to exalt himself, because of the grandeur of his revelations. St.
 Augustine's opinion is well taken: "If a minister of the Gospel is
 praised, he is in danger; if he is despised, he is also in danger."
 
 The ministers of the Gospel should be men who are not too easily
 affected by praise or criticism, but simply speak out the benefit and
 the glory of Christ and seek the salvation of souls.
 
 Whenever you are being praised, remember it is not you who is being
 praised but Christ, to whom all praise belongs. When you preach the
 Word of God in its purity and also live accordingly, it is not your own
 doing, but God's doing. And when people praise you, they really mean
 to praise God in you. When you understand this--and you should because
 "what hast thou that thou didst not receive?"--you will not flatter
 yourself on the one hand and on the other hand you will not carry
 yourself with the thought of resigning from the ministry when you are
 insulted, reproached, or persecuted.
 
 It is really kind of God to send so much infamy, reproach, hatred, and
 cursing our way to keep us from getting proud of the gifts of God in us.
 We need a millstone around our neck to keep us humble. There are a few
 on our side who love and revere us for the ministry of the Word, but for
 every one of these there are a hundred on the other side who hate and
 persecute us.
 
 The Lord is our glory. Such gifts as we possess we acknowledge to be
 the gifts of God, given to us for the good of the Church of Christ.
 Therefore we are not proud because of them. We know that more is
 required of them to whom much is given, than of such to whom little is
 given. We also know that God is no respecter of persons. A plain factory
 hand who does his work faithfully pleases God just as much as a minister
 of the Word.
 
 
   VERSE 26. Let us not be desirous of vain glory.
 
 To desire vainglory is to desire lies, because when one person praises
 another he tells lies. What is there in anybody to praise? But it is
 different when the ministry is praised. We should not only desire people
 to praise the ministry of the Gospel but also do our utmost to make
 the ministry worthy of praise because this will make the ministry
 more effective. Paul warns the Romans not to bring Christianity into
 disrepute. "Let not then your good be evil spoken of." (Rom. 14:16.) He
 also begged the Corinthians to "give no offense in anything, that the
 ministry be not blamed." (I Cor. 6:3.) When people praise our ministry
 they are not praising our persons, but God.
 
 
   VERSE 26. Provoking one another, envying one another.
 
 Such is the ill effect of vainglory. Those who teach errors provoke
 others. When others disapprove and reject the doctrine the teachers
 of errors get angry in turn, and then you have strife and trouble. The
 sectarians hate us furiously because we will not approve their errors.
 We did not attack them directly. We merely called attention to certain
 abuses in the Church. They did not like it and became sore at us,
 because it hurt their pride. They wish to be the lone rulers of the
 church.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER 6
 
 
   VERSE 1. Brethren, if a man be overtaken in a fault ye which are
   spiritual, restore such an one in the spirit of meekness.
 
 IF we carefully weigh the words of the Apostle we perceive that he does
 not speak of doctrinal faults and errors, but of much lesser faults
 by which a person is overtaken through the weakness of his flesh. This
 explains why the Apostle chooses the softer term "fault." To minimize
 the offense still more, as if he meant to excuse it altogether and to
 take the whole blame away from the person who has committed the fault,
 he speaks of him as having been "overtaken," seduced by the devil and of
 the flesh. As if he meant to say, "What is more human than for a human
 being to fall, to be deceived and to err?" This comforting sentence at
 one time saved my life. Because Satan always assails both the purity of
 doctrine which he endeavors to take away by schisms and the purity
 of life which he spoils with his continual temptations to sin, Paul
 explains how the fallen should be treated. Those who are strong are to
 raise up the fallen in the spirit of meekness.
 
 This ought to be borne in mind particularly by the ministers of the Word
 in order that they may not forget the parental attitude which Paul here
 requires of those who have the keeping of souls. Pastors and ministers
 must, of course, rebuke the fallen, but when they see that the fallen
 are sorry they are to comfort them by excusing the fault as well as they
 can. As unyielding as the Holy Spirit is in the matter of maintaining
 and defending the doctrine of faith, so mild and merciful is He toward
 men for their sins as long as sinners repent.
 
 The Pope's synagogue teaches the exact opposite of what the Apostle
 commands. The clerics are tyrants and butchers of men's conscience.
 Every small offense is closely scrutinized. To justify the cruel
 inquisitiveness they quote the statement of Pope Gregory: "It is the
 property of good lives to be afraid of a fault where there is no fault."
 "Our censors must be feared, even if they are unjust and wrong." On
 these pronouncements the papists base their doctrine of excommunication.
 Rather than terrify and condemn men's consciences, they ought to raise
 them up and comfort them with the truth.
 
 Let the ministers of the Gospel learn from Paul how to deal with those
 who have sinned. "Brethren," he says, "if any man be overtaken with a
 fault, do not aggravate his grief, do not scold him, do not condemn
 him, but lift him up and gently restore his faith. If you see a brother
 despondent over a sin he has committed, run up to him, reach out your
 hand to him, comfort him with the Gospel and embrace him like a mother.
 When you meet a willful sinner who does not care, go after him and
 rebuke him sharply." But this is not the treatment for one who has been
 overtaken by a sin and is sorry. He must be dealt with in the spirit of
 meekness and not in the spirit of severity. A repentant sinner is not to
 be given gall and vinegar to drink.
 
 
   VERSE 1. Considering thyself, lest thou also be tempted.
 This consideration is very much needed to put a stop to the severity of
 some pastors who show the fallen no mercy. St. Augustine says: "There
 is no sin which one person has committed, that another person may not
 commit it also." We stand in slippery places. If we become overbearing
 and neglect our duty, it is easy enough to fall into sin. In the book
 entitled "The Lives of Our Fathers," one of the Fathers is reported to
 have said when informed that a brother had fallen into adultery: "He
 fell yesterday; I may fall today." Paul therefore warns the pastors not
 to be too rigorous and unmerciful towards offenders, but to show them
 every affection, always remembering: "This man fell into sin; I may fall
 into worse sin. If those who are always so eager to condemn others would
 investigate themselves they would find that the sins of others are motes
 in comparison to their own."
 
 "Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall."
 (I Cor. 10:12.) If David who was a hero of faith and did so many great
 things for the Lord, could fall so badly that in spite of his advanced
 age he was overcome by youthful lust after he had withstood so many
 different temptations with which the Lord had tested his faith, who are
 we to think that we are more stable? These object lessons of God should
 convince us that of all things God hates pride.
 
 
   VERSE 2. Bear ye one another's burdens, and so fulfill the law of
   Christ.
 
 The Law of Christ is the Law of love. Christ gave us no other law than
 this law of mutual love: "A new commandment I give unto you, That ye
 love one another." To love means to bear another's burdens. Christians
 must have strong shoulders to bear the burdens of their fellow
 Christians. Faithful pastors recognize many errors and offenses in the
 church, which they oversee. In civil affairs an official has to overlook
 much if he is fit to rule. If we can overlook our own shortcomings
 and wrong-doings, we ought to overlook the shortcomings of others in
 accordance with the words, "Bear ye one another's burdens."
 
 Those who fail to do so expose their lack of understanding of the law
 of Christ. Love, according to Paul, "believeth all things, hopeth all
 things, endureth all things." This commandment is not meant for those
 who deny Christ; neither is it meant for those who continue to live
 in sin. Only those who are willing to hear the Word of God and then
 inadvertently fall into sin to their own great sorrow and regret, carry
 the burdens which the Apostle encourages us to bear. Let us not be hard
 on them. If Christ did not punish them, what right have we to do it?
 
 
   VERSE 3. For if a man think himself to be something, when he is
   nothing, he deceiveth himself.
 
 Again the Apostle takes the authors of sects to task for being
 hard-hearted tyrants. They despise the weak and demand that everything
 be just so. Nothing suits them except what they do. Unless you eulogize
 whatever they say or do, unless you adapt yourself to their slightest
 whim, they become angry with you. They are that way because, as St. Paul
 says, they "think themselves to be something," they think they know all
 about the Scriptures.
 
 Paul has their number when he calls them zeros. They deceive
 themselves with their self-suggested wisdom and holiness. They have
 no understanding of Christ or the law of Christ. By insisting that
 everything be perfect they not only fail to bear the burdens of the
 weak, they actually offend the weak by their severity. People begin to
 hate and shun them and refuse to accept counsel or comfort from them.
 
 Paul describes these stiff and ungracious saints accurately when he says
 of them, "They think themselves to be something." Bloated by their
 own silly ideas and schemes they entertain a pretty fair opinion of
 themselves, when in reality they amount to nothing.
 
 
   VERSE 4. But let every man prove his own work, and then shall he have
   rejoicing in himself alone, and not in another.
 
 In this verse the Apostle continues his attack upon the vainglorious
 sectarians. Although this passage may be applied to any work, the
 Apostle has in mind particularly the work of the ministry.
 
 The trouble with these seekers after glory is that they never stop to
 consider whether their ministry is straightforward and faithful. All
 they think about is whether people will like and praise them. Theirs is
 a threefold sin. First, they are greedy of praise. Secondly, they are
 very sly and wily in suggesting that the ministry of other pastors
 is not what it should be. By way of contrast they hope to rise in
 the estimation of the people. Thirdly, once they have established a
 reputation for themselves they become so chesty that they stop short of
 nothing. When they have won the praise of men, pride leads them on to
 belittle the work of other men and to applaud their own. In this artful
 manner they hoodwink the people who rather enjoy to see their former
 pastors taken down a few notches by such upstarts.
 
 "Let a minister be faithful in his office," is the apostolic injunction.
 "Let him not seek his own glory or look for praise. Let him desire to
 do good work and to preach the Gospel in all its purity. Whether an
 ungrateful world appreciates his efforts is to give him no concern
 because, after all, he is in the ministry not for his own glory but for
 the glory of Christ."
 
 A faithful minister cares little what people think of him, as long as
 his conscience approves of him. The approval of his own good conscience
 is the best praise a minister can have. To know that we have taught the
 Word of God and administered the sacraments rightly is to have a glory
 that cannot be taken away.
 
 The glory which the sectarians seek is quite unstable, because it rests
 in the whim of people. If Paul had had to depend on this kind of glory
 for his ministry he would have despaired when he saw the many offenses
 and evils following in the wake of his preaching.
 
 If we had to feel that the success of our ministry depended upon our
 popularity with men we would die, because we are not popular. On the
 contrary, we are hated by the whole world with rare bitterness. Nobody
 praises us. Everybody finds fault with us. But we can glory in the Lord
 and attend to our work cheerfully. Who cares whether our efforts please
 or displease the devil? Who cares whether the world praises or hates us?
 We go ahead "by honour and dishonour, by evil report and good report."
 (II Cor. 6:8.)
 
 The Gospel entails persecution. The Gospel is that kind of a doctrine.
 Furthermore, the disciples of the Gospel are not all dependable. Many
 embrace the Gospel today and tomorrow discard it. To preach the Gospel
 for praise is bad business especially when people stop praising you.
 Find your praise in the testimony of a good conscience.
 
 This passage may also be applied to other work besides the ministry.
 When an official, a servant, a teacher minds his business and performs
 his duty faithfully without concerning himself about matters that are
 not in his line he may rejoice in himself. The best commendation of any
 work is to know that one has done the work that God has given him well
 and that God is pleased with his effort.
 
 
   VERSE 5. Every man shall bear his own burden.
 
 That means: For anybody to covet praise is foolish because the praise of
 men will be of no help to you in the hour of death. Before the judgment
 throne of Christ everybody will have to bear his own burden. As it is
 the praise of men stops when we die. Before the eternal Judge it is not
 praise that counts but your own conscience.
 
 True, the consciousness of work well done cannot quiet the conscience.
 But it is well to have the testimony of a good conscience in the last
 judgment that we have performed our duty faithfully in accordance with
 God's will.
 
 For the suppression of pride we need the strength of prayer. What man
 even if he is a Christian is not delighted with his own praise? Only the
 Holy Spirit can preserve us from the misfortune of pride.
 
 
   VERSE 6. Let him that is taught in the word communicate unto him that
   teacheth in all good things.
 
 Now the Apostle also addresses the hearers of the Word requesting them
 to bestow "all good things" upon those who have taught them the Gospel.
 I have often wondered why all the apostles reiterated this request
 with such embarrassing frequency. In the papacy I saw the people
 give generously for the erection and maintenance of luxurious church
 buildings and for the sustenance of men appointed to the idolatrous
 service of Rome. I saw bishops and priests grow rich until they
 possessed the choicest real estate. I thought then that Paul's
 admonitions were overdone. I thought he should have requested the people
 to curtail their contributions. I saw how the generosity of the people
 of the Church was encouraging covetousness on the part of the clergy. I
 know better now.
 
 As often as I read the admonitions of the Apostle to the effect that the
 churches should support their pastors and raise funds for the relief
 of impoverished Christians I am half ashamed to think that the great
 Apostle Paul had to touch upon this subject so frequently. In writing to
 the Corinthians he needed two chapters to impress this matter upon
 them. I would not want to discredit Wittenberg as Paul discredited the
 Corinthians by urging them at such length to contribute to the relief of
 the poor. It seems to be a by-product of the Gospel that nobody wants to
 contribute to the maintenance of the Gospel ministry. When the doctrine
 of the devil is preached people are prodigal in their willing support of
 those who deceive them.
 
 We have come to understand why it is so necessary to repeat the
 admonition of this verse. When Satan cannot suppress the preaching of
 the Gospel by force he tries to accomplish his purpose by striking the
 ministers of the Gospel with poverty. He curtails their income to such
 an extent that they are forced out of the ministry because they cannot
 live by the Gospel. Without ministers to proclaim the Word of God the
 people go wild like savage beasts.
 
 Paul's admonition that the hearers of the Gospel share all good
 things with their pastors and teachers is certainly in order. To the
 Corinthians he wrote: "If we have sown unto you spiritual things is it a
 great thing if we shall reap your carnal things?" (I Cor. 9:11.) In the
 old days when the Pope reigned supreme everybody paid plenty for masses.
 The begging friars brought in their share. Commercial priests counted
 the daily offerings. From these extortions our countrymen are now
 delivered by the Gospel. You would think they would be grateful for
 their emancipation and give generously for the support of the ministry
 of the Gospel and the relief of impoverished Christians. Instead, they
 rob Christ. When the members of a Christian congregation permit their
 pastor to struggle along in penury, they are worse than heathen.
 
 Before very long they are going to suffer for their ingratitude. They
 will lose their temporal and spiritual possessions. This sin merits the
 severest punishment. The reason why the churches of Galatia, Corinth,
 and other places were troubled by false apostles was this, that they had
 so little regard for their faithful ministers. You cannot refuse to give
 a penny who gives you all good things, even life eternal, and turn around
 and give the devil, the giver of all evil and death eternal, pieces of
 gold, and not be punished for it.
 
 The words "in all good things": are not to be understood to mean that
 people are to give all they have to their ministers, but that they
 should support them liberally and give them enough to live well.
 
 
   VERSE 7. Be not deceived; God is not mocked.
 
 The Apostle is so worked up over this matter that he is not content with
 a mere admonition. He utters the threatening words, "God is not mocked."
 Our countrymen think it good sport to despise the ministry. They like to
 treat the ministers like servants and slaves. "Be not deceived,"
 warns the Apostle, "God is not mocked." God will not be mocked in His
 ministers. Christ said: "He that despiseth you, despiseth me." (Luke
 10:16.) To Samuel God said: "They have not rejected thee, but they have
 rejected me." (I Sam. 8:7.) Be careful, you scoffers. God may postpone
 His punishment for a time, but He will find you out in time, and punish
 you for despising His servants. You cannot laugh at God. Maybe the
 people are little impressed by the threats of God, but in the hour of
 their death they shall know whom they have mocked. God is not ever going
 to let His ministers starve. When the rich suffer the pangs of hunger
 God will feed His own servants. "In the days of famine they shall be
 satisfied." (Ps. 37:19.)
 
 
   VERSE 7. For whatever a man soweth, that shall he also reap.
 
 These passages are all meant to benefit us ministers. I must say I do
 not find much pleasure in explaining these verses. I am made to appear
 as if I am speaking for my own benefit. If a minister preaches on money
 he is likely to be accused of covetousness. Still people must be told
 these things that they may know their duty over against their pastors.
 Our Savior says: "Eating and drinking such things as they give; for the
 laborer is worthy of his hire." (Luke 10:7.) And Paul says elsewhere:
 "Do ye not know that they which minister about holy things live of the
 things of the temple? and they which wait at the altar are partakers
 with the altar? Even so hath the Lord ordained, that they which preach
 the gospel should live of the gospel." (I Cor. 9:13, 14.)
 
 
   VERSE 8. For he that soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap
   corruption; but he that soweth to the Spirit shall of the Spirit reap
   everlasting life.
 
 This simile of sowing and reaping also refers to the proper support
 of ministers. "He that soweth to the Spirit," i.e., he that honors the
 ministers of God is doing a spiritual thing and will reap everlasting
 life. "He that soweth to the flesh," i.e., he that has nothing left for
 the ministers of God, but only thinks of himself, that person will reap
 of the flesh corruption, not only in this life but also in the life to
 come. The Apostle wants to stir up his readers to be generous to their
 pastors.
 
 That the ministers of the Church need support any man with common sense
 can see. Though this support is something physical the Apostle does
 not hesitate to call it sowing to the Spirit. When people scrape
 up everything they can lay their hands on and keep everything for
 themselves the Apostle calls it a sowing to the flesh. He pronounces
 those who sow to the Spirit blessed for this life and the life to come,
 while those who sow to the flesh are accursed now and forever.
 
 
   VERSE 9. And let us not be weary in well doing: for in due season we
   shall reap, if we faint not.
 
 The Apostle intends soon to close his Epistle and therefore repeats once
 more the general exhortation unto good deeds. He means to say "Let us do
 good not only to the ministers of the Gospel, but to everybody, and let
 us do it without weariness." It is easy enough to do good once or twice,
 but to keep on doing good without getting disgusted with the ingratitude
 of those whom we have benefited, that is not so easy. Therefore the
 Apostle does not only admonish us to do good, but to do good untiringly.
 For our encouragement he adds the promise: "For in due season we shall
 reap, if we faint not." "Wait for the harvest and then you will reap the
 reward of your sowing to the Spirit. Think of that when you do good and
 the ingratitude of men will not stop you from doing good."
 
 
   VERSE 10. As we have therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all
   men, especially unto them who are of the household of faith.
 
 In this verse the Apostle summarizes his instructions on the proper
 support of the ministers and of the poor. He paraphrases the words of
 Christ: "I must work the works of him that sent me, while it is day: the
 night cometh, when no man can work." (John 9:4.) Our good deeds are to
 be directed primarily at those who share the Christian faith with us,
 "the household of faith," as Paul calls them, among whom the ministers
 rank first as objects of our well doing.
 
 
   VERSE 11. Ye see how large a letter I have written unto you with mine
   own hand.
 
 With these words the Apostle intends to draw the Galatians on. "I
 never," he says, "wrote such a long letter with my own hand to any of
 the other churches." His other epistles he dictated, and only subscribed
 his greetings and his signature with his own hand.
 
 
   VERSE 12. As many as desire to make a fair shew in the flesh, they
   constrain you to be circumcised; only lest they should suffer
   persecution for the cross of Christ.
 
 Paul once more scores the false apostles in an effort to draw the
 Galatians away from their false doctrine. "The teachers you have now do
 not seek the glory of Christ and the salvation of your souls, but only
 their own glory. They avoid the Cross. They do not understand what they
 teach."
 
 These three counts against the false apostles are of so serious a nature
 that no Christian could have fellowship with them. But not all the
 Galatians obeyed the warning of Paul.
 
 The Apostle's attack upon the false apostles was not unjustified.
 Neither are our attacks upon the papacy. When we call the Pope the
 Antichrist and his minions an evil brood, we do not slander them. We
 merely judge them by the touchstone of God's Word recorded in the first
 chapter of this Epistle: "Though we, or an angel from heaven, preach any
 other gospel unto you than that which we have preached unto you, let him
 be accursed."
 
 
   VERSE 13. For neither they themselves who are circumcised keep the
   law; but desire to have you circumcised, that they may glory in your
   flesh.
 
 In other words: "I shall tell you what kind of teachers you have now.
 They avoid the Cross, they teach no certain truths. They think they are
 performing the Law, but they are not. They have not the Holy Spirit
 and without Him nobody can keep the Law." Where the Holy Ghost does not
 dwell in men there dwells an unclean spirit, a spirit that despises God
 and turns every effort at keeping the Law into a double sin.
 
 Mark what the Apostle is saying: Those who are circumcised do not
 fulfill the Law. No self-righteous person ever does. To work, pray, or
 suffer apart from Christ is to work, pray, and to suffer in vain, "for
 whatsoever is not of faith is sin." It does a person no good to be
 circumcised, to fast, to pray, or to do anything, if in his heart he
 despises Christ.
 
 "Why do the false apostles insist that you should be circumcised? Not
 for the sake of your righteousness," although they give that impression,
 but "that they may glory in your flesh." Now what sort of an ambition is
 that? Worst of all, they force circumcision upon you for no other reason
 than the satisfaction they get out of your submission.
 
 
   VERSE 14. But God forbid that I should glory, save in the cross of our
   Lord Jesus Christ.
 
 "God forbid," says the Apostle, "that I should glory in anything as
 dangerous as the false apostles glory in because what they glory in is a
 poison that destroys many souls, and I wish it were buried in hell. Let
 them glory in the flesh if they wish and let them perish in their glory.
 As for me I glory in the Cross of our Lord Jesus Christ." He expresses
 the same sentiment in the fifth chapter of the Epistle to the Romans,
 where he says: "We glory in tribulations"; and in the twelfth chapter of
 the Second Epistle to the Corinthians: "Most gladly, therefore, will
 l rather glory in my infirmities." According to these expressions
 the glory of a Christian consists in tribulations, reproaches, and
 infirmities.
 
 And this is our glory today with the Pope and the whole world
 persecuting us and trying to kill us. We know that we suffer these
 things not because we are thieves and murderers, but for Christ's sake
 whose Gospel we proclaim. We have no reason to complain. The world, of
 course, looks upon us as unhappy and accursed creatures, but Christ
 for whose sake we suffer pronounces us blessed and bids us to rejoice.
 "Blessed are ye," says He, "when men shall revile you, and persecute
 you, and shall say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake.
 Rejoice, and be exceeding glad." (Matt. 5:11, 12.)
 
 By the Cross of Christ is not to be understood here the two pieces of
 wood to which He was nailed, but all the afflictions of the believers
 whose sufferings are Christ's sufferings. Elsewhere Paul writes: "Who
 now rejoice in my sufferings for you, and fill up that which is behind
 of the afflictions of Christ in my flesh for his body's sake, which is
 the church." (Col. 1:24.)
 
 It is good for us to know this lest we sink into despair when our
 opponents persecute us. Let us bear the cross for Christ's sake. It will
 ease our sufferings and make them light as Christ says, Matthew 11:30,
 "My yoke is easy, and my burden is light."
 
 
   VERSE 14. By whom the world is crucified unto me, and I unto the world.
 
 "The world is crucified unto me," means that I condemn the world. "I am
 crucified unto the world," means that the world in turn condemns me. I
 detest the doctrine, the self-righteousness, and the works of the world.
 The world in turn detests my doctrine and condemns me as a revolutionary
 heretic. Thus the world is crucified unto us and we unto the world.
 
 The monks imagined the world was crucified unto them when they
 entered the monastery. Not the world, but Christ, is crucified in the
 monasteries.
 
 In this verse Paul expresses his hatred of the world. The hatred was
 mutual. As Paul, so we are to despise the world and the devil. With
 Christ on our side we can defy him and say: "Satan, the more you hurt
 me, the more I oppose you."
 
 
   VERSE 15. For in Christ Jesus neither circumcision availeth anything,
   nor uncircumcision, but a new creature.
 
 Since circumcision and uncircumcision are contrary matters we would
 expect the Apostle to say that one or the other might accomplish some
 good. But he denies that either of them do any good. Both are of no
 value because in Christ Jesus neither circumcision nor uncircumcision
 avail anything.
 
 Reason fails to understand this, "for the natural man receiveth not
 the things of the Spirit of God." (I Cor. 2:14.) It therefore seeks
 righteousness in externals. However, we learn from the Word of God that
 there is nothing under the sun that can make us righteous before God and
 a new creature except Christ Jesus.
 
 A new creature is one in whom the image of God has been renewed. Such a
 creature cannot be brought into life by good works, but by Christ alone.
 Good works may improve the outward appearance, but they cannot produce
 a new creature. A new creature is the work of the Holy Ghost, who imbues
 our hearts with faith, love, and other Christian virtues, grants us
 the strength to subdue the flesh and to reject the righteousness of the
 world.
 
 
   VERSE 16. And as many as walk according to this rule, peace be on them,
   and mercy.
 
 This is the rule by which we ought to live, "that ye put on the new man,
 which after God is created in righteousness and true holiness." (Eph.
 4:24.) Those who walk after this rule enjoy the favor of God, the
 forgiveness of their sins, and peace of conscience. Should they ever be
 overtaken by any sin, the mercy of God supports them.
 
 
   VERSE 17. From henceforth let no man trouble me.
 
 The Apostle speaks these words with a certain amount of indignation. "I
 have preached the Gospel to you in conformity with the revelation which
 I received from Jesus Christ. If you do not care for it, very well.
 Trouble me no more. Trouble me no more."
 
 
   VERSE 17. For I bear in my body the marks of the Lord Jesus.
 
 "The marks on my body indicate whose servant I am. If I was anxious to
 please men, if I approved of circumcision and good works as factors
 in our salvation, if I would take delight in your flesh as the false
 apostles do, I would not have these marks on my body. But because I
 am the servant of Jesus Christ and publicly declare that no person can
 obtain the salvation of his soul outside of Christ, I must bear the
 badge of my Lord. These marks were given to me against my will as
 decorations from the devil and for no other merit but that I made known
 Jesus."
 
 Of the marks of suffering which he bore in his body the Apostle makes
 frequent mention in his epistles. "I think," he says, "that God hath set
 forth us the apostles last, as it were appointed to death: for we are
 made a spectacle unto the world, and to angels, and to men." (I Cor.
 4:9.) Again, "Unto this present hour we both hunger, and thirst, and are
 naked, and are buffeted, and have no certain dwelling-place; And labour,
 working with our hands: being reviled, we bless; being persecuted, we
 suffer it; being defamed, we intreat: we are made as the filth of the
 world, and are the offscouring of all things unto this day." (I Cor.
 4:11-13.)
 
 
   VERSE 18. Brethren, the grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with your
   spirit. Amen.
 
 This is the Apostle's farewell. He ends his Epistle as he began it by
 wishing the Galatians the grace of God. We can hear him say: "I have
 presented Christ to you, I have pleaded with you, I have reproved you, I
 have overlooked nothing that I thought might be of benefit to you. All I
 can do now is to pray that our Lord Jesus Christ would bless my Epistle
 and grant you the guidance of the Holy Ghost."
 
 The Lord Jesus Christ, our Savior, who gave me the strength and the
 grace to explain this Epistle and granted you the grace to hear it,
 preserve and strengthen us in faith unto the day of our redemption. To
 Him, the Father and the Son and the Holy Spirit, be glory, world without
 end. Amen.
 
 
 This text was converted to ASCII format for Project Wittenberg by Laura
 J. Hoelter and is in the public domain. You may freely distribute, copy
 or print this text. Please direct any comments or suggestions to:
 
 Rev. Robert E. Smith Walther Library Concordia Theological Seminary
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of Commentary on the Epistle to the

 
 Luther's Little Instruction Book:
 The Small Catechism of Martin Luther
 
 Translation by Robert E. Smith From the German text, printed in:
 Triglot Concordia: The Symbolical Books of the Ev. Lutheran Church.
 St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1921, pp. 538-559.
 
 Note: This version of the Small Catechism is under continuous
 revision. Please check your source for this file from time to time to
 obtain updated versions of this text.
 
 Fort Wayne, Indiana: Project Wittenberg, 2004
 
 I. The Ten Commandments
 The Simple Way a Father Should Present Them to His Household
 
 The First Commandment
 
 You must not have other gods. (Exodus 20:3)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear, love, and trust God more than anything else.
 
 The Second Commandment
 
 You must not misuse your God's name. (Exodus 20:7)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will not use His name to curse,
 swear, cast a spell, lie or deceive, but will use it to call upon Him,
 pray to Him, praise Him and thank Him in all times of trouble.
 
 The Third Commandment
 
 You must keep the Sabbath holy. (Exodus 20:8)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will not look down on preaching
 or God's Word, but consider it holy, listen to it willingly, and learn
 it.
 
 The Fourth Commandment
 
 You must honor your father and mother. [So that things will go well for
 you and you will live long on earth]. (Exodus 20:12)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will neither look down on our
 parents or superiors nor irritate them, but will honor them, serve
 them, obey them, love them and value them.
 
 The Fifth Commandment
 
 You must not kill. (Exodus 20:13)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will neither harm nor hurt our
 neighbor's body, but help him and care for him when he is ill.
 
 The Sixth Commandment
 
 You must not commit adultery. (Exodus 20:14)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that our words and actions will be clean
 and decent and so that everyone will love and honor their spouses.
 
 The Seventh Commandment
 
 You must not steal. (Exodus 20:15)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will neither take our neighbor's
 money or property, nor acquire it by fraud or by selling him poorly
 made products, but will help him improve and protect his property and
 career.
 
 The Eighth Commandment
 
 You must not tell lies about your neighbor. (Exodus 20:16 )
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will not deceive by lying,
 betraying, slandering or ruining our neighbor's reputation, but will
 defend him, say good things about him, and see the best side of
 everything he does.
 
 The Ninth Commandment
 
 You must not desire your neighbor's house. (Exodus 20:17)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will not attempt to trick our
 neighbor out of his inheritance or house, take it by pretending to have
 a right to it, etc. but help him to keep & improve it.
 
 The Tenth Commandment
 
 You must not desire your neighbor's wife, servant, maid, animals or
 anything that belongs to him. (Exodus 20:17)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We must fear and love God, so that we will not release our neighbor's
 cattle, take his employees from him or seduce his wife, but urge them
 to stay and do what they ought to do.
 
 The Conclusion to the Commandments
 
 What does God say to us about all these commandments?
 
 This is what He says:
 "I am the Lord Your God. I am a jealous God. I plague the grandchildren
 and great-grandchildren of those who hate me with their ancestor's sin.
 But I make whole those who love me for a thousand generations." (Exodus
 20:5)
 
 What does it mean?
 
 God threatens to punish everyone who breaks these commandments. We
 should be afraid of His anger because of this and not violate such
 commandments. But He promises grace and all good things to those who
 keep such commandments. Because of this, we, too, should love Him,
 trust Him, and willingly do what His commandments require.
 
 II. The Creed
 The Simple Way a Father Should Present it to His Household
 
 The First Article
 On Creation
 
 I believe in God the Almighty Father, Creator of Heaven and Earth.
 
 What does this mean?
 
 I believe that God created me, along with all creatures. He gave to me:
 my body and soul, my eyes, ears and all the other parts of my body, my
 mind and all my senses. He preserves them as well. He gives me clothing
 and shoes, food and drink, house and land, wife and children, fields,
 animals and all I own. Every day He abundantly provides everything I
 need to nourish this body and life. He protects me against all danger.
 he shields and defends me from all evil. He does all this because of
 His pure, fatherly and divine goodness and His mercy, not because I've
 earned it or deserved it. For all of this, I must thank Him, praise
 Him, serve Him and obey Him. Yes, this is true!
 
 The Second Article
 On Redemption
 
 And in Jesus Christ, His only Son, our Lord, Who was conceived by the
 Holy Spirit, born of the Virgin Mary, suffered under Pontius Pilate,
 was crucified, died and was buried, descended to Hell, on the third day
 rose again from the dead, ascended to Heaven and sat down at the right
 hand of God the Almighty Father. From there He will come to judge the
 living and the dead.
 
 What does this mean?
 
 I believe that Jesus Christ is truly God, born of the Father in
 eternity and also truly man, born of the Virgin Mary. He is my Lord! He
 redeemed me, a lost and condemned person, bought and won me from all
 sins, death and the authority of the Devil. It did not cost Him gold or
 silver, but His holy, precious blood, His innocent body--His death!
 Because of this, I am His very own, will live under Him in His kingdom
 and serve Him righteously, innocently and blessedly forever, just as He
 is risen from death, lives and reigns forever. Yes, this is true.
 
 The Third Article
 On Becoming Holy
 
 I believe in the Holy Spirit, the holy Christian Church, the community
 of the saints, the forgiveness of sins, the resurrection of the body,
 and an everlasting life. Amen.
 
 What does this mean?
 
 I believe that I cannot come to my Lord Jesus Christ by my own
 intelligence or power. But the Holy Spirit called me by the Gospel,
 enlightened me with His gifts, made me holy and kept me in the true
 faith, just as He calls, gathers together, enlightens and makes holy
 the whole Church on earth and keeps it with Jesus in the one, true
 faith. In this Church, He generously forgives each day every sin
 committed by me and by every believer. On the last day, He will raise
 me and all the dead from the grave. He will give eternal life to me and
 to all who believe in Christ. Yes, this is true!
 
 III. The Our Father
 The Simple Way a Father Should Present it to His Household
 
 Introduction
 
 Our Father, Who is in Heaven. (Matthew 6:9)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 In this introduction, God invites us to believe that He is our real
 Father and we are His real children, so that we will pray with trust
 and complete confidence, in the same way beloved children approach
 their beloved Father with their requests.
 
 The First Request
 
 May Your name be holy. (Matthew 6:9)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 Of course, God's name is holy in and of itself, but by this request, we
 pray that He will make it holy among us, too.
 
 How does this take place?
 
 It happens when God's Word is taught clearly and purely, and when we
 live holy lives as God's children based upon it. Help us, Heavenly
 Father, to do this! But anyone who teaches and lives by something other
 than God's Word defiles God's name among us. Protect us from this,
 Heavenly Father!
 
 The Second Request
 
 Your Kingdom come. (Matthew 6:10)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 Truly God's Kingdom comes by itself, without our prayer. But we pray in
 this request that it come to us as well.
 
 How does this happen?
 
 It happens when the Heavenly Father gives us His Holy Spirit, so that
 we believe His holy Word by His grace and live godly lives here in this
 age and there in eternal life.
 
 The Third Request
 
 May Your will be accomplished. As it is Heaven, so may it be on Earth.
 (Matthew 6:10)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 Truly, God's good and gracious will is accomplished without our prayer.
 But we pray in this request that is accomplished among us as well.
 
 How does this happen?
 
 It happens when God destroys and interferes with every evil will and
 all evil advice, which will not allow God's Kingdom to come, such as
 the Devil's will, the world's will and will of our bodily desires. It
 also happens when God strengthens us by faith and by His Word and keeps
 us living by them faithfully until the end of our lives. This is His
 will, good and full of grace.
 
 The Fourth Request
 
 Give us today our daily bread. (Matthew 6:11)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 Truly, God gives daily bread to evil people, even without our prayer.
 But we pray in this request that He will help us realize this and
 receive our daily bread with thanksgiving.
 
 What does "Daily bread" mean?
 
 Everything that nourishes our body and meets its needs, such as: Food,
 drink, clothing, shoes, house, yard, fields, cattle, money,
 possessions, a devout spouse, devout children, devout employees, devout
 and faithful rulers, good government, good weather, peace, health,
 discipline, honor, good friends, faithful neighbors and other things
 like these.
 
 The Fifth Request
 
 And forgive our guilt, as we forgive those guilty of sinning against
 us. (Matthew 6:12)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We pray in this request that our Heavenly Father will neither pay
 attention to our sins nor refuse requests such as these because of our
 sins and because we are neither worthy nor deserve the things for which
 we pray. Yet He wants to give them all to us by His grace, because many
 times each day we sin and truly deserve only punishment. Because God
 does this, we will, of course, want to forgive from our hearts and
 willingly do good to those who sin against us.
 
 The Sixth Request
 
 And lead us not into temptation. (Matthew 6:12)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 God tempts no one, of course, but we pray in this request that God will
 protect us and save us, so that the Devil, the world and our bodily
 desires will neither deceive us nor seduce us into heresy, despair or
 other serious shame or vice, and so that we will win and be victorious
 in the end, even if they attack us.
 
 The Seventh Request
 
 But set us free from the Evil One. ( Matthew 6:12)
 
 What does this mean?
 
 We pray in this request, as a summary, that our Father in Heaven will
 save us from every kind of evil that threatens body, soul, property and
 honor. We pray that when at last our final hour has come, He will grant
 us a blessed death, and, in His grace, bring us to Himself from this
 valley of tears.  Amen
 
 What does this mean?
 
 That I should be certain that such prayers are acceptable to the Father
 in Heaven and will be granted, that He Himself has commanded us to pray
 in this way and that He promises to answer us. Amen. Amen. This means:
 Yes, yes it will happen this way.
 
 IV. The Sacrament of Holy Baptism
 The Simple Way a Father Should Present it to His Household
 
 What is Baptism?
 
 Baptism is not just plain water, but it is water contained within God's
 command and united with God's Word.
 
 Where in the Word of God is this?
 
 Where our Lord Christ spoke in the last chapter of Matthew (Matthew
 28:19):
 "Go into all the world, teaching all heathen nations, and baptizing
 them in the name of the Father, the Son and of the Holy Spirit."
 
 What does Baptism give? What good is it?
 
 It gives us the forgiveness of sins, redeems us from death and the
 Devil, and gives eternal salvation to all who believe this, just as
 God's words and promises declare.
 
 What are these words and promises of God?
 
 Our Lord Christ spoke one of them in the last chapter of Mark (Mark
 16:16):
 "Whoever believes and is baptized will be saved; but whoever does not
 believe will be damned."
 
 How can water do such great things?
 
 Water doesn't make these things happen, of course. It is God's Word,
 which is with and in the water. Because, without God's Word, the water
 is plain water and not baptism. But with God's Word it is a Baptism, a
 grace-filled water of life, a bath of new birth in the Holy Spirit, as
 St. Paul said to Titus in the third chapter (Titus 3:5-8):
 "Through this bath of rebirth and renewal of the Holy Spirit, which He
 poured out on us abundantly through Jesus Christ, our Savior, that we,
 justified by the same grace are made heirs according to the hope of
 eternal life. This is a faithful saying."
 
 What is the meaning of such a water Baptism?
 
 It means that the old Adam in us should be drowned by daily sorrow and
 repentance, and die with all sins and evil lusts, and, in turn, a new
 person daily come forth and rise from death again. He will live forever
 before God in righteousness and purity.
 
 Where is this written?
 
 St. Paul says to the Romans in Chapter Six (Romans 6:4):
 "We are buried with Christ through Baptism into death, so that, in the
 same way Christ is risen from the dead by the glory of the Father, thus
 also must we walk in a new life."
 
 V. How You Should Teach the Uneducated to Confess
 
 What is confession?
 
 Confession has two parts: First, a person admits his sin Second, a
 person receives absolution or forgiveness from the confessor, as if
 from God Himself, without doubting it, but believing firmly that his
 sins are forgiven by God in Heaven through it.
 
 Which sins should people confess?
 
 When speaking to God, we should plead guilty to all sins, even those we
 don't know about, just as we do in the "Our Father," but when speaking
 to the confessor, only the sins we know about, which we know about and
 feel in our hearts.
 
 Which are these?
 
 Consider here your place in life according to the Ten Commandments. Are
 you a father? A mother? A son? A daughter? A husband? A wife? A
 servant? Are you disobedient, unfaithful or lazy? Have you hurt anyone
 with your words or actions? Have you stolen, neglected your duty, let
 things go or injured someone?
 
 Please suggest to me a simple way to confess.
 
 You should speak to your confessor this way:
 
 Honorable, dear Sir: Would you please hear my confession and pronounce
 forgiveness according to God's will.
 
 He will respond: Yes. Please go ahead.
 
 Then say:
 I confess in the presence of God that I am a poor sinner and guilty of
 every kind of sin. I specifically admit to you that I am a servant,
 maid, etc., but I'm afraid that I have served my master unfaithfully.
 >From time to time, I have not done what I was told to do. I have
 angered them and caused them to swear at me. I have neglected my duty
 and allowed damage to be done. My words and actions have been shameful.
 I have been angry with my peers. I have complained about my master's
 wife and sworn at her, etc. I am sorry for all of this and ask for
 grace. I want to do better.
 
 A master or a lady of the house should speak this way:
 I specifically confess to you that I have not faithfully led my
 children, servants or wife to God's glory. I have cursed. I have set a
 bad example with my obscene words and actions. I have hurt my neighbor
 and spoken evil things about him. I have charged him too much, cheated
 him and sold him badly made goods.
 
 Let him also confess any other sins against God's commandments and his
 place in life, etc.
 
 If a person is not burdened with sins such as these or greater sins, he
 should not look for other sins or invent them, because that would turn
 confession into torture. Instead, he should mention one or two that he
 knows about. For example: specifically I confess that I once cursed.
 Once I used inappropriate language. Once I neglected to do this or that
 thing, etc. Let that be enough.
 
 If you do not know of anything you have done wrong (which does not seem
 possible), do not say anything in specific, but receive forgiveness
 based upon the general confession you make to God in the presence of
 your confessor.
 
 After this, the Confessor will say:
 May God be merciful to you and strengthen your faith!
 
 Then he will ask:
 Do you also believe that the forgiveness I give is God's forgiveness?
 
 Then you will answer:
 Yes, dear sir.
 
 After this, he will say:
 May what you believe happen to you. And by the command of my Lord
 Jesus, I forgive your sins in the Name of the Father, Son and Holy
 Spirit. Amen. Go in peace! The confessor will know how to use
 additional passages to comfort and to encourage the faith of those who
 sorrow, are troubled or whose conscience is greatly burdened. This is
 only meant to be a general confession for the uneducated.
 
 VI. The Sacrament of the Altar
 The Simple Way a Father Should Present it to his Household
 
 What is the Sacrament of the Altar?
 
 It is the true body and blood of our Lord Jesus Christ under bread and
 wine for us Christians to eat and to drink, established by Christ
 Himself.
 
 Where is that written?
 
 The holy apostles Matthew, Mark and Luke and St. Paul write this:
 "Our Lord Jesus Christ, in the night on which He was betrayed, took
 bread, gave thanks, broke it, gave it to His disciples and said: 'Take!
 Eat! This is My body, which is given for you. Do this to remember Me!'
 In the same way He also took the cup after supper, gave thanks, gave it
 to them, and said: 'Take and drink from it, all of you! This cup is the
 New Testament in my blood, which is shed for you to forgive sins. This
 do, as often as you drink it, to remember Me!'"
 
 What good does this eating and drinking do?
 
 These words tell us: "Given for you" and "Shed for you to forgive
 sins." Namely, that the forgiveness of sins, life and salvation are
 given to us through these words in the sacrament. Because, where sins
 are forgiven, there is life and salvation as well.
 
 How can physical eating and drinking do such great things?
 
 Of course, eating and drinking do not do these things. These words,
 written here, do them: "given for you" and "shed for you to forgive
 sins." These words, along with physical eating and drinking are the
 important part of the sacrament. Anyone who believes these words has
 what they say and what they record, namely, the forgiveness of sins.
 
 Who, then, receives such a sacrament in a worthy way?
 
 Of course, fasting and other physical preparations are excellent
 disciplines for the body. But anyone who believes these words, "Given
 for you," and "Shed for you to forgive sins," is really worthy and well
 prepared. But whoever doubts or does not believe these words is not
 worthy and is unprepared, because the words, "for you" demand a heart
 that fully believes.
 
 Appendix I
 How a Father Should Teach His Household
 to Conduct Morning and Evening Devotions.
 
 Morning Devotions
 
 As soon as you get out of bed in the morning, you should bless yourself
 with the sign of the Holy Cross and say:
 
 May the will of God, the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit be done!
 Amen.
 Then, kneeling or standing, say the creed and pray the Lord's Prayer.
 If you wish, you may then pray this little prayer as well:
 My Heavenly Father, I thank You, through Jesus Christ, Your beloved
 Son, that You kept me safe from all evil and danger last night. Save
 me, I pray, that you will keep me safe today from every evil and sin as
 well,, so that all I do and the way that I live will please you. I put
 myself in your care, body and soul and all that I have. Let Your holy
 Angels be with me, so that the evil enemy will not gain power over me.
 Amen.
 After that, with joy go about your work and perhaps sing a song
 inspired by the Ten Commandments or your own thoughts.
 
 Evening Devotions
 
 When you go to bed in the evening, you should bless yourself with the
 sign of the Holy Cross and say:
 May the will of God, the Father, the Son and the Holy Spirit be done!
 Amen.
 Then, kneeling or standing, say the creed and pray the Lord's Prayer.
 If you wish, then you may pray this little prayer as well:
 My Heavenly Father, I thank You, through Jesus Christ, Your beloved
 Son, that You have protected me, by Your grace. Forgive, I pray, all my
 sins and the evil I have done. Protect me, by Your grace, tonight. I
 put myself in your care, body and soul and all that I have. Let Your
 holy angels be with me, so that the evil enemy will not gain power over
 me. Amen.
 
 After this, go to sleep immediately with joy.
 
 Appendix II
 How a Father Should Teach His Household
 to say Grace and Return Thanks at Meals:
 
 The Blessing
 
 The children and servants should come to the table modestly and with
 folded hands and say:
 All eyes look to you, O Lord, and You give everyone food at the right
 time. You open Your generous hands and satisfy the hunger of all living
 things with what they desire. (Psalm 145:15-16)
 Note: "What they desire" means that all animals get so much to eat,
 that they are happy and cheerful. Because, worry and greed interferes
 with such desires.
 After this, pray the Lord's Prayer and the following prayer:
 Lord God, Heavenly Father, bless us and these gifts, which we receive
 from Your generous hand, through Jesus Christ, our Lord. Amen.
 
 Thanking God
 
 After eating, too, they should modestly fold their hands and say:
 
 Thank the Lord, because He is kind and His goodness lasts forever! He
 gives all creatures food. He gives livestock their food and feeds the
 young ravens that call out to Him. A horse's strength does not give Him
 pleasure. A man's legs do not give Him joy. People who fear the Lord
 and who wait for His goodness please Him.
 
 After this, pray the Lord's Prayer and the following prayer:
 We thank You, Lord God, Father, through Jesus Christ our Lord, for all
 Your blessings. You live and rule forever! Amen!
 
 Appendix III
 The Home Chart
 A number of passages to use to teach and admonish people in all holy
 orders and statuses in life about their
 duties.
 
 For Bishops, Pastors and Preachers:
 1 Tim. 3:2-4
 Titus 1: 6
 
 What Hearers owe their Pastors:
 1 Cor. 9:14
 Gal. 6: 6
 1 Tim. 5:17-18
 Heb. 13:17
 
 For Earthly Authorities
 Rom. 13:1-4
 
 For those Under Authority
 Matt. 22:21
 Rom. 13:5-7
 1 Tim. 2:1-3
 Titus 3:1
 1 Peter 2:13-14
 
 For Husbands
 1 Peter 3:7
 Col. 3:19
 
 For Wives
 Eph. 5:22
 1 Peter 3:5-6
 
 For Parents
 Eph. 6:4
 
 For Children
 Eph. 6:1-3
 
 For Servants, Maids, Hired Hands and Workers
 Eph. 6: 5-7
 Col. 3:22
 
 For the Man and Woman of the House
 Eph. 6:9
 Col. 4:1
 
 For Young People in General
 1 Pet. 5:5-6
 
 For Widows
 1 Tim. 5:5-6
 
 For Everyone in General
 Rom. 13:8-10
 1 Tim. 2:1-2
 
 If everyone will learn his part,
 The whole household will fare well.
 
 ________________________________________________________________________
 
 This text was translated in 1994, revised in 2002 and revised and
 expanded in 2004 for Project Wittenberg by Robert E. Smith. It has
 been placed in the public domain by him. You may freely distribute,
 copy or print this text. Please direct any comments or suggestions to
 Rev. Robert E. Smith of the Walther Library at:
 
 Concordia Theological Seminary
 Email: smithre@mail.ctsfw.edu
 Surface Mail: 6600 N. Clinton St., Ft. Wayne, IN 46825
 USA Phone: (260) 452-3149 Fax: (260) 452-2126

 
 
 
 Produced by Elizabeth T. Knuth and David Widger
 
 
 
 
 
 CONCERNING CHRISTIAN LIBERTY
 
 by Martin Luther
 
 
 
 
 LETTER OF MARTIN LUTHER TO POPE LEO X.
 
 Among those monstrous evils of this age with which I have now for three
 years been waging war, I am sometimes compelled to look to you and to
 call you to mind, most blessed father Leo. In truth, since you alone are
 everywhere considered as being the cause of my engaging in war, I cannot
 at any time fail to remember you; and although I have been compelled
 by the causeless raging of your impious flatterers against me to appeal
 from your seat to a future council--fearless of the futile decrees
 of your predecessors Pius and Julius, who in their foolish tyranny
 prohibited such an action--yet I have never been so alienated in feeling
 from your Blessedness as not to have sought with all my might, in
 diligent prayer and crying to God, all the best gifts for you and for
 your see. But those who have hitherto endeavoured to terrify me with the
 majesty of your name and authority, I have begun quite to despise and
 triumph over. One thing I see remaining which I cannot despise, and this
 has been the reason of my writing anew to your Blessedness: namely, that
 I find that blame is cast on me, and that it is imputed to me as a great
 offence, that in my rashness I am judged to have spared not even your
 person.
 
 Now, to confess the truth openly, I am conscious that, whenever I have
 had to mention your person, I have said nothing of you but what was
 honourable and good. If I had done otherwise, I could by no means have
 approved my own conduct, but should have supported with all my power the
 judgment of those men concerning me, nor would anything have pleased
 me better, than to recant such rashness and impiety. I have called
 you Daniel in Babylon; and every reader thoroughly knows with what
 distinguished zeal I defended your conspicuous innocence against
 Silvester, who tried to stain it. Indeed, the published opinion of so
 many great men and the repute of your blameless life are too widely
 famed and too much reverenced throughout the world to be assailable by
 any man, of however great name, or by any arts. I am not so foolish as
 to attack one whom everybody praises; nay, it has been and always will
 be my desire not to attack even those whom public repute disgraces. I am
 not delighted at the faults of any man, since I am very conscious myself
 of the great beam in my own eye, nor can I be the first to cast a stone
 at the adulteress.
 
 I have indeed inveighed sharply against impious doctrines, and I have
 not been slack to censure my adversaries on account, not of their bad
 morals, but of their impiety. And for this I am so far from being sorry
 that I have brought my mind to despise the judgments of men and to
 persevere in this vehement zeal, according to the example of Christ,
 who, in His zeal, calls His adversaries a generation of vipers, blind,
 hypocrites, and children of the devil. Paul, too, charges the sorcerer
 with being a child of the devil, full of all subtlety and all malice;
 and defames certain persons as evil workers, dogs, and deceivers. In the
 opinion of those delicate-eared persons, nothing could be more bitter or
 intemperate than Paul's language. What can be more bitter than the words
 of the prophets? The ears of our generation have been made so delicate
 by the senseless multitude of flatterers that, as soon as we perceive
 that anything of ours is not approved of, we cry out that we are being
 bitterly assailed; and when we can repel the truth by no other pretence,
 we escape by attributing bitterness, impatience, intemperance, to our
 adversaries. What would be the use of salt if it were not pungent, or of
 the edge of the sword if it did not slay? Accursed is the man who does
 the work of the Lord deceitfully.
 
 Wherefore, most excellent Leo, I beseech you to accept my vindication,
 made in this letter, and to persuade yourself that I have never thought
 any evil concerning your person; further, that I am one who desires that
 eternal blessing may fall to your lot, and that I have no dispute with
 any man concerning morals, but only concerning the word of truth. In all
 other things I will yield to any one, but I neither can nor will forsake
 and deny the word. He who thinks otherwise of me, or has taken in my
 words in another sense, does not think rightly, and has not taken in the
 truth.
 
 Your see, however, which is called the Court of Rome, and which neither
 you nor any man can deny to be more corrupt than any Babylon or Sodom,
 and quite, as I believe, of a lost, desperate, and hopeless impiety,
 this I have verily abominated, and have felt indignant that the people
 of Christ should be cheated under your name and the pretext of the
 Church of Rome; and so I have resisted, and will resist, as long as
 the spirit of faith shall live in me. Not that I am striving after
 impossibilities, or hoping that by my labours alone, against the furious
 opposition of so many flatterers, any good can be done in that most
 disordered Babylon; but that I feel myself a debtor to my brethren, and
 am bound to take thought for them, that fewer of them may be ruined, or
 that their ruin may be less complete, by the plagues of Rome. For many
 years now, nothing else has overflowed from Rome into the world--as
 you are not ignorant--than the laying waste of goods, of bodies, and of
 souls, and the worst examples of all the worst things. These things are
 clearer than the light to all men; and the Church of Rome, formerly the
 most holy of all Churches, has become the most lawless den of thieves,
 the most shameless of all brothels, the very kingdom of sin, death, and
 hell; so that not even antichrist, if he were to come, could devise any
 addition to its wickedness.
 
 Meanwhile you, Leo, are sitting like a lamb in the midst of wolves,
 like Daniel in the midst of lions, and, with Ezekiel, you dwell among
 scorpions. What opposition can you alone make to these monstrous evils?
 Take to yourself three or four of the most learned and best of the
 cardinals. What are these among so many? You would all perish by poison
 before you could undertake to decide on a remedy. It is all over with
 the Court of Rome; the wrath of God has come upon her to the uttermost.
 She hates councils; she dreads to be reformed; she cannot restrain the
 madness of her impiety; she fills up the sentence passed on her mother,
 of whom it is said, "We would have healed Babylon, but she is not
 healed; let us forsake her." It had been your duty and that of your
 cardinals to apply a remedy to these evils, but this gout laughs at the
 physician's hand, and the chariot does not obey the reins. Under the
 influence of these feelings, I have always grieved that you, most
 excellent Leo, who were worthy of a better age, have been made pontiff
 in this. For the Roman Court is not worthy of you and those like you,
 but of Satan himself, who in truth is more the ruler in that Babylon
 than you are.
 
 Oh, would that, having laid aside that glory which your most abandoned
 enemies declare to be yours, you were living rather in the office of a
 private priest or on your paternal inheritance! In that glory none are
 worthy to glory, except the race of Iscariot, the children of perdition.
 For what happens in your court, Leo, except that, the more wicked and
 execrable any man is, the more prosperously he can use your name
 and authority for the ruin of the property and souls of men, for the
 multiplication of crimes, for the oppression of faith and truth and
 of the whole Church of God? Oh, Leo! in reality most unfortunate, and
 sitting on a most perilous throne, I tell you the truth, because I wish
 you well; for if Bernard felt compassion for his Anastasius at a time
 when the Roman see, though even then most corrupt, was as yet ruling
 with better hope than now, why should not we lament, to whom so much
 further corruption and ruin has been added in three hundred years?
 
 Is it not true that there is nothing under the vast heavens more
 corrupt, more pestilential, more hateful, than the Court of Rome? She
 incomparably surpasses the impiety of the Turks, so that in very truth
 she, who was formerly the gate of heaven, is now a sort of open mouth
 of hell, and such a mouth as, under the urgent wrath of God, cannot be
 blocked up; one course alone being left to us wretched men: to call back
 and save some few, if we can, from that Roman gulf.
 
 Behold, Leo, my father, with what purpose and on what principle it is
 that I have stormed against that seat of pestilence. I am so far from
 having felt any rage against your person that I even hoped to gain
 favour with you and to aid you in your welfare by striking actively and
 vigorously at that your prison, nay, your hell. For whatever the efforts
 of all minds can contrive against the confusion of that impious Court
 will be advantageous to you and to your welfare, and to many others with
 you. Those who do harm to her are doing your office; those who in every
 way abhor her are glorifying Christ; in short, those are Christians who
 are not Romans.
 
 But, to say yet more, even this never entered my heart: to inveigh
 against the Court of Rome or to dispute at all about her. For, seeing
 all remedies for her health to be desperate, I looked on her with
 contempt, and, giving her a bill of divorcement, said to her, "He that
 is unjust, let him be unjust still; and he that is filthy, let him
 be filthy still," giving myself up to the peaceful and quiet study of
 sacred literature, that by this I might be of use to the brethren living
 about me.
 
 While I was making some advance in these studies, Satan opened his
 eyes and goaded on his servant John Eccius, that notorious adversary of
 Christ, by the unchecked lust for fame, to drag me unexpectedly into the
 arena, trying to catch me in one little word concerning the primacy of
 the Church of Rome, which had fallen from me in passing. That boastful
 Thraso, foaming and gnashing his teeth, proclaimed that he would dare
 all things for the glory of God and for the honour of the holy apostolic
 seat; and, being puffed up respecting your power, which he was about
 to misuse, he looked forward with all certainty to victory; seeking to
 promote, not so much the primacy of Peter, as his own pre-eminence among
 the theologians of this age; for he thought it would contribute in no
 slight degree to this, if he were to lead Luther in triumph. The result
 having proved unfortunate for the sophist, an incredible rage torments
 him; for he feels that whatever discredit to Rome has arisen through me
 has been caused by the fault of himself alone.
 
 Suffer me, I pray you, most excellent Leo, both to plead my own cause,
 and to accuse your true enemies. I believe it is known to you in what
 way Cardinal Cajetan, your imprudent and unfortunate, nay unfaithful,
 legate, acted towards me. When, on account of my reverence for your
 name, I had placed myself and all that was mine in his hands, he did not
 so act as to establish peace, which he could easily have established by
 one little word, since I at that time promised to be silent and to make
 an end of my case, if he would command my adversaries to do the same.
 But that man of pride, not content with this agreement, began to justify
 my adversaries, to give them free licence, and to order me to recant, a
 thing which was certainly not in his commission. Thus indeed, when the
 case was in the best position, it came through his vexatious tyranny
 into a much worse one. Therefore whatever has followed upon this is the
 fault not of Luther, but entirely of Cajetan, since he did not suffer me
 to be silent and remain quiet, which at that time I was entreating for
 with all my might. What more was it my duty to do?
 
 Next came Charles Miltitz, also a nuncio from your Blessedness. He,
 though he went up and down with much and varied exertion, and omitted
 nothing which could tend to restore the position of the cause thrown
 into confusion by the rashness and pride of Cajetan, had difficulty,
 even with the help of that very illustrious prince the Elector
 Frederick, in at last bringing about more than one familiar conference
 with me. In these I again yielded to your great name, and was prepared
 to keep silence, and to accept as my judge either the Archbishop of
 Treves, or the Bishop of Naumburg; and thus it was done and concluded.
 While this was being done with good hope of success, lo! that other and
 greater enemy of yours, Eccius, rushed in with his Leipsic disputation,
 which he had undertaken against Carlstadt, and, having taken up a
 new question concerning the primacy of the Pope, turned his arms
 unexpectedly against me, and completely overthrew the plan for peace.
 Meanwhile Charles Miltitz was waiting, disputations were held, judges
 were being chosen, but no decision was arrived at. And no wonder! for
 by the falsehoods, pretences, and arts of Eccius the whole business was
 brought into such thorough disorder, confusion, and festering soreness,
 that, whichever way the sentence might lean, a greater conflagration was
 sure to arise; for he was seeking, not after truth, but after his own
 credit. In this case too I omitted nothing which it was right that I
 should do.
 
 I confess that on this occasion no small part of the corruptions of Rome
 came to light; but, if there was any offence in this, it was the fault
 of Eccius, who, in taking on him a burden beyond his strength, and in
 furiously aiming at credit for himself, unveiled to the whole world the
 disgrace of Rome.
 
 Here is that enemy of yours, Leo, or rather of your Court; by his
 example alone we may learn that an enemy is not more baneful than a
 flatterer. For what did he bring about by his flattery, except evils
 which no king could have brought about? At this day the name of the
 Court of Rome stinks in the nostrils of the world, the papal authority
 is growing weak, and its notorious ignorance is evil spoken of. We
 should hear none of these things, if Eccius had not disturbed the plans
 of Miltitz and myself for peace. He feels this clearly enough himself in
 the indignation he shows, too late and in vain, against the publication
 of my books. He ought to have reflected on this at the time when he was
 all mad for renown, and was seeking in your cause nothing but his own
 objects, and that with the greatest peril to you. The foolish man hoped
 that, from fear of your name, I should yield and keep silence; for I
 do not think he presumed on his talents and learning. Now, when he sees
 that I am very confident and speak aloud, he repents too late of his
 rashness, and sees--if indeed he does see it--that there is One in
 heaven who resists the proud, and humbles the presumptuous.
 
 Since then we were bringing about by this disputation nothing but the
 greater confusion of the cause of Rome, Charles Miltitz for the third
 time addressed the Fathers of the Order, assembled in chapter, and
 sought their advice for the settlement of the case, as being now in a
 most troubled and perilous state. Since, by the favour of God, there
 was no hope of proceeding against me by force, some of the more noted of
 their number were sent to me, and begged me at least to show respect to
 your person and to vindicate in a humble letter both your innocence
 and my own. They said that the affair was not as yet in a position of
 extreme hopelessness, if Leo X., in his inborn kindliness, would put his
 hand to it. On this I, who have always offered and wished for peace, in
 order that I might devote myself to calmer and more useful pursuits, and
 who for this very purpose have acted with so much spirit and vehemence,
 in order to put down by the strength and impetuosity of my words, as
 well as of my feelings, men whom I saw to be very far from equal to
 myself--I, I say, not only gladly yielded, but even accepted it with joy
 and gratitude, as the greatest kindness and benefit, if you should think
 it right to satisfy my hopes.
 
 Thus I come, most blessed Father, and in all abasement beseech you
 to put to your hand, if it is possible, and impose a curb to those
 flatterers who are enemies of peace, while they pretend peace. But there
 is no reason, most blessed Father, why any one should assume that I am
 to utter a recantation, unless he prefers to involve the case in
 still greater confusion. Moreover, I cannot bear with laws for the
 interpretation of the word of God, since the word of God, which teaches
 liberty in all other things, ought not to be bound. Saving these two
 things, there is nothing which I am not able, and most heartily willing,
 to do or to suffer. I hate contention; I will challenge no one; in
 return I wish not to be challenged; but, being challenged, I will not be
 dumb in the cause of Christ my Master. For your Blessedness will be able
 by one short and easy word to call these controversies before you and
 suppress them, and to impose silence and peace on both sides--a word
 which I have ever longed to hear.
 
 Therefore, Leo, my Father, beware of listening to those sirens who
 make you out to be not simply a man, but partly a god, so that you can
 command and require whatever you will. It will not happen so, nor will
 you prevail. You are the servant of servants, and more than any other
 man, in a most pitiable and perilous position. Let not those men deceive
 you who pretend that you are lord of the world; who will not allow any
 one to be a Christian without your authority; who babble of your having
 power over heaven, hell, and purgatory. These men are your enemies and
 are seeking your soul to destroy it, as Isaiah says, "My people, they
 that call thee blessed are themselves deceiving thee." They are in error
 who raise you above councils and the universal Church; they are in error
 who attribute to you alone the right of interpreting Scripture. All
 these men are seeking to set up their own impieties in the Church under
 your name, and alas! Satan has gained much through them in the time of
 your predecessors.
 
 In brief, trust not in any who exalt you, but in those who humiliate
 you. For this is the judgment of God: "He hath cast down the mighty from
 their seat, and hath exalted the humble." See how unlike Christ was to
 His successors, though all will have it that they are His vicars. I fear
 that in truth very many of them have been in too serious a sense His
 vicars, for a vicar represents a prince who is absent. Now if a pontiff
 rules while Christ is absent and does not dwell in his heart, what
 else is he but a vicar of Christ? And then what is that Church but a
 multitude without Christ? What indeed is such a vicar but antichrist
 and an idol? How much more rightly did the Apostles speak, who call
 themselves servants of a present Christ, not the vicars of an absent
 one!
 
 Perhaps I am shamelessly bold in seeming to teach so great a head, by
 whom all men ought to be taught, and from whom, as those plagues of
 yours boast, the thrones of judges receive their sentence; but I imitate
 St. Bernard in his book concerning Considerations addressed to Eugenius,
 a book which ought to be known by heart by every pontiff. I do this, not
 from any desire to teach, but as a duty, from that simple and faithful
 solicitude which teaches us to be anxious for all that is safe for
 our neighbours, and does not allow considerations of worthiness or
 unworthiness to be entertained, being intent only on the dangers or
 advantage of others. For since I know that your Blessedness is driven
 and tossed by the waves at Rome, so that the depths of the sea press
 on you with infinite perils, and that you are labouring under such a
 condition of misery that you need even the least help from any the least
 brother, I do not seem to myself to be acting unsuitably if I forget
 your majesty till I shall have fulfilled the office of charity. I will
 not flatter in so serious and perilous a matter; and if in this you do
 not see that I am your friend and most thoroughly your subject, there is
 One to see and judge.
 
 In fine, that I may not approach you empty-handed, blessed Father, I
 bring with me this little treatise, published under your name, as a good
 omen of the establishment of peace and of good hope. By this you may
 perceive in what pursuits I should prefer and be able to occupy myself
 to more profit, if I were allowed, or had been hitherto allowed, by your
 impious flatterers. It is a small matter, if you look to its exterior,
 but, unless I mistake, it is a summary of the Christian life put
 together in small compass, if you apprehend its meaning. I, in my
 poverty, have no other present to make you, nor do you need anything
 else than to be enriched by a spiritual gift. I commend myself to your
 Paternity and Blessedness, whom may the Lord Jesus preserve for ever.
 Amen.
 
 Wittenberg, 6th September, 1520.
 
 
 
 
 CONCERNING CHRISTIAN LIBERTY
 
 Christian faith has appeared to many an easy thing; nay, not a few even
 reckon it among the social virtues, as it were; and this they do because
 they have not made proof of it experimentally, and have never tasted of
 what efficacy it is. For it is not possible for any man to write well
 about it, or to understand well what is rightly written, who has not at
 some time tasted of its spirit, under the pressure of tribulation; while
 he who has tasted of it, even to a very small extent, can never
 write, speak, think, or hear about it sufficiently. For it is a living
 fountain, springing up into eternal life, as Christ calls it in John iv.
 
 Now, though I cannot boast of my abundance, and though I know how poorly
 I am furnished, yet I hope that, after having been vexed by various
 temptations, I have attained some little drop of faith, and that I can
 speak of this matter, if not with more elegance, certainly with more
 solidity, than those literal and too subtle disputants who have hitherto
 discoursed upon it without understanding their own words. That I may
 open then an easier way for the ignorant--for these alone I am trying
 to serve--I first lay down these two propositions, concerning spiritual
 liberty and servitude:--
 
 A Christian man is the most free lord of all, and subject to none; a
 Christian man is the most dutiful servant of all, and subject to every
 one.
 
 Although these statements appear contradictory, yet, when they are found
 to agree together, they will make excellently for my purpose. They are
 both the statements of Paul himself, who says, "Though I be free from
 all men, yet have I made myself servant unto all" (1 Cor. ix. 19), and
 "Owe no man anything, but to love one another" (Rom. xiii. 8). Now love
 is by its own nature dutiful and obedient to the beloved object. Thus
 even Christ, though Lord of all things, was yet made of a woman; made
 under the law; at once free and a servant; at once in the form of God
 and in the form of a servant.
 
 Let us examine the subject on a deeper and less simple principle. Man is
 composed of a twofold nature, a spiritual and a bodily. As regards the
 spiritual nature, which they name the soul, he is called the spiritual,
 inward, new man; as regards the bodily nature, which they name the
 flesh, he is called the fleshly, outward, old man. The Apostle speaks of
 this: "Though our outward man perish, yet the inward man is renewed day
 by day" (2 Cor. iv. 16). The result of this diversity is that in the
 Scriptures opposing statements are made concerning the same man,
 the fact being that in the same man these two men are opposed to one
 another; the flesh lusting against the spirit, and the spirit against
 the flesh (Gal. v. 17).
 
 We first approach the subject of the inward man, that we may see by what
 means a man becomes justified, free, and a true Christian; that is, a
 spiritual, new, and inward man. It is certain that absolutely none
 among outward things, under whatever name they may be reckoned, has any
 influence in producing Christian righteousness or liberty, nor, on the
 other hand, unrighteousness or slavery. This can be shown by an easy
 argument.
 
 What can it profit the soul that the body should be in good condition,
 free, and full of life; that it should eat, drink, and act according to
 its pleasure; when even the most impious slaves of every kind of vice
 are prosperous in these matters? Again, what harm can ill-health,
 bondage, hunger, thirst, or any other outward evil, do to the soul,
 when even the most pious of men and the freest in the purity of their
 conscience, are harassed by these things? Neither of these states of
 things has to do with the liberty or the slavery of the soul.
 
 And so it will profit nothing that the body should be adorned with
 sacred vestments, or dwell in holy places, or be occupied in sacred
 offices, or pray, fast, and abstain from certain meats, or do whatever
 works can be done through the body and in the body. Something widely
 different will be necessary for the justification and liberty of the
 soul, since the things I have spoken of can be done by any impious
 person, and only hypocrites are produced by devotion to these things. On
 the other hand, it will not at all injure the soul that the body should
 be clothed in profane raiment, should dwell in profane places, should
 eat and drink in the ordinary fashion, should not pray aloud, and
 should leave undone all the things above mentioned, which may be done by
 hypocrites.
 
 And, to cast everything aside, even speculation, meditations, and
 whatever things can be performed by the exertions of the soul itself,
 are of no profit. One thing, and one alone, is necessary for life,
 justification, and Christian liberty; and that is the most holy word of
 God, the Gospel of Christ, as He says, "I am the resurrection and the
 life; he that believeth in Me shall not die eternally" (John xi. 25),
 and also, "If the Son shall make you free, ye shall be free indeed"
 (John viii. 36), and, "Man shall not live by bread alone, but by every
 word that proceedeth out of the mouth of God" (Matt. iv. 4).
 
 Let us therefore hold it for certain and firmly established that the
 soul can do without everything except the word of God, without which
 none at all of its wants are provided for. But, having the word, it is
 rich and wants for nothing, since that is the word of life, of truth, of
 light, of peace, of justification, of salvation, of joy, of liberty, of
 wisdom, of virtue, of grace, of glory, and of every good thing. It is
 on this account that the prophet in a whole Psalm (Psalm cxix.), and in
 many other places, sighs for and calls upon the word of God with so many
 groanings and words.
 
 Again, there is no more cruel stroke of the wrath of God than when He
 sends a famine of hearing His words (Amos viii. 11), just as there is
 no greater favour from Him than the sending forth of His word, as it is
 said, "He sent His word and healed them, and delivered them from their
 destructions" (Psalm cvii. 20). Christ was sent for no other office than
 that of the word; and the order of Apostles, that of bishops, and that
 of the whole body of the clergy, have been called and instituted for no
 object but the ministry of the word.
 
 But you will ask, What is this word, and by what means is it to be used,
 since there are so many words of God? I answer, The Apostle Paul (Rom.
 i.) explains what it is, namely the Gospel of God, concerning His Son,
 incarnate, suffering, risen, and glorified, through the Spirit, the
 Sanctifier. To preach Christ is to feed the soul, to justify it, to set
 it free, and to save it, if it believes the preaching. For faith alone
 and the efficacious use of the word of God, bring salvation. "If thou
 shalt confess with thy mouth the Lord Jesus, and shalt believe in thine
 heart that God hath raised Him from the dead, thou shalt be saved" (Rom.
 x. 9); and again, "Christ is the end of the law for righteousness to
 every one that believeth" (Rom. x. 4), and "The just shall live by
 faith" (Rom. i. 17). For the word of God cannot be received and honoured
 by any works, but by faith alone. Hence it is clear that as the soul
 needs the word alone for life and justification, so it is justified by
 faith alone, and not by any works. For if it could be justified by any
 other means, it would have no need of the word, nor consequently of
 faith.
 
 But this faith cannot consist at all with works; that is, if you imagine
 that you can be justified by those works, whatever they are, along with
 it. For this would be to halt between two opinions, to worship Baal, and
 to kiss the hand to him, which is a very great iniquity, as Job says.
 Therefore, when you begin to believe, you learn at the same time that
 all that is in you is utterly guilty, sinful, and damnable, according to
 that saying, "All have sinned, and come short of the glory of God" (Rom.
 iii. 23), and also: "There is none righteous, no, not one; they are all
 gone out of the way; they are together become unprofitable: there is
 none that doeth good, no, not one" (Rom. iii. 10-12). When you have
 learnt this, you will know that Christ is necessary for you, since He
 has suffered and risen again for you, that, believing on Him, you might
 by this faith become another man, all your sins being remitted, and you
 being justified by the merits of another, namely of Christ alone.
 
 Since then this faith can reign only in the inward man, as it is said,
 "With the heart man believeth unto righteousness" (Rom. x. 10); and
 since it alone justifies, it is evident that by no outward work or
 labour can the inward man be at all justified, made free, and saved; and
 that no works whatever have any relation to him. And so, on the other
 hand, it is solely by impiety and incredulity of heart that he becomes
 guilty and a slave of sin, deserving condemnation, not by any outward
 sin or work. Therefore the first care of every Christian ought to be to
 lay aside all reliance on works, and strengthen his faith alone more
 and more, and by it grow in the knowledge, not of works, but of Christ
 Jesus, who has suffered and risen again for him, as Peter teaches
 (1 Peter v.) when he makes no other work to be a Christian one. Thus
 Christ, when the Jews asked Him what they should do that they might work
 the works of God, rejected the multitude of works, with which He saw
 that they were puffed up, and commanded them one thing only, saying,
 "This is the work of God: that ye believe on Him whom He hath sent, for
 Him hath God the Father sealed" (John vi. 27, 29).
 
 Hence a right faith in Christ is an incomparable treasure, carrying with
 it universal salvation and preserving from all evil, as it is said, "He
 that believeth and is baptised shall be saved; but he that believeth
 not shall be damned" (Mark xvi. 16). Isaiah, looking to this treasure,
 predicted, "The consumption decreed shall overflow with righteousness.
 For the Lord God of hosts shall make a consumption, even determined
 (verbum abbreviatum et consummans), in the midst of the land" (Isa.
 x. 22, 23). As if he said, "Faith, which is the brief and complete
 fulfilling of the law, will fill those who believe with such
 righteousness that they will need nothing else for justification." Thus,
 too, Paul says, "For with the heart man believeth unto righteousness"
 (Rom. x. 10).
 
 But you ask how it can be the fact that faith alone justifies, and
 affords without works so great a treasure of good things, when so many
 works, ceremonies, and laws are prescribed to us in the Scriptures?
 I answer, Before all things bear in mind what I have said: that faith
 alone without works justifies, sets free, and saves, as I shall show
 more clearly below.
 
 Meanwhile it is to be noted that the whole Scripture of God is divided
 into two parts: precepts and promises. The precepts certainly teach us
 what is good, but what they teach is not forthwith done. For they show
 us what we ought to do, but do not give us the power to do it. They
 were ordained, however, for the purpose of showing man to himself, that
 through them he may learn his own impotence for good and may despair of
 his own strength. For this reason they are called the Old Testament, and
 are so.
 
 For example, "Thou shalt not covet," is a precept by which we are all
 convicted of sin, since no man can help coveting, whatever efforts to
 the contrary he may make. In order therefore that he may fulfil the
 precept, and not covet, he is constrained to despair of himself and
 to seek elsewhere and through another the help which he cannot find in
 himself; as it is said, "O Israel, thou hast destroyed thyself; but in
 Me is thine help" (Hosea xiii. 9). Now what is done by this one precept
 is done by all; for all are equally impossible of fulfilment by us.
 
 Now when a man has through the precepts been taught his own impotence,
 and become anxious by what means he may satisfy the law--for the
 law must be satisfied, so that no jot or tittle of it may pass away,
 otherwise he must be hopelessly condemned--then, being truly humbled and
 brought to nothing in his own eyes, he finds in himself no resource for
 justification and salvation.
 
 Then comes in that other part of Scripture, the promises of God, which
 declare the glory of God, and say, "If you wish to fulfil the law, and,
 as the law requires, not to covet, lo! believe in Christ, in whom are
 promised to you grace, justification, peace, and liberty." All these
 things you shall have, if you believe, and shall be without them if you
 do not believe. For what is impossible for you by all the works of the
 law, which are many and yet useless, you shall fulfil in an easy and
 summary way through faith, because God the Father has made everything to
 depend on faith, so that whosoever has it has all things, and he who has
 it not has nothing. "For God hath concluded them all in unbelief, that
 He might have mercy upon all" (Rom. xi. 32). Thus the promises of God
 give that which the precepts exact, and fulfil what the law commands;
 so that all is of God alone, both the precepts and their fulfilment. He
 alone commands; He alone also fulfils. Hence the promises of God belong
 to the New Testament; nay, are the New Testament.
 
 Now, since these promises of God are words of holiness, truth,
 righteousness, liberty, and peace, and are full of universal goodness,
 the soul, which cleaves to them with a firm faith, is so united to them,
 nay, thoroughly absorbed by them, that it not only partakes in, but
 is penetrated and saturated by, all their virtues. For if the touch of
 Christ was healing, how much more does that most tender spiritual touch,
 nay, absorption of the word, communicate to the soul all that belongs to
 the word! In this way therefore the soul, through faith alone, without
 works, is from the word of God justified, sanctified, endued with truth,
 peace, and liberty, and filled full with every good thing, and is truly
 made the child of God, as it is said, "To them gave He power to become
 the sons of God, even to them that believe on His name" (John i. 12).
 
 From all this it is easy to understand why faith has such great power,
 and why no good works, nor even all good works put together, can compare
 with it, since no work can cleave to the word of God or be in the soul.
 Faith alone and the word reign in it; and such as is the word, such is
 the soul made by it, just as iron exposed to fire glows like fire, on
 account of its union with the fire. It is clear then that to a Christian
 man his faith suffices for everything, and that he has no need of works
 for justification. But if he has no need of works, neither has he need
 of the law; and if he has no need of the law, he is certainly free from
 the law, and the saying is true, "The law is not made for a righteous
 man" (1 Tim. i. 9). This is that Christian liberty, our faith, the
 effect of which is, not that we should be careless or lead a bad life,
 but that no one should need the law or works for justification and
 salvation.
 
 Let us consider this as the first virtue of faith; and let us look also
 to the second. This also is an office of faith: that it honours with the
 utmost veneration and the highest reputation Him in whom it believes,
 inasmuch as it holds Him to be truthful and worthy of belief. For there
 is no honour like that reputation of truth and righteousness with which
 we honour Him in whom we believe. What higher credit can we attribute
 to any one than truth and righteousness, and absolute goodness? On
 the other hand, it is the greatest insult to brand any one with the
 reputation of falsehood and unrighteousness, or to suspect him of these,
 as we do when we disbelieve him.
 
 Thus the soul, in firmly believing the promises of God, holds Him to be
 true and righteous; and it can attribute to God no higher glory than
 the credit of being so. The highest worship of God is to ascribe to Him
 truth, righteousness, and whatever qualities we must ascribe to one in
 whom we believe. In doing this the soul shows itself prepared to do His
 whole will; in doing this it hallows His name, and gives itself up to
 be dealt with as it may please God. For it cleaves to His promises, and
 never doubts that He is true, just, and wise, and will do, dispose, and
 provide for all things in the best way. Is not such a soul, in this its
 faith, most obedient to God in all things? What commandment does there
 remain which has not been amply fulfilled by such an obedience? What
 fulfilment can be more full than universal obedience? Now this is not
 accomplished by works, but by faith alone.
 
 On the other hand, what greater rebellion, impiety, or insult to God
 can there be, than not to believe His promises? What else is this, than
 either to make God a liar, or to doubt His truth--that is, to attribute
 truth to ourselves, but to God falsehood and levity? In doing this,
 is not a man denying God and setting himself up as an idol in his own
 heart? What then can works, done in such a state of impiety, profit us,
 were they even angelic or apostolic works? Rightly hath God shut up
 all, not in wrath nor in lust, but in unbelief, in order that those
 who pretend that they are fulfilling the law by works of purity and
 benevolence (which are social and human virtues) may not presume
 that they will therefore be saved, but, being included in the sin of
 unbelief, may either seek mercy, or be justly condemned.
 
 But when God sees that truth is ascribed to Him, and that in the faith
 of our hearts He is honoured with all the honour of which He is worthy,
 then in return He honours us on account of that faith, attributing to
 us truth and righteousness. For faith does truth and righteousness in
 rendering to God what is His; and therefore in return God gives glory
 to our righteousness. It is true and righteous that God is true and
 righteous; and to confess this and ascribe these attributes to Him, this
 it is to be true and righteous. Thus He says, "Them that honour Me I
 will honour, and they that despise Me shall be lightly esteemed" (1 Sam.
 ii. 30). And so Paul says that Abraham's faith was imputed to him for
 righteousness, because by it he gave glory to God; and that to us
 also, for the same reason, it shall be imputed for righteousness, if we
 believe (Rom. iv.).
 
 The third incomparable grace of faith is this: that it unites the soul
 to Christ, as the wife to the husband, by which mystery, as the Apostle
 teaches, Christ and the soul are made one flesh. Now if they are one
 flesh, and if a true marriage--nay, by far the most perfect of all
 marriages--is accomplished between them (for human marriages are but
 feeble types of this one great marriage), then it follows that all they
 have becomes theirs in common, as well good things as evil things; so
 that whatsoever Christ possesses, that the believing soul may take to
 itself and boast of as its own, and whatever belongs to the soul, that
 Christ claims as His.
 
 If we compare these possessions, we shall see how inestimable is the
 gain. Christ is full of grace, life, and salvation; the soul is full of
 sin, death, and condemnation. Let faith step in, and then sin, death,
 and hell will belong to Christ, and grace, life, and salvation to the
 soul. For, if He is a Husband, He must needs take to Himself that which
 is His wife's, and at the same time, impart to His wife that which is
 His. For, in giving her His own body and Himself, how can He but give
 her all that is His? And, in taking to Himself the body of His wife, how
 can He but take to Himself all that is hers?
 
 In this is displayed the delightful sight, not only of communion, but of
 a prosperous warfare, of victory, salvation, and redemption. For, since
 Christ is God and man, and is such a Person as neither has sinned, nor
 dies, nor is condemned, nay, cannot sin, die, or be condemned, and since
 His righteousness, life, and salvation are invincible, eternal, and
 almighty,--when I say, such a Person, by the wedding-ring of faith,
 takes a share in the sins, death, and hell of His wife, nay, makes them
 His own, and deals with them no otherwise than as if they were His, and
 as if He Himself had sinned; and when He suffers, dies, and descends to
 hell, that He may overcome all things, and since sin, death, and
 hell cannot swallow Him up, they must needs be swallowed up by Him in
 stupendous conflict. For His righteousness rises above the sins of all
 men; His life is more powerful than all death; His salvation is more
 unconquerable than all hell.
 
 Thus the believing soul, by the pledge of its faith in Christ, becomes
 free from all sin, fearless of death, safe from hell, and endowed with
 the eternal righteousness, life, and salvation of its Husband Christ.
 Thus He presents to Himself a glorious bride, without spot or wrinkle,
 cleansing her with the washing of water by the word; that is, by faith
 in the word of life, righteousness, and salvation. Thus He betrothes her
 unto Himself "in faithfulness, in righteousness, and in judgment, and in
 loving-kindness, and in mercies" (Hosea ii. 19, 20).
 
 Who then can value highly enough these royal nuptials? Who can
 comprehend the riches of the glory of this grace? Christ, that rich and
 pious Husband, takes as a wife a needy and impious harlot, redeeming
 her from all her evils and supplying her with all His good things. It
 is impossible now that her sins should destroy her, since they have
 been laid upon Christ and swallowed up in Him, and since she has in her
 Husband Christ a righteousness which she may claim as her own, and which
 she can set up with confidence against all her sins, against death and
 hell, saying, "If I have sinned, my Christ, in whom I believe, has not
 sinned; all mine is His, and all His is mine," as it is written, "My
 beloved is mine, and I am His" (Cant. ii. 16). This is what Paul says:
 "Thanks be to God, which giveth us the victory through our Lord Jesus
 Christ," victory over sin and death, as he says, "The sting of death is
 sin, and the strength of sin is the law" (1 Cor. xv. 56, 57).
 
 From all this you will again understand why so much importance is
 attributed to faith, so that it alone can fulfil the law and justify
 without any works. For you see that the First Commandment, which says,
 "Thou shalt worship one God only," is fulfilled by faith alone. If you
 were nothing but good works from the soles of your feet to the crown of
 your head, you would not be worshipping God, nor fulfilling the First
 Commandment, since it is impossible to worship God without ascribing to
 Him the glory of truth and of universal goodness, as it ought in truth
 to be ascribed. Now this is not done by works, but only by faith of
 heart. It is not by working, but by believing, that we glorify God, and
 confess Him to be true. On this ground faith alone is the righteousness
 of a Christian man, and the fulfilling of all the commandments. For to
 him who fulfils the first the task of fulfilling all the rest is easy.
 
 Works, since they are irrational things, cannot glorify God, although
 they may be done to the glory of God, if faith be present. But at
 present we are inquiring, not into the quality of the works done, but
 into him who does them, who glorifies God, and brings forth good
 works. This is faith of heart, the head and the substance of all our
 righteousness. Hence that is a blind and perilous doctrine which teaches
 that the commandments are fulfilled by works. The commandments must have
 been fulfilled previous to any good works, and good works follow their
 fulfillment, as we shall see.
 
 But, that we may have a wider view of that grace which our inner man
 has in Christ, we must know that in the Old Testament God sanctified to
 Himself every first-born male. The birthright was of great value, giving
 a superiority over the rest by the double honour of priesthood and
 kingship. For the first-born brother was priest and lord of all the
 rest.
 
 Under this figure was foreshown Christ, the true and only First-born of
 God the Father and of the Virgin Mary, and a true King and Priest, not
 in a fleshly and earthly sense. For His kingdom is not of this world; it
 is in heavenly and spiritual things that He reigns and acts as Priest;
 and these are righteousness, truth, wisdom, peace, salvation, etc.
 Not but that all things, even those of earth and hell, are subject to
 Him--for otherwise how could He defend and save us from them?--but it is
 not in these, nor by these, that His kingdom stands.
 
 So, too, His priesthood does not consist in the outward display of
 vestments and gestures, as did the human priesthood of Aaron and our
 ecclesiastical priesthood at this day, but in spiritual things, wherein,
 in His invisible office, He intercedes for us with God in heaven, and
 there offers Himself, and performs all the duties of a priest, as Paul
 describes Him to the Hebrews under the figure of Melchizedek. Nor does
 He only pray and intercede for us; He also teaches us inwardly in the
 spirit with the living teachings of His Spirit. Now these are the two
 special offices of a priest, as is figured to us in the case of fleshly
 priests by visible prayers and sermons.
 
 As Christ by His birthright has obtained these two dignities, so He
 imparts and communicates them to every believer in Him, under that law
 of matrimony of which we have spoken above, by which all that is the
 husband's is also the wife's. Hence all we who believe on Christ are
 kings and priests in Christ, as it is said, "Ye are a chosen generation,
 a royal priesthood, a holy nation, a peculiar people, that ye should
 show forth the praises of Him who hath called you out of darkness into
 His marvellous light" (1 Peter ii. 9).
 
 These two things stand thus. First, as regards kingship, every Christian
 is by faith so exalted above all things that, in spiritual power, he is
 completely lord of all things, so that nothing whatever can do him
 any hurt; yea, all things are subject to him, and are compelled to be
 subservient to his salvation. Thus Paul says, "All things work together
 for good to them who are the called" (Rom. viii. 28), and also, "Whether
 life, or death, or things present, or things to come, all are yours; and
 ye are Christ's" (1 Cor. iii. 22, 23).
 
 Not that in the sense of corporeal power any one among Christians has
 been appointed to possess and rule all things, according to the mad and
 senseless idea of certain ecclesiastics. That is the office of kings,
 princes, and men upon earth. In the experience of life we see that we
 are subjected to all things, and suffer many things, even death.
 Yea, the more of a Christian any man is, to so many the more evils,
 sufferings, and deaths is he subject, as we see in the first place in
 Christ the First-born, and in all His holy brethren.
 
 This is a spiritual power, which rules in the midst of enemies, and is
 powerful in the midst of distresses. And this is nothing else than that
 strength is made perfect in my weakness, and that I can turn all things
 to the profit of my salvation; so that even the cross and death are
 compelled to serve me and to work together for my salvation. This is
 a lofty and eminent dignity, a true and almighty dominion, a spiritual
 empire, in which there is nothing so good, nothing so bad, as not to
 work together for my good, if only I believe. And yet there is nothing
 of which I have need--for faith alone suffices for my salvation--unless
 that in it faith may exercise the power and empire of its liberty. This
 is the inestimable power and liberty of Christians.
 
 Nor are we only kings and the freest of all men, but also priests for
 ever, a dignity far higher than kingship, because by that priesthood we
 are worthy to appear before God, to pray for others, and to teach one
 another mutually the things which are of God. For these are the duties
 of priests, and they cannot possibly be permitted to any unbeliever.
 Christ has obtained for us this favour, if we believe in Him: that just
 as we are His brethren and co-heirs and fellow-kings with Him, so we
 should be also fellow-priests with Him, and venture with confidence,
 through the spirit of faith, to come into the presence of God, and cry,
 "Abba, Father!" and to pray for one another, and to do all things
 which we see done and figured in the visible and corporeal office of
 priesthood. But to an unbelieving person nothing renders service or work
 for good. He himself is in servitude to all things, and all things turn
 out for evil to him, because he uses all things in an impious way for
 his own advantage, and not for the glory of God. And thus he is not a
 priest, but a profane person, whose prayers are turned into sin, nor
 does he ever appear in the presence of God, because God does not hear
 sinners.
 
 Who then can comprehend the loftiness of that Christian dignity which,
 by its royal power, rules over all things, even over death, life, and
 sin, and, by its priestly glory, is all-powerful with God, since God
 does what He Himself seeks and wishes, as it is written, "He will fulfil
 the desire of them that fear Him; He also will hear their cry, and will
 save them"? (Psalm cxlv. 19). This glory certainly cannot be attained by
 any works, but by faith only.
 
 From these considerations any one may clearly see how a Christian
 man is free from all things; so that he needs no works in order to be
 justified and saved, but receives these gifts in abundance from faith
 alone. Nay, were he so foolish as to pretend to be justified, set
 free, saved, and made a Christian, by means of any good work, he would
 immediately lose faith, with all its benefits. Such folly is prettily
 represented in the fable where a dog, running along in the water
 and carrying in his mouth a real piece of meat, is deceived by the
 reflection of the meat in the water, and, in trying with open mouth to
 seize it, loses the meat and its image at the same time.
 
 Here you will ask, "If all who are in the Church are priests, by what
 character are those whom we now call priests to be distinguished from
 the laity?" I reply, By the use of these words, "priest," "clergy,"
 "spiritual person," "ecclesiastic," an injustice has been done, since
 they have been transferred from the remaining body of Christians to
 those few who are now, by hurtful custom, called ecclesiastics. For Holy
 Scripture makes no distinction between them, except that those who are
 now boastfully called popes, bishops, and lords, it calls ministers,
 servants, and stewards, who are to serve the rest in the ministry of the
 word, for teaching the faith of Christ and the liberty of believers. For
 though it is true that we are all equally priests, yet we cannot, nor,
 if we could, ought we all to, minister and teach publicly. Thus Paul
 says, "Let a man so account of us as of the ministers of Christ and
 stewards of the mysteries of God" (1 Cor. iv. 1).
 
 This bad system has now issued in such a pompous display of power and
 such a terrible tyranny that no earthly government can be compared to
 it, as if the laity were something else than Christians. Through this
 perversion of things it has happened that the knowledge of Christian
 grace, of faith, of liberty, and altogether of Christ, has utterly
 perished, and has been succeeded by an intolerable bondage to human
 works and laws; and, according to the Lamentations of Jeremiah, we have
 become the slaves of the vilest men on earth, who abuse our misery to
 all the disgraceful and ignominious purposes of their own will.
 
 Returning to the subject which we had begun, I think it is made clear by
 these considerations that it is not sufficient, nor a Christian course,
 to preach the works, life, and words of Christ in a historic manner, as
 facts which it suffices to know as an example how to frame our life, as
 do those who are now held the best preachers, and much less so to keep
 silence altogether on these things and to teach in their stead the laws
 of men and the decrees of the Fathers. There are now not a few persons
 who preach and read about Christ with the object of moving the human
 affections to sympathise with Christ, to indignation against the Jews,
 and other childish and womanish absurdities of that kind.
 
 Now preaching ought to have the object of promoting faith in Him, so
 that He may not only be Christ, but a Christ for you and for me, and
 that what is said of Him, and what He is called, may work in us. And
 this faith is produced and is maintained by preaching why Christ came,
 what He has brought us and given to us, and to what profit and advantage
 He is to be received. This is done when the Christian liberty which we
 have from Christ Himself is rightly taught, and we are shown in what
 manner all we Christians are kings and priests, and how we are lords of
 all things, and may be confident that whatever we do in the presence of
 God is pleasing and acceptable to Him.
 
 Whose heart would not rejoice in its inmost core at hearing these
 things? Whose heart, on receiving so great a consolation, would not
 become sweet with the love of Christ, a love to which it can never
 attain by any laws or works? Who can injure such a heart, or make it
 afraid? If the consciousness of sin or the horror of death rush in upon
 it, it is prepared to hope in the Lord, and is fearless of such evils,
 and undisturbed, until it shall look down upon its enemies. For it
 believes that the righteousness of Christ is its own, and that its sin
 is no longer its own, but that of Christ; but, on account of its faith
 in Christ, all its sin must needs be swallowed up from before the face
 of the righteousness of Christ, as I have said above. It learns, too,
 with the Apostle, to scoff at death and sin, and to say, "O death, where
 is thy sting? O grave, where is thy victory? The sting of death is sin,
 and the strength of sin is the law. But thanks be to God, which giveth
 us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ" (1 Cor. xv. 55-57). For
 death is swallowed up in victory, not only the victory of Christ, but
 ours also, since by faith it becomes ours, and in it we too conquer.
 
 Let it suffice to say this concerning the inner man and its liberty, and
 concerning that righteousness of faith which needs neither laws nor
 good works; nay, they are even hurtful to it, if any one pretends to be
 justified by them.
 
 And now let us turn to the other part: to the outward man. Here we shall
 give an answer to all those who, taking offence at the word of faith and
 at what I have asserted, say, "If faith does everything, and by itself
 suffices for justification, why then are good works commanded? Are we
 then to take our ease and do no works, content with faith?" Not so,
 impious men, I reply; not so. That would indeed really be the case, if
 we were thoroughly and completely inner and spiritual persons; but that
 will not happen until the last day, when the dead shall be raised. As
 long as we live in the flesh, we are but beginning and making advances
 in that which shall be completed in a future life. On this account the
 Apostle calls that which we have in this life the firstfruits of the
 Spirit (Rom. viii. 23). In future we shall have the tenths, and the
 fullness of the Spirit. To this part belongs the fact I have stated
 before: that the Christian is the servant of all and subject to all. For
 in that part in which he is free he does no works, but in that in which
 he is a servant he does all works. Let us see on what principle this is
 so.
 
 Although, as I have said, inwardly, and according to the spirit, a man
 is amply enough justified by faith, having all that he requires to have,
 except that this very faith and abundance ought to increase from day
 to day, even till the future life, still he remains in this mortal life
 upon earth, in which it is necessary that he should rule his own body
 and have intercourse with men. Here then works begin; here he must not
 take his ease; here he must give heed to exercise his body by fastings,
 watchings, labour, and other regular discipline, so that it may be
 subdued to the spirit, and obey and conform itself to the inner man and
 faith, and not rebel against them nor hinder them, as is its nature to
 do if it is not kept under. For the inner man, being conformed to God
 and created after the image of God through faith, rejoices and delights
 itself in Christ, in whom such blessings have been conferred on it, and
 hence has only this task before it: to serve God with joy and for nought
 in free love.
 
 But in doing this he comes into collision with that contrary will in
 his own flesh, which is striving to serve the world and to seek its own
 gratification. This the spirit of faith cannot and will not bear, but
 applies itself with cheerfulness and zeal to keep it down and restrain
 it, as Paul says, "I delight in the law of God after the inward man; but
 I see another law in my members, warring against the law of my mind and
 bringing me into captivity to the law of sin" (Rom. vii. 22, 23), and
 again, "I keep under my body, and bring it unto subjection, lest that
 by any means, when I have preached to others, I myself should be a
 castaway" (1 Cor. ix. 27), and "They that are Christ's have crucified
 the flesh, with the affections and lusts" (Gal. v. 24).
 
 These works, however, must not be done with any notion that by them a
 man can be justified before God--for faith, which alone is righteousness
 before God, will not bear with this false notion--but solely with this
 purpose: that the body may be brought into subjection, and be purified
 from its evil lusts, so that our eyes may be turned only to purging away
 those lusts. For when the soul has been cleansed by faith and made to
 love God, it would have all things to be cleansed in like manner, and
 especially its own body, so that all things might unite with it in the
 love and praise of God. Thus it comes that, from the requirements of his
 own body, a man cannot take his ease, but is compelled on its account
 to do many good works, that he may bring it into subjection. Yet these
 works are not the means of his justification before God; he does them
 out of disinterested love to the service of God; looking to no other
 end than to do what is well-pleasing to Him whom he desires to obey most
 dutifully in all things.
 
 On this principle every man may easily instruct himself in what measure,
 and with what distinctions, he ought to chasten his own body. He will
 fast, watch, and labour, just as much as he sees to suffice for keeping
 down the wantonness and concupiscence of the body. But those who pretend
 to be justified by works are looking, not to the mortification of their
 lusts, but only to the works themselves; thinking that, if they can
 accomplish as many works and as great ones as possible, all is well with
 them, and they are justified. Sometimes they even injure their brain,
 and extinguish nature, or at least make it useless. This is enormous
 folly, and ignorance of Christian life and faith, when a man seeks,
 without faith, to be justified and saved by works.
 
 To make what we have said more easily understood, let us set it forth
 under a figure. The works of a Christian man, who is justified and saved
 by his faith out of the pure and unbought mercy of God, ought to be
 regarded in the same light as would have been those of Adam and Eve in
 paradise and of all their posterity if they had not sinned. Of them it
 is said, "The Lord God took the man and put him into the garden of Eden
 to dress it and to keep it" (Gen. ii. 15). Now Adam had been created by
 God just and righteous, so that he could not have needed to be justified
 and made righteous by keeping the garden and working in it; but, that
 he might not be unemployed, God gave him the business of keeping and
 cultivating paradise. These would have indeed been works of perfect
 freedom, being done for no object but that of pleasing God, and not in
 order to obtain justification, which he already had to the full, and
 which would have been innate in us all.
 
 So it is with the works of a believer. Being by his faith replaced
 afresh in paradise and created anew, he does not need works for his
 justification, but that he may not be idle, but may exercise his own
 body and preserve it. His works are to be done freely, with the sole
 object of pleasing God. Only we are not yet fully created anew in
 perfect faith and love; these require to be increased, not, however,
 through works, but through themselves.
 
 A bishop, when he consecrates a church, confirms children, or performs
 any other duty of his office, is not consecrated as bishop by these
 works; nay, unless he had been previously consecrated as bishop, not one
 of those works would have any validity; they would be foolish, childish,
 and ridiculous. Thus a Christian, being consecrated by his faith, does
 good works; but he is not by these works made a more sacred person, or
 more a Christian. That is the effect of faith alone; nay, unless he were
 previously a believer and a Christian, none of his works would have any
 value at all; they would really be impious and damnable sins.
 
 True, then, are these two sayings: "Good works do not make a good man,
 but a good man does good works"; "Bad works do not make a bad man, but a
 bad man does bad works." Thus it is always necessary that the substance
 or person should be good before any good works can be done, and that
 good works should follow and proceed from a good person. As Christ says,
 "A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a corrupt tree
 bring forth good fruit" (Matt. vii. 18). Now it is clear that the fruit
 does not bear the tree, nor does the tree grow on the fruit; but, on the
 contrary, the trees bear the fruit, and the fruit grows on the trees.
 
 As then trees must exist before their fruit, and as the fruit does not
 make the tree either good or bad, but on the contrary, a tree of either
 kind produces fruit of the same kind, so must first the person of the
 man be good or bad before he can do either a good or a bad work; and his
 works do not make him bad or good, but he himself makes his works either
 bad or good.
 
 We may see the same thing in all handicrafts. A bad or good house does
 not make a bad or good builder, but a good or bad builder makes a good
 or bad house. And in general no work makes the workman such as it is
 itself; but the workman makes the work such as he is himself. Such
 is the case, too, with the works of men. Such as the man himself is,
 whether in faith or in unbelief, such is his work: good if it be done
 in faith; bad if in unbelief. But the converse is not true that, such as
 the work is, such the man becomes in faith or in unbelief. For as works
 do not make a believing man, so neither do they make a justified man;
 but faith, as it makes a man a believer and justified, so also it makes
 his works good.
 
 Since then works justify no man, but a man must be justified before he
 can do any good work, it is most evident that it is faith alone which,
 by the mere mercy of God through Christ, and by means of His word,
 can worthily and sufficiently justify and save the person; and that a
 Christian man needs no work, no law, for his salvation; for by faith he
 is free from all law, and in perfect freedom does gratuitously all that
 he does, seeking nothing either of profit or of salvation--since by
 the grace of God he is already saved and rich in all things through his
 faith--but solely that which is well-pleasing to God.
 
 So, too, no good work can profit an unbeliever to justification and
 salvation; and, on the other hand, no evil work makes him an evil and
 condemned person, but that unbelief, which makes the person and the tree
 bad, makes his works evil and condemned. Wherefore, when any man is made
 good or bad, this does not arise from his works, but from his faith or
 unbelief, as the wise man says, "The beginning of sin is to fall away
 from God"; that is, not to believe. Paul says, "He that cometh to God
 must believe" (Heb. xi. 6); and Christ says the same thing: "Either make
 the tree good and his fruit good; or else make the tree corrupt, and
 his fruit corrupt" (Matt. xii. 33),--as much as to say, He who wishes to
 have good fruit will begin with the tree, and plant a good one; even
 so he who wishes to do good works must begin, not by working, but by
 believing, since it is this which makes the person good. For nothing
 makes the person good but faith, nor bad but unbelief.
 
 It is certainly true that, in the sight of men, a man becomes good or
 evil by his works; but here "becoming" means that it is thus shown and
 recognised who is good or evil, as Christ says, "By their fruits ye
 shall know them" (Matt. vii. 20). But all this stops at appearances and
 externals; and in this matter very many deceive themselves, when they
 presume to write and teach that we are to be justified by good works,
 and meanwhile make no mention even of faith, walking in their own ways,
 ever deceived and deceiving, going from bad to worse, blind leaders of
 the blind, wearying themselves with many works, and yet never attaining
 to true righteousness, of whom Paul says, "Having a form of godliness,
 but denying the power thereof, ever learning and never able to come to
 the knowledge of the truth" (2 Tim. iii. 5, 7).
 
 He then who does not wish to go astray, with these blind ones, must look
 further than to the works of the law or the doctrine of works; nay,
 must turn away his sight from works, and look to the person, and to the
 manner in which it may be justified. Now it is justified and saved, not
 by works or laws, but by the word of God--that is, by the promise of His
 grace--so that the glory may be to the Divine majesty, which has saved
 us who believe, not by works of righteousness which we have done, but
 according to His mercy, by the word of His grace.
 
 From all this it is easy to perceive on what principle good works are
 to be cast aside or embraced, and by what rule all teachings put forth
 concerning works are to be understood. For if works are brought forward
 as grounds of justification, and are done under the false persuasion
 that we can pretend to be justified by them, they lay on us the yoke
 of necessity, and extinguish liberty along with faith, and by this very
 addition to their use they become no longer good, but really worthy of
 condemnation. For such works are not free, but blaspheme the grace of
 God, to which alone it belongs to justify and save through faith. Works
 cannot accomplish this, and yet, with impious presumption, through
 our folly, they take it on themselves to do so; and thus break in with
 violence upon the office and glory of grace.
 
 We do not then reject good works; nay, we embrace them and teach them in
 the highest degree. It is not on their own account that we condemn them,
 but on account of this impious addition to them and the perverse notion
 of seeking justification by them. These things cause them to be only
 good in outward show, but in reality not good, since by them men are
 deceived and deceive others, like ravening wolves in sheep's clothing.
 
 Now this leviathan, this perverted notion about works, is invincible
 when sincere faith is wanting. For those sanctified doers of works
 cannot but hold it till faith, which destroys it, comes and reigns in
 the heart. Nature cannot expel it by her own power; nay, cannot even see
 it for what it is, but considers it as a most holy will. And when
 custom steps in besides, and strengthens this pravity of nature, as has
 happened by means of impious teachers, then the evil is incurable, and
 leads astray multitudes to irreparable ruin. Therefore, though it is
 good to preach and write about penitence, confession, and satisfaction,
 yet if we stop there, and do not go on to teach faith, such teaching
 is without doubt deceitful and devilish. For Christ, speaking by His
 servant John, not only said, "Repent ye," but added, "for the kingdom of
 heaven is at hand" (Matt. iii. 2).
 
 For not one word of God only, but both, should be preached; new and old
 things should be brought out of the treasury, as well the voice of
 the law as the word of grace. The voice of the law should be brought
 forward, that men may be terrified and brought to a knowledge of their
 sins, and thence be converted to penitence and to a better manner of
 life. But we must not stop here; that would be to wound only and not to
 bind up, to strike and not to heal, to kill and not to make alive, to
 bring down to hell and not to bring back, to humble and not to exalt.
 Therefore the word of grace and of the promised remission of sin must
 also be preached, in order to teach and set up faith, since without
 that word contrition, penitence, and all other duties, are performed and
 taught in vain.
 
 There still remain, it is true, preachers of repentance and grace, but
 they do not explain the law and the promises of God to such an end, and
 in such a spirit, that men may learn whence repentance and grace are to
 come. For repentance comes from the law of God, but faith or grace
 from the promises of God, as it is said, "Faith cometh by hearing, and
 hearing by the word of God" (Rom. x. 17), whence it comes that a man,
 when humbled and brought to the knowledge of himself by the threatenings
 and terrors of the law, is consoled and raised up by faith in the Divine
 promise. Thus "weeping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the
 morning" (Psalm xxx. 5). Thus much we say concerning works in general,
 and also concerning those which the Christian practises with regard to
 his own body.
 
 Lastly, we will speak also of those works which he performs towards his
 neighbour. For man does not live for himself alone in this mortal body,
 in order to work on its account, but also for all men on earth; nay, he
 lives only for others, and not for himself. For it is to this end that
 he brings his own body into subjection, that he may be able to serve
 others more sincerely and more freely, as Paul says, "None of us liveth
 to himself, and no man dieth to himself. For whether we live, we live
 unto the Lord; and whether we die, we die unto the Lord" (Rom. xiv. 7,
 8). Thus it is impossible that he should take his ease in this life, and
 not work for the good of his neighbours, since he must needs speak, act,
 and converse among men, just as Christ was made in the likeness of men
 and found in fashion as a man, and had His conversation among men.
 
 Yet a Christian has need of none of these things for justification and
 salvation, but in all his works he ought to entertain this view and look
 only to this object--that he may serve and be useful to others in all
 that he does; having nothing before his eyes but the necessities and the
 advantage of his neighbour. Thus the Apostle commands us to work with
 our own hands, that we may have to give to those that need. He might
 have said, that we may support ourselves; but he tells us to give to
 those that need. It is the part of a Christian to take care of his own
 body for the very purpose that, by its soundness and well-being, he may
 be enabled to labour, and to acquire and preserve property, for the aid
 of those who are in want, that thus the stronger member may serve the
 weaker member, and we may be children of God, thoughtful and busy one
 for another, bearing one another's burdens, and so fulfilling the law of
 Christ.
 
 Here is the truly Christian life, here is faith really working by love,
 when a man applies himself with joy and love to the works of that freest
 servitude in which he serves others voluntarily and for nought, himself
 abundantly satisfied in the fulness and riches of his own faith.
 
 Thus, when Paul had taught the Philippians how they had been made
 rich by that faith in Christ in which they had obtained all things,
 he teaches them further in these words: "If there be therefore any
 consolation in Christ, if any comfort of love, if any fellowship of
 the Spirit, if any bowels and mercies, fulfil ye my joy, that ye be
 like-minded, having the same love, being of one accord, of one mind. Let
 nothing be done through strife or vainglory; but in lowliness of mind
 let each esteem other better than themselves. Look not every man on his
 own things, but every man also on the things of others" (Phil. ii. 1-4).
 
 In this we see clearly that the Apostle lays down this rule for a
 Christian life: that all our works should be directed to the advantage
 of others, since every Christian has such abundance through his faith
 that all his other works and his whole life remain over and above
 wherewith to serve and benefit his neighbour of spontaneous goodwill.
 
 To this end he brings forward Christ as an example, saying, "Let this
 mind be in you, which was also in Christ Jesus, who, being in the form
 of God, thought it not robbery to be equal with God, but made Himself of
 no reputation, and took upon Him the form of a servant, and was made
 in the likeness of men; and being found in fashion as a man, He humbled
 Himself, and became obedient unto death" (Phil. ii. 5-8). This most
 wholesome saying of the Apostle has been darkened to us by men who,
 totally misunderstanding the expressions "form of God," "form of a
 servant," "fashion," "likeness of men," have transferred them to the
 natures of Godhead and manhood. Paul's meaning is this: Christ, when He
 was full of the form of God and abounded in all good things, so that He
 had no need of works or sufferings to be just and saved--for all these
 things He had from the very beginning--yet was not puffed up with these
 things, and did not raise Himself above us and arrogate to Himself power
 over us, though He might lawfully have done so, but, on the contrary,
 so acted in labouring, working, suffering, and dying, as to be like the
 rest of men, and no otherwise than a man in fashion and in conduct, as
 if He were in want of all things and had nothing of the form of God; and
 yet all this He did for our sakes, that He might serve us, and that all
 the works He should do under that form of a servant might become ours.
 
 Thus a Christian, like Christ his Head, being full and in abundance
 through his faith, ought to be content with this form of God, obtained
 by faith; except that, as I have said, he ought to increase this faith
 till it be perfected. For this faith is his life, justification, and
 salvation, preserving his person itself and making it pleasing to God,
 and bestowing on him all that Christ has, as I have said above, and
 as Paul affirms: "The life which I now live in the flesh I live by the
 faith of the Son of God" (Gal. ii. 20). Though he is thus free from all
 works, yet he ought to empty himself of this liberty, take on him the
 form of a servant, be made in the likeness of men, be found in fashion
 as a man, serve, help, and in every way act towards his neighbour as he
 sees that God through Christ has acted and is acting towards him.
 All this he should do freely, and with regard to nothing but the good
 pleasure of God, and he should reason thus:--
 
 Lo! my God, without merit on my part, of His pure and free mercy, has
 given to me, an unworthy, condemned, and contemptible creature all the
 riches of justification and salvation in Christ, so that I no longer
 am in want of anything, except of faith to believe that this is so.
 For such a Father, then, who has overwhelmed me with these inestimable
 riches of His, why should I not freely, cheerfully, and with my whole
 heart, and from voluntary zeal, do all that I know will be pleasing to
 Him and acceptable in His sight? I will therefore give myself as a sort
 of Christ, to my neighbour, as Christ has given Himself to me; and will
 do nothing in this life except what I see will be needful, advantageous,
 and wholesome for my neighbour, since by faith I abound in all good
 things in Christ.
 
 Thus from faith flow forth love and joy in the Lord, and from love
 a cheerful, willing, free spirit, disposed to serve our neighbour
 voluntarily, without taking any account of gratitude or ingratitude,
 praise or blame, gain or loss. Its object is not to lay men under
 obligations, nor does it distinguish between friends and enemies, or
 look to gratitude or ingratitude, but most freely and willingly spends
 itself and its goods, whether it loses them through ingratitude, or
 gains goodwill. For thus did its Father, distributing all things to all
 men abundantly and freely, making His sun to rise upon the just and the
 unjust. Thus, too, the child does and endures nothing except from the
 free joy with which it delights through Christ in God, the Giver of such
 great gifts.
 
 You see, then, that, if we recognize those great and precious gifts, as
 Peter says, which have been given to us, love is quickly diffused in
 our hearts through the Spirit, and by love we are made free, joyful,
 all-powerful, active workers, victors over all our tribulations,
 servants to our neighbour, and nevertheless lords of all things. But,
 for those who do not recognise the good things given to them through
 Christ, Christ has been born in vain; such persons walk by works, and
 will never attain the taste and feeling of these great things. Therefore
 just as our neighbour is in want, and has need of our abundance, so we
 too in the sight of God were in want, and had need of His mercy. And as
 our heavenly Father has freely helped us in Christ, so ought we freely
 to help our neighbour by our body and works, and each should become to
 other a sort of Christ, so that we may be mutually Christs, and that
 the same Christ may be in all of us; that is, that we may be truly
 Christians.
 
 Who then can comprehend the riches and glory of the Christian life? It
 can do all things, has all things, and is in want of nothing; is lord
 over sin, death, and hell, and at the same time is the obedient and
 useful servant of all. But alas! it is at this day unknown throughout
 the world; it is neither preached nor sought after, so that we are quite
 ignorant about our own name, why we are and are called Christians. We
 are certainly called so from Christ, who is not absent, but dwells among
 us--provided, that is, that we believe in Him and are reciprocally and
 mutually one the Christ of the other, doing to our neighbour as Christ
 does to us. But now, in the doctrine of men, we are taught only to seek
 after merits, rewards, and things which are already ours, and we have
 made of Christ a taskmaster far more severe than Moses.
 
 The Blessed Virgin beyond all others, affords us an example of the same
 faith, in that she was purified according to the law of Moses, and like
 all other women, though she was bound by no such law and had no need
 of purification. Still she submitted to the law voluntarily and of free
 love, making herself like the rest of women, that she might not offend
 or throw contempt on them. She was not justified by doing this; but,
 being already justified, she did it freely and gratuitously. Thus ought
 our works too to be done, and not in order to be justified by them; for,
 being first justified by faith, we ought to do all our works freely and
 cheerfully for the sake of others.
 
 St. Paul circumcised his disciple Timothy, not because he needed
 circumcision for his justification, but that he might not offend or
 contemn those Jews, weak in the faith, who had not yet been able to
 comprehend the liberty of faith. On the other hand, when they contemned
 liberty and urged that circumcision was necessary for justification, he
 resisted them, and would not allow Titus to be circumcised. For, as he
 would not offend or contemn any one's weakness in faith, but yielded
 for the time to their will, so, again, he would not have the liberty of
 faith offended or contemned by hardened self-justifiers, but walked in
 a middle path, sparing the weak for the time, and always resisting the
 hardened, that he might convert all to the liberty of faith. On the same
 principle we ought to act, receiving those that are weak in the faith,
 but boldly resisting these hardened teachers of works, of whom we shall
 hereafter speak at more length.
 
 Christ also, when His disciples were asked for the tribute money, asked
 of Peter whether the children of a king were not free from taxes. Peter
 agreed to this; yet Jesus commanded him to go to the sea, saying, "Lest
 we should offend them, go thou to the sea, and cast a hook, and take up
 the fish that first cometh up; and when thou hast opened his mouth thou
 shalt find a piece of money; that take, and give unto them for Me and
 thee" (Matt. xvii. 27).
 
 This example is very much to our purpose; for here Christ calls Himself
 and His disciples free men and children of a King, in want of nothing;
 and yet He voluntarily submits and pays the tax. Just as far, then,
 as this work was necessary or useful to Christ for justification or
 salvation, so far do all His other works or those of His disciples avail
 for justification. They are really free and subsequent to justification,
 and only done to serve others and set them an example.
 
 Such are the works which Paul inculcated, that Christians should be
 subject to principalities and powers and ready to every good work (Titus
 iii. 1), not that they may be justified by these things--for they are
 already justified by faith--but that in liberty of spirit they may thus
 be the servants of others and subject to powers, obeying their will out
 of gratuitous love.
 
 Such, too, ought to have been the works of all colleges, monasteries,
 and priests; every one doing the works of his own profession and state
 of life, not in order to be justified by them, but in order to bring his
 own body into subjection, as an example to others, who themselves
 also need to keep under their bodies, and also in order to accommodate
 himself to the will of others, out of free love. But we must always
 guard most carefully against any vain confidence or presumption of being
 justified, gaining merit, or being saved by these works, this being the
 part of faith alone, as I have so often said.
 
 Any man possessing this knowledge may easily keep clear of danger among
 those innumerable commands and precepts of the Pope, of bishops, of
 monasteries, of churches, of princes, and of magistrates, which some
 foolish pastors urge on us as being necessary for justification and
 salvation, calling them precepts of the Church, when they are not so
 at all. For the Christian freeman will speak thus: I will fast, I will
 pray, I will do this or that which is commanded me by men, not as having
 any need of these things for justification or salvation, but that I
 may thus comply with the will of the Pope, of the bishop, of such a
 community or such a magistrate, or of my neighbour as an example to him;
 for this cause I will do and suffer all things, just as Christ did and
 suffered much more for me, though He needed not at all to do so on His
 own account, and made Himself for my sake under the law, when He was
 not under the law. And although tyrants may do me violence or wrong in
 requiring obedience to these things, yet it will not hurt me to do them,
 so long as they are not done against God.
 
 From all this every man will be able to attain a sure judgment and
 faithful discrimination between all works and laws, and to know who
 are blind and foolish pastors, and who are true and good ones. For
 whatsoever work is not directed to the sole end either of keeping under
 the body, or of doing service to our neighbour--provided he require
 nothing contrary to the will of God--is no good or Christian work. Hence
 I greatly fear that at this day few or no colleges, monasteries, altars,
 or ecclesiastical functions are Christian ones; and the same may be said
 of fasts and special prayers to certain saints. I fear that in all these
 nothing is being sought but what is already ours; while we fancy that
 by these things our sins are purged away and salvation is attained, and
 thus utterly do away with Christian liberty. This comes from ignorance
 of Christian faith and liberty.
 
 This ignorance and this crushing of liberty are diligently promoted by
 the teaching of very many blind pastors, who stir up and urge the people
 to a zeal for these things, praising them and puffing them up with their
 indulgences, but never teaching faith. Now I would advise you, if you
 have any wish to pray, to fast, or to make foundations in churches, as
 they call it, to take care not to do so with the object of gaining any
 advantage, either temporal or eternal. You will thus wrong your faith,
 which alone bestows all things on you, and the increase of which, either
 by working or by suffering, is alone to be cared for. What you give,
 give freely and without price, that others may prosper and have increase
 from you and your goodness. Thus you will be a truly good man and a
 Christian. For what to you are your goods and your works, which are done
 over and above for the subjection of the body, since you have abundance
 for yourself through your faith, in which God has given you all things?
 
 We give this rule: the good things which we have from God ought to flow
 from one to another and become common to all, so that every one of us
 may, as it were, put on his neighbour, and so behave towards him as if
 he were himself in his place. They flowed and do flow from Christ to us;
 He put us on, and acted for us as if He Himself were what we are.
 From us they flow to those who have need of them; so that my faith
 and righteousness ought to be laid down before God as a covering and
 intercession for the sins of my neighbour, which I am to take on myself,
 and so labour and endure servitude in them, as if they were my own; for
 thus has Christ done for us. This is true love and the genuine truth
 of Christian life. But only there is it true and genuine where there
 is true and genuine faith. Hence the Apostle attributes to charity this
 quality: that she seeketh not her own.
 
 We conclude therefore that a Christian man does not live in himself, but
 in Christ and in his neighbour, or else is no Christian: in Christ by
 faith; in his neighbour by love. By faith he is carried upwards
 above himself to God, and by love he sinks back below himself to his
 neighbour, still always-abiding in God and His love, as Christ says,
 "Verily I say unto you, Hereafter ye shall see heaven open, and the
 angels of God ascending and descending upon the Son of man" (John i.
 51).
 
 Thus much concerning liberty, which, as you see, is a true and spiritual
 liberty, making our hearts free from all sins, laws, and commandments,
 as Paul says, "The law is not made for a righteous man" (1 Tim. i. 9),
 and one which surpasses all other external liberties, as far as heaven
 is above earth. May Christ make us to understand and preserve this
 liberty. Amen.
 
 Finally, for the sake of those to whom nothing can be stated so well but
 that they misunderstand and distort it, we must add a word, in case they
 can understand even that. There are very many persons who, when they
 hear of this liberty of faith, straightway turn it into an occasion of
 licence. They think that everything is now lawful for them, and do not
 choose to show themselves free men and Christians in any other way than
 by their contempt and reprehension of ceremonies, of traditions, of
 human laws; as if they were Christians merely because they refuse
 to fast on stated days, or eat flesh when others fast, or omit the
 customary prayers; scoffing at the precepts of men, but utterly passing
 over all the rest that belongs to the Christian religion. On the other
 hand, they are most pertinaciously resisted by those who strive after
 salvation solely by their observance of and reverence for ceremonies,
 as if they would be saved merely because they fast on stated days,
 or abstain from flesh, or make formal prayers; talking loudly of the
 precepts of the Church and of the Fathers, and not caring a straw about
 those things which belong to our genuine faith. Both these parties
 are plainly culpable, in that, while they neglect matters which are of
 weight and necessary for salvation, they contend noisily about such as
 are without weight and not necessary.
 
 How much more rightly does the Apostle Paul teach us to walk in the
 middle path, condemning either extreme and saying, "Let not him that
 eateth despise him that eateth not; and let not him which eateth not
 judge him that eateth" (Rom. xiv. 3)! You see here how the Apostle
 blames those who, not from religious feeling, but in mere contempt,
 neglect and rail at ceremonial observances, and teaches them not to
 despise, since this "knowledge puffeth up." Again, he teaches the
 pertinacious upholders of these things not to judge their opponents. For
 neither party observes towards the other that charity which edifieth. In
 this matter we must listen to Scripture, which teaches us to turn aside
 neither to the right hand nor to the left, but to follow those right
 precepts of the Lord which rejoice the heart. For just as a man is
 not righteous merely because he serves and is devoted to works and
 ceremonial rites, so neither will he be accounted righteous merely
 because he neglects and despises them.
 
 It is not from works that we are set free by the faith of Christ, but
 from the belief in works, that is from foolishly presuming to seek
 justification through works. Faith redeems our consciences, makes them
 upright, and preserves them, since by it we recognise the truth that
 justification does not depend on our works, although good works neither
 can nor ought to be absent, just as we cannot exist without food and
 drink and all the functions of this mortal body. Still it is not on them
 that our justification is based, but on faith; and yet they ought not
 on that account to be despised or neglected. Thus in this world we
 are compelled by the needs of this bodily life; but we are not hereby
 justified. "My kingdom is not hence, nor of this world," says Christ;
 but He does not say, "My kingdom is not here, nor in this world." Paul,
 too, says, "Though we walk in the flesh, we do not war after the flesh"
 (2 Cor. x. 3), and "The life which I now live in the flesh I live by
 the faith of the Son of God" (Gal. ii. 20). Thus our doings, life, and
 being, in works and ceremonies, are done from the necessities of this
 life, and with the motive of governing our bodies; but yet we are not
 justified by these things, but by the faith of the Son of God.
 
 The Christian must therefore walk in the middle path, and set these two
 classes of men before his eyes. He may meet with hardened and obstinate
 ceremonialists, who, like deaf adders, refuse to listen to the truth of
 liberty, and cry up, enjoin, and urge on us their ceremonies, as if they
 could justify us without faith. Such were the Jews of old, who would not
 understand, that they might act well. These men we must resist, do just
 the contrary to what they do, and be bold to give them offence, lest
 by this impious notion of theirs they should deceive many along with
 themselves. Before the eyes of these men it is expedient to eat flesh,
 to break fasts, and to do in behalf of the liberty of faith things which
 they hold to be the greatest sins. We must say of them, "Let them alone;
 they be blind leaders of the blind" (Matt. xv. 14). In this way Paul
 also would not have Titus circumcised, though these men urged it;
 and Christ defended the Apostles, who had plucked ears of corn on the
 Sabbath day; and many like instances.
 
 Or else we may meet with simple-minded and ignorant persons, weak in
 the faith, as the Apostle calls them, who are as yet unable to apprehend
 that liberty of faith, even if willing to do so. These we must spare,
 lest they should be offended. We must bear with their infirmity, till
 they shall be more fully instructed. For since these men do not act thus
 from hardened malice, but only from weakness of faith, therefore, in
 order to avoid giving them offence, we must keep fasts and do other
 things which they consider necessary. This is required of us by charity,
 which injures no one, but serves all men. It is not the fault of these
 persons that they are weak, but that of their pastors, who by the snares
 and weapons of their own traditions have brought them into bondage and
 wounded their souls when they ought to have been set free and healed by
 the teaching of faith and liberty. Thus the Apostle says, "If meat make
 my brother to offend, I will eat no flesh while the world standeth" (1
 Cor. viii. 13); and again, "I know, and am persuaded by the Lord Jesus,
 that there is nothing unclean of itself; but to him that esteemeth
 anything to be unclean, to him it is unclean. It is evil for that man
 who eateth with offence" (Rom. xiv. 14, 20).
 
 Thus, though we ought boldly to resist those teachers of tradition, and
 though the laws of the pontiffs, by which they make aggressions on the
 people of God, deserve sharp reproof, yet we must spare the timid crowd,
 who are held captive by the laws of those impious tyrants, till they
 are set free. Fight vigorously against the wolves, but on behalf of the
 sheep, not against the sheep. And this you may do by inveighing against
 the laws and lawgivers, and yet at the same time observing these laws
 with the weak, lest they be offended, until they shall themselves
 recognise the tyranny, and understand their own liberty. If you wish to
 use your liberty, do it secretly, as Paul says, "Hast thou faith? have
 it to thyself before God" (Rom. xiv. 22). But take care not to use it in
 the presence of the weak. On the other hand, in the presence of tyrants
 and obstinate opposers, use your liberty in their despite, and with the
 utmost pertinacity, that they too may understand that they are tyrants,
 and their laws useless for justification, nay that they had no right to
 establish such laws.
 
 Since then we cannot live in this world without ceremonies and works,
 since the hot and inexperienced period of youth has need of being
 restrained and protected by such bonds, and since every one is bound
 to keep under his own body by attention to these things, therefore
 the minister of Christ must be prudent and faithful in so ruling and
 teaching the people of Christ, in all these matters, that no root of
 bitterness may spring up among them, and so many be defiled, as Paul
 warned the Hebrews; that is, that they may not lose the faith, and begin
 to be defiled by a belief in works as the means of justification. This
 is a thing which easily happens, and defiles very many, unless faith be
 constantly inculcated along with works. It is impossible to avoid this
 evil, when faith is passed over in silence, and only the ordinances of
 men are taught, as has been done hitherto by the pestilent, impious,
 and soul-destroying traditions of our pontiffs and opinions of our
 theologians. An infinite number of souls have been drawn down to hell by
 these snares, so that you may recognise the work of antichrist.
 
 In brief, as poverty is imperilled amid riches, honesty amid business,
 humility amid honours, abstinence amid feasting, purity amid pleasures,
 so is justification by faith imperilled among ceremonies. Solomon says,
 "Can a man take fire in his bosom, and his clothes not be burned?"
 (Prov. vi. 27). And yet as we must live among riches, business, honours,
 pleasures, feastings, so must we among ceremonies, that is among perils.
 Just as infant boys have the greatest need of being cherished in the
 bosoms and by the care of girls, that they may not die, and yet, when
 they are grown, there is peril to their salvation in living among
 girls, so inexperienced and fervid young men require to be kept in and
 restrained by the barriers of ceremonies, even were they of iron, lest
 their weak minds should rush headlong into vice. And yet it would be
 death to them to persevere in believing that they can be justified
 by these things. They must rather be taught that they have been thus
 imprisoned, not with the purpose of their being justified or gaining
 merit in this way, but in order that they might avoid wrong-doing, and
 be more easily instructed in that righteousness which is by faith, a
 thing which the headlong character of youth would not bear unless it
 were put under restraint.
 
 Hence in the Christian life ceremonies are to be no otherwise looked
 upon than as builders and workmen look upon those preparations for
 building or working which are not made with any view of being permanent
 or anything in themselves, but only because without them there could be
 no building and no work. When the structure is completed, they are laid
 aside. Here you see that we do not contemn these preparations, but set
 the highest value on them; a belief in them we do contemn, because no
 one thinks that they constitute a real and permanent structure. If any
 one were so manifestly out of his senses as to have no other object
 in life but that of setting up these preparations with all possible
 expense, diligence, and perseverance, while he never thought of the
 structure itself, but pleased himself and made his boast of these
 useless preparations and props, should we not all pity his madness and
 think that, at the cost thus thrown away, some great building might have
 been raised?
 
 Thus, too, we do not contemn works and ceremonies--nay, we set the
 highest value on them; but we contemn the belief in works, which no one
 should consider to constitute true righteousness, as do those hypocrites
 who employ and throw away their whole life in the pursuit of works, and
 yet never attain to that for the sake of which the works are done. As
 the Apostle says, they are "ever learning and never able to come to the
 knowledge of the truth" (2 Tim. iii. 7). They appear to wish to build,
 they make preparations, and yet they never do build; and thus they
 continue in a show of godliness, but never attain to its power.
 
 Meanwhile they please themselves with this zealous pursuit, and even
 dare to judge all others, whom they do not see adorned with such a
 glittering display of works; while, if they had been imbued with faith,
 they might have done great things for their own and others' salvation,
 at the same cost which they now waste in abuse of the gifts of God. But
 since human nature and natural reason, as they call it, are naturally
 superstitious, and quick to believe that justification can be attained
 by any laws or works proposed to them, and since nature is also
 exercised and confirmed in the same view by the practice of all earthly
 lawgivers, she can never of her own power free herself from this bondage
 to works, and come to a recognition of the liberty of faith.
 
 We have therefore need to pray that God will lead us and make us taught
 of God, that is, ready to learn from God; and will Himself, as He has
 promised, write His law in our hearts; otherwise there is no hope for
 us. For unless He himself teach us inwardly this wisdom hidden in a
 mystery, nature cannot but condemn it and judge it to be heretical. She
 takes offence at it, and it seems folly to her, just as we see that it
 happened of old in the case of the prophets and Apostles, and just as
 blind and impious pontiffs, with their flatterers, do now in my case and
 that of those who are like me, upon whom, together with ourselves, may
 God at length have mercy, and lift up the light of His countenance upon
 them, that we may know His way upon earth and His saving health among
 all nations, who is blessed for evermore. Amen. In the year of the Lord
 MDXX.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Allen Mulvey
 
 
 
 
 
 THE SMALCALD ARTICLES
 
 By Martin Luther
 
 
      _The Smalcald Articles.
      Articles of Christian Doctrine
      which were to have been presented on our part
      to the Council, if any had been assembled at Mantua
      or elsewhere, indicating what we could accept
      or yield, and what we could not._
 
      by Dr. Martin Luther, 1537
 
      Translated by F. Bente and  W. H. T. Dau
 
      Published in:
      _Triglot Concordia: The Symbolical Books
      of the Ev. Lutheran Church_.
      (St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1921),
      pp. 453-529.
 
 
 
 
 Preface of Dr. Martin Luther.
 
 Since Pope Paul III convoked a Council last year, to assemble
 at Mantua about Whitsuntide, and afterwards transferred it
 from Mantua, so that it is not yet known where he will or can
 fix it, and we on our part either had to expect that we would
 be summoned also to the Council or [to fear that we would] be
 condemned unsummoned, I was directed to compile and collect
 the articles of our doctrine [in order that it might be plain]
 in case of deliberation as to what and how far we would be
 both willing and able to yield to the Papists, and in what
 points we intended to persevere and abide to the end.
 
 I have accordingly compiled these articles and presented them
 to our side. They have also been accepted and unanimously
 confessed by our side, and it has been resolved that, in case
 the Pope with his adherents should ever be so bold as
 seriously and in good faith, without lying and cheating, to
 hold a truly free [legitimate] Christian Council (as, indeed,
 he would be in duty bound to do), they be publicly delivered
 in order to set forth the Confession of our Faith.
 
 But though the Romish court is so dreadfully afraid of a free
 Christian Council, and shuns the light so shamefully, that it
 has [entirely] removed, even from those who are on its side,
 the hope that it will ever permit a free Council, much less
 that it will itself hold one, whereat, as is just, they [many
 Papists] are greatly offended and have no little trouble on
 that account [are disgusted with this negligence of the Pope],
 since they notice thereby that the Pope would rather see all
 Christendom perish and all souls damned than suffer either
 himself or his adherents to be reformed even a little, and his
 [their] tyranny to be limited, nevertheless I have determined
 meanwhile to publish these articles in plain print, so that,
 should I die before there would be a Council (as I fully
 expect and hope, because the knaves who flee the light and
 shun the day take such wretched pains to delay and hinder the
 Council), those who live and remain after me may have my
 testimony and confession to produce, in addition to the
 Confession which I have issued previously, whereby up to this
 time I have abided, and, by God's grace, will abide.
 
 For what shall I say? How shall I complain? I am still living,
 writing, preaching, and lecturing daily; [and] yet there are
 found such spiteful men, not only among the adversaries, but
 also false brethren that profess to be on our side, as dare to
 cite my writings and doctrine directly against myself, and let
 me look on and listen, although they know well that I teach
 otherwise, and as wish to adorn their venom with my labor, and
 under my name to [deceive and] mislead the poor people. [Good
 God!] Alas! what first will happen when I am dead?
 
 Indeed, I ought to reply to everything while I am still
 living. But, again, how can I alone stop all the mouths of the
 devil? especially of those (as they all are poisoned) who will
 not hear or notice what we write, but solely exercise
 themselves with all diligence how they may most shamefully
 pervert and corrupt our word in every letter. These I let the
 devil answer, or at last Gods wrath, as they deserve. I often
 think of the good Gerson who doubts whether anything good
 should be [written and] published. If it is not done, many
 souls are neglected who could be delivered: but if it is done,
 the devil is there with malignant, villainous tongues without
 number which envenom and pervert everything, so that
 nevertheless the fruit [the usefulness of the writings] is
 prevented. Yet what they gain thereby is manifest. For while
 they have lied so shamefully against us and by means of lies
 wished to retain the people, God has constantly advanced His
 work, and been making their following ever smaller and ours
 greater, and by their lies has caused and still causes them to
 be brought to shame.
 
 I must tell a story. There was a doctor sent here to
 Wittenberg from France, who said publicly before us that his
 king was sure and more than sure, that among us there is no
 church, no magistrate, no married life, but all live
 promiscuously as cattle, and each one does as he pleases.
 Imagine now, how will those who by their writings have
 instilled such gross lies into the king and other countries as
 the pure truth, look at us on that day before the
 judgment-seat of Christ? Christ, the Lord and Judge of us all,
 knows well that they lie and have [always] lied, His sentence
 they in turn, must hear; that I know certainly. God convert to
 repentance those who can be converted! Regarding the rest it
 will be said, Woe, and, alas! eternally.
 
 But to return to the subject. I verily desire to see a truly
 Christian Council [assembled some time], in order that many
 matters and persons might be helped. Not that we need It, for
 our churches are now, through God's grace, so enlightened and
 equipped with the pure Word and right use of the Sacraments,
 with knowledge of the various callings and of right works,
 that we on our part ask for no Council, and on such points
 have nothing better to hope or expect from a Council. But we
 see in the bishoprics everywhere so many parishes vacant and
 desolate that one's heart would break, and yet neither the
 bishops nor canons care how the poor people live or die, for
 whom nevertheless Christ has died, and who are not permitted
 to hear Him speak with them as the true Shepherd with His
 sheep. This causes me to shudder and fear that at some time He
 may send a council of angels upon Germany utterly destroying
 us, like Sodom and Gomorrah, because we so wantonly mock Him
 with the Council.
 
 Besides such necessary ecclesiastical affairs, there would be
 also in the political estate innumerable matters of great
 importance to improve. There is the disagreement between the
 princes and the states; usury and avarice have burst in like a
 flood, and have become lawful [are defended with a show of
 right]; wantonness, lewdness, extravagance in dress, gluttony,
 gambling, idle display, with all kinds of bad habits and
 wickedness, insubordination of subjects, of domestics and
 laborers of every trade, also the exactions [and most
 exorbitant selling prices] of the peasants (and who can
 enumerate all?) have so increased that they cannot be
 rectified by ten Councils and twenty Diets. If such chief
 matters of the spiritual and worldly estates as are contrary
 to God would be considered in the Council, they would have all
 hands so full that the child's play and absurdity of long
 gowns [official insignia], large tonsures, broad cinctures [or
 sashes], bishops' or cardinals' hats or maces, and like
 jugglery would in the mean time be forgotten. If we first had
 performed God's command and order in the spiritual and secular
 estate we would find time enough to reform food, clothing,
 tonsures, and surplices. But if we want to swallow such
 camels, and, instead, strain at gnats, let the beams stand and
 judge the motes, we also might indeed be satisfied with the
 Council.
 
 Therefore I have presented few articles; for we have without
 this so many commands of God to observe in the Church, the
 state and the family that we can never fulfil them. What,
 then, is the use, or what does it profit that many decrees and
 statutes thereon are made in the Council, especially when
 these chief matters commanded of God are neither regarded nor
 observed? Just as though He were bound to honor our jugglery
 as a reward of our treading His solemn commandments under
 foot. But our sins weigh upon us and cause God not to be
 gracious to us; for we do not repent, and, besides, wish to
 defend every abomination.
 
 O Lord Jesus Christ, do Thou Thyself convoke a Council, and
 deliver Thy servants by Thy glorious advent! The Pope and his
 adherents are done for; they will have none of Thee. Do Thou,
 then, help us, who are poor and needy, who sigh to Thee, and
 beseech Thee earnestly, according to the grace which Thou hast
 given us, through Thy Holy Ghost who liveth and reigneth with
 Thee and the Father, blessed forever. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 THE FIRST PART
 
 Treats of the Sublime Articles Concerning the Divine Majesty,
 as:
 
 I.
 That Father, Son, and Holy Ghost, three distinct persons in
 one divine essence and nature, are one God, who has created
 heaven and earth.
 
 II.
 That the Father is begotten of no one; the Son of the Father;
 the Holy Ghost proceeds from Father and Son.
 
 III.
 That not the Father nor the Holy Ghost but the Son became man.
 
 IV.
 That the Son became man in this manner, that He was conceived,
 without the cooperation of man, by the Holy Ghost, and was
 born of the pure, holy [and always] Virgin Mary. Afterwards He
 suffered, died, was buried, descended to hell, rose from the
 dead, ascended to heaven, sits at the right hand of God, will
 come to judge the quick and the dead, etc. as the Creed of the
 Apostles, as well as that of St. Athanasius, and the Catechism
 in common use for children, teach.
 
 Concerning these articles there is no contention or dispute,
 since we on both sides confess them. Therefore it is not
 necessary now to treat further of them.
 
 
 
 
 THE SECOND PART
 
 Treats of the Articles which Refer to
 the Office and Work of Jesus Christ,
 or Our Redemption.
 
 The first and chief article is this,
 
 That Jesus Christ, our God and Lord, died for our sins, and
 was raised again for our justification, Rom. 4, 25.
 
 And He alone is the Lamb of God which taketh away the sins of
 the world, John 1, 29; and God has laid upon Him the
 iniquities of us all, Is. 53, 6.
 
 Likewise: All have sinned and are justified without merit
 [freely, and without their own works or merits] by His grace,
 through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus, in His blood,
 Rom. 3, 23 f.
 
 Now, since it is necessary to believe this, and it cannot be
 otherwise acquired or apprehended by any work, law, or merit,
 it is clear and certain that this faith alone justifies us as
 St. Paul says, Rom. 3, 28: For we conclude that a man is
 justified by faith, without the deeds of the Law. Likewise v.
 26: That He might be just, and the Justifier of him which
 believeth in Christ.
 
 Of this article nothing can be yielded or surrendered [nor can
 anything be granted or permitted contrary to the same], even
 though heaven and earth, and whatever will not abide, should
 sink to ruin. For there is none other name under heaven, given
 among men whereby we must be saved, says Peter, Acts 4, 12.
 And with His stripes we are healed, Is. 53, 5. And upon this
 article all things depend which we teach and practice in
 opposition to the Pope, the devil, and the [whole] world.
 Therefore, we must be sure concerning this doctrine, and not
 doubt; for otherwise all is lost, and the Pope and devil and
 all things gain the victory and suit over us.
 
 
 
 
 Article II: Of the Mass.
 
 That the Mass in the Papacy must be the greatest and most
 horrible abomination, as it directly and powerfully conflicts
 with this chief article, and yet above and before all other
 popish idolatries it has been the chief and most specious. For
 it has been held that this sacrifice or work of the Mass, even
 though it be rendered by a wicked [and abandoned] scoundrel,
 frees men from sins, both in this life and also in purgatory,
 while only the Lamb of God shall and must do this, as has been
 said above. Of this article nothing is to be surrendered or
 conceded, because the first article does not allow it.
 
 If, perchance, there were reasonable Papists we might speak
 moderately and in a friendly way, thus: first, why they so
 rigidly uphold the Mass. For it is but a pure invention of
 men, and has not been commanded by God; and every invention of
 man we may [safely] discard, as Christ declares, Matt. 15, 9:
 In vain do they worship Me, teaching for doctrines the
 commandments of men.
 
 Secondly. It is an unnecessary thing, which can be omitted
 without sin and danger.
 
 Thirdly. The Sacrament can be received in a better and more
 blessed way [more acceptable to God], (yea, the only blessed
 way), according to the institution of Christ. Why, then, do
 they drive the world to woe and [extreme] misery on account of
 a fictitious, unnecessary matter, which can be well obtained
 in another and more blessed way?
 
 Let [care be taken that] it be publicly preached to the people
 that the Mass as men's twaddle [commentitious affair or human
 figment] can be omitted without sin, and that no one will be
 condemned who does not observe it, but that he can be saved in
 a better way without the Mass. I wager [Thus it will come to
 pass] that the Mass will then collapse of itself, not only
 among the insane [rude] common people, but also among all
 pious, Christian, reasonable, God-fearing hearts; and that the
 more, when they would hear that the Mass is a [very] dangerous
 thing, fabricated and invented without the will and Word of
 God.
 
 Fourthly. Since such innumerable and unspeakable abuses have
 arisen in the whole world from the buying and selling of
 masses, the Mass should by right be relinquished, if for no
 other purpose than to prevent abuses, even though in itself it
 had something advantageous and good. How much more ought we to
 relinquish it, so as to prevent [escape] forever these
 horrible abuses, since it is altogether unnecessary, useless,
 and dangerous, and we can obtain everything by a more
 necessary, profitable, and certain way without the Mass.
 
 Fifthly. But since the Mass is nothing else and can be nothing
 else (as the Canon and all books declare), than a work of men
 (even of wicked scoundrels), by which one attempts to
 reconcile himself and others to God, and to obtain and merit
 the remission of sins and grace (for thus the Mass is observed
 when it is observed at the very best; otherwise what purpose
 would it serve?), for this very reason it must and should
 [certainly] be condemned and rejected. For this directly
 conflicts with the chief article, which says that it is not a
 wicked or a godly hireling of the Mass with his own work, but
 the Lamb of God and the Son of God, that taketh away our sins.
 
 But if any one should advance the pretext that as an act of
 devotion he wishes to administer the Sacrament, or Communion,
 to himself, he is not in earnest [he would commit a great
 mistake, and would not be speaking seriously and sincerely].
 For if he wishes to commune in sincerity, the surest and best
 way for him is in the Sacrament administered according to
 Christ's institution. But that one administer communion to
 himself is a human notion, uncertain, unnecessary, yea, even
 prohibited. And he does not know what he is doing, because
 without the Word of God he obeys a false human opinion and
 invention. So, too, it is not right (even though the matter
 were otherwise correct) for one to use the common Sacrament of
 [belonging to] the Church according to his own private
 devotion, and without God's Word and apart from the communion
 of the Church to trifle therewith.
 
 This article concerning the Mass will be the whole business of
 the Council. [The Council will perspire most over, and be
 occupied with this article concerning the Mass.] For if it
 were [although it would be] possible for them to concede to us
 all the other articles, yet they could not concede this. As
 Campegius said at Augsburg that he would be torn to pieces
 before he would relinquish the Mass, so, by the help of God,
 I, too, would suffer myself to be reduced to ashes before I
 would allow a hireling of the Mass, be he good or bad, to be
 made equal to Christ Jesus, my Lord and Savior, or to be
 exalted above Him. Thus we are and remain eternally separated
 and opposed to one another. They feel well enough that when
 the Mass falls, the Papacy lies in ruins. Before they will
 permit this to occur, they will put us all to death if they
 can.
 
 In addition to all this, this dragon's tail, [I mean] the
 Mass, has begotten a numerous vermin-brood of manifold
 idolatries.
 
 First, purgatory. Here they carried their trade into purgatory
 by masses for souls, and vigils, and weekly, monthly, and
 yearly celebrations of obsequies, and finally by the Common
 Week and All Souls Day, by soul-baths so that the Mass is used
 almost alone for the dead, although Christ has instituted the
 Sacrament alone for the living. Therefore purgatory, and every
 solemnity, rite, and commerce connected with it, is to be
 regarded as nothing but a specter of the devil. For it
 conflicts with the chief article [which teaches] that only
 Christ, and not the works of men, are to help [set free]
 souls. Not to mention the fact that nothing has been
 [divinely] commanded or enjoined upon us concerning the dead.
 Therefore all this may be safely omitted, even if it were no
 error and idolatry.
 
 The Papists quote here Augustine and some of the Fathers who
 are said to have written concerning purgatory, and they think
 that we do not understand for what purpose and to what end
 they spoke as they did. St. Augustine does not write that
 there is a purgatory nor has he a testimony of Scripture to
 constrain him thereto, but he leaves it in doubt whether there
 is one, and says that his mother asked to be remembered at the
 altar or Sacrament. Now, all this is indeed nothing but the
 devotion of men, and that, too, of individuals, and does not
 establish an article of faith, which is the prerogative of God
 alone.
 
 Our Papists, however, cite such statements [opinions] of men
 in order that men should believe in their horrible,
 blasphemous, and cursed traffic in masses for souls in
 purgatory [or in sacrifices for the dead and oblations], etc.
 But they will never prove these things from Augustine. Now,
 when they have abolished the traffic in masses for purgatory,
 of which Augustine never dreamt, we will then discuss with
 them whether the expressions of Augustine without Scripture
 [being without the warrant of the Word] are to be admitted,
 and whether the dead should be remembered at the Eucharist.
 For it will not do to frame articles of faith from the works
 or words of the holy Fathers; otherwise their kind of fare, of
 garments, of house, etc., would have to become an article of
 faith, as was done with relies. [We have, however, another
 rule, namely] The rule is: The Word of God shall establish
 articles of faith, and no one else, not even an angel.
 
 Secondly. From this it has followed that evil spirits have
 perpetrated much knavery [exercised their malice] by appearing
 as the souls of the departed, and with unspeakable [horrible]
 lies and tricks demanded masses, vigils, pilgrimages, and
 other alms. All of which we had to receive as articles of
 faith, and to live accordingly; and the Pope confirmed these
 things, as also the Mass and all other abominations. Here,
 too, there is no [cannot and must not be any] yielding or
 surrendering.
 
 Thirdly. [Hence arose] the pilgrimages. Here, too, masses, the
 remission of sins and the grace of God were sought, for the
 Mass controlled everything. Now it is indeed certain that such
 pilgrimages, without the Word of God, have not been commanded
 us, neither are they necessary, since we can have these things
 [the soul can be cared for] in a better way, and can omit
 these pilgrimages without any sin and danger. Why therefore do
 they leave at home [desert] their own parish [their called
 ministers, their parishes], the Word of God, wives, children,
 etc., who are ordained and [attention to whom is necessary and
 has been] commanded, and run after these unnecessary,
 uncertain, pernicious will-o'-the-wisps of the devil [and
 errors]? Unless the devil was riding [made insane] the Pope,
 causing him to praise and establish these practices, whereby
 the people again and again revolted from Christ to their own
 works, and became idolaters, which is worst of all; moreover,
 it is neither necessary nor commanded, but is senseless and
 doubtful, and besides harmful. Hence here, too, there can be
 no yielding or surrendering [to yield or concede anything here
 is not lawful], etc. And let this be preached, that such
 pilgrimages are not necessary, but dangerous; and then see
 what will become of them. [For thus they will perish of their
 own accord.]
 
 Fourthly. Fraternities [or societies], in which cloisters,
 chapters, vicars have assigned and communicated (by a legal
 contract and sale) all masses and good works, etc., both for
 the living and the dead. This is not only altogether a human
 bauble, without the Word of God, entirely unnecessary and not
 commanded, but also contrary to the chief article, Of
 Redemption. Therefore it is in no way to be tolerated.
 
 Fifthly. The relics, in which there are found so many
 falsehoods and tomfooleries concerning the bones of dogs and
 horses, that even the devil has laughed at such rascalities,
 ought long ago to have been condemned, even though there were
 some good in them; and so much the more because they are
 without the Word of God; being neither commanded nor
 counseled, they are an entirely unnecessary and useless thing.
 But the worst is that [they have imagined that] these relics
 had to work indulgence and the forgiveness of sins [and have
 revered them] as a good work and service of God, like the
 Mass, etc.
 
 Sixthly. Here belong the precious indulgences granted (but
 only for money) both to the living and the dead, by which the
 miserable [sacrilegious and accursed] Judas, or Pope, has sold
 the merit of Christ, together with the superfluous merits of
 all saints and of the entire Church, etc. All these things
 [and every single one of them] are not to be borne, and are
 not only without the Word of God, without necessity, not
 commanded, but are against the chief article. For the merit of
 Christ is [apprehended and] obtained not by our works or
 pence, but from grace through faith, without money and merit;
 and is offered [and presented] not through the power of the
 Pope, but through the preaching of God's Word.
 
 
 Of the Invocation of Saints.
 
 The invocation of saints is also one of the abuses of
 Antichrist conflicting with the chief article, and destroys
 the knowledge of Christ. Neither is it commanded nor
 counseled, nor has it any example [or testimony] in Scripture,
 and even though it were a precious thing, as it is not [while,
 on the contrary, it is a most harmful thing], in Christ we
 have everything a thousandfold better [and surer, so that we
 are not in need of calling upon the saints].
 
 And although the angels in heaven pray for us (as Christ
 Himself also does), as also do the saints on earth, and
 perhaps also in heaven, yet it does not follow thence that we
 should invoke and adore the angels and saints, and fast, hold
 festivals, celebrate Mass in their honor, make offerings, and
 establish churches, altars, divine worship, and in still other
 ways serve them, and regard them as helpers in need [as
 patrons and intercessors], and divide among them all kinds of
 help, and ascribe to each one a particular form of assistance,
 as the Papists teach and do. For this is idolatry, and such
 honor belongs alone to God. For as a Christian and saint upon
 earth you can pray for me, not only in one, but in many
 necessities. But for this reason I am not obliged to adore and
 invoke you, and celebrate festivals, fast, make oblations,
 hold masses for your honor [and worship], and put my faith in
 you for my salvation. I can in other ways indeed honor, love,
 and thank you in Christ. If now such idolatrous honor were
 withdrawn from angels and departed saints, the remaining honor
 would be without harm and would quickly be forgotten. For when
 advantage and assistance, both bodily and spiritual, are no
 more to be expected, the saints will not be troubled [the
 worship of the saints will soon vanish], neither in their
 graves nor in heaven. For without a reward or out of pure love
 no one will much remember, or esteem, or honor them [bestow on
 them divine honor].
 
 In short, the Mass itself and anything that proceeds from it,
 and anything that is attached to it, we cannot tolerate, but
 must condemn, in order that we may retain the holy Sacrament
 pure and certain, according to the institution of Christ,
 employed and received through faith.
 
 
 
 
 Article III: Of Chapters and Cloisters.
 
 That chapters and cloisters [colleges of canons and
 communistic dwellings], which were formerly founded with the
 good intention [of our forefathers] to educate learned men and
 chaste [and modest] women, ought again to be turned to such
 use, in order that pastors, preachers, and other ministers of
 the churches may be had, and likewise other necessary persons
 [fitted] for [the political administration of] the secular
 government [or for the commonwealth] in cities and countries,
 and well-educated, maidens for mothers and housekeepers, etc.
 
 If they will not serve this purpose, it is better that they be
 abandoned or razed, rather than [continued and], with their
 blasphemous services invented by men, regarded as something
 better than the ordinary Christian life and the offices and
 callings ordained by God. For all this also is contrary to the
 first chief article concerning the redemption made through
 Jesus Christ. Add to this that (like all other human
 inventions) these have neither been commanded; they are
 needless and useless, and, besides, afford occasion for
 dangerous and vain labor [dangerous annoyances and fruitless
 worship], such services as the prophets call Aven, i.e., pain
 and labor.
 
 
 
 
 Article IV: Of the Papacy.
 
 That the Pope is not, according to divine law or according to
 the Word of God the head of all Christendom (for this [name]
 belongs to One only, whose name is Jesus Christ), but is only
 the bishop and pastor of the Church at Rome, and of those who
 voluntarily or through a human creature (that is, a political
 magistrate) have attached themselves to him, to be Christians,
 not under him as a lord, but with him as brethren [colleagues]
 and comrades, as the ancient councils and the age of St.
 Cyprian show.
 
 But to-day none of the bishops dare to address the Pope as
 brother as was done at that time [in the age of Cyprian]; but
 they must call him most gracious lord, even though they be
 kings or emperors. This [Such arrogance] we will not, cannot,
 must not take upon our conscience [with a good conscience
 approve]. Let him, however, who will do it, do so without us
 [at his own risk].
 
 Hence it follows that all things which the Pope, from a power
 so false, mischievous, blasphemous, and arrogant, has done and
 undertaken, have been and still are purely diabolical affairs
 and transactions (with the exception of such things as pertain
 to the secular government, where God often permits much good
 to be effected for a people, even through a tyrant and
 [faithless] scoundrel) for the ruin of the entire holy
 [catholic or] Christian Church (so far as it is in his power)
 and for the destruction of the first and chief article
 concerning the redemption made through Jesus Christ.
 
 For all his bulls and books are extant, in which he roars like
 a lion (as the angel in Rev. 12 depicts him), [crying out] that
 no Christian can be saved unless he obeys him and is subject
 to him in all things that he wishes, that he says, and that he
 does. All of which amounts to nothing less than saying:
 Although you believe in Christ, and have in Him [alone]
 everything that is necessary to salvation, yet it is nothing
 and all in vain unless you regard [have and worship] me as
 your god, and be subject and obedient to me. And yet it is
 manifest that the holy Church has been without the Pope for at
 least more than five hundred years, and that even to the
 present day the churches of the Greeks and of many other
 languages neither have been nor are yet under the Pope.
 Besides, as often remarked, it is a human figment which is not
 commanded, and is unnecessary and useless; for the holy
 Christian [or catholic] Church can exist very well without
 such a head, and it would certainly have remained better
 [purer, and its career would have been more prosperous] if
 such a head had not been raised up by the devil. And the
 Papacy is also of no use in the Church, because it exercises
 no Christian office; and therefore it is necessary for the
 Church to continue and to exist without the Pope.
 
 And supposing that the Pope would yield this point, so as not
 to be supreme by divine right or from Gods command, but that
 we must have [there must be elected] a [certain] head, to whom
 all the rest adhere [as their support] in order that the
 [concord and] unity of Christians may be preserved against
 sects and heretics, and that such a head were chosen by men,
 and that it were placed within the choice and power of men to
 change or remove this head, just as the Council of Constance
 adopted nearly this course with reference to the Popes,
 deposing three and electing a fourth; supposing, I say, that
 the Pope and See at Rome would yield and accept this (which,
 nevertheless, is impossible; for thus he would have to suffer
 his entire realm and estate to be overthrown and destroyed,
 with all his rights and books, a thing which, to speak in few
 words, he cannot do), nevertheless, even in this way
 Christianity would not be helped, but many more sects would
 arise than before.
 
 For since men would have to be subject to this head, not from
 God's command, but from their personal good pleasure, it would
 easily and in a short time be despised, and at last retain no
 member; neither would it have to be forever confined to Rome
 or any other place, but it might be wherever and in whatever
 church God would grant a man fit for the [taking upon him such
 a great] office. Oh, the complicated and confused state of
 affairs [perplexity] that would result!
 
 Therefore the Church can never be better governed and
 preserved than if we all live under one head, Christ, and all
 the bishops equal in office (although they be unequal in
 gifts), be diligently joined in unity of doctrine, faith,
 Sacraments, prayer, and works of love, etc., as St. Jerome
 writes that the priests at Alexandria together and in common
 governed the churches, as did also the apostles, and
 afterwards all bishops throughout all Christendom, until the
 Pope raised his head above all.
 
 This teaching shows forcefully that the Pope is the very
 Antichrist, who has exalted himself above, and opposed himself
 against Christ because he will not permit Christians to be
 saved without his power, which, nevertheless, is nothing, and
 is neither ordained nor commanded by God. This is, properly
 speaking to exalt himself above all that is called God as Paul
 says, 2 Thess. 2, 4. Even the Turks or the Tartars, great
 enemies of Christians as they are, do not do this, but they
 allow whoever wishes to believe in Christ, and take bodily
 tribute and obedience from Christians.
 
 The Pope, however, prohibits this faith, saying that to be
 saved a person must obey him. This we are unwilling to do,
 even though on this account we must die in God s name. This
 all proceeds from the fact that the Pope has wished to be
 called the supreme head of the Christian Church by divine
 right. Accordingly he had to make himself equal and superior
 to Christ, and had to cause himself to be proclaimed the head
 and then the lord of the Church, and finally of the whole
 world, and simply God on earth, until he has dared to issue
 commands even to the angels in heaven. And when we distinguish
 the Pope s teaching from, or measure and hold it against, Holy
 Scripture, it is found [it appears plainly] that the Pope s
 teaching, where it is best, has been taken from the imperial
 and heathen law and treats of political matters and decisions
 or rights, as the Decretals show; furthermore, it teaches of
 ceremonies concerning churches, garments, food, persons and
 [similar] puerile, theatrical and comical things without
 measure, but in all these things nothing at all of Christ,
 faith, and the commandments of God. Lastly, it is nothing else
 than the devil himself, because above and against God he urges
 [and disseminates] his [papal] falsehoods concerning masses,
 purgatory, the monastic life, one's own works and [fictitious]
 divine worship (for this is the very Papacy [upon each of
 which the Papacy is altogether founded and is standing]), and
 condemns, murders and tortures all Christians who do not exalt
 and honor these abominations [of the Pope] above all things.
 Therefore, just as little as we can worship the devil himself
 as Lord and God, we can endure his apostle, the Pope, or
 Antichrist, in his rule as head or lord. For to lie and to
 kill, and to destroy body and soul eternally, that is wherein
 his papal government really consists, as I have very clearly
 shown in many books.
 
 In these four articles they will have enough to condemn in the
 Council. For they cannot and will not concede us even the
 least point in one of these articles. Of this we should be
 certain, and animate ourselves with [be forewarned and made
 firm in] the hope that Christ, our Lord, has attacked His
 adversary, and he will press the attack home [pursue and
 destroy him] both by His Spirit and coming. Amen.
 
 For in the Council we will stand not before the Emperor or the
 political magistrate, as at Augsburg (where the Emperor
 published a most gracious edict, and caused matters to be
 heard kindly [and dispassionately]), but [we will appear]
 before the Pope and devil himself, who intends to listen to
 nothing, but merely [when the case has been publicly
 announced] to condemn, to murder and to force us to idolatry.
 Therefore we ought not here to kiss his feet, or to say: Thou
 art my gracious lord, but as the angel in Zechariah 3, 2 said
 to Satan: The Lord rebuke thee, O Satan.
 
 
 
 
 THE THIRD PART OF THE ARTICLES.
 
 Concerning the following articles we may [will be able to]
 treat with learned and reasonable men, or among ourselves. The
 Pope and his [the Papal] government do not care much about
 these. For with them conscience is nothing, but money, [glory]
 honors, power are [to them] everything.
 
 I. Of Sin.
 
 Here we must confess, as Paul says in Rom. 5, 11, that sin
 originated [and entered the world] from one man Adam, by whose
 disobedience all men were made sinners, [and] subject to death
 and the devil. This is called original or capital sin.
 
 The fruits of this sin are afterwards the evil deeds which are
 forbidden in the Ten Commandments, such as [distrust]
 unbelief, false faith, idolatry, to be without the fear of
 God, presumption [recklessness], despair, blindness [or
 complete loss of sight], and, in short not to know or regard
 God; furthermore to lie, to swear by [to abuse] God's name [to
 swear falsely], not to pray, not to call upon God, not to
 regard [to despise or neglect] God's Word, to be disobedient
 to parents, to murder, to be unchaste, to steal, to deceive,
 etc.
 
 This hereditary sin is so deep and [horrible] a corruption of
 nature that no reason can understand it, but it must be
 [learned and] believed from the revelation of Scriptures, Ps.
 51, 5; Rom. 6, 12 ff.; Ex. 33, 3; Gen. 3, 7 ff. Hence, it is
 nothing but error and blindness in regard to this article what
 the scholastic doctors have taught, namely:
 
 That since the fall of Adam the natural powers of man have
 remained entire and incorrupt, and that man by nature has a
 right reason and a good will; which things the philosophers
 teach.
 
 Again that man has a free will to do good and omit evil, and,
 conversely, to omit good and do evil.
 
 Again, that man by his natural powers can observe and keep
 [do] all the commands of God.
 
 Again, that, by his natural powers, man can love God above all
 things and his neighbor as himself.
 
 Again, if a man does as much as is in him, God certainly
 grants him His grace.
 
 Again, if he wishes to go to the Sacrament, there is no need
 of a good intention to do good, but it is sufficient if he has
 not a wicked purpose to commit sin; so entirely good is his
 nature and so efficacious the Sacrament.
 
 [Again,] that it is not founded upon Scripture that for a good
 work the Holy Ghost with His grace is necessary.
 
 Such and many similar things have arisen from want of
 understanding and ignorance as regards both this sin and
 Christ, our Savior and they are truly heathen dogmas, which we
 cannot endure. For if this teaching were right [approved],
 then Christ has died in vain, since there is in man no defect
 nor sin for which he should have died; or He would have died
 only for the body, not for the soul, inasmuch as the soul is
 [entirely] sound, and the body only is subject to death.
 
 
 II. Of the Law
 
 Here we hold that the Law was given by God, first, to restrain
 sin by threats and the dread of punishment, and by the promise
 and offer of grace and benefit. But all this miscarried on
 account of the wickedness which sin has wrought in man. For
 thereby a part [some] were rendered worse, those, namely, who
 are hostile to [hate] the Law, because it forbids what they
 like to do, and enjoins what they do not like to do.
 Therefore, wherever they can escape [if they were not
 restrained by] punishment, they [would] do more against the
 Law than before. These, then, are the rude and wicked
 [unbridled and secure] men, who do evil wherever they [notice
 that they] have the opportunity.
 
 The rest become blind and arrogant [are smitten with arrogance
 and blindness], and [insolently] conceive the opinion that
 they observe and can observe the Law by their own powers, as
 has been said above concerning the scholastic theologians;
 thence come the hypocrites and [self-righteous or] false
 saints.
 
 But the chief office or force of the Law is that it reveal
 original sin with all its fruits, and show man how very low
 his nature has fallen, and has become [fundamentally and]
 utterly corrupted; as the Law must tell man that he has no God
 nor regards [cares for] God, and worships other gods, a matter
 which before and without the Law he would not have believed.
 In this way he becomes terrified, is humbled, desponds,
 despairs, and anxiously desires aid, but sees no escape; he
 begins to be an enemy of [enraged at] God, and to murmur, etc.
 This is what Paul says, Rom. 4, 15: The Law worketh wrath. And
 Rom. 5, 20: Sin is increased by the Law. [The Law entered that
 the offense might abound.]
 
 
 III. Of Repentance.
 
 This office [of the Law] the New Testament retains and urges,
 as St. Paul, Rom. 1, 18 does, saying: The wrath of God is
 revealed from heaven against all ungodliness and
 unrighteousness of men. Again, 3, 19: All the world is guilty
 before God. No man is righteous before Him. And Christ says,
 John 16, 8: The Holy Ghost will reprove the world of sin.
 
 This, then, is the thunderbolt of God by which He strikes in a
 heap [hurls to the ground] both manifest sinners and false
 saints [hypocrites], and suffers no one to be in the right
 [declares no one righteous], but drives them all together to
 terror and despair. This is the hammer, as Jeremiah says, 23,
 29: Is not My Word like a hammer that breaketh the rock in
 pieces? This is not activa contritio or manufactured
 repentance, but passiva contritio [torture of conscience],
 true sorrow of heart, suffering and sensation of death.
 
 This, then, is what it means to begin true repentance; and
 here man must hear such a sentence as this: You are all of no
 account, whether you be manifest sinners or saints [in your
 own opinion]; you all must become different and do otherwise
 than you now are and are doing [no matter what sort of people
 you are], whether you are as great, wise, powerful, and holy
 as you may. Here no one is [righteous, holy], godly, etc.
 
 But to this office the New Testament immediately adds the
 consolatory promise of grace through the Gospel, which must be
 believed, as Christ declares, Mark 1,15: Repent and believe
 the Gospel, i.e., become different and do otherwise, and
 believe My promise. And John, preceding Him, is called a
 preacher of repentance, however, for the remission of sins,
 i.e., John was to accuse all, and convict them of being
 sinners, that they might know what they were before God, and
 might acknowledge that they were lost men, and might thus be
 prepared for the Lord, to receive grace, and to expect and
 accept from Him the remission of sins. Thus also Christ
 Himself says, Luke 24, 47: Repentance and remission of sins
 must be preached in My name among all nations.
 
 But whenever the Law alone, without the Gospel being added
 exercises this its office there is [nothing else than] death
 and hell, and man must despair, like Saul and Judas; as St.
 Paul, Rom. 7, 10, says: Through sin the Law killeth. On the
 other hand, the Gospel brings consolation and remission not
 only in one way, but through the word and Sacraments, and the
 like, as we shall hear afterward in order that [thus] there is
 with the Lord plenteous redemption, as Ps. 130, 7 says against
 the dreadful captivity of sin.
 
 However, we must now contrast the false repentance of the
 sophists with true repentance, in order that both may be the
 better understood.
 
 Of the False Repentance of the Papists.
 
 It was impossible that they should teach correctly concerning
 repentance, since they did not [rightly] know the real sins
 [the real sin]. For, as has been shown above, they do not
 believe aright concerning original sin, but say that the
 natural powers of man have remained [entirely] unimpaired and
 incorrupt; that reason can teach aright, and the will can in
 accordance therewith do aright [perform those things which are
 taught], that God certainly bestows His grace when a man does
 as much as is in him, according to his free will.
 
 It had to follow thence [from this dogma] that they did [must
 do] penance only for actual sins such as wicked thoughts to
 which a person yields (for wicked emotion [concupiscence,
 vicious feelings, and inclinations], lust and improper
 dispositions [according to them] are not sins ), and for
 wicked words and wicked deeds, which free will could readily
 have omitted.
 
 And of such repentance they fix three parts contrition,
 confession, and satisfaction, with this [magnificent]
 consolation and promise added: If man truly repent, [feel
 remorse,] confess, render satisfaction, he thereby would have
 merited forgiveness, and paid for his sins before God [atoned
 for his sins and obtained a plenary redemption]. Thus in
 repentance they instructed men to repose confidence in their
 own works. Hence the expression originated, which was employed
 in the pulpit when public absolution was announced to the
 people: Prolong O God, my life, until I shall make
 satisfaction for my sins and amend my life.
 
 There was here [profound silence and] no mention of Christ nor
 faith; but men hoped by their own works to overcome and blot
 out sins before God. And with this intention we became priests
 and monks, that we might array ourselves against sin.
 
 As to contrition, this is the way it was done: Since no one
 could remember all his sins (especially as committed through
 an entire year), they inserted this provision, namely, that if
 an unknown sin should be remembered later [if the remembrance
 of a concealed sin should perhaps return], this also must be
 repented of and confessed etc. Meanwhile they were [the person
 was] commended to the grace of God.
 
 Moreover, since no one could know how great the contrition
 ought to be in order to be sufficient before God, they gave
 this consolation: He who could not have contrition, at least
 ought to have attrition, which I may call half a contrition or
 the beginning of contrition, for they have themselves
 understood neither of these terms nor do they understand them
 now, as little as I. Such attrition was reckoned as contrition
 when a person went to confession.
 
 And when it happened that any one said that he could not have
 contrition nor lament his sins (as might have occurred in
 illicit love or the desire for revenge, etc.), they asked
 whether he did not wish or desire to have contrition [lament].
 When one would reply Yes (for who, save the devil himself,
 would here say No?), they accepted this as contrition, and
 forgave him his sins on account of this good work of his
 [which they adorned with the name of contrition]. Here they
 cited the example of St. Bernard, etc.
 
 Here we see how blind reason, in matters pertaining to God,
 gropes about, and, according to its own imagination, seeks for
 consolation in its own works, and cannot think of [entirely
 forgets] Christ and faith. But if it be [clearly] viewed in
 the light, this contrition is a manufactured and fictitious
 thought [or imagination], derived from man's own powers,
 without faith and without the knowledge of Christ. And in it
 the poor sinner, when he reflected upon his own lust and
 desire for revenge, would sometimes [perhaps] have laughed
 rather than wept [either laughed or wept, rather than to think
 of something else], except such as either had been truly
 struck by [the lightning of] the Law, or had been vainly vexed
 by the devil with a sorrowful spirit. Otherwise [with the
 exception of these persons] such contrition was certainly mere
 hypocrisy, and did not mortify the lust for sins [flames of
 sin]; for they had to grieve, while they would rather have
 continued to sin, if it had been free to them.
 
 As regards confession, the procedure was this: Every one had
 [was enjoined] to enumerate all his sins (which is an
 impossible thing). This was a great torment. From such as he
 had forgotten [But if any one had forgotten some sins] he
 would be absolved on the condition that, if they would occur
 to him, he must still confess them. In this way he could never
 know whether he had made a sufficiently pure confession
 [perfectly and correctly], or when confessing would ever have
 an end. Yet he was pointed to his own works, and comforted
 thus: The more fully [sincerely and frankly] one confesses,
 and the more he humiliates himself and debases himself before
 the priest, the sooner and better he renders satisfaction for
 his sins; for such humility certainly would earn grace before
 God.
 
 Here, too, there was no faith nor Christ, and the virtue of
 the absolution was not declared to him, but upon his
 enumeration of sins and his self-abasement depended his
 consolation. What torture, rascality, and idolatry such
 confession has produced is more than can be related.
 
 As to satisfaction, this is by far the most involved
 [perplexing] part of all. For no man could know how much to
 render for a single sin, not to say how much for all. Here
 they have resorted to the device of imposing a small
 satisfaction, which could indeed be rendered, as five
 Paternosters, a day's fast, etc.; for the rest [that was
 lacking] of the [in their] repentance they were directed to
 purgatory.
 
 Here, too, there was nothing but anguish and [extreme] misery.
 [For] some thought that they would never get out of purgatory,
 because, according to the old canons seven years' repentance
 is required for a single mortal sin. Nevertheless, confidence
 was placed upon our work of satisfaction, and if the
 satisfaction could have been perfect, confidence would have
 been placed in it entirely, and neither faith nor Christ would
 have been of use. But this confidence was impossible. For
 although any one had done penance in that way for a hundred
 years, he would still not have known whether he had finished
 his penance. That meant forever to do penance and never to
 come to repentance.
 
 Here now the Holy See at Rome, coming to the aid of the poor
 Church, invented indulgences, whereby it forgave and remitted
 [expiation or] satisfaction, first, for a single instance, for
 seven years, for a hundred years and distributed them among
 the cardinals and bishops, so that one could grant indulgence
 for a hundred years and another for a hundred days. But he
 reserved to himself alone the power to remit the entire
 satisfaction.
 
 Now, since this began to yield money, and the traffic in bulls
 became profitable he devised the golden jubilee year [a truly
 goldbearing year], and fixed it at Rome. He called this the
 remission of all punishment and guilt. Then the people came
 running, because every one would fain have been freed from
 this grievous, unbearable burden. This meant to find [dig up]
 and raise the treasures of the earth. Immediately the Pope
 pressed still further, and multiplied the golden years one
 upon another. But the more he devoured money, the wider grew
 his maw.
 
 Later, therefore, he issued them [those golden years of his]
 by his legates [everywhere] to the countries, until all
 churches and houses were full of the Golden Year. At last he
 also made an inroad into purgatory among the dead, first, by
 founding masses and vigils, afterwards, by indulgences and the
 Golden Year, and finally souls became so cheap that he
 released one for a farthing.
 
 But all this, too, was of no avail. For although the Pope
 taught men to depend upon, and trust in, these indulgences
 [for salvation], yet he rendered the [whole] matter again
 uncertain. For in his bulls he declares: Whoever would share
 in the indulgences or a Golden Year must be contrite, and have
 confessed, and pay money. Now, we have heard above that this
 contrition and confession are with them uncertain and
 hypocrisy. Likewise, also no one knew what soul was in
 purgatory, and if some were therein, no one knew which had
 properly repented and confessed. Thus he took the precious
 money [the Pope snatched up the holy pence], and comforted
 them meanwhile with [led them to confidence in] his power and
 indulgence, and [then again led them away from that and]
 directed them again to their uncertain work.
 
 If, now [although], there were some who did not believe
 [acknowledge] themselves guilty of such actual sins in
 [committed by] thoughts, words, and works,--as I, and such
 as I, in monasteries and chapters [fraternities or colleges of
 priests], wished to be monks and priests, and by fasting,
 watching, praying, saying Mass, coarse garments, and hard
 beds, etc., fought against [strove to resist] evil thoughts,
 and in full earnest and with force wanted to be holy, and yet
 the hereditary, inborn evil sometimes did in sleep what it is
 wont to do (as also St. Augustine and Jerome among others
 confess),--still each one held the other in esteem, so that
 some, according to our teaching, were regarded as holy,
 without sin and full of good works, so much so that with this
 mind we would communicate and sell our good works to others,
 as being superfluous to us for heaven. This is indeed true,
 and seals, letters, and instances [that this happened] are at
 hand.
 
 [When there were such, I say] These did not need repentance.
 For of what would they repent, since they had not indulged
 wicked thoughts? What would they confess [concerning words not
 uttered], since they had avoided words? For what should they
 render satisfaction, since they were so guiltless of any deed
 that they could even sell their superfluous righteousness to
 other poor sinners? Such saints were also the Pharisees and
 scribes in the time of Christ.
 
 Here comes the fiery angel, St. John [Rev. 10], the true
 preacher of [true] repentance, and with one [thunderclap and]
 bolt hurls both [those selling and those buying works] on one
 heap, and says: Repent! Matt. 3, 2. Now, the former [the poor
 wretches] imagine: Why, we have repented! The latter [the
 rest] say: We need no repentance. John says: Repent ye, both
 of you, for ye are false penitents; so are these [the rest]
 false saints [or hypocrites], and all of you on either side
 need the forgiveness of sins, because neither of you know what
 true sin is not to say anything about your duty to repent of
 it and shun it. For no one of you is good; you are full of
 unbelief, stupidity, and ignorance of God and God's will. For
 here He is present of whose fulness have all we received, and
 grace for grace, John 1, 16, and without Him no man can be
 just before God. Therefore, if you wish to repent, repent
 aright- your penance will not accomplish anything [is
 nothing]. And you hypocrites, who do not need repentance, you
 serpents' brood, who has assured you that you will escape the
 wrath to come? etc. Matt. 3, 7; Luke 3, 7.
 
 In the same way Paul also preaches, Rom. 3, 10-12: There is
 none righteous, there is none that understandeth, there is
 none that seeketh after God, there is none that doeth good, no
 not one; they are all gone out of the way; they are together
 become unprofitable. And Acts 17, 30: God now commandeth all
 men everywhere to repent. "All men," he says; no one excepted
 who is a man. This repentance teaches us to discern sin,
 namely, that we are altogether lost, and that there is nothing
 good in us from head to foot [both within and without], and
 that we must absolutely become new and other men.
 
 This repentance is not piecemeal [partial] and beggarly
 [fragmentary], like that which does penance for actual sins,
 nor is it uncertain like that. For it does not debate what is
 or is not sin, but hurls everything on a heap, and says: All
 in us is nothing but sin [affirms that, with respect to us,
 all is simply sin (and there is nothing in us that is not sin
 and guilt)]. What is the use of [For why do we wish]
 investigating, dividing, or distinguishing a long time? For
 this reason, too, this contrition is not [doubtful or]
 uncertain. For there is nothing left with which we can think
 of any good thing to pay for sin, but there is only a sure
 despairing concerning all that we are, think, speak, or do
 [all hope must be cast aside in respect of everything], etc.
 
 In like manner confession, too, cannot be false, uncertain, or
 piecemeal [mutilated or fragmentary]. For he who confesses
 that all in him is nothing but sin comprehends all sins
 excludes none, forgets none. Neither can the satisfaction be
 uncertain, because it is not our uncertain, sinful work, but
 it is the suffering and blood of the [spotless and] innocent
 Lamb of God who taketh away the sin of the world.
 
 Of this repentance John preaches, and afterwards Christ in the
 Gospel, and we also. By this [preaching of] repentance we dash
 to the ground the Pope and everything that is built upon our
 good works. For all is built upon a rotten and vain
 foundation, which is called a good work or law, even though no
 good work is there, but only wicked works, and no one does the
 Law (as Christ, John 7, 19, says), but all transgress it.
 Therefore the building [that is raised upon it] is nothing but
 falsehood and hypocrisy, even [in the part] where it is most
 holy and beautiful.
 
 And in Christians this repentance continues until death,
 because, through the entire life it contends with sin
 remaining in the flesh, as Paul, Rom. 7, 14-25, [shows]
 testifies that he wars with the law in his members, etc.; and
 that, not by his own powers, but by the gift of the Holy Ghost
 that follows the remission of sins. This gift daily cleanses
 and sweeps out the remaining sins, and works so as to render
 man truly pure and holy.
 
 The Pope, the theologians, the jurists, and every other man
 know nothing of this [from their own reason], but it is a
 doctrine from heaven, revealed through the Gospel, and must
 suffer to be called heresy by the godless saints [or
 hypocrites].
 
 On the other hand, if certain sectarists would arise, some of
 whom are perhaps already extant, and in the time of the
 insurrection [of the peasants] came to my own view, holding
 that all those who had once received the Spirit or the
 forgiveness of sins, or had become believers, even though they
 should afterwards sin, would still remain in the faith, and
 such sin would not harm them, and [hence] crying thus: "Do
 whatever you please; if you believe, it all amounts to
 nothing; faith blots out all sins," etc.--they say, besides,
 that if any one sins after he has received faith and the
 Spirit, he never truly had the Spirit and faith: I have had
 before me [seen and heard] many such insane men, and I fear
 that in some such a devil is still remaining [hiding and
 dwelling].
 
 It is, accordingly, necessary to know and to teach that when
 holy men, still having and feeling original sin, also daily
 repenting of and striving with it, happen to fall into
 manifest sins, as David into adultery, murder, and blasphemy,
 that then faith and the Holy Ghost has departed from them
 [they cast out faith and the Holy Ghost]. For the Holy Ghost
 does not permit sin to have dominion, to gain the upper hand
 so as to be accomplished, but represses and restrains it so
 that it must not do what it wishes. But if it does what it
 wishes, the Holy Ghost and faith are [certainly] not present.
 For St. John says, 1 Ep. 3, 9: Whosoever is born of God doth
 not commit sin,... and he cannot sin. And yet it is also the
 truth when the same St. John says, 1 Ep. 1, 8: If we say that
 we have no sin, we deceive ourselves and the truth is not in
 us.
 
 
 IV. Of the Gospel.
 
 We will now return to the Gospel, which not merely in one way
 gives us counsel and aid against sin; for God is
 superabundantly rich [and liberal] in His grace [and
 goodness]. First, through the spoken Word by which the
 forgiveness of sins is preached [He commands to be preached]
 in the whole world; which is the peculiar office of the
 Gospel. Secondly, through Baptism. Thirdly, through the holy
 Sacrament of the Altar. Fourthly, through the power of the
 keys, and also through the mutual conversation and consolation
 of brethren, Matt. 18, 20: Where two or three are gathered
 together, etc.
 
 
 V. Of Baptism.
 
 Baptism is nothing else than the Word of God in the water,
 commanded by His institution, or, as Paul says, a washing in
 the Word; as also Augustine says: Let the Word come to the
 element, and it becomes a Sacrament. And for this reason we do
 not hold with Thomas and the monastic preachers [or
 Dominicans] who forget the Word (God's institution) and say
 that God has imparted to the water a spiritual power, which
 through the water washes away sin. Nor [do we agree] with
 Scotus and the Barefooted monks [Minorites or Franciscan
 monks], who teach that, by the assistance of the divine will,
 Baptism washes away sins, and that this ablution occurs only
 through the will of God, and by no means through the Word or
 water. Of the baptism of children we hold that children ought
 to be baptized. For they belong to the promised redemption
 made through Christ, and the Church should administer it
 [Baptism and the announcement of that promise] to them.
 
 
 VI. Of the Sacrament of the Altar.
 
 Of the Sacrament of the Altar we hold that bread and wine in
 the Supper are the true body and blood of Christ, and are
 given and received not only by the godly, but also by wicked
 Christians.
 
 And that not only one form is to be given. [For] we do not
 need that high art [specious wisdom] which is to teach us that
 under the one form there is as much as under both, as the
 sophists and the Council of Constance teach. For even if it
 were true that there is as much under one as under both, yet
 the one form only is not the entire ordinance and institution
 [made] ordained and commanded by Christ. And we especially
 condemn and in God's name execrate those who not only omit
 both forms but also quite autocratically [tyrannically]
 prohibit, condemn, and blaspheme them as heresy, and so exalt
 themselves against and above Christ, our Lord and God
 [opposing and placing themselves ahead of Christ], etc.
 
 As regards transubstantiation, we care nothing about the
 sophistical subtlety by which they teach that bread and wine
 leave or lose their own natural substance, and that there
 remain only the appearance and color of bread, and not true
 bread. For it is in perfect agreement with Holy Scriptures
 that there is, and remains, bread, as Paul himself calls it,
 1 Cor. 10, 16: The bread which we break. And 1 Cor. 11, 28:
 Let him so eat of that bread.
 
 
 VII. Of the Keys.
 
 The keys are an office and power given by Christ to the Church
 for binding and loosing sin, not only the gross and well-known
 sins, but also the subtle, hidden, which are known only to
 God, as it is written in Ps. 19, 13: Who can understand his
 errors? And in Rom. 7, 25 St. Paul himself complains that with
 the flesh he serves the law of sin. For it is not in our
 power, but belongs to God alone, to judge which, how great,
 and how many the sins are, as it is written in Ps. 143, 2:
 Enter not into judgment with Thy servant; for in Thy sight
 shall no man living be justified. And Paul, 1 Cor. 4, 4, says:
 For I know nothing by myself; yet am I not hereby justified.
 
 VIII. Of Confession.
 
 Since Absolution or the Power of the Keys is also an aid and
 consolation against sin and a bad conscience, ordained by
 Christ [Himself] in the Gospel, Confession or Absolution ought
 by no means to be abolished in the Church, especially on
 account of [tender and] timid consciences and on account of
 the untrained [and capricious] young people, in order that
 they may be examined, and instructed in the Christian
 doctrine.
 
 But the enumeration of sins ought to be free to every one, as
 to what he wishes to enumerate or not to enumerate. For as
 long as we are in the flesh, we shall not lie when we say: "I
 am a poor man [I acknowledge that I am a miserable sinner],
 full of sin." Rom. 7, 23: I see another law in my members,
 etc. For since private absolution originates in the Office of
 the Keys, it should not be despised [neglected], but greatly
 and highly esteemed [of the greatest worth], as [also] all
 other offices of the Christian Church.
 
 And in those things which concern the spoken, outward Word, we
 must firmly hold that God grants His Spirit or grace to no
 one, except through or with the preceding outward Word, in
 order that we may [thus] be protected against the enthusiasts,
 i.e., spirits who boast that they have the Spirit without and
 before the Word, and accordingly judge Scripture or the spoken
 Word, and explain and stretch it at their pleasure, as Muenzer
 did, and many still do at the present day, who wish to be
 acute judges between the Spirit and the letter, and yet know
 not what they say or declare. For [indeed] the Papacy also is
 nothing but sheer enthusiasm, by which the Pope boasts that
 all rights exist in the shrine of his heart, and whatever he
 decides and commands with [in] his church is spirit and right,
 even though it is above and contrary to Scripture and the
 spoken Word.
 
 All this is the old devil and old serpent, who also converted
 Adam and Eve into enthusiasts, and led them from the outward
 Word of God to spiritualizing and self-conceit, and
 nevertheless he accomplished this through other outward words.
 Just as also our enthusiasts [at the present day] condemn the
 outward Word, and nevertheless they themselves are not silent,
 but they fill the world with their pratings and writings, as
 though, indeed, the Spirit could not come through the writings
 and spoken word of the apostles, but [first] through their
 writings and words he must come. Why [then] do not they also
 omit their own sermons and writings, until the Spirit Himself
 come to men, without their writings and before them, as they
 boast that Me has come into them without the preaching of the
 Scriptures? But of these matters there is not time now to
 dispute at greater length; we have elsewhere sufficiently
 urged this subject.
 
 For even those who believe before Baptism, or become believing
 in Baptism, believe through the preceding outward Word, as the
 adults, who have come to reason, must first have heard: He
 that believeth and is baptized shall be saved, even though
 they are at first unbelieving, and receive the Spirit and
 Baptism ten years afterwards. Cornelius, Acts 10, 1 ff., had
 heard long before among the Jews of the coming Messiah,
 through whom he was righteous before God, and in such faith
 his prayers and alms were acceptable to God (as Luke calls him
 devout and God-fearing), and without such preceding Word and
 hearing could not have believed or been righteous. But St.
 Peter had to reveal to him that the Messiah (in whom, as one
 that was to come, he had hitherto believed) now had come, lest
 his faith concerning the coming Messiah hold him captive among
 the hardened and unbelieving Jews, but know that he was now to
 be saved by the present Messiah, and must not, with the
 [rabble of the] Jews deny nor persecute Him.
 
 In a word, enthusiasm inheres in Adam and his children from
 the beginning [from the first fall] to the end of the world,
 [its poison] having been implanted and infused into them by
 the old dragon, and is the origin, power [life], and strength
 of all heresy, especially of that of the Papacy and Mahomet.
 Therefore we ought and must constantly maintain this point,
 that God does not wish to deal with us otherwise than through
 the spoken Word and the Sacraments. It is the devil himself
 whatsoever is extolled as Spirit without the Word and
 Sacraments. For God wished to appear even to Moses through the
 burning bush and spoken Word; and no prophet neither Elijah
 nor Elisha, received the Spirit without the Ten Commandments
 [or spoken Word]. Neither was John the Baptist conceived
 without the preceding word of Gabriel, nor did he leap in his
 mother's womb without the voice of Mary. And Peter says,
 2. Ep. 1, 21: The prophecy came not by the will of man; but
 holy men of God spake as they were moved by the Holy Ghost.
 Without the outward Word, however, they were not holy, much
 less would the Holy Ghost have moved them to speak when they
 still were unholy [or profane]; for they were holy, says he,
 since the Holy Ghost spake through them.
 
 IX. Of Excommunication.
 
 The greater excommunication, as the Pope calls it, we regard
 only as a civil penalty, and it does not concern us ministers
 of the Church. But the lesser, that is, the true Christian
 excommunication, consists in this, that manifest and obstinate
 sinners are not admitted to the Sacrament and other communion
 of the Church until they amend their lives and avoid sin. And
 ministers ought not to mingle secular punishments with this
 ecclesiastical punishment, or excommunication.
 
 X. Of Ordination and the Call.
 
 If the bishops would be true bishops [would rightly discharge
 their office], and would devote themselves to the Church and
 the Gospel, it might be granted to them for the sake of love
 and unity, but not from necessity, to ordain and confirm us
 and our preachers; omitting, however, all comedies and
 spectacular display [deceptions, absurdities, and appearances]
 of unchristian [heathenish] parade and pomp. But because they
 neither are, nor wish to be, true bishops, but worldly lords
 and princes, who will neither preach, nor teach, nor baptize,
 nor administer the Lord's Supper, nor perform any work or
 office of the Church, and, moreover, persecute and condemn
 those who discharge these functions, having been called to do
 so, the Church ought not on their account to remain without
 ministers [to be forsaken by or deprived of ministers].
 
 Therefore, as the ancient examples of the Church and the
 Fathers teach us, we ourselves will and ought to ordain
 suitable persons to this office; and, even according to their
 own laws, they have not the right to forbid or prevent us. For
 their laws say that those ordained even by heretics should be
 declared [truly] ordained and stay ordained [and that such
 ordination must not be changed], as St. Jerome writes of the
 Church at Alexandria, that at first it was governed in common
 by priests and preachers, without bishops.
 
 XI. Of the Marriage of Priests.
 
 To prohibit marriage, and to burden the divine order of
 priests with perpetual celibacy, they have had neither
 authority nor right [they have done out of malice, without any
 honest reason], but have acted like antichristian, tyrannical,
 desperate scoundrels [have performed the work of antichrist,
 of tyrants and the worst knaves], and have thereby caused all
 kinds of horrible, abominable, innumerable sins of unchastity
 [depraved lusts], in which they still wallow. Now, as little
 as we or they have been given the power to make a woman out of
 a man or a man out of a woman, or to nullify either sex, so
 little have they had the power to [sunder and] separate such
 creatures of God, or to forbid them from living [and
 cohabiting] honestly in marriage with one another. Therefore
 we are unwilling to assent to their abominable celibacy, nor
 will we [even] tolerate it, but we wish to have marriage free
 as God has instituted [and ordained] it, and we wish neither
 to rescind nor hinder His work; for Paul says, 1 Tim. 4, 1
 ff., that this [prohibition of marriage] is a doctrine of
 devils.
 
 XII. Of the Church.
 
 We do not concede to them that they are the Church, and [in
 truth] they are not [the Church]; nor will we listen to those
 things which, under the name of Church, they enjoin or forbid.
 For, thank God, [to-day] a child seven years old knows what
 the Church is, namely, the holy believers and lambs who hear
 the voice of their Shepherd. For the children pray thus: I
 believe in one holy [catholic or] Christian Church. This
 holiness does not consist in albs, tonsures, long gowns, and
 other of their ceremonies devised by them beyond Holy
 Scripture, but in the Word of God and true faith.
 
 XIII. How One is Justified before God, and of Good Works.
 
 What I have hitherto and constantly taught concerning this I
 know not how to change in the least, namely, that by faith, as
 St. Peter says, we acquire a new and clean heart, and God will
 and does account us entirely righteous and holy for the sake
 of Christ, our Mediator. And although sin in the flesh has not
 yet been altogether removed or become dead, yet He will not
 punish or remember it.
 
 And such faith, renewal, and forgiveness of sins is followed
 by good works. And what there is still sinful or imperfect
 also in them shall not be accounted as sin or defect, even
 [and that, too] for Christ's sake; but the entire man, both as
 to his person and his works, is to be called and to be
 righteous and holy from pure grace and mercy, shed upon us
 [unfolded] and spread over us in Christ. Therefore we cannot
 boast of many merits and works, if they are viewed apart from
 grace and mercy, but as it is written, 1 Cor. 1, 31: He that
 glorieth, let him glory in the Lord, namely, that he has a
 gracious God. For thus all is well. We say, besides, that if
 good works do not follow, faith is false and not true.
 
 XIV. Of Monastic Vows.
 
 As monastic vows directly conflict with the first chief
 article, they must be absolutely abolished. For it is of them
 that Christ says, Matt. 24, 5. 23 ff.: I am Christ, etc. For
 he who makes a vow to live as a monk believes that he will
 enter upon a mode of life holier than ordinary Christians
 lead, and wishes to earn heaven by his own works not only for
 himself, but also for others; this is to deny Christ. And they
 boast from their St. Thomas that a monastic vow is equal to
 Baptism. This is blasphemy [against God].
 
 XV. Of Human Traditions.
 
 The declaration of the Papists that human traditions serve for
 the remission of sins, or merit salvation, is [altogether]
 unchristian and condemned, as Christ says Matt. 15, 9: In vain
 they do worship Me, teaching for doctrines the commandments of
 men. Again, Titus 1, 14: That turn from the truth. Again, when
 they declare that it is a mortal sin if one breaks these
 ordinances [does not keep these statutes], this, too, is not
 right.
 
 These are the articles on which I must stand, and, God
 willing, shall stand even to my death; and I do not know how
 to change or to yield anything in them. If any one wishes to
 yield anything, let him do it at the peril of his conscience.
 
 Lastly, there still remains the Pope's bag of impostures
 concerning foolish and childish articles, as, the dedication
 of churches, the baptism of bells, the baptism of the
 altarstone, and the inviting of sponsors to these rites, who
 would make donations towards them. Such baptizing is a
 reproach and mockery of Holy Baptism, hence should not be
 tolerated. Furthermore, concerning the consecration of
 wax-tapers, palm-branches, cakes, oats, [herbs,] spices, etc.,
 which indeed, cannot be called consecrations, but are sheer
 mockery and fraud. And such deceptions there are without
 number, which we commend for adoration to their god and to
 themselves, until they weary of it. We will [ought to] have
 nothing to do with them.
 
 
      Dr. Martin Luther subscribed.
 
      Dr. Justus Jonas, Rector, subscribed with his own hand.
 
      Dr. John Bugenhagen, Pomeranus, subscribed.
 
      Dr. Caspar Creutziger subscribed.
 
      Nicholas Amsdorf of Magdeburg subscribed.
 
      George Spalatin of Altenburg subscribed.
 
      I, Philip Melanchthon, also regard [approve] the above
      articles as right and Christian. But regarding the Pope I hold
      that, if he would allow the Gospel, his superiority over the
      bishops which he has otherwise, is conceded to him by human
      right also by us, for the sake of the peace and general unity
      of those Christians who are also under him, and may be under
      him hereafter.
 
      John Agricola of Eisleben subscribed.
      Gabriel Didymus subscribed.
 
      I, Dr. Urban Rhegius, Superintendent of the churches in the
      Duchy of Lueneburg, subscribe in my own name and in the name
      of my brethren, and of the Church of Hanover.
 
      I, Stephen Agricola, Minister at Hof, subscribe.
 
      Also I, John Draconites, Professor and Minister at Marburg,
      subscribe.
 
      I, Conrad Figenbotz, for the glory of God subscribe that I
      have thus believed, and am still preaching and firmly
      believing as above.
 
      I, Andrew Osiander of Nuernberg, subscribe.
      I, Magister Veit Dieterich, Minister at Nuernberg, subscribe.
      I, Erhard Schnepf, Preacher at Stuttgart, subscribe.
      Conrad Oettinger, Preacher of Duke Ulrich at Pforzheim.
      Simon Schneeweiss, Pastor of the Church at Crailsheim.
 
      I, John Schlagenhaufen, Pastor of the Church at Koethen,
      subscribe.
 
      The Reverend Magister George Helt of Forchheim.
      The Reverend Magister Adam of Fulda, Preacher in Hesse.
      The Reverend Magister Anthony Corvinus, Preacher in Hesse.
 
      I, Doctor John Bugenhagen, Pomeranus, again subscribe in the
      name of Magister John Brentz, as on departing from Smalcald he
      directed me orally and by a letter, which I have shown to
      these brethren who have subscribed.
 
      I, Dionysius Melander, subscribe to the Confession, the
      Apology, and the Concordia on the subject of the Eucharist.
 
      Paul Rhodius, Superintendent of Stettin.
      Gerard Oemcken, Superintendent of the Church at Minden.
 
      I, Brixius Northanus, Minister of the Church of Christ which
      is at Soest, subscribe to the Articles of the Reverend Father
      Martin Luther, and confess that hitherto I have thus believed
      and taught, and by the Spirit of Christ I shall continue thus
      to believe and teach.
 
      Michael Caelius, Preacher at Mansfeld, subscribed.
      The Reverend Magister Peter Geltner Preacher at Frankfort,
      subscribed.
      Wendal Faber, Pastor of Seeburg in Mansfeld.
 
      I, John Aepinus, subscribe.
      Likewise, I, John Amsterdam of Bremen.
 
      I, Frederick Myconius, Pastor of the Church at Gotha in
      Thuringia, subscribe in my own name and in that of Justus
      Menius of Eisenach.
 
      I, Doctor John Lang, Preacher of the Church at Erfurt,
      subscribe with my own hand in my own name, and in that of my
      other coworkers in the Gospel, namely:
      The Reverend Licentiate Ludwig Platz of Melsungen.
      The Reverend Magister Sigismund Kirchner,
      The Reverend Wolfgang Kiswetter,
      The Reverend Melchior Weitmann
      The Reverend John Thall.
      The Reverend John Kilian.
      The Reverend Nicholas Faber.
      The Reverend Andrew Menser.
 
      And I, Egidius Mechler, have subscribed with my own hand.
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 Disputation of Doctor Martin Luther
 
 on the Power and Efficacy of Indulgences
 
 by Dr. Martin Luther, 1517
 
   Published in:
   Works of Martin Luther
   Adolph Spaeth, L.D. Reed, Henry Eyster Jacobs, et Al., Trans. & Eds.
   (Philadelphia: A. J. Holman Company, 1915), Vol. 1, pp. 29-38.
 
 
 
 
   DISPUTATION OF DOCTOR MARTIN LUTHER
   ON THE POWER AND EFFICACY OF
   INDULGENCES
 
 OCTOBER 31, 1517
 
 Out of love for the truth and the desire to bring it to light, the
 following propositions will be discussed at Wittenberg, under the
 presidency of the Reverend Father Martin Luther, Master of Arts and of
 Sacred Theology, and Lecturer in Ordinary on the same at that place.
 Wherefore he requests that those who are unable to be present and
 debate orally with us, may do so by letter.
 
 In the Name our Lord Jesus Christ. Amen.
 
 1. Our Lord and Master Jesus Christ, when He said Poenitentiam agite,
 willed that the whole life of believers should be repentance.
 
 2. This word cannot be understood to mean sacramental penance, i.e.,
 confession and satisfaction, which is administered by the priests.
 
 3. Yet it means not inward repentance only; nay, there is no inward
 repentance which does not outwardly work divers mortifications of the
 flesh.
 
 4. The penalty [of sin], therefore, continues so long as hatred of self
 continues; for this is the true inward repentance, and continues until
 our entrance into the kingdom of heaven.
 
 5. The pope does not intend to remit, and cannot remit any penalties
 other than those which he has imposed either by his own authority or by
 that of the Canons.
 
 6. The pope cannot remit any guilt, except by declaring that it has
 been remitted by God and by assenting to God's remission; though, to be
 sure, he may grant remission in cases reserved to his judgment. If his
 right to grant remission in such cases were despised, the guilt would
 remain entirely unforgiven.
 
 7. God remits guilt to no one whom He does not, at the same time,
 humble in all things and bring into subjection to His vicar, the
 priest.  8. The penitential canons are imposed only on the living, and,
 according to them, nothing should be imposed on the dying.
 
 9. Therefore the Holy Spirit in the pope is kind to us, because in his
 decrees he always makes exception of the article of death and of
 necessity.
 
 10. Ignorant and wicked are the doings of those priests who, in the
 case of the dying, reserve canonical penances for purgatory.
 
 11. This changing of the canonical penalty to the penalty of purgatory
 is quite evidently one of the tares that were sown while the bishops
 slept.
 
 12. In former times the canonical penalties were imposed not after, but
 before absolution, as tests of true contrition.
 
 13. The dying are freed by death from all penalties; they are already
 dead to canonical rules, and have a right to be released from them.
 
 14. The imperfect health [of soul], that is to say, the imperfect love,
 of the dying brings with it, of necessity, great fear; and the smaller
 the love, the greater is the fear.
 
 15. This fear and horror is sufficient of itself alone (to say nothing
 of other things) to constitute the penalty of purgatory, since it is
 very near to the horror of despair.
 
 16. Hell, purgatory, and heaven seem to differ as do despair,
 almost-despair, and the assurance of safety.
 
 17. With souls in purgatory it seems necessary that horror should grow
 less and love increase.
 
 18. It seems unproved, either by reason or Scripture, that they are
 outside the state of merit, that is to say, of increasing love.
 
 19. Again, it seems unproved that they, or at least that all of them,
 are certain or assured of their own blessedness, though we may be quite
 certain of it.
 
 20. Therefore by "full remission of all penalties" the pope means not
 actually "of all," but only of those imposed by himself.
 
 21. Therefore those preachers of indulgences are in error, who say that
 by the pope's indulgences a man is freed from every penalty, and saved;
 
 22. Whereas he remits to souls in purgatory no penalty which, according
 to the canons, they would have had to pay in this life.  23. If it is
 at all possible to grant to any one the remission of all penalties
 whatsoever, it is certain that this remission can be granted only to
 the most perfect, that is, to the very fewest.
 
 24. It must needs be, therefore, that the greater part of the people
 are deceived by that indiscriminate and highsounding promise of release
 from penalty.
 
 25. The power which the pope has, in a general way, over purgatory, is
 just like the power which any bishop or curate has, in a special way,
 within his own diocese or parish.
 
 26. The pope does well when he grants remission to souls [in
 purgatory], not by the power of the keys (which he does not possess),
 but by way of intercession.
 
 27. They preach man who say that so soon as the penny jingles into the
 money-box, the soul flies out [of purgatory].
 
 28. It is certain that when the penny jingles into the money-box, gain
 and avarice can be increased, but the result of the intercession of the
 Church is in the power of God alone.
 
 29. Who knows whether all the souls in purgatory wish to be bought out
 of it, as in the legend of Sts. Severinus and Paschal.
 
 30. No one is sure that his own contrition is sincere; much less that
 he has attained full remission.
 
 31. Rare as is the man that is truly penitent, so rare is also the man
 who truly buys indulgences, i.e., such men are most rare.
 
 32. They will be condemned eternally, together with their teachers, who
 believe themselves sure of their salvation because they have letters of
 pardon.
 
 33. Men must be on their guard against those who say that the pope's
 pardons are that inestimable gift of God by which man is reconciled to
 Him;
 
 34. For these "graces of pardon" concern only the penalties of
 sacramental satisfaction, and these are appointed by man.
 
 35. They preach no Christian doctrine who teach that contrition is not
 necessary in those who intend to buy souls out of purgatory or to buy
 confessionalia.
 
 36. Every truly repentant Christian has a right to full remission of
 penalty and guilt, even without letters of pardon.
 
 37. Every true Christian, whether living or dead, has part in all the
 blessings of Christ and the Church; and this is granted him by God,
 even without letters of pardon.
 
 38. Nevertheless, the remission and participation [in the blessings of
 the Church] which are granted by the pope are in no way to be despised,
 for they are, as I have said, the declaration of divine remission.
 
 39. It is most difficult, even for the very keenest theologians, at one
 and the same time to commend to the people the abundance of pardons and
 [the need of] true contrition.
 
 40. True contrition seeks and loves penalties, but liberal pardons only
 relax penalties and cause them to be hated, or at least, furnish an
 occasion [for hating them].
 
 41. Apostolic pardons are to be preached with caution, lest the people
 may falsely think them preferable to other good works of love.
 
 42. Christians are to be taught that the pope does not intend the
 buying of pardons to be compared in any way to works of mercy.
 
 43. Christians are to be taught that he who gives to the poor or lends
 to the needy does a better work than buying pardons;
 
 44. Because love grows by works of love, and man becomes better; but by
 pardons man does not grow better, only more free from penalty.
 
 45. Christians are to be taught that he who sees a man in need, and
 passes him by, and gives [his money] for pardons, purchases not the
 indulgences of the pope, but the indignation of God.
 
 46. Christians are to be taught that unless they have more than they
 need, they are bound to keep back what is necessary for their own
 families, and by no means to squander it on pardons.
 
 47. Christians are to be taught that the buying of pardons is a matter
 of free will, and not of commandment.
 
 48. Christians are to be taught that the pope, in granting pardons,
 needs, and therefore desires, their devout prayer for him more than the
 money they bring.
 
 49. Christians are to be taught that the pope's pardons are useful, if
 they do not put their trust in them; but altogether harmful, if through
 them they lose their fear of God.
 
 50. Christians are to be taught that if the pope knew the exactions of
 the pardon-preachers, he would rather that St.  Peter's church should
 go to ashes, than that it should be built up with the skin, flesh and
 bones of his sheep.
 
 51. Christians are to be taught that it would be the pope's wish, as it
 is his duty, to give of his own money to very many of those from whom
 certain hawkers of pardons cajole money, even though the church of St.
 Peter might have to be sold.
 
 52. The assurance of salvation by letters of pardon is vain, even
 though the commissary, nay, even though the pope himself, were to stake
 his soul upon it.
 
 53. They are enemies of Christ and of the pope, who bid the Word of God
 be altogether silent in some Churches, in order that pardons may be
 preached in others.
 
 54. Injury is done the Word of God when, in the same sermon, an equal
 or a longer time is spent on pardons than on this Word.
 
 55. It must be the intention of the pope that if pardons, which are a
 very small thing, are celebrated with one bell, with single processions
 and ceremonies, then the Gospel, which is the very greatest thing,
 should be preached with a hundred bells, a hundred processions, a
 hundred ceremonies.
 
 56. The "treasures of the Church," out of which the pope grants
 indulgences, are not sufficiently named or known among the people of
 Christ.
 
 57. That they are not temporal treasures is certainly evident, for many
 of the vendors do not pour out such treasures so easily, but only
 gather them.
 
 58. Nor are they the merits of Christ and the Saints, for even without
 the pope, these always work grace for the inner man, and the cross,
 death, and hell for the outward man.
 
 59. St. Lawrence said that the treasures of the Church were the
 Church's poor, but he spoke according to the usage of the word in his
 own time.
 
 60. Without rashness we say that the keys of the Church, given by
 Christ's merit, are that treasure;
 
 61. For it is clear that for the remission of penalties and of reserved
 cases, the power of the pope is of itself sufficient.
 
 62. The true treasure of the Church is the Most Holy Gospel of the
 glory and the grace of God.
 
 63. But this treasure is naturally most odious, for it makes the first
 to be last.
 
 64. On the other hand, the treasure of indulgences is naturally most
 acceptable, for it makes the last to be first.
 
 65. Therefore the treasures of the Gospel are nets with which they
 formerly were wont to fish for men of riches.
 
 66. The treasures of the indulgences are nets with which they now fish
 for the riches of men.
 
 67. The indulgences which the preachers cry as the "greatest graces"
 are known to be truly such, in so far as they promote gain.
 
 68. Yet they are in truth the very smallest graces compared with the
 grace of God and the piety of the Cross.
 
 69. Bishops and curates are bound to admit the commissaries of
 apostolic pardons, with all reverence.
 
 70. But still more are they bound to strain all their eyes and attend
 with all their ears, lest these men preach their own dreams instead of
 the commission of the pope.
 
 71. He who speaks against the truth of apostolic pardons, let him be
 anathema and accursed!
 
 72. But he who guards against the lust and license of the
 pardon-preachers, let him be blessed!
 
 73. The pope justly thunders against those who, by any art, contrive
 the injury of the traffic in pardons.
 
 74. But much more does he intend to thunder against those who use the
 pretext of pardons to contrive the injury of holy love and truth.
 
 75. To think the papal pardons so great that they could absolve a man
 even if he had committed an impossible sin and violated the Mother of
 God--this is madness.
 
 76. We say, on the contrary, that the papal pardons are not able to
 remove the very least of venial sins, so far as its guilt is concerned.
 
 77. It is said that even St. Peter, if he were now Pope, could not
 bestow greater graces; this is blasphemy against St. Peter and against
 the pope.
 
 78. We say, on the contrary, that even the present pope, and any pope
 at all, has greater graces at his disposal; to wit, the Gospel, powers,
 gifts of healing, etc., as it is written in I. Corinthians xii.
 
 79. To say that the cross, emblazoned with the papal arms, which is set
 up [by the preachers of indulgences], is of equal worth with the Cross
 of Christ, is blasphemy.
 
 80. The bishops, curates and theologians who allow such talk to be
 spread among the people, will have an account to render.  81. This
 unbridled preaching of pardons makes it no easy matter, even for
 learned men, to rescue the reverence due to the pope from slander, or
 even from the shrewd questionings of the laity.
 
 82. To wit:--"Why does not the pope empty purgatory, for the sake of
 holy love and of the dire need of the souls that are there, if he
 redeems an infinite number of souls for the sake of miserable money
 with which to build a Church? The former reasons would be most just;
 the latter is most trivial."
 
 83. Again:--"Why are mortuary and anniversary masses for the dead
 continued, and why does he not return or permit the withdrawal of the
 endowments founded on their behalf, since it is wrong to pray for the
 redeemed?"
 
 84. Again:--"What is this new piety of God and the pope, that for money
 they allow a man who is impious and their enemy to buy out of purgatory
 the pious soul of a friend of God, and do not rather, because of that
 pious and beloved soul's own need, free it for pure love's sake?"
 
 85. Again:--"Why are the penitential canons long since in actual fact
 and through disuse abrogated and dead, now satisfied by the granting of
 indulgences, as though they were still alive and in force?"
 
 86. Again:--"Why does not the pope, whose wealth is to-day greater than
 the riches of the richest, build just this one church of St. Peter with
 his own money, rather than with the money of poor believers?"
 
 87. Again:--"What is it that the pope remits, and what participation
 does he grant to those who, by perfect contrition, have a right to full
 remission and participation?"
 
 88. Again:--"What greater blessing could come to the Church than if the
 pope were to do a hundred times a day what he now does once, and bestow
 on every believer these remissions and participations?"
 
 89. "Since the pope, by his pardons, seeks the salvation of souls
 rather than money, why does he suspend the indulgences and pardons
 granted heretofore, since these have equal efficacy?"
 
 90. To repress these arguments and scruples of the laity by force
 alone, and not to resolve them by giving reasons, is to expose the
 Church and the pope to the ridicule of their enemies, and to make
 Christians unhappy.
 
 91. If, therefore, pardons were preached according to the spirit and
 mind of the pope, all these doubts would be readily resolved; nay, they
 would not exist.
 
 92. Away, then, with all those prophets who say to the people of
 Christ, "Peace, peace," and there is no peace!
 
 93. Blessed be all those prophets who say to the people of Christ,
 "Cross, cross," and there is no cross!
 
 94. Christians are to be exhorted that they be diligent in following
 Christ, their Head, through penalties, deaths, and hell;
 
 95. And thus be confident of entering into heaven rather through many
 tribulations, than through the assurance of peace.
 
 
 
 ======================================================================
 
   This text was converted to ASCII format for Project Wittenberg by
   Allen Mulvey and is in the public domain.  You may freely
   distribute, copy or print this text.  Please direct any comments
   or suggestions to: Rev. Robert E. Smith of the Walther Library at
   Concordia Theological Seminary.
 
   E-mail: CFWLibrary@CRF.CUIS.EDU
   Surface Mail: 6600 N. Clinton St., Ft. Wayne, IN 46825 USA
   Phone: (219) 481-2123
   Fax: (219) 481-2126
 
 ======================================================================
 
 
 
   "Disputatio pro Declaratione Virtutis Indulgentiarum."
   by Dr. Martin Luther, 1483-1546
   D. MARTIN LUTHERS WERKE: KRITISCHE GESAMMTAUSGABE.
   1. Band (Weimar: Hermann Boehlau, 1883). pp. 233-238.
   PW #001-001La
 
 ======================================================================
 
   This text was converted to ASCII format for Project Wittenberg by
   Rev. Robert E. Smith and is in the public domain.  You may freely
   distribute, copy or print this text.  Please direct any comments
   or suggestions to: Rev. Robert E. Smith of the Walther Library at
   Concordia Theological Seminary.
 
   E-mail: CFWLibrary@CRF.CUIS.EDU
   Surface Mail: 6600 N. Clinton St., Ft.  Wayne, IN 46825 USA
   Phone: (219) 481-2123
   Fax: (219) 481-2126
 
 ======================================================================
 
 Amore et studio elucidande veritatis hec subscripta disputabuntur
 Wittenberge, Presidente R. P. Martino Lutther, Artium et S.  Theologie
 Magistro eiusdemque ibidem lectore Ordinario. Quare petit, ut qui non
 possunt verbis presentes nobiscum disceptare agant id literis absentes.
 In nomine domini nostri Hiesu Christi.  Amen.
 
 1. Dominus et magister noster Iesus Christus dicendo 'Penitentiam agite
 &c.' omnem vitam fidelium penitentiam esse voluit.  2. Quod verbum de
 penitentia sacramentali (id est confessionis et satisfactionis, que
 sacerdotum ministerio celebratur) non potest intelligi.
 
 3. Non tamen solam intendit interiorem, immo interior nulla est, nisi
 foris operetur varias carnis mortificationes.
 
 4. Manet itaque pena, donec manet odium sui (id est penitentia vera
 intus), scilicet usque ad introitum regni celorum.
 
 5. Papa non vult nec potest ullas penas remittere preter eas, quas
 arbitrio vel suo vel canonum imposuit.
 
 6. Papa non potest remittere ullam culpam nisi declarando, et
 approbando remissam a deo Aut certe remittendo casus reservatos sibi,
 quibus contemptis culpa prorsus remaneret.
 
 7. Nulli prorus remittit deus culpam, quin simul eum subiiciat
 humiliatum in omnibus sacerdoti suo vicario.
 
 8. Canones penitentiales solum viventibus sunt impositi nihilque
 morituris secundum eosdem debet imponi.
 
 9. Inde bene nobis facit spiritussanctus in papa excipiendo in suis
 decretis semper articulum mortis et necessitatis.
 
 10. Indocte et male faciunt sacerdotes ii, qui morituris penitentias
 canonicas in purgatorium reservant.
 
 11. Zizania illa de mutanda pena Canonica in penam purgatorii videntur
 certe dormientibus episcopis seminata.
 
 12. Olim pene canonice non post, sed ante absolutionem imponebantur
 tanquam tentamenta vere contritionis.
 
 13. Morituri per mortem omnia solvunt et legibus canonum mortui iam
 sunt, habentes iure earum relaxationem.
 
 14. Imperfecta sanitas seu charitas morituri necessario secum fert
 magnum timorem, tantoque maiorem, quanto minor fuerit ipsa.
 
 15. Hic timor et horror satis est se solo (ut alia taceam) facere penam
 purgatorii, cum sit proximus desperationis horrori.
 
 16. Videntur infernus, purgaturium, celum differre, sicut desperatio,
 prope desperatio, securitas differunt.
 
 17. Necessarium videtur animabus in purgatorio sicut minni horrorem ita
 augeri charitatem.
 
 18. Nec probatum videtur ullis aut rationibus aut scripturis, quod sint
 extra statum meriti seu augende charitatis.
 
 19. Nec hoc probatum esse videtur, quod sint de sua beatitudine certe
 et secure, saltem omnes, licet nos certissimi simus.  20. Igitur papa
 per remissionem plenariam omnium penarum non simpliciter omnium
 intelligit, sed a seipso tantummodo impositarum.
 
 21. Errant itaque indulgentiarum predicatores ii, qui dicunt per pape
 indulgentias hominem ab omni pena solvi et salvari.
 
 22. Quin nullam remittit animabus in purgatorio, quam in hac vita
 debuissent secundum Canones solvere.
 
 23. Si remissio ulla omnium omnino penarum potest alicui dari, certum
 est eam non nisi perfectissimis, i.e. paucissimis, dari.
 
 24. Falli ob id necesse est maiorem partem populi per indifferentem
 illam et magnificam pene solute promissionem.
 
 25. Qualem potestatem habet papa in purgatorium generaliter, talem
 habet quilibet Episcopus et Curatus in sua diocesi et parochia
 specialiter.
 
 1. [26] Optime facit papa, quod non potestate clavis (quam nullam
 habet) sed per modum suffragii dat animabus remissionem.
 
 2. [27] Hominem predicant, qui statim ut iactus nummus in cistam
 tinnierit evolare dicunt animam.
 
 3. [28] Certum est, nummo in cistam tinniente augeri questum et
 avariciam posse: suffragium autem ecclesie est in arbitrio dei solius.
 
 4. [29] Quis scit, si omnes anime in purgatorio velint redimi, sicut de
 s. Severino et Paschali factum narratur.
 
 5. [30] Nullus securus est de veritate sue contritionis, multominus de
 consecutione plenarie remissionis.
 
 6. [31] Quam rarus est vere penitens, tam rarus est vere indulgentias
 redimens, i. e. rarissimus.
 
 7. [32] Damnabuntur ineternum cum suis magistris, qui per literas
 veniarum securos sese credunt de sua salute.
 
 8. [33] Cavendi sunt nimis, qui dicunt venias illas Pape donum esse
 illud dei inestimabile, quo reconciliatur homo deo.
 
 9. [34] Gratie enim ille veniales tantum respiciunt penas
 satisfactionis sacramentalis ab homine constitutas.
 
 10. [35] Non christiana predicant, qui docent, quod redempturis animas
 vel confessionalia non sit necessaria contritio.
 
 11. [36] Quilibet christianus vere compunctus habet remissionem
 plenariam a pena et culpa etiam sine literis veniarum sibi debitam.
 
 12. [37] Quilibet versus christianus, sive vivus sive mortuus, habet
 participationem omnium bonorum Christi et Ecclesie etiam sine literis
 veniarum a deo sibi datam.
 
 13. [38] Remissio tamen et participatio Pape nullo modo est
 contemnenda, quia (ut dixi) est declaratio remissionis divine.
 
 14. [39] Difficillimum est etiam doctissimis Theologis simul extollere
 veniarum largitatem et contritionis veritatem coram populo.
 
 15. [40] Contritionis veritas penas querit et amat, Veniarum autem
 largitas relaxat et odisse facit, saltem occasione.
 
 16. [41] Caute sunt venie apostolice predicande, ne populus false
 intelligat eas preferri ceteris bonis operibus charitatis.
 
 17. [42] Docendi sunt christiani, quod Pape mens non est, redemptionem
 veniarum ulla ex parte comparandam esse operibus misericordie.
 
 18. [43] Docendi sunt christiani, quod dans pauperi aut mutuans egenti
 melius facit quam si venias redimereet.
 
 19. [44] Quia per opus charitatis crescit charitas et fit homo melior,
 sed per venias non fit melior sed tantummodo a pena liberior.
 
 20. [45] Docendi sunt christiani, quod, qui videt egenum et neglecto eo
 dat pro veniis, non idulgentias Pape sed indignationem dei sibi
 vendicat.
 
 21. [46] Docendi sunt christiani, quod nisi superfluis abundent
 necessaria tenentur domui sue retinere et nequaquam propter venias
 effundere.
 
 22. [47] Docendi sunt christiani, quod redemptio veniarum est libera,
 non precepta.
 
 23. [48] Docendi sunt christiani, quod Papa sicut magis eget ita magis
 optat in veniis dandis pro se devotam orationem quam promptam pecuniam.
 
 24. [49] Docendi sunt christiani, quod venie Pape sunt utiles, si non
 in cas confidant, Sed nocentissime, si timorem dei per eas amittant.
 
 25. [50] Docendi sunt christiani, quod si Papa nosset exactiones
 venialium predicatorum, mallet Basilicam s. Petri in cineres ire quam
 edificari cute, carne et ossibus ovium suarum.
 
 1. [51] Docendi sunt christiani, quod Papa sicut debet ita vellet,
 etiam vendita (si opus sit) Basilicam s. Petri, de suis pecuniis dare
 illis, a quorum plurimis quidam concionatores veniarum pecuniam
 eliciunt.
 
 2. [52] Vana est fiducia salutis per literas veniarum, etiam si
 Commissarius, immo Papa ipse suam animam pro illis impigneraret.  3.
 [53] Hostes Christi et Pape sunt ii, qui propter venias predicandas
 verbum dei in aliis ecclesiis penitus silere iubent.
 
 4. [54] Iniuria fit verbo dei, dum in eodem sermone equale vel longius
 tempus impenditur veniis quam illi.
 
 5. [55] Mens Pape necessario est, quod, si venie (quod minimum est) una
 campana, unis pompis et ceremoniis celebrantur, Euangelium (quod
 maximum est) centum campanis, centum pompis, centum ceremoniis
 predicetur.
 
 6. [56] Thesauri ecclesie, unde Pape dat indulgentias, neque satis
 nominati sunt neque cogniti apud populum Christi.
 
 7. [57] Temporales certe non esse patet, quod non tam facile eos
 profundunt, sed tantummodo colligunt multi  concionatorum.
 
 8. [58] Nec sunt merita Christi et sanctorum, quia hec semper sine Papa
 operantur gratiam hominis interioris et crucem, mortem infernumque
 exterioris.
 
 9. [59] Thesauros ecclesie s. Laurentius dixit esse pauperes ecclesie,
 sed locutus est usu vocabuli suo tempore.
 
 10. [60] Sine temeritate dicimus claves ecclesie (merito Christi
 donatas) esse thesaurum istum.
 
 11. [61] Clarum est enim, quod ad remissionem penarum et casuum sola
 sufficit potestas Pape.
 
 12. [62] Verus thesaurus ecclesie est sacrosanctum euangelium glorie et
 gratie dei.
 
 13. [63] Hic autem est merito odiosissimus, quia ex primis facit
 novissimos.
 
 14. [64] Thesaurus autem indulgentiarum merito est gratissimus, quia ex
 novissimis facit primos.
 
 15. [65] Igitur thesauri Euangelici rhetia sunt, quibus olim
 piscabantur viros divitiarum.
 
 16. [66] Thesauri indulgentiarum rhetia sunt, quibus nunc piscantur
 divitias virorum.
 
 17. [67] Indulgentie, quas concionatores vociferantur maximas gratias,
 intelliguntur vere tales quoad questum promovendum.
 
 18. [68] Sunt tamen re vera minime ad gratiam dei et crucis pietatem
 comparate.
 
 19. [69] Tenentur Episcopi et Curati veniarum apostolicarum
 Commissarios cum omni reverentia admittere.  20. [70] Sed magis
 tenentur omnibus oculis intendere, omnibus auribus advertere, ne pro
 commissione Pape sua illi somnia predicent.  21. [71] Contra veniarum
 apostolicarum veritatem qui loquitur, sit ille anathema et maledictus.
 
 22. [72] Qui vero, contra libidinem ac licentiam verborum Concionatoris
 veniarum curam agit, sit ille benedictus.
 
 23. [73] Sicut Papa iuste fulminat eos, qui in fraudem negocii veniarum
 quacunque arte machinantur,
 
 24. [74] Multomagnis fulminare intendit eos, qui per veniarum pretextum
 in fraudem sancte charitatis et veritatis machinantur,
 
 25. [75] Opinari venias papales tantas esse, ut solvere possint
 hominem, etiam si quis per impossibile dei genitricem violasset, Est
 insanire.
 
 1. [76] Dicimus contra, quod venie papales nec minimum venialium
 peccatorum tollere possint quo ad culpam.
 
 2. [77] Quod dicitur, nec si s. Petrus modo Papa esset maiores gratias
 donare posset, est blasphemia in sanctum Petrum et Papam.
 
 3. [78] Dicimus contra, quod etiam iste et quilibet papa maiores habet,
 scilicet Euangelium, virtutes, gratias, curationum &c. ut 1. Co. XII.
 
 4. [79] Dicere, Crucem armis papalibus insigniter erectam cruci Christi
 equivalere, blasphemia est.
 
 5. [80] Rationem reddent Episcopi, Curati et Theologi, Qui tales
 sermones in populum licere sinunt.
 
 6. [81] Facit hec licentiosa veniarum predicatio, ut nec reverentiam
 Pape facile sit etiam doctis viris redimere a calumniis aut certe
 argutis questionibus laicorm.
 
 7. [82] Scilicet. Cur Papa non evacuat purgatorium propter sanctissimam
 charitatem et summam animarum necessitatem ut causam omnium
 iustissimam, Si infinitas animas redimit propter pecuniam funestissimam
 ad structuram Basilice ut causam levissimam?
 
 8. [83] Item. Cur permanent exequie et anniversaria defunctorum et non
 reddit aut recipi permittit beneficia pro illis instituta, cum iam sit
 iniuria pro redemptis orare?
 
 9. [84] Item. Que illa nova pietas Dei et Pape, quod impio et inimico
 propter pecuniam concedunt animam piam et amicam dei redimere, Et tamen
 propter necessitatem ipsius met pie et dilecte anime non redimunt eam
 gratuita charitate?
 
 10. [85] Item. Cur Canones penitentiales re ipsa et non usu iam diu in
 semet abrogati et mortui adhuc tamen pecuniis redimuntur per
 concessionem indulgentiarum tanquam vivacissimi?
 
 11. [86] Item. Cur Papa, cuius opes hodie sunt opulentissimis Crassis
 crassiores, non de suis pecuniis magis quam pauperum fidelium struit
 unam tantummodo Basilicam sancti Petri?
 
 12. [87] Item. Quid remittit aut participat Papa iis, qui per
 contritionem perfectam ius habent plenarie remissionis et
 participationis?
 
 13. [88] Item. Quid adderetur ecclesie boni maioris, Si Papa, sicut
 semel facit, ita centies in die cuilibet fidelium has remissiones et
 participationes tribueret?
 
 14. [89] Ex quo Papa salutem querit animarum per venias magis quam
 pecunias, Cur suspendit literas et venias iam olim concessas, cum sint
 eque efficaces?
 
 15. [90] Hec scrupulosissima laicorum argumenta sola potestate
 compescere nec reddita ratione diluere, Est ecclesiam et Papam hostibus
 ridendos exponere et infelices christianos facere.
 
 16. [91] Si ergo venie secundum spiritum et mentem Pape predicarentur,
 facile illa omnia solverentur, immo non essent.
 
 17. [92] Valeant itaque omnes illi prophete, qui dicunt populo Christi
 'Pax pax,' et non est pax.
 
 18. [93] Bene agant omnes illi prophete, qui dicunt populo Christi
 'Crux crux,' et non est crux.
 
 19. [94] Exhortandi sunt Christiani, ut caput suum Christum per penas,
 mortes infernosque sequi studeant,
 
 20. [95] Ac sic magis per multas tribulationes intrare celum quam per
 securitatem pacis confidant.
 
 M.D.Xvii.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ron Swanson (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive/American
 Libraries)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LUTHER'S
 EPISTLE SERMONS
 EPIPHANY, EASTER AND PENTECOST
 
 
 TRANSLATED WITH THE HELP OF OTHERS
 BY
 PROF. JOHN NICHOLAS LENKER, D.D.
 
 AUTHOR OF "LUTHERANS IN ALL LANDS," TRANSLATOR OF LUTHER'S WORKS INTO
 ENGLISH AND PRESIDENT OF THE NATIONAL LUTHERAN LIBRARY ASSOCIATION
 
 
 
 
 VOL. II.
 (_Volume VIII of Luther's Complete Works_.)
 
 THIRD THOUSAND
 
 
 
 
 _The Luther Press_
 MINNEAPOLIS, MINN., U.S.A.
 1909.
 
 
 
 
 _Dedication_
 
 To All, Pastors and Laymen, who appreciate the true place of Luther's
 Writings in the Evangelization of Europe, and are interested in the
 Evangelization of the world, this volume of Easter and Pentecost
 Epistle Sermons of the English Luther is gratefully and prayerfully
 dedicated.
 
 
 
 
 Copyright, 1909, by J. N. LENKER.
 
 
 
 
 _Foreword_
 
 
 The Evangelization of the World is being accomplished more rapidly
 than we think. Three mighty movements are constantly at
 work--Reformation, Heathen Missions and Emigration or Colonization. By
 the Reformation Europe was evangelized; by Heathen Missions Asia and
 Africa are being evangelized and by Emigration or Colonization North
 and South America and Australia have been to a large extent
 evangelized. In "Lutherans In All Lands," published in 1893, and in
 the introduction to the volume on St. Peter's Epistles of the English
 Luther, we emphasized the relation of the Evangelical-Lutheran church
 and of Luther's writings to the evangelization of the world through
 these three movements. In view of the recent marvelous growth in
 interest in Heathen Missions and the false ideas about Luther's
 relation to this theme, the following may be in place here in this
 volume of Easter and Pentecost sermons:
 
 The Christian religion being preeminently missionary the Reformation
 of the Christian Church would necessarily be missionary. Protestant
 missions began with Protestantism.
 
 Herzog's Encyclopedia says: "Luther himself already seizes every
 opportunity offered by a text of the Divine Word in order to remind
 believers of the distress of the Heathen and Turks and earnestly urges
 them to pray in their behalf, and to send out missionaries to them. In
 accord with him all the prominent theologians and preachers of his
 day, and of the succeeding period inculcated the missionary duty of
 the Church. Many also of the Evangelical princes cherished the work
 with Christian love and zeal."
 
 Luther's interest in the work of true evangelization is seen in the
 name he designedly chose for the church of his followers. He did not
 call it Protestant nor Lutheran, but conscientiously insisted upon it
 being called the Evangelical, or in plain Anglo-Saxon, the Gospel
 church, the Evangelizing church. Because of Luther's emphasis on the
 word evangelical there are properly speaking no Lutheran, but only
 Evangelical-Lutheran churches. He is the evangelist of Protestantism
 in the true sense.
 
 Of the library of 110 volumes of which Luther is the author, 85 of
 them treat of the Bible and expound its pure evangelical teachings in
 commentaries, sermons and catechetical writings. He popularized the
 word evangelical. With his tongue and pen he labored incessantly for
 the evangelization of Europe. That Europe is evangelized is due more
 to his labors and writings than to those of any other. What those
 writings did for Europe they may do, and we believe, will do, for the
 world in a greater or less degree. The greatest evangelist of Europe
 has a God-given place in the evangelization of the world. His most
 evangelical classics should be translated into all the dialects of
 earth as soon as the Bible is given to the people in their native
 tongue.
 
 Dr. Warneck says: "By the Reformation the christianizing of a large
 part of Europe was first completed, and so far it may be said to have
 carried on a mission work at home on an extensive scale." Further he
 says: "The Reformation certainly did a great indirect service to the
 cause of missions to the heathen, as it not only restored the true
 substance of missionary preaching by its earnest proclamation of the
 Gospel, but also brought back the whole work of missions on Apostolic
 lines. Luther rightly combats, as Plitt insists, 'the secularizing of
 missionary work.'"
 
 In explaining the 117th Psalm Luther says: "If all the heathen shall
 praise God, he must first be their God. Shall he be their God? Then
 they must know him and believe in him, and put away all idolatry,
 since God can not be praised with idolatrous lips or with unbelieving
 hearts. Shall they believe? Then they must first hear his Word and by
 it receive the Holy Spirit, who cleanses and enlightens their heart
 through faith. Are they to hear his Word? Then preachers must be sent
 who shall declare to them the Word of God." So in his familiar hymn,
 "Es wolle Gott uns gnaedig sein."
 
     "And Jesus Christ, His saving strength
      To Gentiles to make known,
      That thee, O God, may thank and praise
      The Gentiles everywhere."
 
 In commenting on the words of the Second Psalm, "Ask of me and I will
 give thee the heathen for thine inheritance," Luther says: "Christ,
 therefore, being upon earth and appointed king upon Mount Zion,
 receives the Gentiles who were then promised unto him. The words 'of
 me' are not spoken without a particular meaning. They are to show that
 this kingdom and this inheritance of the Gentiles are conferred on
 Christ, not by men, nor in any human way, but by God, that is,
 spiritually."
 
 All who retain the good old custom of the fathers in reading Luther's
 Postil sermons on the Gospel and Epistle texts for each Sunday know
 what deep missionary thoughts are found in the sermons for Epiphany,
 Ascension Day and Pentecost.
 
 In one sermon for Ascension Day on "Go ye into all the world and
 preach the Gospel to the whole creation," we read, "these words of the
 Sovereign Ruler commission these poor beggars to go forth and proclaim
 this new message, not in one city or country only, but in all the
 world."
 
 For the history of the writing of these sermons the reader is referred
 to volumes 10, 11, 12 and 13 of the Gospel sermons of Luther's works
 in English.
 
 The German text will be readily found in the 12th volume of the Walch
 and of the St. Louis Walch editions, and in the 8th volume of the
 Erlangen edition of Luther's works.
 
 Due acknowledgment is hereby made of aid received from the translation
 of Pastor Ambrose Henkel, and published in 1869, at New Market,
 Virginia. Also to Pastor C. B. Gohdes, for comparing the manuscript
 from the Third Sunday before Lent with the German text and making
 valuable improvements.
 
 J. N. LENKER.
 
 Home for Young Women,
 Minneapolis, Minn., March 22, 1909.
 
 
 
 
 _Contents_
 
                                                                  Page.
 First Sunday After Epiphany.--The Fruits of Faith. Our Spiritual
   Service. Romans 12, 1-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .    7
 
 Second Sunday After Epiphany.--The Gifts and Works of Christ's
   Members. Our Christian Duty. Romans 12, 6-16  . . . . . . . . .   20
 
 Third Sunday After Epiphany.--Christian Revenge. Romans 12, 16-21   51
 
 Fourth Sunday After Epiphany.--Christian Love and the Command to
   Love. Romans 13, 8-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   56
 
 Fifth Sunday After Epiphany.--The Glorious Adornment of
   Christians. Colossians 3, 12-17 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   76
 
 Third Sunday Before Lent.--The Christian Race for the Prize.
   1 Corinthians 9, 24-10, 5 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   93
 
 Second Sunday Before Lent.--Paul's Glory in His Labor and
   Sufferings. 2 Corinthians 11, 19-12, 9  . . . . . . . . . . . .  104
 
 Sunday Before Lent.--Paul's Praise of Christian Love.
   1 Corinthians 13  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  119
 
 First Sunday in Lent.--An Entreaty to Live as Christians.
   2 Corinthians 6, 1-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  133
 
 Second Sunday in Lent.--Exhortation to Holiness. 1 Thessalonians
   4, 1-7  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  145
 
 Third Sunday in Lent.--Exhortation to be Imitators of God.
   Ephesians 5, 1-9  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  150
 
 Fourth Sunday in Lent.--The Children of Promise. Galatians 4,
   21-31 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  162
 
 Fifth Sunday in Lent.--Christ Our Great High Priest. Hebrews 9,
   11-15 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  163
 
 Palm Sunday.--Christ an Example of Love. Christ's Humiliation and
   Exaltation. Philippians 2, 5-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  169
 
 
 SUMMER PART OF THE EPISTLE POSTIL.
 
 Easter Sunday.--Purging Out the Old Leaven and the New Easter
   Festival of Christians. 1 Corinthians 5, 6-8  . . . . . . . . .  181
 
 Easter Monday.--Peter's Sermon on the Blessings of Christ's
   Resurrection. Acts 10, 34-43  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  194
 
 Easter Tuesday.--Paul's Sermon on the Power and Blessings of
   Christ's Resurrection. Acts 13, 26-39 . . . . . . . . . . . . .  202
 
 Second Sermon.--The Divine Word and the Resurrection. Acts 13,
   26-39 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  204
 
 Easter Wednesday.--The Fruit That Follows Belief in the
   Resurrection. Colossians 3, 1-7 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  217
 
 Sunday After Easter.--The Victory of Faith and the Witness of the
   Holy Spirit Through Baptism. 1 John 5, 4-12 . . . . . . . . . .  231
 
 Second Sunday After Easter.--An Exhortation to Patience by
   Christ's Example in Suffering. 1 Peter 2, 20-25 . . . . . . . .  248
 
 Third Sunday After Easter.--Our Christian Duties. An Exhortation
   to the New Christian Life. 1 Peter 2, 11-20 . . . . . . . . . .  272
 
 Second Sermon.--The Resurrection of the Dead. 1 Corinthians 15,
   20-28 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  285
 
 Fourth Sunday After Easter.--The Resurrection of the Dead.
   1 Corinthians 15, 35-50 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  287
 
 Second Sermon.--Our Gifts and Duties. James 1, 16-21  . . . . . .  289
 
 Fifth Sunday After Easter.--The Change of Our Mortal Body and the
   Destruction of Death. 1 Corinthians 15, 51-58 . . . . . . . . .  301
 
 Ascension Day.--The History of Christ's Ascension. Acts 1, 1-11 .  301
 
 Sunday After Ascension Day.--Soberness in Prayer and Fervency in
   Love, and the Proper Functions of Church Officers. 1 Peter 4,
   7-11  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  303
 
 Pentecost.--The History of Pentecost. Acts 2, 1-13  . . . . . . .  329
 
 Pentecost Monday.--Peter's Sermon on Joel's Prophecy on the
   Outpouring of the Holy Spirit. Acts 2, 14-28  . . . . . . . . .  336
 
 Pentecost Tuesday.--The Resurrection and Glorification of Christ
   Through the Sending of the Holy Spirit. Acts 2, 29-36 . . . . .  336
 
 
 
 
 _First Sunday After Epiphany_
 
 Text: Romans 12, 1-6.
 
 1 I beseech you therefore, brethren, by the mercies of God, to present
 your bodies a living sacrifice, holy, acceptable to God, which is your
 spiritual service. 2 And be not fashioned according to this world: but
 be ye transformed by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what
 is the good and acceptable and perfect will of God. 3 For I say,
 through the grace that was given me, to every man that is among you,
 not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think; but so to
 think as to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to each man a
 measure of faith. 4 For even as we have many members in one body, and
 all the members have not the same office: 5 so we, who are many, are
 one body in Christ, and severally members one of another. 6 And having
 gifts differing according to the grace that was given to us.
 
 
 THE FRUITS OF FAITH.
 
 1. In the preceding sermons I have treated sufficiently of faith and
 love; and of crosses and afflictions, the promoters of hope. Faith,
 love and affliction bound the Christian's life. It is unnecessary that
 I should further discourse on these topics. As they--or anything
 pertaining to the life of the Christian--present themselves, reference
 may be had to those former postils. It is my purpose now briefly to
 make plain that the sum of all divine doctrine is simply Jesus Christ,
 as we have often heard.
 
 2. This epistle lesson treats not of faith, but of the fruits of
 faith--love, unity, patience, self-denial, etc. Among these fruits,
 the apostle considers first the discipline of the body--the
 mortification of evil lusts. He handles the subject here in a manner
 wholly unlike his method in other epistles. In Galatians he speaks of
 crucifying the flesh with its lusts; in Hebrews and Colossians, of
 putting off the old man and mortifying the members on earth. Here he
 mentions presenting the body as a sacrifice; he dignifies it by the
 loftiest and most sacred terms. Why does he so?
 
 First, by making the terms glorious, he would the more emphatically
 urge us to yield this fruit of faith. The whole world regards the
 priest's office--his service and his dignity--as representing the acme
 of nobility and exaltation; and so it truly does. Now, if one would be
 a priest and exalted before God, let him set about this work of
 offering up his body to God; in other words, let him be humble, let
 him be nothing in the eyes of the world.
 
 3. I will let every man decide for himself the difference between the
 outward priesthood of dazzling character and the internal, spiritual
 priesthood. The first is confined to a very few individuals; the
 second, Christians commonly share. One was ordained of men,
 independently of the Word of God; the other was established through
 the Word, irrespective of human devices. In that, the skin is
 besmeared with material oil; in this, the heart is internally anointed
 with the Holy Spirit. That applauds and extols its works; this
 proclaims and magnifies the grace of God, and his glory. That does not
 offer up the body with its lusts, but rather fosters the evil desires
 of the flesh; this sacrifices the body and mortifies its lusts. The
 former permits the offering up to itself of gold and property, of
 honor, of idleness and pleasure, and of all manner of lust on earth;
 the latter foregoes these things and accepts only the reverse of
 homage. That again sacrifices Christ in its awful perversions; this,
 satisfied with the atonement once made by Christ, offers up itself
 with him and in him, by making similar sacrifices. In fact, the two
 priesthoods accord about as well as Christ and Barabbas, as light and
 darkness, as God and the world. As little as smearing and shaving were
 factors in Christ's priesthood, so little will they thus procure for
 anyone the Christian priesthood. Yet Christ, with all his Christians,
 is priest. "Thou art a priest for ever after the order of
 Melchizedek." Ps 110, 4. The Christian priesthood will not admit of
 appointment. The priest is not made. He must be born a priest; must
 inherit his office. I refer to the new birth--the birth of water and
 the Spirit. Thus all Christians become priests, children of God and
 co-heirs with Christ the Most High Priest.
 
 4. Men universally consider the title of priest glorious and
 honorable; it is acceptable to everyone. But the duties and the
 sacrifice of the office are rarely accepted. Men seem to be averse to
 these latter. The Christian priesthood costs life, property, honor,
 friends and all worldly things. It cost Christ the same on the holy
 cross. No man readily chooses death instead of life, and accepts pain
 instead of pleasure, loss instead of gain, shame rather than honor,
 enemies rather than friends, according to the example Christ set for
 us on the cross. And further, all this is to be endured, not for
 profit to one's self, but for the benefit of his neighbor and for the
 honor and glory of God. For so Christ offered up his body. This
 priesthood is a glorious one.
 
 5. As I have frequently stated, the suffering and work of Christ is to
 be viewed in two lights: First, as grace bestowed on us, as a blessing
 conferred, requiring the exercise of faith on our part and our
 acceptance of the salvation offered. Second, we are to regard it an
 example for us to follow; we are to offer up ourselves for our
 neighbors' benefit and for the honor of God. This offering is the
 exercise of our love--distributing our works for the benefit of our
 neighbors. He who so does is a Christian. He becomes one with Christ,
 and the offering of his body is identical with the offering of
 Christ's body. This is what Peter calls offering sacrifices acceptable
 to God by Christ. He describes priesthood and offering in these words:
 "Ye also, as living stones, are built up a spiritual house, to be a
 holy priesthood, to offer up spiritual sacrifices, acceptable to God
 through Jesus Christ." 1 Pet 2, 5.
 
 6. Peter says "spiritual sacrifices," but Paul says our bodies are to
 be offered up. While it is true that the body is not spirit, the
 offering of it is called a spiritual sacrifice because it is freely
 sacrificed through the Spirit, the Christian being uninfluenced by the
 constraints of the Law or the fear of hell. Such motives, however,
 sway the ecclesiasts, who have heaped tortures upon themselves by
 undergoing fasts, uncomfortable clothing, vigils, hard beds and other
 vain and difficult performances, and yet failed to attain to this
 spiritual sacrifice. Rather, they have wandered the farther from it
 because of their neglect to mortify their old Adam-like nature. They
 have but increased in presumption and wickedness, thinking by their
 works and merits to raise themselves in God's estimation. Their
 penances were not intended for the mortification of their bodies, but
 as works meriting for them superior seats in heaven. Properly, then,
 their efforts may be regarded a carnal sacrifice of their bodies,
 unacceptable to God and most acceptable to the devil.
 
 7. But spiritual sacrifices, Peter tells us, are acceptable to God;
 and Paul teaches the same (Rom 8, 13): "If by the Spirit ye put to
 death the deeds of the body, ye shall live." Paul speaks of mortifying
 through the Spirit; Peter, of a spiritual sacrifice. The offering must
 first be slain. Paul's thought is: "If ye mortify the deeds of the
 body in your individual, chosen ways, unprompted by the Spirit or your
 own heart, simply through fear of punishment, that mortification--that
 sacrifice--will be carnal; and ye shall not live, but die a death the
 more awful." The Spirit must mortify your deeds--spiritually it must
 be done; that is, with real enjoyment, unmoved by fear of hell,
 voluntarily, without expectation of meriting honor or reward, either
 temporal or eternal. This, mark you, is a spiritual sacrifice. However
 outward, gross, physical and visible a deed may be, it is altogether
 spiritual when wrought by the Spirit. Even eating and drinking are
 spiritual works if done through the Spirit. On the other hand,
 whatsoever is wrought through the flesh is carnal, no matter to what
 extent it may be a secret desire of the soul. Paul (Gal 5, 20) terms
 idolatry and heresies works of the flesh, notwithstanding they are
 invisible impulses of the soul.
 
 8. In addition to this spiritual sacrifice--the mortifying of the
 deeds of the body--Peter mentions another, later on in the same
 chapter: "But ye are ... a royal priesthood ... that ye may show forth
 the excellencies of him who called you out of darkness into his
 marvelous light." Here Peter touches upon the preaching office, the
 real sacrificial office, concerning which it is said (Ps 50, 23),
 "Whoso offereth the sacrifice of thanksgiving glorifieth me."
 Preaching extols the grace of God. It is the offering of praise and
 thanks. Paul boasts (Rom 15, 16) that he sanctifies and offers the
 Gospel. But it is not our purpose to consider here this sacrifice of
 praise; though praise in the congregation may be included in the
 spiritual sacrifice, as we shall see. For he who offers his body to
 God also offers his tongue and his lips as instruments to confess,
 preach and extol the grace of God. On this topic, however, we shall
 speak elsewhere. Let us now consider the words of the text.
 
 
 OUR SPIRITUAL SERVICE.
 
 "I beseech you therefore, brethren."
 
 9. Paul does not say, "I command you." He is preaching to those
 already godly Christians through faith in the new man; to hearers who
 are not to be constrained by commandments, but to be admonished. For
 the object is to secure voluntary renunciation of their old, sinful,
 Adam-like nature. He who will not cheerfully respond to friendly
 admonition is no Christian. And he who attempts by the restraints of
 law to compel the unwilling to renunciation, is no Christian preacher
 or ruler; he is but a worldly jailer.
 
 "By the mercies of God."
 
 10. A teacher of the Law enforces his restraints through threats and
 punishments. A preacher of grace persuades and incites by calling
 attention to the goodness and mercy of God. The latter does not desire
 works prompted by an unwilling spirit, or service that is not the
 expression of a cheerful heart. He desires that a joyous, willing
 spirit shall incite to the service of God. He who cannot, by the
 gracious and lovely message of God's mercy so lavishly bestowed upon
 us in Christ, be persuaded in a spirit of love and delight to
 contribute to the honor of God and the benefit of his neighbor, is
 worthless to Christianity, and all effort is lost on him. How can one
 whom the fire of heavenly love and grace cannot melt, be rendered
 cheerfully obedient by laws and threats? Not human mercy is offered
 us, but divine mercy, and Paul would have us perceive it and be moved
 thereby.
 
 "To present your bodies."
 
 11. Many and various were the sacrifices of the Old Testament. But all
 were typical of this one sacrifice of the body, offered by Christ and
 his Christians. And there is not, nor can be, any other sacrifice in
 the New Testament. What more would one, or could one, offer than
 himself, all he is and all he has? When the body is yielded a
 sacrifice, all belonging to the body is yielded also. Therefore, the
 Old Testament sacrifices, with the priests and all the splendor, have
 terminated. How does the offering of a penny compare with that of the
 body? Indeed, such fragmentary patchwork scarcely deserves recognition
 as a sacrifice when the bodies of Christ and of his followers are
 offered.
 
 Consequently, Isaiah may truly say that in the New Testament such
 beggarly works are loathsome compared to real and great sacrifices:
 "He that killeth an ox is as he that slayeth a man; he that
 sacrificeth a lamb, as he that breaketh a dog's neck; he that offereth
 an oblation, as he that offereth swine's blood; he that burneth
 frankincense, as he that blesseth an idol." Is 66, 3. Similarly, also:
 "What unto me is the multitude of your sacrifices? saith Jehovah: I
 have had enough of the burnt-offerings of rams, and the fat of fed
 beasts; and I delight not in the blood of bullocks, or of lambs, or of
 he-goats." Is 1, 11. Thus, in plain words, Isaiah rejects all other
 sacrifices in view of this true one.
 
 12. Our blind leaders, therefore, have most wretchedly deceived the
 world by their mass-offerings, for they have forgotten this one real
 sacrifice. The mass may be celebrated and at the same time the soul be
 not benefited, but rather injured. But the body cannot be offered
 without benefiting the soul. Under the New Testament dispensation,
 then, the mass cannot be a sacrifice, even were it ever one. For all
 the works, all the sacrifices of the New Testament, must be true and
 soul-benefiting. Otherwise they are not New Testament sacrifices. It
 is said (Ps 25, 10), "All the paths of Jehovah are lovingkindness and
 truth."
 
 "A living sacrifice, holy, acceptable to God."
 
 13. Paul here makes use of the three words "living," "holy" and
 "acceptable," doubtless to teach that the sacrifices of the Old
 Testament are repealed and the entire priesthood abolished. The Old
 Testament sacrifices consisted of bullocks, sheep and goats. To these
 life was not spared. For the sacrifice they were slain, burned,
 consumed by the priests. But the New Testament sacrifice is a
 wonderful offering. Though slain, it still lives. Indeed, in
 proportion as it is slain and sacrificed, does it live in vigor. "If
 by the Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye shall live."
 Rom 8, 13. "For ye died, and your life is hid with Christ in God." Col
 3, 3. "And they that are of Christ Jesus have crucified the flesh with
 the passions and the lusts thereof." Gal 5, 24.
 
 14. The word "living," then, is to be spiritually understood--as
 having reference to the life before God and not to the temporal life.
 He who keeps his body under and mortifies its lusts does not live to
 the world; he does not lead the life of the world. The world lives in
 its lusts, and according to the flesh; it is powerless to live
 otherwise. True, the Christian is bodily in the world, yet he does not
 live after the flesh. As Paul says (2 Cor 10, 3), "Though we walk in
 the flesh, we do not war according to the flesh"; and again (Rom 8,
 1), "Who walk not after the flesh." Such a life is, before God,
 eternal, and a true, living sacrifice. Such mortification of the body
 and of its lusts, whether effected by voluntary discipline or by
 persecution, is simply an exercise in and for the life eternal.
 
 15. None of the Old Testament sacrifices were holy--except in an
 external and temporal sense--until they were consumed. For the life of
 the animal was but temporal and external previous to the sacrifice.
 But the "living sacrifice" Paul mentions is righteous before God, and
 also externally holy. "Holy" implies simply, being designed for the
 service and the honor of God, and employed of God. Hence we must here
 understand the word "holy" as conveying the thought that we let God
 alone work in us and we be simply his holy instruments. As said in
 First Corinthians 6, 19-20, "Your body is the temple of the Holy Ghost
 ... and ye are not your own ... therefore glorify God in your body,
 and in your spirit, which are God's." Again (Gal 6, 17), "I bear
 branded on my body the marks of Jesus." Now, he who performs a work
 merely for his own pleasure and to his own honor, profanes his
 sacrifice. So also do they who by their works seek to merit reward
 from God, whether temporal or eternal. The point of error is, they are
 not yet a slain sacrifice. The sacrifice cannot be holy unless it
 first lives; that is, unless it is slain before God, and slain in its
 own consciousness, and thus does not seek its own honor and glory.
 
 16. The Old Testament sacrifices were not in themselves acceptable to
 God. Nor did they render man acceptable. But in the estimation of the
 world--before men--they were pleasing, even regarded highly worthy.
 Men thought thereby to render themselves well-pleasing in God's sight.
 But the spiritual sacrifice is, in man's estimation, the most
 repugnant and unacceptable of all things. It condemns, mortifies and
 opposes whatever, in man's judgment, is good and well-pleasing. For,
 as before stated, nature cannot do otherwise than to live according to
 the flesh, particularly to follow its own works and inventions. It
 cannot admit that all its efforts and designs are vain and worthy of
 mortification and of death. The spiritual sacrifice is acceptable to
 God, Paul teaches, however unacceptable it may be to the world. They
 who render this living, holy sacrifice are happy and assured of their
 acceptance with God; they know God requires the death of the lusts and
 inventions of the flesh, and he alone desires to live and work in us.
 
 17. Consequently, Paul's use of the word "body" includes more than
 outward, sensual vices and crimes, as gluttony, fornication, murder;
 it includes everything not of the new spiritual birth but belonging to
 the old Adam nature, even its best and noblest faculties, outer and
 inner; the deep depravity of self-will, for instance, and arrogance,
 human wisdom and reason, reliance on our own good works, on our own
 spiritual life and on the gifts wherewith God has endowed our nature.
 
 To illustrate: Take the most spiritual and the wisest individuals on
 earth, and while it is true that a fraction of them are outwardly and
 physically chaste, their hearts, it will be found, are filled with
 haughtiness, presumption and self-will, while they delight in their
 own wisdom and peculiar conduct. No saint is wholly free from the deep
 depravity of the inner nature. Hence he must constantly offer himself
 up, mortifying his old deceitful self. Paul calls it sacrificing the
 body, because the individual, on becoming a Christian, lives more than
 half spiritually, and the evil propensities remaining to be mortified
 Paul attributes to the body as to the inferior, the less important,
 part of man; the part not as yet wholly under the Spirit's influence.
 
 "Which is your spiritual (reasonable) service."
 
 18. A clear distinction is here made between the services rendered God
 by Christians and those which the Jews rendered. The thought is: The
 Jews' service to God consisted in sacrifices of irrational beasts, but
 the service of Christians, in spiritual sacrifices--the sacrifice of
 their bodies, their very selves. The Jews offered gold and silver;
 they built an inanimate temple of wood and stone. Christians are a
 different people. Their sacrifices are not silver and gold. Their
 temple is not wood and stone; it is themselves. "Ye are a temple of
 God." 1 Cor 3, 16. Thus you observe the unfair treatment accorded
 Christians in ignoring their peculiar services and inducing the world
 to build churches, to erect altars and monasteries, and to manufacture
 bells, chalices and images by way of Christian service--works that
 would have been too burdensome for even the Jews.
 
 19. In brief, this our reasonable service is rightly called a
 spiritual service of the heart, performed in the faith and the
 knowledge of God. Here Paul rejects all service not performed in faith
 as entirely unreasonable, even if rendered by the body and in outward
 act, and having the appearance of great holiness and spiritual life.
 Such have been the works, offerings, monkery and stringent life of the
 Papists, performed without the knowledge of God--having no command of
 God--and without spirit and heart. They have thought that so long as
 the works were performed they must be pleasing to God, independent of
 their faith. Such was also the service of the Jews in their works and
 offerings, and of all who knew not Christ and were without faith.
 Hence they were no better than the service and works of idolatrous and
 ignorant heathen.
 
 "And be not fashioned according to this world: but be ye transformed
 by the renewing of your mind, that ye may prove what is the good and
 acceptable and perfect will of God."
 
 20. As before said, the world cannot endure the sight or hearing of
 this living sacrifice; therefore it opposes it on every side. With its
 provocations and threats, its enticements and persecutions, it has
 every advantage, aided by the fact that our minds and spirits are not
 occupied with that spiritual sacrifice, but we give place to the
 dispositions and inclinations of the world. We must be careful, then,
 to follow neither the customs of the world nor our own reason or
 plausible theories. We must constantly subdue our dispositions and
 control our wills, not obeying the dictates of reason and desire.
 Always we are to conduct ourselves in a manner unlike the way of the
 world. So shall we be daily changed--renewed in our minds. That is, we
 come each day to place greater value on the things condemned by human
 reason--by the world. Daily we prefer to be poor, sick and despised,
 to be fools and sinners, until ultimately we regard death as better
 than life, foolishness as more precious than wisdom, shame nobler than
 honor, labor more blessed than wealth, and sin more glorious than
 human righteousness. Such a mind the world does not possess. The mind
 of the world is altogether unlike the Christian's. It not only
 continues unchanged and unrenewed in its old disposition, but is
 obdurate and very old.
 
 21. God's will is ever good and perfect, ever gracious; but it is not
 at all times so regarded of men. Indeed, human reason imagines it to
 be the evil, unfriendly, abominable will of the devil, because what
 reason esteems highest, best and holiest, God's will regards as
 nothing and worthy of death. Therefore, Christian experience must come
 to the rescue and decide. It must feel and prove, must test and
 ascertain, whether one is prompted by a sincere and gracious will. He
 who perseveres and learns in this way will go forward in his
 experience, finding God's will so gracious and pleasing he would not
 exchange it for all the world's wealth. He will discover that
 acceptance of God's will affords him more happiness, even in poverty,
 disgrace and adversity, than is the lot of any worldling in the midst
 of earthly honors and pleasures. He will finally arrive at a degree of
 perfection making him inclined to exchange life for death, and, with
 Paul, to desire to depart that sin may no more live in him, and that
 the will of God may be done perfectly in himself in every relation. In
 this respect he is wholly unlike the world; he conducts himself very
 differently from it. For the world never has enough of this life,
 while the experienced Christian is ready to be removed. What the world
 seeks, he avoids; what it avoids, he seeks.
 
 22. Paul, you will observe, does not consider the Christian absolutely
 free from sin, since he beseeches us to be "transformed by the
 renewing of the mind." Where transformation and renewal are necessary,
 something of the old and sinful nature must yet remain. This sin is
 not imputed to Christians, because they daily endeavor to effect
 transformation and renovation. Sin exists in them against their will.
 Flesh and spirit are contrary to each other (Gal 5, 17), therefore we
 do not what we would. Rom 7, 15.
 
 Paul makes particular mention of "the mind" here, by contrast making
 plainer what is intended by the "body" which he beseeches them to
 sacrifice. The scriptural sense of the word "mind" has already been
 sufficiently defined as "belief," which is the source of either vice
 or virtue. For what I value, I believe to be right. I observe what I
 value, as do others. But when belief is wrong, conscience and faith
 have not control. Where unity of mind among men is lacking, love and
 peace cannot be present; and where love and faith are not present,
 only the world and the devil reign. Hence transformation by renewal of
 the mind is of vital importance. Now follows:
 
 
 SOBER THOUGHTS OF OURSELVES.
 
 "For I say, through the grace that was given me, to every man that is
 among you, not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think;
 but so to think as to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to
 every man a measure of faith."
 
 23. Paul, in all his epistles, is careful to give this instruction to
 Christians. His purpose is to preserve simplicity of faith among them
 everywhere; to prevent sects and schisms in Christian life, which have
 their origin in differing minds, in diversity of belief. To make
 admonition the more forcible, he refers to his apostolic office; to
 the fact that he was, by the grace of God, chosen and sent to teach
 the things he advocates. His words here mean: "Ye possess many graces,
 but let everyone take heed to confine his belief and opinions to the
 limits of faith. Let him not esteem himself above another, nor attach
 to the gifts conferred upon himself greater value than he accords
 those conferred upon another. Otherwise he will be inclined to despise
 the lesser gifts and emphasize the more exalted ones, and to influence
 others to the same practice." Where there is not such humility,
 recourse is had to works and to the honoring of gifts, while faith is
 neglected. Thus belief prompts to do as the world does, to value what
 is exalted and to despise what is humble.
 
 24. This principle cannot be better illustrated than by the prevailing
 examples of our time. For instance, monks and priests have established
 spiritual orders which they regard highly meritorious. In this respect
 they do not think soberly, but extravagantly. They imagine ordinary
 Christians to be insignificant in comparison with them. But their
 orders represent neither faith nor love, and are not commanded by God.
 They are peculiar, something devised by the monks and priests
 themselves. Hence there is division. Because of the different beliefs,
 numerous sects exist, each striving for first place. Consequently, all
 the orders become unprofitable in God's sight. The love and faith and
 harmony which unite Christians are dissipated.
 
 25. Paul teaches that, however varied the gifts and the outward works,
 none should, because of these, esteem himself good, nor regard himself
 better than others. Rather, every man should estimate his own goodness
 by his faith. Faith is something all Christians have, though not in
 equal measure, some possessing more and others less. However, in faith
 all have the same possession--Christ. The murderer upon the cross,
 through faith, had Christ in himself as truly as had Peter, Paul,
 Abraham, the mother of the Lord, and all saints; though his faith may
 not have been so strong. Therefore, though gifts be unequal, the
 precious faith is the same. Now, if we are to glory in the treasures
 of faith only, not in the gifts, every man should esteem another's
 gifts as highly as his own, and with his own gifts serve that other
 who in faith possesses equal treasure with him. Then will continue
 loving harmony and simple faith, and none will fall back upon his own
 works or merits. Of this "mind," or belief, you may read further in
 the preceding postils, especially in the epistle selection for the
 third Sunday in Advent. Further comment on this text will be left for
 the next epistle lesson, the two being closely connected.
 
 
 
 
 _Second Sunday After Epiphany_
 
 Text: Romans 12, 6-16.
 
 6 And having gifts differing according to the grace that was given to
 us, whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of
 our faith; 7 or ministry, let us give ourselves to our ministry; or he
 that teacheth, to his teaching; 8 or he that exhorteth, to his
 exhorting; he that giveth, let him do it with liberality; he that
 ruleth, with diligence; he that showeth mercy, with cheerfulness. 9
 Let love be without hypocrisy. Abhor that which is evil; cleave to
 that which is good. 10 In love of the brethren be tenderly affectioned
 one to another; in honor preferring one another; 11 in diligence not
 slothful; fervent in spirit; serving the Lord; 12 rejoicing in hope;
 patient in tribulation; continuing stedfastly in prayer; 13
 communicating to the necessities of the saints; given to hospitality.
 14 Bless them that persecute you; bless, and curse not. 15 Rejoice
 with them that rejoice; weep with them that weep. 16 Be of the same
 mind one toward another. Set not your mind on high things, but
 condescend to things that are lowly.
 
 
 GIFTS AND WORKS OF CHRIST'S MEMBERS.
 
 1. This lesson begins in a way that would seem to call for a portion
 properly belonging to the epistle for the preceding Sunday, and
 terminates short of its full connection. Evidently it was arranged by
 some unlearned and thoughtless individual, with a view simply to
 making convenient reading in the churches and not to its explanation
 to the people. It will be necessary to a clear comprehension,
 therefore, to note its real connections.
 
 2. In the epistle for last Sunday, the apostle teaches that as
 Christians we are to renew our minds by sacrificing our bodies, thus
 preserving the true character of faith; that we are not to regard
 ourselves as good or perfect without faith, if we would avoid the rise
 of sects and conflicting opinions among Christians; that each is to
 continue firm in the measure of faith God has given him, whether it be
 weak or strong; that he shall use his gifts to his neighbor's profit,
 and then they will not be regarded special favors by the less gifted,
 and the common faith will be generally prized as the highest and most
 precious treasure, the result being satisfaction for all men. Paul
 next adds the simile: "For even as we have many members in one body,
 and all the members have not the same office: so we, who are many, are
 one body in Christ, and severally members one of another." Then
 follows our selection for today, the connection being, "And having
 gifts differing according to the grace that was given to us," etc.
 Paul likens the various gifts to ourselves, the different members of
 the common body of Christ.
 
 It is an apt and beautiful simile, one he makes use of frequently; for
 instance, 1 Cor 12, 12 and Eph 4, 16. It teaches directly and clearly
 the equality of all Christians; that one common faith should satisfy
 all; that gifts are not to be regarded as making one better, happier
 and more righteous than another, in the eyes of God. The latter idea
 is certainly erroneous, and destructive of faith, which alone avails
 with God.
 
 
 WE ARE BORN MEMBERS OF CHRIST.
 
 3. First, if we examine this simile, we shall find that all the
 members perform certain functions of the body because they are members
 of it; and no member has its place through its own efforts or its own
 merits. It was born a member, before the exercise of office was
 possible. It acts by virtue of being a member; it does not become a
 member by virtue of its action. It derives existence and all its
 powers from the body, regardless of its own exertions. The body,
 however, exercises its members as occasion requires. The eye has not
 attained its place because of its power of seeing--not because it has
 merited its office as an organ of sight for the body. In the very
 beginning it derived its existence and its peculiar function of sight
 from the body. It cannot, therefore, boast in the slightest degree
 that by its independent power of seeing it has deserved its place as
 an eye. It has the honor and right of its position solely through its
 birth, not because of any effort on its part.
 
 4. Similarly, no Christian can boast that his own efforts have made
 him a member of Christ, with other Christians, in the common faith.
 Nor can he by any work constitute himself a Christian. He performs
 good works by virtue of having become a Christian, in the new birth,
 through faith, regardless of any merit of his own. Clearly, then, good
 works do not make Christians, but Christians bring forth good works.
 The fruit does not make the tree, but the tree produces the fruit.
 Seeing does not make the eye, but the eye produces vision. In short,
 cause ever precedes effect; effect does not produce cause, but cause
 produces effect. Now, if good works do not make a Christian, do not
 secure the grace of God and blot out our sins, they do not merit
 heaven. No one but a Christian can enjoy heaven. One cannot secure it
 by his works, but by being a member of Christ; an experience effected
 through faith in the Word of God.
 
 5. How, then, shall we regard those who teach us to exterminate our
 sins, to secure grace, to merit heaven, all by our own works; who
 represent their ecclesiastical orders as special highways to heaven?
 What is their theory? They teach, as you observe, that cause is
 produced by effect. Just as if mere muscular tissue that is not a
 tongue becomes a tongue by fluent speaking, or becomes mouth and
 throat by virtue of much drinking; as if running makes feet; keen
 hearing, an ear; smelling, a nose; nourishment at the mother's breast,
 a child; suspension from the apple-tree, an apple. Beautiful
 specimens, indeed, would these be--fine tongues, throats and ears,
 fine children, fine apples.
 
 6. What sort of foolish, perverted individuals are they who so teach?
 Well might you exclaim: "What impossible undertakings, what useless
 burdens and hardships, they assume!" Yes, what but burdens do they
 deserve who pervert God's truth into falsehood; who change the gifts
 God designed for man's benefit into acts of service rendered by man to
 God; who, unwilling to abide in the common faith, aspire to exalted
 and peculiar place as priests and beings superior to other Christians?
 They deserve to be overwhelmed in astonishing folly and madness, and
 to be burdened with useless labors and hardships in their attempts to
 do impossible things. They cheat the world of its blessings while they
 fill themselves. It is said of them (Ps 14, 4-5): "Have all the
 workers of iniquity no knowledge, who eat up my people as they eat
 bread, and call not upon Jehovah?"--that is, they live not in faith.
 And continuing--"There were they in great fear"; meaning that here and
 there they make that a matter of conscience which is not, because they
 cling to works and not to faith.
 
 
 EACH MEMBER CONTENT WITH ITS OWN POWERS.
 
 7. In the second place, the simile teaches that each member of the
 body is content with the other members, and rejoices in its powers,
 not being solicitous as to whether any be superior to itself. For
 instance, the nose is inferior in office to the eye, yet in the
 relation they sustain to each other the former is not envious of the
 latter; rather, it rejoices in the superior function the eye performs.
 On the other hand, the eye does not despise the nose; it rejoices in
 all the powers of the other members. As Paul says elsewhere (1 Cor 12,
 23): "Those parts of the body, which we think to be less honorable,
 upon these we bestow more abundant honor." Thus we see that hand and
 eye, regardless of their superior office, labor carefully to clothe
 and adorn the less honorable members. They make the best use of their
 own distinction to remove the dishonor and shame of the inferior
 members.
 
 8. However unequal the capacities and distinction of the individual
 members of the body, they are equal in that they are all parts of the
 same body. The eye cannot claim any better right to a place in the
 body than the least distinguished member has. Nor can it boast greater
 authority over the body than any other member enjoys. And thus it does
 not essay to do. It grants all members equal participation in the
 body. Likewise, all Christians, whether strong in faith or weak,
 perfect or defective, share equally in Christ and are equal in
 Christendom. Each may appropriate the whole Christ unto himself. I may
 boast as much in Christ as Peter or the mother of God may boast. Nor
 do I envy Peter because he is a more distinguished member of the
 Christian Church than I. I am glad of it. On the other hand, he does
 not despise me for being a less honored member. I am a part of the
 same body to which he belongs, and I possess Christ as well as he
 does.
 
 9. The self-righteous are unable to concede this equality. They must
 stir up sects and distinctions among Christians. Priests aspire to be
 better than laymen; monks better than priests; virgins than wives. The
 diligent, in praying and fasting, would be better than the laborer;
 and they who lead austere lives, more righteous than they of ordinary
 life. This is the work of the devil, and productive of every form of
 evil. Opposed to it is Christ's doctrine in our text. Under such
 conditions as mentioned, faith and love are subverted. The unlearned
 are deluded, and led away from faith to works and orders. Inequality
 is everywhere. The ecclesiasts desire to sit in high places, to
 receive all honor, to have their feet kissed, and will honor and
 respect none but themselves. Indeed, they would ultimately intercede
 for poor Christians, would be mediators between them and God,
 attaching no importance whatever to the stations in life occupied by
 these. They proceed as if they alone were members of Christ, and as if
 their relation to him could not be closer. Then they presume by their
 works to constitute others members of Christ, being careful, however,
 to demand adequate financial return for the service. They are members
 of the devil; not of Christ.
 
 
 EACH MEMBER SERVES ALL THE OTHERS.
 
 10. In the third place, according to the simile each member of the
 body conducts itself in a manner to profit the others--the whole body.
 The eye prepares the way for hand and foot. The foot, in its carriage
 of the body, safeguards the eye. Each member ever cares for and serves
 the others. More beautiful figures of love and good works are not to
 be found than those derived from the body with its members. In the
 members we daily bear about with us, and with which we are continually
 familiar, God has described the law of love in a living and forcible
 manner. Upon the principle there illustrated, the Christian should
 act, conducting himself in a way to profit not himself but others, and
 having a sincere interest in them. Under such conditions, schisms and
 sects could not spring up among us.
 
 11. But we are blind; we neither see nor read the beautiful lesson
 taught us in our own bodies. We proceed to invent good works as a
 means of improving our condition and bringing ourselves into a saved
 state. This error is attributable to our lack of faith and of heart
 knowledge of Christ. Hence we are restless in soul, seeking to be
 liberated from sin and to become righteous. The heart in its ignorance
 of the sufficiency of common faith, engages in these abnormal, special
 works. There is where foolish individuals begin to disregard faith and
 love, imagining such works true ways to heaven. One takes up one
 thing, and another something else, and so it goes, until there is
 nothing but sects. One sect condemns and rejects the other. Each,
 exalting itself beyond measure, claims superiority.
 
 
 EACH MEMBER SUFFERS AND REJOICES WITH ALL.
 
 12. In the fourth place, "whether one member suffereth, all the
 members suffer with it; or one member is honored, all the members
 rejoice with it," as Paul says. 1 Cor 12, 26. In short, no member
 lives and acts for itself; all obey and serve one another, and the
 more honored members serve most. Each seems to say: "I desire not to
 be otherwise than as I am. I am satisfied to be a member of the same
 body with the others, and to have equal rights and honors therein. It
 is unnecessary for me to exert myself to share in that body, for I am
 already a member of it, and content. My efforts I direct to serving
 the body--all the members, my beloved brothers and partners. I assume
 no peculiarities. I would not cause discord and conflict."
 
 13. Observe, this is the way all true, righteous Christians do, as we
 have frequently said. They who conduct themselves otherwise cannot be
 true Christians; they are worse--more pernicious--than heathen. They
 cannot refrain from instigating sects; from assuming some peculiarity,
 some special doctrine, wherein they proudly exalt themselves above
 other men. Thus they lure to themselves the hearts of the unlearned.
 Against this class Paul here, as everywhere, faithfully warns us.
 
 14. See, then, that you become a member of Christ. This is to be
 accomplished through faith alone, regardless of works. And having
 become a member, if God has appointed you a duty according to your
 capacity, abide in it. Let no one allure you away from it. Esteem not
 yourself better than others, but serve them, rejoicing in their works
 and their offices as you do in your own, even if they are less
 important. Faith renders you equal with others, and others equal with
 you, and so on.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN EQUALITY AND CHRISTIAN GIFTS.
 
 Paul's design in this epistle is to teach equality. He would have no
 one "think of himself more highly than he ought to think; but so to
 think as to think soberly, according as God hath dealt to each man a
 measure of faith." Or, to express it differently: "Let each one regard
 that his work for which he has a gift, and let him perform it. But he
 is not consequently to esteem himself superior to others differently
 gifted. He should delight in their works, justly recognizing those
 works as of God's grace, and knowing that God distributes the measure
 of faith and this his grace not in one way, but in many ways." Paul's
 peculiar choice of words here, referring to all gifts as the grace of
 God and the measure of faith, is meant to teach that no man may regard
 his individual gift as a peculiar instance in that respect, as do they
 who are not of the common faith. It is the one same God, Spirit and
 Lord, the apostle tells us (1 Cor 12, 5-11), who effects in this work
 and that, whether small or great, in you or in me, in the one same
 faith, love and hope.
 
 15. The importance, the nobleness and helpfulness of this doctrine is
 beyond our power of expression. The wretched condition of all
 Christendom, divided as it is into innumerable sects, is, alas, plain
 testimony that no body nor member, no faith nor love, seems longer to
 exist anywhere. Unity of mind in relation to the various gifts of God
 cannot exist in connection with human doctrines. Hence it is
 impossible for the orders and the doctrines of our ecclesiastical
 lords to stand with unity of mind; one or the other must fall.
 
 16. "Measure of faith" may be understood as implying that God imparts
 to some more of faith itself; and to others, less. But I presume
 Paul's thought in employing the expression is that faith brings gifts,
 which are its chief blessing. These are said to be according to the
 measure of our faith, and not to the measure of our will or our merit.
 We have not merited our gifts. Where faith exists, God honors it with
 certain gifts, apportioned, or committed, according to his will. As we
 have it in First Corinthians 12, 11, "dividing to each one severally
 even as he will"; and in Ephesians 4, 16, "to each member according to
 his measure." The same reason may be assigned for Paul's words,
 "Having gifts differing according to the grace that was given to us,"
 not "differing according to our merits." Grace as well as faith brings
 these noble jewels--our gifts--to each one according to his measure.
 It excludes in every respect our works and our merits, and directs us
 to make our works minister only to our neighbors.
 
 "Whether prophecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion of our
 faith."
 
 17. The apostle enumerates several gifts, or works of Christian
 members, mentioning prophecy first. Prophecy is of two kinds: One is
 the foretelling of future events, a gift or power possessed by all the
 prophets under the Old Testament dispensation, and by the apostles;
 the other is the explanation of the Scriptures. "Greater is he that
 prophesieth than he that speaketh with tongues." 1 Cor 14, 5. Now, the
 Gospel being the last prophetic message to be delivered previous to
 the time of the judgment, and to predict the events of that period, I
 presume Paul has reference here simply to that form of prophecy he
 mentions in the fourteenth of First Corinthians--explanation of the
 Scriptures. This form is common, ever prevails, and is profitable to
 Christians; the other form is rare. That reference is to this form,
 Paul implies in his words, "Let us prophesy according to the
 proportion of faith." Doubtless he means the Christian faith then
 arising. No other faith, no other doctrine, is to be introduced. Now,
 when he says prophecy must be according to the proportion of faith, it
 is plain enough he does not refer to the foretelling of future events.
 
 18. The apostle's meaning, then, is: "They who have the gift of
 Scripture explanation must be careful to explain in conformity with
 the faith, and not to teach contrary to its principles." "Other
 foundation can no man lay than that which is laid, which is Jesus
 Christ." 1 Cor 3, 11. Let every man be careful not to build upon this
 foundation with wood, hay, stubble--things unsuited to such a
 foundation; let him build with gold, silver and precious stones.
 
 Every doctrine, every explanation of the Scriptures, then, which leads
 us to rely upon our own works, and produces false Christians and
 self-righteous individuals, in the name of faith, is emphatically
 condemned. Any doctrine that teaches we are to exterminate our sins,
 to become happy and righteous and to obtain peace of conscience before
 God, in any other way than through faith alone--without works--is not
 in harmony with the Christian faith. For instance, all monastic life,
 and the doctrine of racketing spirits from purgatory, are in conflict
 with faith.
 
 19. Paul, you will observe, does not attach so much importance to the
 prediction of future events; for instance, the prophecies of
 Lichtenberger, Joachim and others in these latter times. Such
 predictions, though they may gratify the curiosity of men concerning
 the fate of kings, princes and others of prominence in the world, are
 unnecessary prophecies under the New Testament dispensation. They
 neither teach the Christian faith nor contribute to its strength.
 Hence this form of prophecy may be regarded as among the least of
 God's gifts. More, it sometimes proceeds from the devil. But the
 ability to explain the Scriptures is the noblest, the best, prophetic
 gift. The Old Testament prophets derived their title to the name
 chiefly because they prophesied concerning Christ--according to Peter
 (Acts 4, 25 and 1 Pet 1, 10)--and because they led the people of their
 day in the way of faith by explaining--giving the sense of--the divine
 Word. These things had much more to do with their title than the fact
 of their making occasional predictions concerning earthly kings and
 temporal affairs. In general, they did not make such predictions. But
 the first-mentioned form of prophecy they daily delivered, without
 omission. The faith whereto their prophecies conformed is perpetual.
 
 20. It is of much significance that Paul recognizes faith as the
 controlling judge and rule in all matters of doctrine and prophecy. To
 faith everything must bow. By faith must all doctrine be judged and
 held. You see whom Paul would constitute doctors of the holy
 Scriptures--men of faith and no others. These should be the judges and
 deciders of all doctrines. Their decision should prevail, even though
 it conflict with that of the Pope, of the councils, of the whole
 world. Faith is and must be lord and God over all teachers. Note,
 then, the conduct of the Church orders who failed to recognize faith's
 right to judge, and assumed that prerogative themselves, accepting
 only power, numbers and temporal rank. But you know Pope, councils and
 all the world, with their doctrines, must yield authority to the most
 insignificant Christian with faith, even though it be but a
 seven-year-old child, and his decision of their doctrines and laws is
 to be accepted. Christ commands us to take heed that we despise not
 one of these little ones that believe in him. See Mt 18: 6, 10. Again,
 he says (Jn 6, 45), "They shall all be taught of God." Now, it is
 inconsistent to reject the judgment of him whom God himself teaches.
 Rather, let all men hearken to him.
 
 "Or ministry, let us give ourselves to our ministry."
 
 21. The office of the ministry is the second gift of God the apostle
 enumerates. With the early Christians the duties of this office were
 to serve poor widows and orphans, distributing to them temporal goods.
 Such were the duties of Stephen and his associates (Acts 6, 5), and
 such should be the duties of the stewards and provosts in monasteries
 today. Again, this was the office of those who ministered unto the
 prophets and apostles, the preachers and teachers: for instance, the
 women who followed Christ and served him with their substance; and
 Onesimus, Titus, Timothy and others of Paul's disciples. They made all
 necessary temporal provision, that the apostles and the preachers
 might give themselves uninterruptedly to preaching, teaching and
 prayer, and might be unencumbered with temporal affairs.
 
 22. But things have changed, as we see. Now we have spiritual lords,
 princes, kings, who neglect, not alone to preach and to pray, but also
 to distribute temporal goods to the poor and the widow and the orphan.
 Rather, they pervert the rightful substance of these to add to their
 own pomp. They neither prophesy nor serve; yet they appropriate the
 position and the name of minister, their purpose being to restrain and
 persecute true preachers and servants, and to destroy Christianity
 everywhere and spend its possessions to foster their own luxury.
 
 "Or he that teacheth, to his teaching; or he that exhorteth, to his
 exhorting."
 
 23. We treated of these two gifts in the epistle lesson for Christmas
 night. Tit 2. Teaching consists in instructing those unacquainted with
 faith and the Christian life; exhortation, in inciting, arousing,
 impelling, reproving and beseeching with all perseverance, those
 having knowledge of the faith. We are enjoined (2 Tim 4, 2) to be
 urgent, to "reprove, rebuke and exhort," that Christians may not grow
 weary, indolent and negligent, as too often they do, knowing already
 what is required of them. But prophecy must furnish the store of
 information for the teachers and exhorters. Scripture expositors must
 supply these latter. Prophesying, then, is the source of all doctrine
 and exhortation.
 
 "He that giveth, let him do it with liberality."
 
 24. The mention here made of giving has reference to the fund
 contributed into a common treasury, in charge of servants and
 officers, for distribution among teachers, prophets, widows, orphans
 and the poor generally, as before stated. This was according to an Old
 Testament command. Beside the annual tithes, designed for the Levites,
 special tithes were to be set aside every third year for the poor, the
 widows and the orphans. There is no New Testament law for specific
 giving, for this is the day of grace, wherein everyone is admonished
 to give freely. Paul says (Gal 6, 6), "Let him that is taught in the
 word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things." Again
 (verse 10), "Let us work that which is good toward all men, and
 especially toward them that are of the household of faith."
 
 25. But giving is to be done with liberality--freely and gratuitously,
 to the honor of God alone, with no intent to secure favor, honor or
 profit; none shall dictate in the matter; and preference shall not be
 shown in giving much to the amiable and nothing to the uncongenial, as
 has been the case in the past in relation to the prebends and fiefs.
 These were distributed according to friendship and favor; for the sake
 of money, honor and profit. The same is true of nearly all paid
 services in the matter of purgatory and hell. Freely, freely, we are
 to give, being careful only that it be well pleasing to God and
 bestowed according to necessity.
 
 Paul, you will observe, frequently commends such liberality. It is
 rarely manifest, however. True gifts are made beyond measure, but they
 are unprofitable because not made with a free, liberal spirit; for
 instance, contributions to monasteries and other institutions. Not
 being given with liberality, God does not permit these gifts to be
 used for Christian purposes. Given in an unchristian manner, they
 must, in an unchristianlike way, be wasted; as Micah says (ch. 1, 7):
 "Of the hire of a harlot hath she gathered them, and unto the hire of
 a harlot shall they return." Reference is to spiritual
 whoredom--unbelief--which never acts with liberality.
 
 "He that ruleth, with diligence."
 
 26. "Ruling," or overseeing, is to be understood as relating to the
 common offices in the Christian Church. Paul is not speaking of
 temporal rulers, as princes and heads of families, but of rulers in
 the Church. He says (1 Tim 3, 5): "If a man knoweth not how to rule
 his own house, how shall he take care of the church of God?" He means
 those who have oversight of Church officers generally; who take care
 that teachers be diligent, that deacons and ministers make proper and
 careful distribution of the finances, and that sinners are reproved
 and disciplined; in short, who are responsible for the proper
 execution of all offices. Such are the duties of a bishop. From their
 office they receive the title of bishops--superintendents and
 "Antistrites," as Paul here terms them; that is, overseers and rulers.
 
 27. It is the especial duty of these to be concerned about others, not
 about themselves; the latter care is forbidden rather than enjoined.
 Mt 6, 25. Diligence in the connection in which it is used in the text,
 is prompted by love and not by self-interest. It being the duty of a
 bishop to readily assume oversight, to minister and control, and all
 things being dependent upon him as the movements of team and wagon are
 dependent upon the driver, the bishop has no time for indolence,
 drowsiness and negligence. He must be attentive and diligent, even
 though all others be slothful and careless. Were he inattentive and
 unfaithful, the official duties of all the others would likewise be
 badly executed. The result would be similar to that when the driver
 lies asleep and allows the team to move at will. Under such
 circumstances, to hope for good results is useless, especially
 considering the dangerous roads wherein Christians must travel here,
 among devils who would, in every twinkling of the eye, overthrow and
 destroy them.
 
 28. Why should Paul reverse the seemingly proper order? He does not
 mention ruling first--give it precedence. He rather assigns to
 prophecy the first place, making ministering, teaching, exhorting and
 contributing follow successively, while ruling he places last or
 sixth, among the common offices. Undoubtedly, the Spirit designed such
 order in view of future abominations that should follow the devil's
 establishment of tyranny and worldly dominion among Christians. This
 is the case at present. Dominion occupies chief place. Everything in
 Christendom must yield to the wantonness of tyranny. Prophecy,
 ministry, teaching, exhortation, benevolence--all must give way to
 tyranny. Nothing may interrupt its sway; it must not yield to
 prophecy, teaching or any other office.
 
 29. We must remember, however, that nothing takes precedence of the
 Word of God. The preaching of it transcends all other offices.
 Dominion is but a servant to arouse preaching to activity, like to the
 servant who wakes his master from sleep, or in other ways reminds him
 of his office. This principle confirms Christ's words (Lk 22, 26): "He
 that is the greater among you, let him become as the younger; and he
 that is chief, as he that doth serve." Teachers and prophets, however,
 are to be obedient to rulers and continue subject to them; each
 Christian work and office must subserve the others. Thus is carried
 out Paul's doctrine in this epistle: that one should not esteem
 himself better than others; should not exalt himself over men,
 thinking of himself more highly than he ought to think; though one
 gift or office is more honorable than another, yet it must also
 subserve that other. While the office of ruler is the lowest, yet
 every other appointment is subject to it; on the other hand, in care
 and oversight the ruler serves all others. Again, the prophet, who
 holds the highest office, submits to the ruler, etc.
 
 "He that showeth mercy, with cheerfulness."
 
 30. The six preceding obligations devolve upon the common governing
 powers of the Christian Church--at present known as the ecclesiastical
 order. Paul now proceeds to enumerate duties pertaining to every
 member of the Church. The six first-mentioned obligations are not,
 however, to be individualized to the extent of making but a single
 obligation devolve upon one individual. He who prophesies may also
 teach, admonish, serve and rule. And the same is true of each office.
 Let every man discover unto how many offices he is called, and conduct
 himself accordingly. He must not exalt himself over others, as if
 better than they, and create sects from the common gifts of God; he
 must continue in the common faith of his fellows, allowing mutual
 service and subjection in the gifts.
 
 31. "Mercy" implies all good deeds or benefits conferred by neighbors
 upon one another, aside from the regular contributions of which we
 have spoken. The Hebrew word the apostle uses for "mercy" is "hesed."
 In Latin it is "beneficium"; in Greek, "eleemosyna"; and in common
 parlance, "alms." It is in this sense that Christ employs the term
 throughout the Gospel: "When thou doest alms" (Mt 6, 2)--that is, thy
 good deeds, or favors; "I desire mercy, and not sacrifice" (Mt 12,
 27); "He that showed mercy on him" (Lk 10, 37). And there are other
 similar passages where the word "mercy" is equivalent to "benefit" or
 "favor"; for instance (Mt 5, 7), "Blessed are the merciful."
 
 32. Paul would say: "Let him who is himself so favored that he may
 confer benefits upon others, do it cheerfully and with pleasure." He
 declares (2 Cor 9, 7), "God loveth a cheerful giver." And he makes his
 meaning clear by another portion of the same verse, "not grudgingly,
 or of necessity." That is, the giver is not to twitter and tremble,
 not to be slow and tardy in his giving, nor to seek everywhere for
 reasons to withhold his gift. He is not to give in a way calculated to
 spoil the recipient's enjoyment of the favor. Nor is he to delay until
 the gift loses its sweetness because of the importunity required to
 secure it; rather he should be ready and willing. Solomon says (Prov
 3, 28): "Say not unto thy neighbor, Go, and come again, and to-morrow
 I will give; when thou hast it by thee." "Bis dat qui cito dat." He
 gives doubly who gives quickly. Again, "Tarda gratia non est gratia,"
 A tardy favor is no favor. The word "hilaris" in this connection does
 not imply joyful giving, but free, cheerful, willing and loving
 generosity, a generosity moved by slight entreaty.
 
 
 THE WORKS OF CHRIST'S MEMBERS.
 
 "Let love be without hypocrisy."
 
 33. How aptly the apostle points out the danger of error in each
 obligation, as well as the right course! Prophecy is carried beyond
 its proper sphere when it does not accord with the faith. This is the
 danger-point in all prophecy. The common error in ministering lies in
 the indolence manifested therein, and the constant preference for some
 other occupation. Again, the prevailing error in teaching and
 exhorting is in giving attention to something besides those
 obligations; for instance, deceiving men with human nonsense. The
 mistake in giving is that it is seldom done with liberality. Rulers
 are prone to seek quiet and leisure, desiring to escape being burdened
 with care and anxiety. Favors are seldom bestowed cheerfully and with
 a willing heart. So, too, pure love is a rare thing on earth. Not that
 love in itself is impure, but too often it is mere pretense. John
 implies as much in his words (1 Jn 3, 18), "My little children, let us
 not love in word, neither with the tongue; but in deed and truth."
 
 34. Now, they who harbor hatred while pretending to love, or are
 guilty of similar gross hypocrisies, fall far short of the spirit of
 this teaching. But Paul refers to those of liberated conscience, who
 conduct themselves like true Christians, well knowing how to teach
 concerning Christ; but who are careless of their works, not realizing
 that they neglect their neighbors and fail to assist the needy and to
 rebuke the wicked; who are generally negligent, bringing forth none of
 the fruits of faith; among whom the true Word of God is choked, like
 seed among thorns, as Christ says. Mt 13, 22. But we have elsewhere
 explained the nature of pure love.
 
 "Abhor that which is evil."
 
 35. While to abhor evil is one of the chief principles of love, it is
 rare. The principle is too often lost sight of through hypocrisy and
 false love. We ignore, wink at, even make light of and are undisturbed
 by the evil deeds of our neighbor. We are unwilling to incur his
 displeasure by manifesting indignation and offering rebuke for his
 wickedness, or by withdrawing from his society. Especially do we
 hesitate when we thus must endanger body or life; for instance, when
 the vices of those in high life demand our censure. By such weakness
 on our part we merely dissimulate love. Paul requires, not only a
 secret abhorrence of evil, but an open manifestation of it in word and
 deed. True love is not influenced by the closeness of the friend, by
 the advantage of his favors, or by the standing of his connections;
 nor is it influenced by the perverseness of an enemy. It abhors evil,
 and censures it or flees from it, whether in father or mother, brother
 or sister, or in any other. Corrupt nature loves itself and does not
 abhor its own evil; rather, it covers and adorns it. Anger is styled
 zeal; avarice is called prudence; and deception, wisdom.
 
 "Cleave to that which is good."
 
 36. The second feature of real, true love is that it cleaves to the
 good, even though found in the worst enemy, and though directly
 opposing love's desire. Love is no respecter of persons. It is not
 intimidated by the possible danger its expression might incur. But
 false love will dare, even for the sake of honor, profit or advantage,
 to forsake the good in its friend, particularly when danger threatens
 or persecution arises. Much less, then, will he whose love is false
 cleave to the good in an enemy and stand by and maintain it. And if it
 necessitated opposing his own interests, he would not support his
 enemy's deed, however good. Briefly, the proverb, "The world is false
 and full of infidelity," and that other saying, "Fair but empty
 words," clearly express the fact that the love of our corrupt human
 nature is false and hypocritical, and that where the Spirit of God
 dwells not, there is no real, pure love. These two
 principles--abhorring the evil and cleaving to the good--are clearly
 presented in Psalm 15, 4: "In whose eyes a reprobate is despised, but
 who honoreth them that fear Jehovah"--in other words, "Who cleaves to
 the good, even though it be in an enemy; and hates the evil, even
 though in a friend." Try men by these two principles in their lending,
 their dealing and giving, reproving and teaching, tolerating and
 suffering, and their dissimulation and hypocrisy will be readily
 apparent.
 
 "In love of the brethren be tenderly affectioned one to another."
 
 37. Christians exhibit perfect love when, in addition to the love they
 manifest toward all men, they are themselves united by a peculiar bond
 of Christian affection. The term "tenderly affectioned" expresses the
 love parents have for children, and brothers for each other. Paul
 would say: "Christians are not simply to manifest a spirit of mutual
 love, but they are to conduct themselves toward one another in a
 tender, parental and brotherly way." Thus Paul boasts of doing in the
 case of the people of Thessalonica. 1 Thes 1, 11. Isaiah declares (ch.
 66, 13) that God will so comfort the apostles: "As one whom his mother
 comforteth, so will I comfort you." And Peter says (1 Pet 3, 8):
 "Loving as brethren, tenderhearted, humbleminded." The nature of the
 brotherly love we owe our neighbors is illustrated in the love of an
 affectionate mother for her child. Such love Christ has shown, and
 still shows, toward us. He sustains us, frail, corrupt, sinful beings
 that we are. So imperfect are we, we seem not Christians at all. But
 the love of Christ makes us his, regardless of our imperfections.
 
 "In honor preferring one another."
 
 38. Christ's love and friendship for ourselves should lead us to
 esteem one another precious. We should be dear to one another for the
 sake of the Christ within us. We may not reject any because of his
 imperfections. We must remember the Lord dwells in the weak vessel
 also, and honors him with his presence. If Christ regards him worthy
 of kindness and affection, and extends to him the same privilege in
 himself that we enjoy, we should bow before that weak one, honoring
 him as the living temple of our Lord, the seat of his presence. What
 matters to us the insignificance of the seat the Lord chooses? If it
 is not too humble to be honored with his presence, why should we his
 servants not honor it?
 
 "In diligence not slothful."
 
 39. "Diligence" here implies every form of righteous work and business
 that occupies us. Paul requires us to be diligent, skillful and
 active. We are not to proceed as do they who undertake one thing
 today, and tomorrow another, confining themselves to nothing and soon
 growing weary and indolent. For instance, some readily and very
 zealously engage in a good work, such as praying, reading, fasting,
 giving, serving, disciplining the body. But after two or three
 attempts they become indolent and fail to accomplish the undertaking.
 Their ardor subsides with the gratification of their curiosity. Such
 people become unstable and weak. So Paul enjoins to be
 
 "Fervent in spirit."
 
 40. A weak and somewhat curious disposition may undertake with fervor,
 being ready to accomplish everything at once; but in the very start it
 becomes faint and weak, and voluntarily yields. It becomes silent when
 opposition, disaffection and persecution must be encountered. The
 fervor that does not persevere in spiritual matters is carnal.
 Spiritual fervor increases with undertaking and effort. It is the
 nature of spirit not to know weariness. Spirit grows faint and weary
 only by idleness. Laboring, it increases in strength. Particularly
 does it gain in fervor through persecution and opposition. So it
 perseveres, and accomplishes its projects, even though the gates of
 hell oppose.
 
 "Serving the Lord." (Adapt yourselves to the time.)
 
 41. Some renderings read, "Serve the Lord," for in the Greek "Kairos"
 and "Kyrios" sound much alike. One means "Time," the other "Lord." I
 am undecided which is preferable. "Serve the time"--"adapt yourselves
 to the time"--would be apt. And "Serve the Lord" would not be a bad
 construction. Let each choose for himself. To serve the Lord means to
 let all our acts be done as unto the Lord himself, in the effort to
 serve him, not seeking our own honor, and not neglecting our duty for
 fear of men or because of their favors; it means to follow the spirit
 of Nehemiah's declaration when the temple was being built (Neh 2,
 20)--We are servants of the God of Heaven. Such was the reply of the
 Jews to those who attempted to hinder them. Practically, the Jews
 said: "We do not serve ourselves. Our service is not designed for our
 own honor, but for the honor of the God of Heaven." I shall, however,
 adhere to the rendering, "Adapt yourselves to the time." It is
 equivalent to saying: Direct yourselves according to the time. That
 is, employ it well; be seasonable, in keeping with Solomon's words (Ec
 3, 3-4): "A time to break down, and a time to build up; a time to
 weep, and a time to laugh," etc. There is a time for everything. The
 thought is, Exercise your privileges, confining yourself to no
 particular time; be able to do the duty that presents itself, as Psalm
 1, 3 suggests: "He shall be like a tree ... that bringeth forth its
 fruit in its season."
 
 42. This valuable and excellent doctrine militates against the
 self-righteous, who confine themselves to set times, to the extent of
 making the time conform to them and adapt itself to their convenience.
 They observe particular hours for praying, for eating, for drinking.
 Should you, in dire need of aid, approach one of them, you might
 perish before he would disengage himself to assist you.
 
 Note, the self-righteous man does not adapt himself to the time--does
 not rise to the occasion as he should. The opportunity to perform a
 work of love, he permits to pass. The time must be suited to
 him--which will never be. No opportunity to do good ever presents
 itself to this class, for they are so absorbed in themselves as to
 permit every such occasion to pass. Nor are they seasonable in things
 concerning themselves. They laugh when they should weep; they are
 gloomy when they should rejoice; they flatter when censure is due. All
 their efforts are untimely. It is their fortune to miss every
 opportunity in consequence of confining their endeavors to certain
 times. This is the way of the world.
 
 "Rejoicing in hope."
 
 43. Here is an occasion, truly, when we should be timely. The ungodly
 rejoice when satiate with wealth, honor and ease, but are filled with
 gloom at a change in the weather. Their joy is untimely as well as
 their grief. They rejoice when they should grieve, and grieve when
 they should rejoice. But Christians are capable of rejoicing, not in
 ease and temporal advantage, but in God. They rejoice most when their
 worldly condition is worst. The farther earthly advantages are
 removed, the nearer is God with his eternal blessings. Paul enumerates
 joy among the fruits of the Spirit (Gal 5, 22); the flesh knows not
 such pleasure. In Romans 14, 17, he speaks of "joy in the Holy
 Spirit."
 
 "Patient in tribulation."
 
 44. Throughout the Gospel we are taught that Christians must endure
 crosses and evil days. Hence the Gospel arms us with divine armor, and
 that alone. That is, it teaches us, not how to avert temporal ills and
 to enjoy peace, but how to endure and conquer these ills. We are not
 to oppose and try to avert them, but patiently to endure them until
 they wear themselves out upon us, and lose their power; as ocean
 waves, dashing against the shore, recede and vanish of their own
 accord. Not yielding, but perseverence, shall win here. But of this
 topic we have treated during the Advent season.
 
 "Continuing stedfastly in prayer."
 
 45. Prayer has been sufficiently defined in the third epistle for
 Advent. Paul does not allude to babbling out of prayer-books, nor to
 bawling in the Church. You will never offer true prayer from a book.
 To be sure, you may, by reading a prayer, learn how and what to pray,
 and have your devotion enkindled; but real prayer must proceed
 spontaneously from the heart, not in prescribed words; the language
 must be dictated by the fervor of the soul. Paul particularly
 specifies that we are to be "stedfast in prayer." In other words, we
 should not become remiss, even though we do not immediately receive
 what we ask. The chief thing in prayer is faith. Faith relies on God's
 promise to hear its petition. It may not receive at once what it is
 confident of receiving; but it waits, and though for a time there may
 be indications of failure, yet the petition is granted. Christ gives
 striking illustrations of such perseverence in the parable of the
 wicked judge (Lk 18), and in that of the friend's importunity (Lk 11).
 He everywhere teaches the necessity of faith in prayer. "Whatsoever ye
 shall ask in prayer, believing, ye shall receive," Mt 21, 22. And
 again, "Or what man is there of you, who, if his son shall ask him for
 a loaf, will give him a stone?" Mt 7, 9.
 
 "Communicating to the necessities of the saints."
 
 46. The meaning of this injunction is shamefully perverted. In our
 necessities we daily seek the assistance of saints. Hence the numerous
 institutions, altars and services to these, everywhere in the world.
 Paul's teaching, however, is that we are to "communicate to the
 necessity of the saints." Since we ignore the sanctified ones of this
 life who need our assistance, we are well rewarded by having to go to
 the dead to solicit aid in our necessities. Paul means the saints on
 earth--the Christians. He calls them saints out of respect to the Word
 of God and his grace, which, in faith, renders them holy without
 works.
 
 47. It would be a great shame, a blasphemy, for a Christian to deny
 that he is holy. It would be equivalent to denying the holiness of the
 blood of Christ, of the Word, the Spirit, the grace of God, and of God
 himself. And all these God has applied to or conferred upon the
 Christian to render him holy. Paul does not hesitate to call himself a
 saint (Eph 3, 8): "Unto me who am less than the least of all saints,
 was this grace given." And (1 Tim 5, 10) he would relieve widows who
 washed the feet of the saints. It is also said in Psalm 86, 2,
 "Preserve my soul; for I am godly [holy]." Peter, too (1 Pet 1, 16),
 quoting from Moses, speaks God's message, "Ye shall be holy; for I am
 holy." The word "holy" in the Scriptures has reference only to the
 living.
 
 But we have had books other than the Scriptures to read. Consequently
 we have been led by our seducers into the humiliating wickedness of
 calling holy only the dead, and regarding it the highest presumption
 to apply the term to ourselves. At the same time we are all desirous
 of being called "Christians," a sublimer title than "holy"; for Christ
 is perfect holiness, and Christians are named after Christ--after
 perfect holiness. The shameful abomination known as "the exaltation of
 saints" is responsible for the deplorable error here. The Pope's
 influence has created the belief that only they are holy who are dead,
 or whose works have exalted them to the honor of the title. But how
 often is the devil exalted as a saint, and how often we regard them
 saints who are of hell!
 
 48. Paul's design in mentioning "the necessities of the saints" is to
 teach and move us to do as much for Christians as we are inclined to
 do for the saints of heaven; to regard such ministration as precious
 service, for so it is. He commends to us the real saints--those in
 want; who are of saintly character, though they may be forsaken,
 hungry, naked, imprisoned, half-dead, regarded by the world as ungodly
 evil-doers deserving of every form of misfortune; who, unable to help
 themselves, need assistance. They differ much from those saints whose
 help we, staring heavenward, implore. It is the poor Christians whom
 Christ will array on the last day, saying, "Inasmuch as ye did it unto
 one of these my brethren, even these least, ye did it unto me." Mt 25,
 40. Then they who so ostentatiously served the blessed of heaven must
 stand shamed and afraid in the presence of those whom in this life
 they scorned to respect as they should. Nor will the saints whom they
 bound themselves to serve, and whom they worshiped, avail them
 anything.
 
 "Given to hospitality."
 
 49. Now, Paul specifies concerning the "necessities of the saints" and
 names the treatment to be accorded them. Not only in word are we to
 remember them, but in deed, extending hospitality as their necessities
 demand. "Hospitality" stands for every form of physical aid when
 occasion calls for it--feeding the hungry, giving drink to the
 thirsty, clothing the naked. In the early days of the Gospel, the
 apostles and disciples did not sit in palaces, cloisters,
 institutions, and torture the people with edicts and commands as do
 the idolatrous bishops today. Pilgrim-like, they went about the
 country, having no house nor home, no kitchen nor cellar, no
 particular abiding-place. It was necessary that everywhere hospitality
 be extended the saints, and service rendered them, that the Gospel
 might be preached. This was as essential as giving assistance in their
 distresses and sufferings.
 
 "Bless them that persecute you."
 
 50. Incidental to the subject of the saints' necessities, the apostle
 reminds us we are to conduct ourselves in a Christian manner toward
 our persecutors, who, to great extent, are to blame for the distresses
 of the saints. It is well to observe here that we are not merely
 advised, but commanded, to love our enemies, to do them good and to
 speak well of them; such conduct is the fruit of the Spirit. We must
 not believe what we have heretofore been taught--that the admonition
 comes only to the perfect, and that they are merely counseled to bless
 their persecutors. Christ teaches (Mt 5, 44) that all Christians are
 commanded so to do. And to "bless" our persecutors means to desire for
 them only good in body and soul. For instance, if an enemy detracts
 from our honor, we should respond, "God honor you and keep you from
 disgrace." Or if one infringe upon our rights, we ought to say, "May
 God bless and prosper you." On this wise should we do.
 
 "Bless, and curse not."
 
 51. This is to be our attitude toward mankind generally, whether
 persecutors or otherwise. The meaning is: "Not only bless your
 persecutors, but live without curses for any, with blessings for all;
 wishing no one evil, but everyone only good." For we are children of
 blessing; as Peter says: "Hereunto were ye called, that ye should
 inherit a blessing." 1 Pet 3, 9. In our blessing, all the world is
 blessed--through Christ. "In thy seed shall all the nations of the
 earth be blessed." Gen 22, 18. It is inconsistent for a Christian to
 curse even his most bitter enemy and an evil-doer; for he is commanded
 to bear upon his lips the Gospel. The dove did not bring to Noah in
 the ark a poisonous branch or a thistle sprig; she brought an
 olive-leaf in her mouth. Gen 8, 11. The Gospel likewise is simply a
 gracious, blessed, glad and healing word. It brings only blessing and
 grace to the whole world. No curse, but pure blessing, goes with the
 Gospel. The Christian's lips, then, must be lips of blessing, not of
 cursing. If they curse, they are not the lips of a Christian.
 
 52. It is necessary, however, to distinguish between cursing and
 censuring or reproving. Reproof and punishment greatly differ from
 cursing and malediction. To curse means to invoke evil, while
 censuring carries the thought of displeasure at existing evil, and an
 effort to remove it. In fact, cursing and censuring are opposed.
 Cursing invokes evil and misfortune; censure aims to remove them.
 Christ himself censured, or reproved. He called the Jews a generation
 of vipers, children of the devil, hypocrites, blind dolts, liars, and
 so on. He did not curse them to perpetuate their evils; rather he
 desired the evils removed. Paul does similarly. He says of the
 sorcerer that he is a child of the devil and full of subtilty. Acts
 13, 10. Again, the Spirit reproves the world of sin. Jn 16, 8.
 
 53. But the strong argument is here urged that the saints of the
 Scriptures not only censured, but cursed. Jacob, the patriarch, cursed
 his sons Reuben, Simeon and Levi. Gen 49, 7. A great part of the Law
 of Moses is made up of curses, especially Deut 28, 15. Open cursing is
 commanded to be pronounced by the people, on Mount Ebal. Deut 27, 13.
 How much cursing we find in the Psalms, particularly Psalm 109. Again,
 how David cursed Joab, captain of his host! 2 Sam 3, 29. How bitterly
 Peter curses Simon (Acts 8, 20): "Thy silver perish with thee." Paul
 curses the seducers of the Galatians (Gal 5, 12), "I would they were
 even cut off." And he says (1 Cor 16, 22), "If any man loveth not the
 Lord, let him be anathema." Christ cursed the innocent fig-tree. Mt
 21, 19. And Elisha cursed the children of Bethel. 2 Kings 2, 24. What
 shall we say to these things?
 
 54. I answer: We must distinguish between love and faith. Love must
 not curse; it must always bless. But faith has power to curse. Faith
 makes us children of God, and is to us in God's place. Love makes us
 servants of men, and occupies the place of a servant. Without the
 Spirit's direction, no one can rightly understand and imitate such
 examples of cursing. Cursing stands opposed to cursing--the curses of
 God to the curses of the devil. When the devil, through his followers,
 resists, destroys, obstructs, the Word of God--the channel of the
 blessing--the blessing is impeded, and in God's sight a curse rests
 upon the blessing. Then it is the office of faith to come out with a
 curse, desiring the removal of the obstruction that God's blessing may
 be unhindered.
 
 55. Were one, with imprecation, to invoke God to root out and destroy
 popery--the order of priests, monks and nuns, together with the
 cloisters and other institutions, the whole world might well say,
 Amen. For these the devil's devices curse, condemn and impede
 everywhere God's Word and his blessing. These things are evils so
 pernicious, so diabolical, they do not merit our love. The more we
 serve the ecclesiasts and the more we yield to them, the more obdurate
 they become. They rant and rage against the Word of God and the
 Spirit, against faith and love. Such conduct Christ calls
 blasphemy--sin--against the Holy Spirit--unpardonable sin. Mt 12, 31.
 And John says (1 Jn 5, 16), "There is a sin unto death; not concerning
 this do I say that he should make request." With the ecclesiasts all
 is lost. They will not accept any love or assistance which does not
 leave them in their wickedness, does not strengthen and help--even
 honor and exalt--them in it. Any effort you may make otherwise will
 but cause them to rage against the Holy Spirit, to blaspheme and curse
 your teaching, declaring: "It proceeds not from love and fidelity to
 God, but from the hate, the malice, of the devil. It is not the Word
 of God, but falsehood. It is the devil's heresy and error."
 
 56. In fact, cursing which contributes only to the service of God is a
 work of the Holy Spirit. It is enjoined in the first commandment, and
 is independent of and superior to love. Until God commands us to do a
 certain good work or to manifest our love toward our neighbor, we are
 under no obligation so to do. His will transcends all the good works
 we can do, all the love we can show our neighbor. Even if I could save
 the entire world in a single day and it were not God's will I should,
 I would have no right to do it. Therefore, I should not bless, should
 not perform a good work, should not manifest my love to any, unless it
 be consistent with the will and command of God. The measure of our
 love to our neighbors is the Word of God. Likewise, by the first
 commandment all other commandments are to be measured. We might, in
 direct violation of the commandments of the second table, were it
 consistent with God's will and promotive of his honor, obey the first
 commandment in killing, robbing, taking captive women and children and
 disobeying father and mother, as did the children of Israel in the
 case of their heathen enemies. Likewise the Holy Spirit is able to,
 and does at times, perform works seemingly opposed to all the
 commandments of God. While apparently there is violation in some
 respects, it is in reality only of the commandments of the second
 table, concerning our neighbor. The Spirit's works are in conformity
 with the first three commandments of the first table, relating to God.
 Therefore, if you first become a Peter, a Paul, a Jacob, a David, an
 Elisha, you too may curse in God's name, and with exalted merit in his
 sight.
 
 "Rejoice with them that rejoice; weep with them that weep."
 
 57. There may be a direct connection between these two commands and
 the injunction about "communicating to the necessities of the saints"
 upon which Paul has been expatiating, teaching how we are to treat our
 persecutors, who are largely to blame for the "necessities" of
 Christians. Yet I am inclined to think he speaks here in an unrelated
 way, of our duty to make ourselves agreeable to all men, to adapt
 ourselves to their circumstances, whether good or ill, whether or no
 they are in want. As common servants, we should minister to mankind in
 their every condition, that we may persuade them to accept the Gospel.
 Paul speaks further on this point.
 
 58. Now, if a fellow-man have reason to rejoice, it is not for us to
 put on a stern countenance, as do the hypocrites, who assume to be
 somewhat peculiar. Their unnatural seriousness is meant to be
 indicative of their unrivaled wisdom and holiness, and of the fact
 that men who rejoice instead of wearing, as they do, a stern look, are
 fools and sinners. But no, we are to participate in the joy of our
 fellow-man when that joy is not inconsistent with the will of God. For
 instance, we should rejoice with the father who joys in the piety and
 sweetness of his wife, in her health and fruitfulness, and in the
 obedience and intelligence of his children; and when he is as well off
 as we are so far as soul, body and character, family and property, are
 concerned. These are gifts of God. According to Paul (Acts 14, 17),
 they are given that God may fill our hearts "with food and gladness."
 Though many such gifts and pleasures are improperly used, they are
 nevertheless the gifts of God and not to be rejected with a gloomy
 face as if we dare not, or should not, enjoy them. On the other hand,
 we ought to weep with our fellow-man when he is in sad circumstances,
 as we would weep over our own unhappy condition. We read (2 Sam 1, 17;
 3, 33) that David lamented for Saul, Jonathan and Abner, and (Phil 2,
 27) that Paul was filled with sorrow over the illness of Epaphroditus
 and grieved as if the affliction were his own.
 
 "Be of the same mind one toward another."
 
 59. The apostle has previously (verse 10) spoken concerning unity of
 mind in relation to God-ordained spiritual gifts, counseling that
 everyone should be content as to the offices and gifts of his fellows.
 Now Paul speaks of the temporal affairs of men, teaching likewise
 mutual appreciation of one another's calling and character, offices
 and works, and that none is to esteem himself better than another
 because of these. The shoemaker's apprentice has the same Christ with
 the prince or the king; the woman, the same Christ the man has. While
 there are various occupations and external distinctions among men,
 there is but one faith and one Spirit.
 
 60. But this doctrine of Paul has long been dishonored. Princes,
 lords, nobles, the rich and the powerful, reflect themselves in
 themselves, thinking they are the only men on earth. Even among their
 own ranks, one aspires to be more exalted, more noble and upright,
 than another. Their notions and opinions are almost as diverse as the
 clouds of heaven. They are not of the same mind concerning external
 distinctions. One does not esteem another's condition and occupation
 as significant and as honorable as his own. The individual sentiment
 apparently is: "My station is the best; all others are revolting."
 
 The clumsy, booted peasant enters the strife. The baker aspires to be
 better than the barber; the shoemaker, than the bath-keeper. Should
 one happen to be illegitimately born, he is not eligible to a trade,
 though he even be holy. Certificates of legitimate birth must be
 produced, and such is the complex state of society, there are as many
 beliefs as masters and servants. How can there be unity of mind
 concerning spiritual offices and blessings with people so at variance
 upon trivial, contemptible worldly matters? True, there must be the
 various earthly stations, characters and employments; but it is
 heathenish, unchristian and worldly for one to entertain the absurd
 idea that God regards a certain individual a better Christian than
 another upon the contemptible grounds of his temporal station, and not
 to perceive that in God's sight these conditions make no inner
 difference.
 
 61. Indeed, it is not only unchristian, but effeminate and childish,
 to hold such a view. A woman will win distinction for herself by
 handling the spindle or the needle more deftly than another, or by
 adjusting her bonnet more becomingly than her neighbor can; in fact,
 she may secure prominence by things even more insignificant. To say
 the least, no woman thinks herself less a woman than any other. The
 same is true of children; each is best satisfied with its own bread
 and butter, and thinks its own toy the prettiest; if it does not, it
 will cry until it gets its prettiest.
 
 And so it is with the world: one has more power, another is a better
 Christian, another is more illustrious; one has more learning, another
 is more respectable; one is of this lineage, another that. These
 distinctions are the source of hatred, murder and every form of evil,
 so tenaciously does each individual adhere to his own notions. Yet,
 despite their separate and dissimilar opinions, men call themselves
 Christians.
 
 "Set not your mind on high things."
 
 62. Here Paul makes clear the preceding injunction. He would restrain
 men from their unholy conceits. As before stated, every man is best
 pleased with his own ideas. Hence foolishness pervades the land. One,
 seeing another honored above himself, is restlessly ambitious to
 emulate that other. But he acts contrary to both teachings of Paul:
 Comparing himself to his inferiors or to his equals, he thinks he is
 far above them, and his own station most honorable. Comparing himself
 with his superiors, he sees his pretended rank fail; hence he strives
 to rival them, devoting all his energies to attain the enviable
 position. Clinging to external distinctions, his changing notions and
 unstable heart impel him to such ambition and render him dissatisfied
 with the Christ whom all men possess alike.
 
 But what does Paul teach? Not so. He says, "Set not your mind on what
 the world values." His meaning is: "Distinctions truly must there be
 in this life--one thing high, another low. Everything cannot be gold,
 nor can all things be straw. Nevertheless, among men there should be
 unity of mind in this relation." God treats men alike. He gives his
 Word and his Spirit to the lowly as well as to the high. Paul does not
 use the little word "mind" undesignedly. "High things" have their
 place and they are not pernicious. But to "mind" them, to be absorbed
 in them with the whole heart, to be puffed up with conceit because of
 our relation to them, enjoying them to the disadvantage of the less
 favored--this is heathenish.
 
 "But condescend to things that are lowly."
 
 63. In other words: Despise not lowly stations and characters. Say
 not, they must either be exalted or removed. God uses them; indeed,
 the world cannot dispense with them. Where would the wealthy and
 powerful be if there were no poor and humble? As the feet support the
 body, so the low support the high. The higher class, then, should
 conduct themselves toward the lowly as the body holds itself with
 relation to the feet; not "minding," or regarding, their lofty
 station, but conforming to and recognizing with favor the station of
 the lowly. Legal equality is here made a figure of spiritual
 things--concerning the aspirations of the heart. Christ conducted
 himself with humility. He did not deny his own exaltation, but neither
 was he haughty toward us by reason of it. He did not despise us, but
 stooped to our wretched condition and raised us by means of his own
 exalted position.
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday After Epiphany_
 
 Text: Romans 12, 16-21.
 
 16 Be not wise in your own conceits. 17 Render to no man evil for
 evil. Take thought for things honorable in the sight of all men. 18 If
 it be possible, as much as in you lieth, be at peace with all men. 19
 Avenge not yourselves, beloved, but give place unto the wrath of God:
 for it is written, Vengeance belongeth unto me; I will recompense,
 saith the Lord. 20 But if thine enemy hunger, feed him; if he thirst,
 give him to drink: for in so doing thou shalt heap coals of fire upon
 his head. 21 Be not overcome of evil, but overcome evil with good.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN REVENGE.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This and the last sermon are one in some editions. Hence
 the paragraphs are numbered as one sermon.]
 
 "Be not wise in your own conceits."
 
 64. The lesson as read in the Church ends here. We shall, therefore,
 notice but briefly the remaining portion. "Conceits," as here used,
 signifies the obstinate attitude with regard to temporal things which
 is maintained by that individual who is unwilling to be instructed,
 who himself knows best in all things, who yields to no one and calls
 good whatever harmonizes with his ideas. The Christian should be more
 willing to make concession in temporal affairs. Let him not be
 contentious, but rather yielding, since the Word of God and faith are
 not involved, it being only a question of personal honor, of friends
 and of worldly things.
 
 "Render to no man evil for evil."
 
 65. In the counsel above (verse 14) to "curse not," the writer of the
 epistle has in mind those unable to avenge themselves, or to return
 evil for evil. These have no alternative but to curse, to invoke evil
 upon their oppressors. In this instance, however, the reference is to
 those who have equal power to render one another evil for evil, malice
 for malice, whether by acts committed or omitted--and usually they are
 omitted. But the Christian should render good for evil, and omit not.
 God suffers his sun to shine upon the evil and upon the good. Mt 5,
 45.
 
 "Take thought for things honorable in the sight of all men."
 
 66. This injunction is similar to that he gives the Thessalonians (1
 Thes 5, 22), "Abstain from all appearance of evil"; and the
 Philippians (ch. 4, 8): "Whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things
 are honorable, whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure,
 whatsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if
 there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these
 things." The reference is purely to our outward conduct. Paul would
 not have the Christian think himself at liberty to do his own
 pleasure, regardless of others' approbation. Only in the things of
 faith is such the Christian's privilege. His outward conduct should be
 irreproachable, acceptable to all men; in keeping with the teaching of
 first Corinthians, 10, 32-33, to please all men, giving offense
 neither to Jews nor to Gentiles; and obedient to Peter's advice (1 Pet
 2, 12), "Having your behavior seemly among the Gentiles."
 
 "If it be possible, as much as in you lieth, be at peace with all
 men."
 
 67. Outward peace among men is here intended--peace with Christians
 and heathen, with the godly and the wicked, the high and the low. We
 must give no occasion for strife; rather, we are to endure every ill
 patiently, never permitting peace to be disturbed on our account. We
 must not return evil for evil, blow for blow; for he who so does,
 gives rise to contention. Paul adds, "As much as in you lieth." We are
 to avoid injuring any, lest we be the ones to occasion contention. We
 must extend friendliness to all men, even though they be not friendly
 to us. It is impossible to maintain peace at all times. The saying is,
 "I can continue in peace only so long as my neighbor is willing." But
 it lies in our power to leave others at peace, friends and foes, and
 to endure the contentions of all. "Oh yes," you say, "but where would
 we be then?" Listen:
 
 "Avenge not yourselves, beloved, but give place unto the wrath of God:
 for it is written, Vengeance belongeth unto me; I will recompense,
 saith the Lord."
 
 68. Note, in forbidding us to return blow for blow and to resort to
 vengeance, the apostle implies that our enjoyment of peace depends on
 our quiet endurance of others' disturbance. He not only gives us
 assurance that we shall be avenged, but he intimidates us from
 usurping the office of God, to whom alone belong vengeance and
 retribution. Indeed, he rather deplores the fate of the Christian's
 enemies, who expose themselves to God's wrath; he would move us to
 pity them in view of the fact that we must give place to wrath and
 permit them to fall into the hands of God.
 
 The vengeance and wrath of God are dispensed in various ways: through
 the instrumentality of political government; at the hands of the
 devil; by illness, hunger and pestilence; by fire and water; by war,
 enmity, disgrace; and by every possible kind of misfortune on earth.
 Every creature may serve as the rod and the weapon of God when he
 designs chastisement. As said in Wisdom of Solomon, 5, 17: "He shall
 ... make the creature his weapon for the revenge of his enemies."
 
 69. So Paul says, "Give place unto wrath." I have inserted the words
 "of God" to make clearer the meaning of the text; the wrath of God is
 intended, and not the wrath of man. The thought is not of giving place
 to the anger of our enemies. True, there may be occasion even for
 that, but Paul has not reference here to man's anger. Evidently, he
 means misfortunes and plagues, which are regarded as expressions of
 God's wrath. Possibly the apostle omitted the phrase to avoid giving
 the idea that only the final wrath of God is meant--his anger at the
 last day, when he will inflict punishment without instrumentality.
 Paul would include here all wrath, whether temporal or eternal, to
 which God gives expression in his chastisements. This is an Old
 Testament way of speaking. Phinehas says (Jos 22, 18), "To-morrow he
 will be wroth with ... Israel." And Moses in several places speaks of
 God's anger being kindled. See Numbers 11: 1, 10, 33. I mention these
 things by way of teaching that when the political government wields
 the sword of punishment against its enemies, it should be regarded as
 an expression of God's wrath; and that the statement in Deuteronomy
 32, 35, "Vengeance is mine," does not refer solely to punishment
 inflicted of God direct, without instrumentality.
 
 "But if thine enemy hunger, feed him; if he thirst, give him to drink;
 for in so doing thou shalt heap coals of fire upon his head."
 
 70. This teaching endorses what I have already stated--that the
 Christian's enemies are to be pitied in that they are subjected to the
 wrath of God. Consequently it is not Christian-like to injure them;
 rather, we should extend favors. Paul here introduces a quotation from
 Solomon. Prov 25, 21-22. Heaping coals of fire on the head, to my
 thought, implies conferring favors upon the enemy. Being enkindled by
 our kindness, he ultimately becomes displeased with himself and more
 kindly disposed to us. Coals here are benefits, or favors. Coals in
 the censer likewise stand for the favors, or blessings, of God; they
 are a type of our prayers, which should rise with fervor. Some say
 that coals represent the Law and judgments of God (see Psalm 18, 8,
 "Coals were kindled by it"), reasoning that in consequence of the
 Christian's favors, his enemy is constrained to censure himself and to
 feel the weight of God's Law and his judgments. I do not think a
 Christian should desire punishment to fall upon his enemy, though such
 explanation of the sentence is not inapt. In fact, it rather accords
 with the injunction, "Give place unto wrath"; that is, do good and
 then wrath--the coals--will readily fall upon the enemy.
 
 "Be not overcome of evil, but overcome evil with good."
 
 71. With this concluding counsel, it strikes me, Paul himself explains
 the phrase "coals of fire" in harmony with the first idea--that the
 malice of an enemy is to be overcome with good. Overcoming by force is
 equivalent to lending yourself to evil and wronging the enemy who
 wrongs you. By such a course your enemy overcomes you and you are made
 evil like himself. But if you overcome him with good, he will be made
 righteous like you. A spiritual overcoming is here meant; the
 disposition, the heart, the soul--yes, the devil who instigates the
 evil--are overcome.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday After Epiphany_
 
 Text: Romans 13, 8-10.
 
 8 Owe no man anything, save to love one another: for he that loveth
 his neighbor hath fulfilled the law. 9 For this, Thou shalt not commit
 adultery, Thou shalt not kill, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not
 covet, and if there be any other commandment, it is summed up in this
 word, namely, Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself. 10 Love worketh
 no ill to his neighbor; love therefore is the fulfilment of the law.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN LOVE AND THE COMMAND TO LOVE.
 
 1. This, like the two preceding epistle lessons, is admonitory, and
 directs our attention to the fruits of faith. Here, however, Paul sums
 up briefly all the fruits of faith, in love. In the verses going
 before he enjoined subjection to temporal government--the rendering of
 tribute, custom, fear and honor wherever due--since all governmental
 power is ordained of God. Then follows our lesson: "Owe no man
 anything," etc.
 
 2. I shall ignore the various explanations usually invented for this
 command, "Owe no man anything, but to love one another." To me,
 clearly and simply it means: Not as men, but as Christians, are we
 under obligations. Our indebtedness should be the free obligation of
 love. It should not be compulsory and law-prescribed. Paul holds up
 two forms of obligation: one is inspired by law, the other by love.
 
 Legal obligations make us debtors to men; an instance is when one
 individual has a claim upon another for debt. The duties and tribute,
 the obedience and honor, we owe to political government are of this
 legal character. Though personally these things are not essential to
 the Christian--they do not justify him nor make him more
 righteous--yet, because he must live here on earth, he is under
 obligation, so far as outward conduct is concerned, to put himself on
 a level with other men in these things, and generally to help maintain
 temporal order and peace. Christ paid tribute money as a debt (Mt 17,
 27), notwithstanding he had told Peter he was under no obligation to
 do so and would have committed no sin before God in omitting the act.
 
 3. Another obligation is love, when a Christian voluntarily makes
 himself a servant of all men. Paul says (1 Cor 9, 19), "For though I
 was free from all men, I brought myself under bondage to all." This is
 not a requirement of human laws; no one who fails in this duty is
 censured or punished for neglect of legal obligations. The world is
 not aware of the commandment to love; of the obligation to submit to
 and serve a fellow-man. This fact is very apparent. Let one have
 wealth, and so long as he refrains from disgracing his neighbor's
 wife, from appropriating his neighbor's goods, sullying his honor or
 injuring his person, he is, in the eyes of the law, righteous. No law
 punishes him for avarice and penuriousness; for refusing to lend, to
 give, to aid, and to help his wronged neighbor secure justice. Laws
 made for restraint of the outward man are directed only toward evil
 works, which they prohibit and punish. Good works are left to
 voluntary performance. Civil law does not extort them by threats and
 punishment, but commends and rewards them, as does the Law of Moses.
 
 4. Paul would teach Christians to so conduct themselves toward men and
 civil authority as to give no occasion for complaint or censure
 because of unfulfilled indebtedness to temporal law. He would not have
 them fail to satisfy the claims of legal obligation, but rather to go
 beyond its requirements, making themselves debtors voluntarily and
 serving those who have no claims on them. Relative to this topic, Paul
 says (Rom 1, 14), "I am debtor both to Greeks and to Barbarians."
 Love's obligation enables a man to do more than is actually required
 of him. Hence the Christian always willingly renders to the state and
 to the individual all service exacted by temporal regulations,
 permitting no claims upon himself in this respect.
 
 5. Paul's injunction, then, might be expressed: Owe all men, that you
 may owe none; owe everything, that you may owe nothing. This sounds
 paradoxical. But one indebtedness is that of love, an obligation to
 God. The other is indebtedness to temporal law, an obligation in the
 eyes of the world. He who makes himself a servant, who takes upon
 himself love's obligation to all men, goes so far that no one dares
 complain of omission; indeed, he goes farther than any could desire.
 Thus he is made free. He lives under obligation to no one from the
 very fact that he puts himself under obligation to all. This manner of
 presenting the thought would be sustained by the Spirit in connection
 with other duties; for instance: Do no good work, that you may do only
 good works. Never be pious and holy, if you would be always pious and
 holy. As Paul says (ch. 12, 16), "Be not wise in your own conceits";
 or (1 Cor 3, 18), "If any man thinketh that he is wise among you in
 this world, let him become a fool, that he may become wise." It is in
 this sense we say: Owe all men that you may owe no man; or, "Owe no
 man anything, but to love one another."
 
 6. Such counsel is given with the thought of the two obligations. He
 who would perform works truly good in the sight of God, must guard
 against works seemingly brilliant in the eyes of the world, works
 whereby men presume to become righteous. He who desires to be
 righteous and holy must guard against the holiness attained by works
 without faith. Again, the seeker for wisdom must reject the wisdom of
 men, of nature, wisdom independent of the Spirit. Similarly, he who
 would be under obligation to none must obligate himself to all in
 every respect. So doing, he retains no claim of his own. Consequently,
 he soon rises superior to all law, for law binds only those who have
 claims of their own. Rightly is it said, "Qui cedit omnibus bonis,
 omnibus satisfecit," "He who surrenders all his property, satisfies
 all men." How can one be under obligation when he does not, and
 cannot, possess anything? It is love's way to give all. The best way,
 then, to be under obligation to none is, through love to obligate
 one's self in every respect to all men. In this sense it may be said:
 If you would live, die; if you would not be imprisoned, incarcerate
 yourself; if you do not desire to go to hell, descend there; if you
 object to being a sinner, be a sinner; if you would escape the cross,
 take it upon yourself; if you would conquer the devil, let him
 vanquish you; would you overcome a wicked individual, permit him to
 overcome you. The meaning of it all is, we should readily submit to
 God, to the devil and to men, and willingly permit their pleasure; we
 are to insist on nothing, but to accept all things as they transpire.
 This is why Paul speaks as he does, "Owe no man anything," etc.,
 instead of letting it go at the preceding injunction in verse 5,
 "Render therefore to all their dues," etc.
 
 
 LOVE FULFILS THE LAW.
 
 "For he that loveth his neighbor hath fulfilled the law."
 
 7. Having frequently spoken of the character and fruits of love, it is
 unnecessary to introduce the subject here. The topic is sufficiently
 treated in the epistle lesson for the Sunday preceding Lent. We will
 look at the command to love, in the Law of God. Innumerable, endless,
 are the books and doctrines produced for the direction of man's
 conduct. And there is still no limit to the making of books and laws.
 Note the ecclesiastical and civil regulations, the spiritual orders
 and stations. These laws and doctrines might be tolerated, might be
 received with more favor, if they were founded upon and administered
 according to the one great law--the one rule or measure--of love; as
 the Scriptures do, which present many different laws, but all born of
 love, and comprehended in and subject to it. And these laws must
 yield, must become invalid, when they conflict with love.
 
 Of Love's higher authority we find many illustrations in the
 Scriptures. Christ makes particular mention of the matter in Matthew
 12, 3-4, where David and his companions ate the holy showbread. Though
 a certain law prohibited all but the priests from partaking of this
 holy food, Love was empress here, and free. Love was over the Law,
 subjecting it to herself. The Law had to yield for the time being, had
 to become invalid, when David suffered hunger. The Law had to submit
 to the sentence: "David hungers and must be relieved, for Love
 commands, Do good to your needy neighbor. Yield, therefore, thou Law.
 Prevent not the accomplishment of this good. Rather accomplish it
 thyself. Serve him in his need. Interpose not thy prohibitions." In
 connection with this same incident, Christ teaches that we are to do
 good to our neighbor on the Sabbath; to minister as necessity demands,
 whatever the Sabbath restrictions of the Law. For when a brother's
 need calls, Love is authority and the Law of the Sabbath is void.
 
 8. Were laws conceived and administered in love, the number of laws
 would matter little. Though one might not hear or learn all of them,
 he would learn from the one or two he had knowledge of, the principle
 of love taught in all. And though he were to know all laws, he might
 not discover the principle of love any more readily than he would in
 one. Paul teaches this method of understanding and mastering law when
 he says: "Owe no man anything, but to love one another"; "He that
 loveth another hath fulfilled the law"; "If there be any other
 commandment, it is briefly comprehended in this saying, namely, Thou
 shalt love thy neighbor as thyself"; "Love worketh no ill to his
 neighbor"; "Love is the fulfilling of the law." Every word in this
 epistle lesson proves Love mistress of all law.
 
 9. Further, no greater calamity, wrong and wretchedness is possible on
 earth than the teaching and enforcing of laws without love. In such
 case, laws are but a ruinous curse, making true the proverbs, "summum
 jus, summa injustitia," "The most strenuous right is the most
 strenuous wrong"; and again, Solomon's words (Ec 7, 17), "Noli nimium
 esse justus," "Be not righteous overmuch." Here is where we leave
 unperceived the beam in our own eye and proceed to remove the mote
 from our neighbor's eye. Laws without love make the conscience timid
 and fill it with unreasonable terror and despair, to the great injury
 of body and soul. Thus, much trouble and labor are incurred all to no
 purpose.
 
 10. An illustration in point is the before-mentioned incident of David
 in his hunger. 1 Sam 21, 6. Had the priest been disposed to refuse
 David the holy bread, had he blindly insisted on honoring the
 prohibitions of the Law and failed to perceive the authority of Love,
 had he denied this food to him who hungered, what would have been the
 result? So far as the priest's assistance went, David would have had
 to perish with hunger, and the priest would have been guilty of murder
 for the sake of the Law. Here, indeed, "summum jus, summa
 injustitia"--the most strenuous right would have been the most
 strenuous wrong. Moreover, on examining the heart of the priest who
 should be so foolish, you would find there the extreme abomination of
 making sin where there is no sin, and a matter of conscience where
 there is no occasion for it. For he holds it a sin to eat the bread,
 when really it is an act of love and righteousness. Then, too, he
 regards his act of murder--permitting David to die of hunger--not a
 sin, but a good work and service to God.
 
 11. But who can fully portray this blind, perverted, abominable folly?
 It is the perpetration of an evil the devil himself cannot outdo. For
 it makes sin where there is no sin, and a matter of conscience without
 occasion. It robs of grace, salvation, virtue, and God with all his
 blessings, and that without reason, falsely and deceitfully. It
 emphatically denies and condemns God. Again, it makes murder and
 injustice a good work, a divine service. It puts the devil with his
 falsehoods in the place of God. It institutes the worst form of
 idolatry and ruins body and soul, destroying the former by hunger and
 the latter by a terrified conscience. It makes of God the devil, and
 of the devil God. It makes hell of heaven and heaven of hell;
 righteousness of sin, and sin of righteousness. This I call
 perversion--where strictest justice is the most strenuous wrong.
 
 To this depravity Ezekiel has reference (ch. 13, 18-19): "Thus saith
 the Lord Jehovah: Woe to the women that sew pillows upon all elbows,
 and make kerchiefs for the head of persons of every stature to hunt
 souls! Will ye hunt the souls of my people, and save souls alive for
 yourselves? And ye have profaned me among my people for handfuls of
 barley and for pieces of bread, to slay the souls that should not die,
 and to save the souls alive that should not live, by your lying to my
 people that hearken unto lies." What is meant but that the blind
 teachers of the Law terrify the conscience, and put sin and death in
 the place of grace and life, and grace and life where is only sin and
 death; and all for a handful of barley and a bit of bread? In other
 words, such teachers devote themselves to laws concerning strictly
 external matters, things that perish with the using, such as a drink
 of water and a morsel of bread, wholly neglecting love and harassing
 the conscience with fear of sin unto eternal death; as Ezekiel goes on
 to say (verses 22-23): "Because with lies ye have grieved the heart of
 the righteous, whom I have not made sad, and strengthened the hands of
 the wicked, that he should not return from his wicked way, and be
 saved alive; therefore ye shall no more see false visions, nor divine
 divinations: and I will deliver my people out of your hand; and ye
 shall know that I am Jehovah."
 
 12. Mark you, it is making the hearts of the righteous sad to load
 them with sins when their works are good; it is strengthening the
 hands of the wicked to make their works good when they are naught but
 sin. Relative to this subject, we read (Ps 14, 5): "There were they in
 great fear; for God is in the generation of the righteous." That is,
 the sting of conscience fills with fear where there is neither reason
 for fear nor for a disturbed conscience. That is feared as sin which
 is really noble service to God. The thought of the last passage is:
 When they should call upon God and serve him, they fear such conduct
 is sin and not divine service; again, when they have need to fear a
 service not divine, they are secure and unafraid. Isaiah's words (ch.
 29, 13) are to the same effect: "Their fear of me is a commandment of
 men which hath been taught them." Always the perverted people spoken
 of corrupt everything. They confidently call on God where is only the
 devil; they refrain in fear from calling on God where God is.
 
 13. Such, mark you, is the wretched condition of them who are blindly
 occupied with laws and works and fail to comprehend the design of law
 and its mistress Love. Note, also, in the case of our miserable
 ecclesiasts and their followers, how rigidly they adhere to their own
 inventions! Though all the world meet ruin, their devices must be
 sustained; they must be perpetuated regardless of bodily illness and
 death, or of suffering and ruin for the soul. They even regard such
 destruction and ruin as divine service, and know no fear nor remorse
 of conscience. Indeed, so strongly entrenched are they in their
 wickedness, they will never return from it. Moreover, should one of
 their wretched number be permitted to alleviate the distress of his
 body and soul--to eat meat, to marry--he is afraid, he feels remorse
 of conscience; he is uncertain about sin and law, about death and
 hell; he calls not on God, nor serves him; all this, even though the
 body should die ten deaths and the soul go to the devil a hundred
 times.
 
 14. Observe, then, the state of the world; how little flesh and blood
 can accomplish even in their best efforts; how dangerous to undertake
 to rule by law alone--indeed, how impossible it is, without great
 danger, to govern and instruct souls with mere laws, ignoring love and
 the Spirit, in whose hands is the full power of all law. It is written
 (Deut 33, 2), "At his right hand was a fiery law for them." This is
 the law of love in the Spirit. It shall regulate all laws at the left
 hand; that is, the external laws of the world. It is said (Ex 28, 30)
 that the priest must bear upon his breast, in the breastplate, "the
 Urim and the Thummim"; that is, Light and Perfection, indicative of
 the priest's office to illuminate the Law--to give its true sense--and
 faultlessly to keep and to teach it.
 
 15. In the conception, the establishment and the observance of all
 laws, the object should be, not the furtherance of the laws in
 themselves, not the advancement of works, but the exercise of love.
 That is the true purpose of law, according to Paul here, "He that
 loveth his neighbor hath fulfilled the law." Therefore, when the law
 contributes to the injury rather than the benefit of our neighbor, it
 should be ignored. The same law may at one time benefit our neighbor
 and at another time injure him. Consequently, it should be regulated
 according to its advantage to him. Law should be made to serve in the
 same way that food and raiment and other necessaries of life serve. We
 consider not the food and raiment themselves, but their benefit to our
 needy neighbor. And we cease to dispense them as soon as we perceive
 they no longer add to his comfort.
 
 16. Suppose you were to come across an individual foolish enough to
 act with no other thought than that food and clothing are truly good
 things, and so proceed to stuff a needy one with unlimited food and
 drink unto choking, and to clothe him unto suffocation, and then not
 to desist. Suppose to the command, "Stop, you have suffocated, have
 already over-fed and over-clothed him, and all is lost effort now,"
 the foolish one should reply: "You heretic, would you forbid good
 works? Food, drink and raiment are good things, therefore we must not
 cease to dispense them; we cannot do too much." And suppose he
 continued to force food and clothing on the man. Tell me, what would
 you think of such a one? He is a fool more than foolish; he is more
 mad than madness itself. But such is about the character of our
 ecclesiasts today, and of those who are so blind in the exercise of
 law as to act as if works were the only requisite, and to suffocate
 body and soul, being ignorant that the one purpose of law is to call
 forth the exercise of love. They make works superior to love, and a
 maid to her matron. Such perversion prevails to an extent distressing
 to think of, not to mention hearing and seeing it, or more, practicing
 and permitting it ourselves.
 
 17. The commandment of love is not a long one; it is short. It is one
 injunction, not many. It is even not a commandment, and at the same
 time is all commandments. Brief, and a unit in itself, its meaning is
 easily comprehended. But in its exercise, it is far-reaching, for it
 includes and regulates all commandments. So far as works are enjoined,
 it is no commandment at all; it names no peculiar work. Yet it
 represents all commandments, because properly the fulfilment of all
 commandments is the fulfilment of this. The commandment of love
 suspends every commandment, yet it perpetuates all. Its whole purpose
 is that we may recognize no commandment, no work, except as love
 dictates.
 
 18. As life on earth apart from works is an impossibility, necessarily
 there must be various commandments involving works. Yet Love is
 supreme over these requirements, dictating the omission or the
 performance of works according to its own best interests, and
 permitting no works opposed to itself.
 
 To illustrate: A driver, holding the reins, guides team and wagon at
 will. If he were content merely to hold the reins, regardless of
 whether or no the team followed the road, the entire equipage--team,
 wagon, reins and driver--would soon be wrecked; the driver would be
 lying drowned in a ditch or a pool, or have his neck broken going over
 stumps and rocks. But if he dexterously regulates the movement of the
 outfit according to the road, observing where it is safe and where
 unsafe, he will proceed securely because wisely. Were he, in his
 egotism, to drive straight ahead, endeavoring to make the road conform
 to the movement of the wagon, at his pleasure, he would soon see how
 beautifully his plan would work.
 
 19. So it is when men are governed by laws and works, the laws not
 being regulated according to the people. The case is that of the
 driver who would regulate the road by the movements of the wagon.
 True, the road is often well suited to the straight course of the
 wagon. But just as truly the road is, in certain places, crooked and
 uneven, and then the wagon must conform to the course and condition of
 the road. Men must adapt themselves to laws and regulations wherever
 possible and where the laws are beneficial. But where laws prove
 detrimental to men's interests, the former must yield. The ruler must
 wisely make allowance for love, suspending works and laws. Hence,
 philosophers say prudence--or circumspection or discretion as the
 ecclesiasts put it--is the guide and regulator of all virtues.
 
 20. We read in a book of the ancient fathers that on a certain
 occasion of their assembling, the question was raised, which is really
 the noblest work? Various replies were given. One said prayer, another
 fasting; but St. Anthony was of the opinion that of all works and
 virtues, discretion is the best and surest way to heaven. These,
 however, were but childish, unspiritual ideas relating to their own
 chosen works. A Christian views the matter in quite a different light,
 and more judiciously. He concludes that neither discretion nor
 rashness avails before God. Only faith and love serve with him. But
 love is true discretion; love is the driver and the true discretion in
 righteous works. It always looks to the good of the neighbor, to the
 amelioration of his condition; just as the discretion of the world
 looks to the general welfare of the governed in the adjustment of
 political laws. Let this suffice on this point.
 
 21. But the question arises: How can love fulfil the Law when love is
 but one of the fruits of faith and we have frequently said that only
 faith in Christ removes our sins, justifies us and satisfies all the
 demands of the Law? How can we make the two claims harmonize? Christ
 says, too (Mt 7, 12): "All things, therefore, whatsoever ye would that
 men should do unto you, even so do ye also unto them: for this is the
 law and the prophets." Thus he shows that love for one's neighbor
 fulfils both the Law and the prophets. Again, he says (Mt 22, 37-40):
 "Thou shalt love the Lord thy God ... thy neighbor as thyself. On
 these two the whole law hangeth, and the prophets." Where, then, does
 Paul stand, who says (Rom 3, 31): "Do we then make the law of none
 effect through faith? God forbid: nay, we establish the law." Again
 (Rom 3, 28): "We reckon therefore that a man is justified by faith
 apart from the works of the law." And again (Rom 1, 17), "The
 righteous shall live by faith."
 
 22. I reply: As we have frequently said, we must properly distinguish
 between faith and love. Faith deals with the heart, and love with the
 works. Faith removes our sins, renders us acceptable, justifies us.
 And being accepted and justified as to our person, love is given us in
 the Holy Spirit and we delight in doing good. Now, it is the nature of
 the Law to attack our person and demand good works; and it will not
 cease to demand until it gains its point. We cannot do good works
 without the Spirit and love. The Law constrains us to know ourselves
 with our imperfections, and to recognize the necessity of our becoming
 altogether different individuals that we may satisfy the Law. The Law
 does not exact so much of the heart as of works; in fact, it demands
 nothing but works and ignores the heart. It leaves the individual to
 discover, from the works required, that he must become an altogether
 different person. But faith, when it comes, creates a nature capable
 of accomplishing the works the Law demands. Thus is the Law fulfilled.
 
 So Paul's sayings on the subject are beautiful and appropriate. The
 Law demands of us works; it must be fulfilled by works. Hence it
 cannot in every sense be said that faith fulfils the Law. However, it
 prepares the way and enables us to fulfil it, for the Law demands, not
 us, but our works. The Law constrains us--teaches us that we must be
 changed before we can accomplish its works; it makes us conscious of
 our inability as we are. On the other hand, love and works do not
 change us, do not justify us. We must be changed in person and
 justified before we can love and do good works. Our love and our works
 are evidence of justification and of a change, since they are
 impossible until the individual is free from sin and made righteous.
 
 23. This explanation is given to enable us to perceive the true nature
 of the Law, of faith and of love; to ascribe to each its own mission;
 and rightly to understand the Scripture declarations in their
 harmonious relations that while faith justifies, it does not fulfil
 the Law, and that while love does not justify, it does fulfil the Law.
 The Law requires love and works, but does not mention the heart. The
 heart is sensible of the Law, but love is not. Just as the Law, in
 requiring works before faith exists, is a sign to the individual
 leading him to recognize his utter lack of faith and righteousness,
 and to conclude he is conquered, so love in its fulfilment of the Law
 after faith intervenes is a sign and a proof to the individual of his
 faith and righteousness. Law and love, then, witness to him concerning
 his unrighteousness or his righteousness. After faith comes, love is
 evidence of righteousness. Before faith, man is sensible of the Law's
 oppression because he knows he does not possess what the Law requires.
 And the Law does not require a changed heart, but works. Love and
 works do not effect the fulfilment of the Law; they are themselves its
 fulfilment.
 
 24. Now, though faith does not fulfil the Law, it contains that which
 effects its fulfilment; it secures the Spirit and love whereby the end
 is accomplished. On the other hand, if love does not justify us, it
 makes manifest the faith whereby we are justified. Briefly, as Paul
 says here, "Love is the fulfilment of the law." His thought is:
 Fulfilment of the Law is one thing, and effecting or furnishing its
 fulfilment another. Love fulfils the Law in the sense that love itself
 is its fulfilment; but faith fulfils it in the sense that it offers
 that by which it is fulfilled. For faith loves and works, as said in
 Galatians 5, 6, "Faith worketh through love." The water fills the
 pitcher; so does the cupbearer. The water fills of itself; the
 cupbearer fills with the water--"effective et formaliter implere," as
 the sophists would say.
 
 25. Faith is ever the actor, and love the act. The law requires the
 act and thus forces the actor to be changed. The Law is then fulfilled
 by the act, which, however, the actor must perform. Thus Paul rejects
 the fancies of the sophists, who in the matter of love would make a
 distinction between the external work and the inner affection, saying:
 "Love is an inner affection that loves our neighbor when in our heart
 we wish him well." Its expression in works, however, they call the
 fruit of love. But we will not discuss this idea. Note, Paul terms
 love not only an affection, but an affectionate good act. Faith and
 the heart are the actor and fulfiller of the Law. Paul says, "He that
 loveth his neighbor hath fulfilled the law." And love is the act, the
 fulfilling; for he says, "Love is the fulfilment of the law."
 
 26. Another question arises: How can love for our neighbor be the
 fulfilment of the Law when we are required to love God supremely, even
 above our neighbor? I reply: Christ answers the question when he tells
 us (Mt 22, 39) the second commandment is like unto the first. He makes
 love to God and love to our neighbor the same love. The reason for
 this is, first: God, having no need for our works and benefactions for
 himself, bids us to do for our neighbor what we would do for God. He
 asks for himself only our faith and our recognition of him as God. The
 object of proclaiming his honor and rendering him praise and thanks
 here on earth is that our neighbor may be converted and brought into
 fellowship with God. Such service is called the love of God, and is
 performed out of love to God; but it is exercised for the benefit of
 our neighbor only.
 
 27. The second reason why God makes love to our neighbor an obligation
 equal to love to himself is: God has made worldly wisdom foolish,
 desiring henceforth to be loved amid crosses and afflictions. Paul
 says (1 Cor 1, 21), "Seeing that in the wisdom of God the world
 through its wisdom knew not God, it was God's good pleasure through
 the foolishness of the preaching to save them that believe."
 Therefore, upon the cross he submitted himself unto death and misery,
 and imposed the same submission upon all his disciples. They who
 refused to love him before when he bestowed upon them food and drink,
 blessing and honor, must now love him in hunger and sorrow, in
 adversity and disgrace. All works of love, then, must be directed to
 our wretched, needy neighbors. In these lowly ones we are to find and
 love God, in them we are to serve and honor him, and only so can we do
 it. The commandment to love God is wholly merged in that to love our
 neighbors.
 
 28. These facts restrain those elusive, soaring spirits that seek
 after God only in great and glorious undertakings. It stops the mouths
 of those who strive after greatness like his, who would force
 themselves into heaven, presuming to serve and love him with their
 brilliant works. But they miss him by passing over him in their
 earthly neighbor, in whom God would be loved and honored. Therefore,
 they will hear, on the last day, the sentence (Mt 25, 42), "I was
 hungry, and ye did not give me to eat," etc. For Christ laid aside his
 divinity and took upon himself the form of a servant for the very
 purpose of bringing down and centering upon our neighbor the love we
 extend to himself. Yet we leave the Lord to lie here in his
 humiliation while we gaze open-mouthed into heaven and make great
 pretensions to love and service to God.
 
 
 ALL COMMANDMENTS SUMMED UP IN LOVE.
 
 "For this, Thou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not kill, Thou
 shalt not steal, Thou shalt not covet; and if there be any other
 commandment, it is briefly summed up in this word, namely, Thou shalt
 love thy neighbor as thyself."
 
 29. Love being the chief element of all law, it comprehends, as has
 been made sufficiently clear, all commandments. Its one concern is to
 be useful to man and not harmful; therefore, it readily discovers the
 way. Recognizing the fact that man, from his ardent self-love, seeks
 to promote his own interests and avoid injuring them, love endeavors
 to adopt the same course toward others. We will consider the
 commandment just cited, noticing how ingeniously and wisely it is
 arranged. It brings out four thoughts. First, it states who is under
 obligation to love: thou--the nearest, noblest, best individual we can
 command. No one can fulfil the Law of God for another; each must do it
 for himself. As Paul says (Gal 6, 5), "Each man shall bear his own
 burden." And (2 Cor 5, 10): "For we must all be made manifest before
 the judgment-seat of Christ; that each one may receive the things done
 in the body, according to what he hath done, whether it be good or
 bad." So it is said, "Thou, thou thyself, must love;" not, "Let
 someone else love for you." Though one can and should pray that God
 may be gracious to another and help him, yet no one will be saved
 unless he himself fulfils God's command. It is not enough merely to
 pray that another may escape punishment, as the venders of indulgences
 teach; much rather, we should pray that he become righteous and
 observe God's precepts.
 
 30. Second, the commandment names the most noble virtue--love. It does
 not say, "Thou shalt feed thy neighbor, give him drink, clothe him,"
 all of which things are inestimably good works; it says, "Thou shalt
 love him." Love is the chief virtue, the fountain of all virtues. Love
 gives food and drink; it clothes, comforts, persuades, relieves and
 rescues. What shall we say of it, for behold he who loves gives
 himself, body and soul, property and honor, all his powers inner and
 external, for his needy neighbor's benefit, whether it be friend or
 enemy; he withholds nothing wherewith he may serve another. There is
 no virtue like love; there can be no special work assigned it as in
 the case of limited virtues, such as chastity, mercy, patience,
 meekness, and the like. Love does all things. It will suffer in life
 and in death, in every condition, and that even for its enemies. Well
 may Paul here say that all other commandments are briefly comprehended
 in the injunction, "Thou shalt love thy neighbor as thyself."
 
 31. Third, the commandment names, as the sphere of our love, the
 noblest field, the dearest friend--our neighbor. It does not say,
 "Thou shalt love the rich, the mighty, the learned, the saint." No,
 the unrestrained love designated in this most perfect commandment does
 not apportion itself among the few. With it is no respect of persons.
 It is the nature of false, carnal, worldly love to respect the
 individual, and to love only so long as it hopes to derive profit.
 When such hope ceases, that love also ceases. The commandment of our
 text, however, requires of us free, spontaneous love to all men,
 whoever they may be, and whether friend or foe, a love that seeks not
 profit, and administers only what is beneficial. Such love is most
 active and powerful in serving the poor, the needy, the sick, the
 wicked, the simple-minded and the hostile; among these it is always
 and under all circumstances necessary to suffer and endure, to serve
 and do good.
 
 32. Note here, this commandment makes us all equal before God, without
 regard to distinctions incident to our stations in life, to our
 persons, offices and occupations. Since the commandment is to all--to
 every human being--a sovereign, if he be a human being, must confess
 the poorest beggar, the most wretched leper, his neighbor and his
 equal in the sight of God. He is under obligation, according to this
 commandment, not to extend a measure of help, but to serve that
 neighbor with all he has and all he controls. If he loves him as God
 here commands him to do, he must give the beggar preference over his
 crown and all his realm; and if the beggar's necessity requires, must
 give his life. He is under obligation to love his neighbor, and must
 admit that such a one is his neighbor.
 
 33. Is not this a superior, a noble, commandment, which completely
 levels the most unequal individuals? Is it not wonderfully comforting
 to the beggar to have servants and lovers of such honor? wonderful
 that his poverty commands the services of a king in his opulence? that
 to his sores and wounds are subject the crown of wealth and the sweet
 savor of royal splendor? But how strange it would seem to us to behold
 kings and queens, princes and princesses, serving beggars and lepers,
 as we read St. Elizabeth did! Even this, however, would be a slight
 thing in comparison with what Christ has done. No one can ever equal
 him in the obedience wherewith he has exalted this commandment. He is
 a king whose honor transcends that of all other kings; indeed, he is
 the Son of God. And yet he puts himself on a level with the worst
 sinners, and serves them even to dying for them. Were ten kings of
 earth to serve to the utmost one beggar, it would be a remarkable
 thing; but of what significance would it be in comparison with the
 service Christ has rendered? The kings would be put to utter shame and
 would have to acknowledge their service unworthy of notice.
 
 34. Learn, then, the condition of the world--how far it is, not only
 from Christ's immeasurable example, but from the commandment in this
 verse. Where are to be found any who comprehend the meaning of the
 little phrase "thy neighbor," notwithstanding there is, beside this
 commandment, the natural law of service written in the hearts of all
 men? Not an individual is there who does not realize, and who is not
 forced to confess, the justice and truth of the natural law outlined
 in the command (Mt 7, 12), "All things therefore whatsoever ye would
 that men should do unto you, even so do ye also unto them." The light
 of this law shines in the inborn reason of all men. Did they but
 regard it, what need have they of books, teachers or laws? They carry
 with them in the depths of their hearts a living book, fitted to teach
 them fully what to do and what to omit, what to accept and what to
 reject, and what decision to make.
 
 Now, the command to love our neighbors as ourselves is equivalent to
 that other, "Whatsoever ye would that men should do unto you," etc.
 Every individual desires to be loved and not hated; and he also feels
 and sees his obligation to exercise the same disposition toward
 others. The carrying out of this obligation is loving another as
 himself. But evil lust and sinful love obscure the light of natural
 law, and blind man, until he fails to perceive the guide-book in his
 heart and to follow the clear command of reason. Hence he must be
 restrained and repelled by external laws and material books, with the
 sword and by force. He must be reminded of his natural light and have
 his own heart revealed to him. Yet admonition does not avail; he does
 not see the light. Evil lust and sinful love blind him. With the sword
 and with political laws he must still be outwardly restrained from
 perpetrating actual crimes.
 
 35. The fourth thing the commandment presents is the standard by which
 we are to measure our love--an excellent model. Those are particularly
 worthy instructions and commandments which present examples. This
 commandment holds up a truly living example--"thyself." It is a better
 model than any example the saints have set. The saints are dead and
 their deeds are past, but this example ever lives. Everyone must admit
 a consciousness of his own love for himself; of his ardent concern for
 his temporal life; of his careful nourishment of his body with food,
 raiment and all good things; of his fleeing from death and avoiding
 evil. This is self-love; something we are conscious of in ourselves.
 What, then, is the teaching of the commandment? To do to another as
 you do to yourself; to value his body and his life equally with your
 own body and life. Now, how could God have pointed you to an example
 dearer, more pleasing and more to the purpose than this example--the
 deep instinct of your nature? Indeed, your depth of character is
 measured by the writing of this command in your heart.
 
 36. How will you fare with God if you do not love your neighbor?
 Feeling this commandment written within your heart, your conscience
 will condemn you. Your whole conduct will be an example witnessing
 against you, testifying to your failure to do unto others as the
 natural instinct of your being, more forcibly than all the examples of
 the saints, has taught you to do. But how will it go with the
 ecclesiasts in particular--the churchmen with their singing and
 praying, their cowls and bald pates, and all their jugglery? I make no
 comment on the fact that they have never observed the commandment. I
 ask, however, when has their monastic fanaticism permitted them time
 and opportunity to perceive for once this law in their hearts, to
 become sensible of the example set them in their own human instinct,
 or even to read the precept in books or hear it preached? Poor,
 miserable people! Do you presume to think that God will make void
 this, love's commandment, so deeply and clearly impressed upon the
 heart, so beautifully and unmistakably illustrated in your own
 natures, and in the many written and spoken words as well--think you
 God will do this on account of your cowls and bald pates, and regard
 what you have been devising and performing?
 
 37. Alas, how shamelessly the world has ignored this beautiful and
 impressive commandment wherein are so skilfully presented the
 individual, the task, the model and the sphere of labor! And, on the
 other hand, how shamefully it occupies itself with the very reverse of
 what is taught in this commandment! Its whole practice and tendency
 seem to be to place our responsibility upon others; monks and priests
 must be righteous for us and pray in our stead, that we may personally
 be excused. For the noblest virtue, love, we substitute self-devised
 works; in the place of our neighbors we put wood and stone, raiment
 and food, even dead souls--the saints of heaven. These we serve; with
 them we are occupied; they are the sphere wherein we exercise
 ourselves. Instead of the noblest example--"as thyself"--we look to
 the legends and the works of saints. We presume to imitate such
 outward examples, omitting the duty which our own nature and life
 present and which the command of God outlines, notwithstanding such
 duty offers more than we could ever fulfil. Even if we could
 accomplish all it offers, we would still not equal Christ.
 
 
 LOVE WORKS ONLY GOOD TO ITS NEIGHBOR.
 
 "Love worketh no ill to his neighbor: love, therefore, is the
 fulfilment of the law."
 
 38. The Ten Commandments forbid doing evil to our neighbor--"Thou
 shalt not kill, Thou shalt not commit adultery," etc. The apostle,
 employing similar phraseology, says that love observes all these
 commands, injuring none. Not only that; it effects good for all. It is
 practically doing evil to permit our neighbor to remain in peril when
 we can relieve him, even though we may not have been instrumental in
 placing him where he is. If he is hungry and we do not feed him when
 it is in our power to do so, we practically permit him to die of
 hunger. We should take this view concerning any perilous condition,
 any adverse circumstance, with our neighbors. How love is the
 fulfilment of the Law, we have now heard.
 
 
 
 
 _Fifth Sunday After Epiphany_
 
 Text: Colossians 3, 12-17.
 
 12 Put on therefore, as God's elect, holy and beloved, a heart of
 compassion, kindness, lowliness, meekness, longsuffering; 13
 forbearing one another, and forgiving each other, if any man have a
 complaint against any; even as the Lord forgave you, so also do ye: 14
 and above all these things put on love, which is the bond of
 perfectness. 15 And let the peace of Christ rule in your hearts, to
 the which also ye were called in one body; and be ye thankful. 16 Let
 the Word of Christ dwell in you richly; in all wisdom teaching and
 admonishing one another with psalms and hymns and spiritual songs,
 singing with grace in your hearts unto God. 17 And whatsoever ye do,
 in word or in deed, do all in the name of the Lord Jesus, giving
 thanks to God the Father through him.
 
 
 THE GLORIOUS ADORNMENT OF CHRISTIANS.
 
 1. This text is also a letter of admonition, teaching what manner of
 fruit properly results from faith. Paul deals kindly with the
 Colossians. He does not command, urge nor threaten, as teachers of the
 Law must do in the case of those under the Law. He persuades them with
 loving words in view of the blessing and grace of God received, and in
 the light of Christ's own example. Christians should act with
 readiness and cheerfulness, being moved neither by fear of punishment
 nor by desire for reward, as frequently before stated. This admonition
 has been so oft repeated in the preceding epistle lesson that we know,
 I trust, what constitutes a Christian. Therefore we will but briefly
 touch on the subject.
 
 "Put on, therefore."
 
 2. In the epistle for New Year's day we have sufficiently explained
 the meaning of "putting on"; how by faith we put on Christ, and he us;
 how in love we put on our neighbor, and our neighbor us. The Christian
 apparel is of two kinds--faith and love. Christ wore two manner of
 garments--one whole and typical of faith, the other divided and
 typical of love.
 
 Paul here has reference to the latter garment, love. He would teach us
 Christians the manner of ornaments and apparel we are to wear in the
 world; not silk or precious gold. To women these are forbidden of
 Peter (1 Pet 3, 3), and of Paul (1 Tim 2, 9). Love for our neighbor is
 a garment well befitting us--that love which leads us to concern
 ourselves about the neighbor and his misfortunes. Such love is called
 the ornament of a Christian character--an ornament in the eyes of men.
 
 3. Observe the tender and sacred style of the apostle's admonition, a
 style he is wont to use toward us. He does not drive us with laws, but
 persuades by reminding us of the ineffable grace of God; for he terms
 us the "elect of God," and "holy" and "beloved." He would call forth
 the fruits of faith, desiring them to be yielded in a willing,
 cheerful and happy spirit. The individual who sincerely believes and
 trusts that before God he is beloved, holy and elect, will consider
 how to sustain his honors and titles, how to conduct himself worthily
 of them; more, he will love God with a fervor enabling him to do or
 omit, or to suffer, all things cheerfully, and will never know how to
 do enough. But he who doubts such attitude of God toward himself will
 not recognize the force of these words. He will not feel the power of
 the statement that we are holy, beloved, elect, in the sight of God.
 
 4. Let us disregard, therefore, the saints who elect and love
 themselves; who adorn themselves with the works of the Law; who
 observe fasts and discipline; who regard raiment and position, for
 they are unwilling to be sinners before God. Our ornaments are unlike
 these, and not associated with such mockeries. They are honesty,
 sincerity, good works, service to our neighbor. We are unfettered by
 laws regarding food, raiment, times, etc. We are holy in the sight of
 God, before whom none can be holy until he sees himself a sinner and
 rejects his own righteousness. But the class mentioned are holy in
 their own estimation; therefore, they ever remain wicked--sinners in
 the sight of God. We are beloved of God because we despise ourselves,
 we judge and condemn ourselves and reject our self-love. The others,
 because they love and esteem themselves, are despicable and
 unacceptable in the sight of God. Again, we are chosen of God for the
 reason that we despise ourselves as filth. Such God chooses, and has
 chosen from eternity. Because the would-be saints elect themselves,
 God will reject them, as indeed he has from eternity. Now, this is
 what Paul means by these words,
 
 "A heart of compassion."
 
 5. They stand for a part of the ornament, the beautiful, charming
 Christian jewel, that becomes us better in the sight of God than
 pearls, precious stones, silk and gold become us in the eyes of the
 world. "A heart of compassion" is evidence of the true Christian. Paul
 would say: "Not simply in external deed, or in appearance, are ye to
 be merciful, but in the inmost heart." He refers to that sincere and
 whole-souled mercy characteristic of the father and mother who witness
 the distress of a child for whom they would readily expose their lives
 or sacrifice all they possess. The Christian's mind and heart should
 be constantly devoted to merciful deeds, with an ardor so intense as
 to make him unaware he is doing good and compassionate acts.
 
 6. With this single phrase Paul condemns the works and arbitrary rules
 of hypocritical saints, whose severity will not permit them to
 associate with sinners. Their rigorous laws must be all-controlling.
 They do nothing but compel and drive. They exhibit no mercy, but
 perpetual reproach, censure, condemnation, blame and bluster. They can
 endure no imperfection. But among Christians many are sinners, many
 infirm. In fact, Christians associate only with these; not with
 saints. Christians reject none, but bear with all. Indeed, they are as
 sincerely interested for sinners as they would be for themselves were
 they the infirm. They pray for the sinners, teach, admonish, persuade,
 do all in their power to reclaim. Such is the true character of a
 Christian. So God, in Christ, has dealt with us and ever deals. So
 Christ dealt with the adulteress (Jn 8, 11) when he released her from
 her tormentors, and with his gracious words influenced her to
 repentance and suffered her to depart. We read of St. Antony having
 said that Paphrutius knew how souls are to be saved, because he
 rescued a certain individual from brethren who persecuted and
 oppressed him for his transgression. See "Lives of the Fathers."
 
 Were God to deal with us according to the rigor of his laws, we should
 all be lost. But he mercifully suspends the Law. Isaiah says (ch. 9,
 4): "For the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his shoulder, the
 rod of his oppressor, thou hast broken." God now only persuades.
 
 7. Note how involved in the Law and in hypocrisy they still are who
 esteem themselves prominent saints and at the same time are intolerant
 of the infirmities of Christians. If they fail to find perfect
 holiness--a miracle of purity--in those who possess Christ and know
 the Gospel, then nothing is as it should be; the heavens are on the
 point of falling and the earth about to be destroyed. They can only
 judge, censure and deride, saying: "Oh, yes, he is truly evangelical;
 indeed, he is a visionary!" Thus they indicate their utter blindness.
 With the beam constantly in their own eyes, they show how little they
 know of Christ.
 
 Know, then, when you meet one so ready to censure and condemn, one
 requiring absolute perfection in Christians--know that such a one is
 merely an enforcer of the Law, a base hypocrite, a merciless jailer,
 with no true knowledge of Christ. As, with Christians, there is no law
 but all is love, so neither can there be judgment, condemnation and
 censure. And he who calls another a visionary is certainly a visionary
 ten-fold himself. In the thing for which he judges and condemns
 another, he condemns himself. Since he ignores mercy and all but the
 Law, he finds no mercy in the sight of God; in fact, he has never
 experienced, never tasted, God's mercy. To his taste, both God and
 neighbor are bitter as gall and wormwood.
 
 8. But tender mercy is to be shown only to Christians and only among
 Christians. With the rejecters and persecutors of the Gospel we must
 deal differently. It is not right that my charity be liberal enough to
 tolerate unsound doctrine. In the case of false faith and doctrine
 there is neither love nor patience. Against these it is my duty
 earnestly to contend and not to yield a hair's breadth.
 Otherwise--when faith is not imperiled--I must be unfailingly kind and
 merciful to all notwithstanding the infirmities of their lives. I may
 not censure, oppress nor drive; I must persuade, entreat and tolerate.
 A defective life does not destroy Christianity; it exercises it. But
 defective doctrine--false belief--destroys all good. So, then,
 toleration and mercy are not permissible in the case of unsound
 doctrine; only anger, opposition and death are in order, yet always in
 accordance with the Word of God.
 
 9. On the other hand, they who are mercifully tolerated must not
 imagine that because they escape censure and force, their beliefs and
 practices are right. They must not construe such mercy as
 encouragement to become indolent and negligent, and to continue in
 their error. Mercy is not extended them with any such design. The
 object is to give them opportunity to recover zeal and strength. But
 if they be disposed to remain as they are, very well; let them alone.
 They will not long continue thus; the devil will lead them farther
 astray, until finally they will completely apostatize, even becoming
 enemies to the Gospel. Such will be their end if they permit mercy to
 be lavished upon them in vain. We may not be indolent and asleep in
 the matter of our false doctrines, relying upon the fact that we are
 not despised nor constrained of men. There is particular need to be
 active and diligent, for the devil neither sleeps nor rests. We need
 beware that he does not lead us where we will never enjoy God's mercy.
 
 "Kindness, lowliness, meekness, longsuffering."
 
 10. These words represent the other elements of Christian character.
 Kindness you will find defined in the second epistle lesson for the
 early Christmas service. It characterizes the conduct of the
 individual who is gentle and sympathetic to all; who repels none with
 forbidding countenance, harsh words or rude deportment. We Germans
 would call such a one affable and friendly disposed. Kindness is a
 virtue not confined to certain works; it modifies the whole life. The
 kindly person is obliging to everyone, not displeased with any, and is
 attractive to all men. In contrast are those peculiar characters who
 have pleasure in nothing but their own conceits; who insist on others
 accommodating themselves to them and their ways, while they yield to
 none. Such individuals are termed "uncivil."
 
 11. But the liberality of kindness is not to be extended to false
 doctrine. Only relative to conduct and works is it to be exercised. As
 oft before stated, love with all its works and fruits has no place in
 the matter of unsound doctrine. I must love my neighbor and show him
 kindness whatever the imperfections of his life. But if he refuses to
 believe or to teach sound doctrine, I cannot, I dare not, love him or
 show him kindness. According to Paul (Gal 1, 8-9), I must hold him
 excommunicated and accursed, even though he be an angel from heaven.
 
 Thus remarkably do faith and love differ and are distinct. Love will
 be, must be, kind even to the bitterest enemy so long as he assails
 not faith and doctrine. But it will not, it cannot, tolerate the
 individual who does, be it father, mother or dearest friend. Deut 13,
 6-8. Love, then, must be exercised, not in relation to the doctrine
 and faith of our neighbor, but relative to his life and works. Faith,
 on the contrary, has to do, not with his works and life, but with his
 doctrine and belief.
 
 12. I think we must know by this time the meaning of "lowliness" of
 mind--esteeming one's self least and others greater. As Christ
 illustrates it, occupying the lowest seat at the wedding, and this
 cheerfully. We are to serve even when our service is not desired, and
 to minister unto our enemies. So Christ humbled himself before Judas
 the betrayer, and before all of us. He came, not to be served, but to
 serve. That humbleness of mind is a rare virtue is not to be wondered
 at, for every Christian grace is a rarity. Particularly are graces
 lacking with those who, professing to know most of Christ, find
 something to censure in all Christians. Christianity Paul calls a
 mystery of God; and it is likely to continue so.
 
 13. "Meekness" is opposed to anger. The meek man is not easily excited
 to exhibit anger, to curse, smite, hate, or wish evil to any, even an
 enemy. To refrain thus is an art. Hypocrites--in fact, all the
 world--can be meek toward friends and those who treat them well. But
 true meekness and humility will remain only among the elect and
 beloved saints of God, as Paul here implies. Even among these are many
 deficient in all, or at least a large part, of the Christian graces.
 Hypocrites may thus find something to censure, something whereat to be
 offended, in the beloved, elect saints of God. And the true saints
 have occasion to exercise mercy, humility, meekness and forbearance.
 They whom Paul here terms elect and beloved saints of God, though
 slightly deficient in humility, meekness and forbearance, are not
 therefore unholy, not rejected and despised.
 
 14. Paul makes a distinction between longsuffering and forbearance, as
 in Romans 2, 4: "Despisest thou the riches of his goodness and
 forbearance and longsuffering?" In "longsuffering" we have the thought
 here and there expressed by God in the Psalms and elsewhere by the
 Hebrew "arich apaim"--"slow to wrath." God patiently bears with evil.
 Indeed, he repeatedly delays vengeance, apparently more ready to
 forgive than to punish, even under extreme provocation and having just
 reason to chastise. Longsuffering extends farther than patience.
 Patience bears evil and injustice; but longsuffering delays
 punishment. It does not design to punish; it would not take hasty
 revenge. Unlike the revengeful, it wishes no one evil. Many we see,
 indeed, who suffer much and are patient but at the same time trust in
 a final avenging. The longsuffering Christian, however, is opposed to
 revenge, desiring the sinner to amend his ways.
 
 "Forbearing one another, and forgiving each other, if any man have a
 complaint against any; even as the Lord forgave you, so also do ye."
 
 15. In this verse all law is abolished among Christians. One is not
 permitted to demand, through process of law, the recovery of his
 property. He must forgive and yield. Christ's example enjoins this
 principle; he has forgiven us. And what is the extent of his
 forgiveness? He pardons past sins, but that is not all; as John says
 (1 Jn 2, 1-2), "If any man sin, we have an Advocate with the Father,
 Jesus Christ the righteousness and he is the propitiation for our
 sins."
 
 16. Note, it is the true Christian saints whom Paul describes, but he
 looks upon them as infirm to the extent of offending and complaining
 against one another. This is a state of affairs by no means becoming
 Christians and saints. So I say Christ's kingdom is a mystery obscure
 beyond the power of our preaching and teaching sufficiently to
 explain. Unbelievers cannot be induced to work, but believers cannot
 be withheld from working. Some would not believe and some would not
 love.
 
 It is true of Christ's kingdom that his Christians are not perfectly
 holy. They have begun to be holy and are in a state of progression.
 There are still to be found among them anger, evil desire, unholy
 love, worldly care and other deplorable infirmities, remains of the
 old Adam. Paul speaks of these things as burdens which one must bear
 for a neighbor (Gal 6, 2), and in Romans 15, 1, he admonishes us to
 "bear the infirmities of the weak." Likewise Christ loved his apostles
 much and suffered much from them, and he still daily bears with his
 own.
 
 17. Some, enumerating the fruits of the Spirit mentioned in Galatians
 5, 22-23, say a Christian should be gentle, meek, longsuffering,
 chaste; and they look upon this passage as a law commanding such
 fruits. Hence they refuse to recognize as Christians any who fail to
 possess the fruits in perfection. Now, such individuals cannot believe
 there is a Christ, certain as the fact is. They judge malignantly,
 complaining that Christians do not exist. They take offense at Christ
 for his superior wisdom. For Christ has given us scriptural authority
 for knowing Christians by their fruits. He says (Mt 7, 16), "By their
 fruits ye shall know them." Here they are emphatic.
 
 18. Can you locate the failure of such an individual? He fails in the
 fact that he understands absolutely nothing of Christ's kingdom. For
 he misinterprets the passages referring to Christians. He understands
 the statement that Christians should be kind and meek, to mean they
 must never become angry, must bear anything and show impatience toward
 none; if they do not so, they cannot be Christians, for they have not
 the fruits. Dear man, what but his own blindness can lead him to such
 a conclusion? He fancies Christianity to be a holy order of
 perfection, altogether without infirmity, a perfection as in heaven
 among the angels. But tell me, where do the Scriptures speak thus of
 Christians?
 
 But whoso recognizes Christianity as a progressive order yet in its
 beginning, will not be offended at the occasional manifestation of
 ungentleness, unkindness and impatience on the part of a Christian;
 for he remembers that Christians are commanded to bear one another's
 burdens and infirmities. He knows that the enumeration of the fruits
 of the Spirit is not a record of laws the observance of which is
 imperative or Christ will be denied. He is aware the passage is to be
 interpreted as meaning that Christians are to strive to be kind; that
 is the mark at which they aim. However, even though they have made a
 beginning and some progress in this virtue, they often are unkind and
 bear fruits directly the opposite of the fruits of the Spirit. True,
 the text quoted says we should be kind, but it does not say we are
 kind. We are tending toward it, we are in a state of progression; but
 during the progress much of the old and as yet untransformed nature is
 intermingled.
 
 19. Know, then, that in a mysterious way Christ is in his saints, and
 beware of judging or condemning anyone when you have not positive
 assurance that he believes and teaches contrary to the Gospel. But
 whoso does oppose the Gospel, you may safely judge to be without
 Christ, and under the sway of the devil. Pray for such a one and
 admonish him, in the hope of his conversion. But in the case of one
 who endorses and honors the Gospel, observe Paul's comment (Rom 14,
 4): "Who art thou that judgest the servant of another? to his own lord
 he standeth or falleth. Yea, he shall be made to stand; for the Lord
 hath power to make him stand." And again (1 Cor 10, 12): "Wherefore
 let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall." Christ
 would be at the same time hidden and revealed, found and not found. He
 permits the intermingling of some infirmities with the fruits of the
 Spirit, that he may conceal himself, and that malicious judges may be
 offended.
 
 "And above all these things put on love, which is the bond of
 perfectness."
 
 20. From longsuffering and meekness the apostle distinguishes love and
 other jewels of spiritual beauty whereof we have already heard, though
 all are comprehended in love. As faith is the chief element of
 Christian character, so love is chief of the fruits of the Spirit, the
 jewel of surpassing beauty. Therefore Paul says, "Above all these
 things put on love." Love transcends mercy, kindness, meekness and
 humility. Paul calls it "the bond of perfectness" because it unites
 human hearts; not a partial unity, based on similarity or close
 relationship, but a complete unity among all men and in all relations.
 It makes us of one mind, one heart, one desire. It permits no one to
 originate a peculiar order of doctrine or faith. All who love are of
 the same belief. Consequently there is the same purpose of heart with
 the poor and the rich, with rulers and subjects, the ill and the well,
 the high and the low, the honored and the disgraced. The loving heart
 permits all to share in its good; more, it participates in the
 adversities of all men, regarding them as its own. Where love is,
 perfect unity and communion obtain in every event, good or bad. It is
 a most perfect bond.
 
 21. Where love is lacking, hearts are united and aims single in but
 few relations; in most things there is disagreement. For instance:
 Robbers have a common bond, but it is no more than a common purpose in
 committing robbery and murder. Worldly friends are of the same mind so
 far as concerns their own interests. Monks are united in relation to
 their order and their honor. Herod and Pilate agreed, but simply in
 regard to Christ. For the most part it is exceptional that one monk,
 priest or layman agrees with another. Their bond of union is weak;
 they are as chaff bound with straw.
 
 "And let the peace of Christ rule in your hearts, to which also ye
 were called."
 
 22. There is much to threaten the sundering of love's bond. The devil
 never sleeps, but continually stirs up discord and unrest. Paul does
 not deny that the bond is assailed. But he exhorts us to resist,
 remembering that love must be exercised by opposition. He admonishes
 us to let the peace of Christ have dominion in our hearts. The thought
 of the verse is: Though the peace of the world and the flesh abides
 not, though you must witness the forces of discord and disruption,
 nevertheless let your hearts have peace in Christ.
 
 We spoke of the peace of God in the epistle selection for the Fourth
 Sunday in Advent--Philippians 4, 7. This is the peace whereunto the
 Gospel calls; not the peace of the world, the flesh or the devil, but
 the peace that passeth all understanding, of which Paul tells us. We
 are to hold the peace of God, not only when all is well, but when sin,
 death, the flesh, the world and all calamities rage.
 
 "And be ye thankful."
 
 23. "Thankfulness" here may be taken in either of two senses: First,
 thankfulness toward God, Paul's thought being: Let the remembrance of
 all God has done for you move you to gratitude for his grace and
 mercy, a gratitude to which shall succeed love and peace. Secondly, we
 may understand thankfulness toward men--gratitude for all the benefits
 received from our fellows. The apostle elsewhere (2 Tim 3, 2) speaks
 of there being, in the last days, among other vices, that of
 "unthankfulness" of men toward each other. Let everyone make choice
 for himself of the two applications. It is my opinion, since Paul
 later takes up the subject of gratitude to God, and since he is here
 handling that of love to our neighbor--it is my opinion he has
 reference here to gratitude to our fellowmen. This, I think, is his
 meaning.
 
 Man is glad to have love shown him; he is quite willing to receive
 good from others and to be dealt with according to the Gospel. At the
 same time, he is not disposed to manifest love to his fellows: favors
 shown him are lost upon his ingratitude. Though love is not defeated
 by ungratefulness--for it bears all things (1 Cor 13, 7)--yet
 unthankfulness produces weariness and aversion; and it is a base,
 unjust and shameful thing for one who continually lends assistance not
 to be served in return.
 
 24. Paul says on this topic (Gal 6, 6), "Let him that is taught in the
 Word communicate unto him that teacheth in all good things." And he
 declares (1 Tim 5, 17) that they who labor in the Word and doctrine
 are worthy of double honor. In the ninth chapter of First Corinthians
 he speaks at length on how teachers are entitled to support, saying
 the mouth of the threshing ox should not be muzzled; that would be
 gross ingratitude. Of such unthankfulness he here hints. It is true
 today, and ever has been, that preachers of the Word of God must in
 general seek their own bread, and receive ingratitude as their reward
 for the wonderful blessings they confer. Were it their part to
 celebrate masses and indulgences, gratitude would be forthcoming;
 great would be the gifts and service rendered them as expression of
 thankfulness. But just as ungratefully were the Levites treated under
 the old Law, in contrast with the favor shown the priests of idols and
 groves.
 
 "Let the word of Christ dwell in you richly; in all wisdom teaching
 and admonishing one another with psalms and hymns and spiritual songs,
 singing with grace in your hearts unto God."
 
 25. This verse appropriately follows the injunction to be thankful.
 Paul would say: Be careful to honor teachers and preachers, being
 grateful that they handle the Word and may richly impart it to you. I
 do not imagine Paul refers to the giving of the Word of God from
 heaven, for it is not within man's power to so give it; God alone can
 commit it to us. So he has done and continues to do. On every occasion
 when he permits the Gospel to be preached, he showers the message upon
 us abundantly, withholding no essential knowledge. But, after it is
 given, we ought to be thankful and to faithfully read and hear it,
 sing and speak it, and meditate upon it day and night. And it should
 be our part to secure teachers enough to minister it to us liberally
 and continuously. This is what is meant by letting the Word of God
 dwell among us richly.
 
 26. Satiated, indolent spirits soon grow tired and dismiss their
 pastors to go wherever they wish. The latter are forced to seek a
 living by other work, and thus God's Word is neglected and becomes
 rare and thinly sown in the land. Nehemiah (ch. 13, 10) complains that
 the Levites, because of lack of support, were forced to leave their
 worship and temple and flee to the fields or start false worship and
 fables to mislead the people. They then received enough to exist--they
 became wealthy.
 
 It has come about in the Christian Church that as often as the support
 of godly pastors and teachers has grown to be a burden, as Augustine
 laments has been the case, these have been either forced to neglect
 the Word to labor for their own support, or forced to invent that
 wretched, accursed worship now prevalent throughout the world and
 whereby the preachers have attained lordly position. With the revival
 of the Gospel the financial difficulty mentioned is recurring, and it
 will continue to recur. One hundred dollars cannot now be raised for
 the support of a good schoolmaster or preacher where formerly a
 thousand dollars--yes, incomputible sums--were contributed toward
 churches, institutions, masses, vigils and the like. Once more God
 punishes ingratitude by permitting his preachers to withdraw wholly
 from the ministry and to engage in their own support, or by sending
 upon the people even greater delusions than ever, which defraud them
 of wealth and destroy body and soul. For they refuse to let the Word
 of God dwell among them richly. Paul adds the modifying phrase,
 
 "In all wisdom."
 
 27. Were we to have the Word of God so richly as to ring in every
 street corner, to be sung everywhere by all children--as they designed
 who into the pulpits and the lessons introduced canonical prayers and
 singing and reading--what would all this profit without an
 understanding mind--without wisdom? For the Word of God was given to
 make us wise. It was intended that we should understand it; that it
 should be preached and sung intelligibly. And they who minister it,
 who sing and speak it, ought to be wise, understanding everything
 pertaining to the salvation of the soul and the honor of God. That is
 what it means to have the Word of God dwell among us in all wisdom.
 Here Paul briefly overthrows the vociferous practices of the churches
 and monasteries where so much preaching and reading obtain while at
 the same time the Gospel is not understood. He seems to have foreseen
 the coming time when the Word of God should freely prevail, but with
 no resulting wisdom; the time when men should daily increase in
 ignorance and fanaticism until they should become mere dolts, so
 completely void of wisdom as to call vociferation and boasting divine
 worship, and to regard that preaching the salvation of souls.
 
 28. What it is to teach and to admonish has been frequently explained.
 Here Paul makes the duty of instruction common to all
 Christians--"teaching and admonishing one another." That is, aside
 from the regular office of preaching, each is to teach himself and
 others, thus making everyday use of the Word of God, publicly and
 privately, generally and specially.
 
 29. As I see it, the apostle's distinction of the three words--psalms,
 hymns and spiritual songs--is this: "psalms" properly indicates those
 productions of David and others constituting the Book of Psalms;
 "hymns" refers to the songs of the prophets occasionally mentioned in
 the Scriptures--songs of Moses, Deborah, Solomon, Isaiah, Daniel,
 Habakkuk, with the Magnificat, the Benediction, and the like, called
 "Canticles"; "spiritual songs" are those not written in the Scriptures
 but of daily origin with men. Paul calls these latter "spiritual" to a
 greater degree than psalms and hymns, though he recognizes those as
 themselves spiritual. He forbids worldly, sensual and unbecoming
 songs, desiring us to sing of spiritual things. It is then that our
 songs are calculated to benefit and instruct, as he says.
 
 30. But what is the significance of Paul's phrase "with grace"? I
 offer the explanation that he refers to the grace of God and means
 that the singing of spiritual songs is to be voluntary, uncompelled,
 spontaneous, rendered with cheerfulness and prompted by love; not
 extorted by authority and law, as is the singing in our churches
 today. No one sings, preaches or prays from a recognition of mercy and
 grace received. The motive is a hope for gain, or a fear of
 punishment, injury and shame; or again, the holiest individuals bind
 themselves to obedience, or are driven to it, for the sake of winning
 heaven, and not at all to further the knowledge of the Word of
 God--the understanding of it richly and in all wisdom, as Paul desires
 it to be understood. I imagine Paul has in mind the charm of music and
 the beauty of poetry incident to song. He says in Ephesians 4, 29:
 "Let no corrupt speech proceed out of your mouth, but such as is good
 for edifying as the need may be, that it may give grace to them that
 hear." Likewise should songs be calculated to bring grace and favor to
 them who hear. Foul, unchaste and superfluous words have no place
 therein, nor have any inappropriate elements, elements void of
 significance and without virtue and life. Hymns are to be rich in
 meaning, to be pleasing and sweet, and thus productive of enjoyment
 for all hearers. The singing of such songs is very properly called in
 Hebrew singing "with grace," as Paul has it. Of this character of
 songs are the psalms and hymns of the Scriptures; they are good
 thoughts presented in pleasing words. Some songs, though expressed in
 charming words, are worldly and carnal; while others presenting good
 thoughts are at the same time expressed in words inappropriate,
 unattractive and devoid of grace.
 
 "Singing with grace in your hearts unto God."
 
 31. Paul does not enjoin silence of the lips. He would have words of
 the mouth proceed from the heart sincerely and fervently; not
 hypocritically, as Isaiah mentions (ch. 29, 13), saying: "This people
 draw nigh unto me, and with their mouth and with their lips do honor
 me, but have removed their heart far from me." Paul would have the
 Word of God to dwell among Christians generally, and richly to be
 spoken, sung and meditated upon everywhere; and that understandingly
 and productive of spiritual fruit, the Word being universally prized.
 He would that men thus sing unto the Lord heartfelt praise and thanks.
 He says let the Word "dwell" among you. Not merely lodge as a guest
 for a night or two, but abide with you forever. He is constantly
 apprehensive of human doctrines.
 
 "And whatsoever ye do, in word or in deed, do all in the name of the
 Lord Jesus, giving thanks to God the Father through him."
 
 32. The works of Christians are not circumscribed by name, time nor
 place. Whatever Christians do is good; whenever done it is timely;
 wherever wrought it is appropriately. So Paul names no work. He makes
 no distinction, but concludes all works good, whether it be eating or
 drinking, speaking or keeping silence, waking or sleeping, going or
 staying, being idle or otherwise. All acts are eminently worthy
 because done in the name of the Lord Jesus. Such is Paul's teaching
 here. And our works are wrought in the name of the Lord Jesus when we
 by faith hold fast the fact that Christ is in us and we in him in the
 sense that we no longer labor but he lives and works in us. Paul says
 (Gal 2, 20), "It is no longer I that live, but Christ liveth in me."
 But when we do a work as of ourselves, then it is wrought in our own
 name and there is nothing good about it.
 
 33. The expression "in the name of God," or "Go in the name of Jesus,"
 is frequently uttered falsely and in cheer hypocrisy. The saying is,
 "All misfortunes rise in the name of God." For teachers of false
 doctrines habitually offer their commodities in the name of God. They
 even come in the name of Christ, as he himself foretells. Mt 24, 24.
 To sincerely and earnestly speak and work in Jesus' name, necessarily
 the heart must accord with the utterances of the mouth. As the lips
 declare in the name of God, so must the heart confidently, with firm
 faith, hold that God directs and performs the work. Peter teaches the
 same (1 Pet 4, 11): "If any man ministereth [perform anything],
 ministering as of the strength which God supplieth." Then will the
 venture prosper. No Christian should undertake to do any deed in his
 own ability and directed by his own judgment. Rather let him be
 assured that God works with and through him. Paul says (1 Cor 9, 26):
 "I therefore so run, as not uncertainly; so fight I, as not beating
 the air."
 
 34. Such an attitude will result in praise and thanks to God as the
 one to whom are due all honor and praise for every good thing. So Paul
 teaches and also Peter. Immediately after declaring that we are to
 work according to the ability which God gives, Peter adds "that in all
 things God may be glorified through Jesus Christ." But he who
 undertakes anything in his own ability, however he may glorify God
 with his lips, lies and deceives, like the hypocrite in the Gospel.
 Thankfulness, therefore, is the only duty we can perform unto God; and
 this is not to be rendered of ourselves, but through our Mediator,
 Jesus. Without him none can come to the Father, none can be accepted.
 Of this fact we have often spoken.
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday Before Lent_
 
 Text: First Corinthians 9, 24-27; 10, 1-5.
 
 24 Know ye not that they that run in a race run all, but one receiveth
 the prize? Even so run; that ye may attain. 25 And every man that
 striveth in the games exerciseth self-control in all things. Now they
 do it to receive a corruptible crown; but we an incorruptible. 26 I
 therefore so run, as not uncertainly; so fight I, as not beating the
 air: 27 but I buffet my body, and bring it into bondage: lest by any
 means, after that I have preached to others, I myself should be
 rejected. 1 For I would not, brethren, have you ignorant, that our
 fathers were all under the cloud, and all passed through the sea; 2
 and were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the sea; 3 and
 did all eat the same spiritual food; 4 and did all drink the same
 spiritual drink: for they drank of a spiritual rock that followed
 them: and the rock was Christ. 5 Howbeit with most of them God was not
 well pleased: for they were overthrown in the wilderness.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN RACE FOR THE PRIZE.
 
 1. This lesson is a part of the long four-chapter instruction Paul
 gives the Corinthians. Therein he teaches them how to deal with those
 weak in the faith, and warns rash, presumptuous Christians to take
 heed lest they fall, however they may stand at the present. He
 presents a forcible simile in the running of the race, or the strife
 for the prize. Many run without obtaining the object of their pursuit.
 But we should not vainly run. To faithfully follow Christ does not
 mean simply to run. That will not suffice. We must run to the purpose.
 To believe, to be running in Christ's course, is not sufficient; we
 must lay hold on eternal life. Christ says (Mt 24, 13), "But he that
 endureth to the end, the same shall be saved." And Paul (1 Cor 10,
 12), "Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he
 fall."
 
 2. Now, running is hindered in two ways; for one, by indolence. When
 faith is not strenuously exercised, when we are indolent in good
 works, our progress is hindered, so that the prize is not attained.
 But to such hindrance I do not think Paul here refers. He is not
 alluding to those who indolently run, but to them who run in vain
 because missing their object; individuals, for instance, who pursue
 their aim at full speed, but, deluded by a phantom, miss their aim and
 rush to ruin or run up against fearful obstacles. Hence Paul enjoins
 men to run successfully while in the race, that they may seize the
 prize and not lose it by default. In consequence the race is hindered
 when a false goal is set up or the true one removed. The apostle says
 (Col 2, 18), "Let no man rob you of your prize." It is true, however,
 that an indolent, negligent life will eventually bring about loss of
 the prize. While men sleep, the enemy very soon sows tares among the
 wheat.
 
 3. The goal is removed when the Word of God is falsified and creations
 of the human mind are preached under the name of God's Word. And these
 things readily come about when we are not careful to keep the unity of
 the Spirit, when each follows his own ideas and yields to no other,
 because he prefers his own conceit.
 
 Such must be the course of events where love is lacking. The strong
 and the learned desire to be looked upon as peculiarly commendable,
 while the weak in the faith are despised. Thus the devil has abundant
 opportunity to sow tares. Paul calls love the unity of the Spirit, and
 admonishes (Eph 4, 3) that we endeavor to keep the unity of the Spirit
 in the bond of peace. In Second Thessalonians 2, 10 he proclaims the
 coming of Antichrist "because they received not the love of the
 truth"; that is, true love.
 
 "And every man that striveth in the games [that striveth for the
 mastery]."
 
 4. Were he who competes in a race to attempt other things or to make a
 success of other matters at the same time, he would not gain much;
 rather he would soon be defeated, lose the race and everything. If he
 would truly strive, he must attend to no other thing. All else must be
 neglected and attention centered upon the contest alone. Even then the
 winner must have fortune's favor; for they who neglect all to run do
 not all gain the prize.
 
 Likewise in the Christian contest it is necessary, and in an even
 higher degree, to renounce everything and to devote oneself only to
 the contest. He who would in addition seek his own glory and profit,
 who would find in the Word and Spirit of God occasion for his own
 praise and advantage after the manner of the dissenters and
 schismatics--what can such a one expect to win? He is wholly entangled
 in temporal glory and gain; bound hand and foot, a complete captive.
 The race he runs is the mere dream race of one lying upon his couch an
 indolent captive.
 
 "I therefore so run, as not uncertainly; so fight I, as not beating
 the air."
 
 5. Paul here points to himself as exemplar and hints at the cause of
 failure, viz., lapse from love and the use of the divine word in a
 wilful, ambitious and covetous spirit, whereas the faith which worketh
 by love is lacking. Under such conditions, false and indolent
 Christians run indeed a merry race; yet God's Word and ways in which
 they are so alert and speedy are merely a show, because they make them
 subserve their own interests and glory. They fail, however, to see
 that they race uncertainly and beat the air. They never make a serious
 attempt, nor do they ever hit the mark. While it is theirs to mortify
 ambition, to restrain their self-will and to enlist in the service of
 their neighbors, they do none of these things. On the contrary, they
 even do many things to strengthen their ambition and self-will, and
 then they swear by a thousand oaths that they are seeking not their
 own honor but the honor of God, their neighbor's welfare and not their
 own.
 
 Peter says (2 Pet 1, 9-10) this class are blind and cannot see afar
 and have forgotten they were purged from their old sins, because they
 fail to make their calling sure by good works. Therefore, it comes
 about that, as Paul says, they run uncertainly, beating the air. Their
 hearts are unstable and wavering before God, and they are changeable
 and fickle in all their ways, James 1, 8. Since they are aimless and
 inconstant at heart, this will appear likewise as inconstancy in
 regard to works and doctrines. They undertake now this and now that;
 they cannot be quiet nor refrain from factional strife. Thus they miss
 their aim or else remove the goal, and cannot but deviate from the
 true and common path.
 
 "But I buffet [keep under] my body, and bring it into bondage
 [subjection]."
 
 6. The apostle's thought is the same as in his statement above, "Every
 man that striveth in the games exerciseth self-control in all things."
 By "keeping under the body" Paul means, not only subduing the carnal
 lusts, but every temporal object as well, in so far as it appeals to
 bodily desire--love of honor, fame, wealth and the like. He who gives
 license to these things instead of subduing them will preach to his
 own condemnation, however correct his preaching be. Such do not permit
 the truth to be presented; this is true particularly of temporal
 honor. These words of the apostle, then, are a fine thrust at
 ambitious and self-centered preachers and Christians. Not only do they
 run in vain and fight to no purpose; they become actual castaways with
 only the semblance--the color--of Christianity.
 
 
 EXAMPLES FROM SCRIPTURE.
 
 "For I would not, brethren, have you ignorant, that our fathers were
 all under the cloud."
 
 7. Paul cites a terrible example from Scripture to prove that not all
 obtain the prize who run. There were about six hundred thousand of
 them, all of whom walked in the way of God and enjoyed his word and
 his confidence so completely as to be protected under the cloud and
 miraculously to pass through the sea; yet among the vast number who
 ran at that time only two, Joshua and Caleb, obtained the prize. They
 alone of all that multitude reached the promised land.
 
 Later on in the chapter (verses 11-12) Paul explains this fact,
 saying: "Now these things happened unto them by way of example; and
 they were written for our admonition ... wherefore let him that
 thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall." The design of these
 dealings of God with Israel is to terrify the pride, false wisdom and
 self-will; to deter men from despising their fellows and from seeking
 to make the Word of God minister to their own honor or profit in
 preference to the honor and profit of others. The intent is to have
 each individual put himself on an equality with others, each to bear
 with his fellow, the weak enduring the strong, and so on, as enjoined
 in the four chapters.
 
 8. How many great and noble men may have been among the six hundred
 thousand, men to whom we would have been unworthy to hand a cup of
 water! They included the twelve princes of the twelve tribes, one of
 whom, Nahshon, Matthew (ch. 1, 4) numbers in the holy lineage of
 Christ. There were also the seventy elders who shared in the spirit of
 Moses, Eldad and Medad in particular (Num 11, 27), and all the other
 great men aside from the faction of Korah. All these, mark you, strove
 in the race. They did and suffered much. They witnessed many miracles
 of God. They aided in erecting a grand tabernacle and in instituting
 divine worship. They were full of good works. Yet they failed, and
 died in the wilderness. Who is so daring and haughty he will not be
 restrained and humbled by so remarkable an example of divine judgment?
 Well may it be said, "Let him that ... standeth take heed lest he
 fall."
 
 9. Well, the example of Israel is one readily understood. God grant we
 may heed it! Let us examine the apostle's text yet further--his
 mention of baptism and spiritual food, using Christian terms and
 placing the fathers upon the same plane with us Christians, as if they
 also had had Baptism and the Holy Supper.
 
 He would have us know, first, the oft-repeated fact that God from the
 beginning led, redeemed and saved his saints by two
 instrumentalities--by his own word and external signs. Adam was saved
 by the word of promise (Gen 3, 15): The seed of the woman shall bruise
 the serpent's head; that is, Christ shall come to conquer sin, death
 and Satan for us. To this promise God added the sign of sacrifice,
 sacrifice kindled with fire from heaven, as in Abel's case (Gen 4, 4),
 and in other cases mentioned in the Scriptures. The word of promise
 was Adam's Gospel until the time of Noah and of Abraham. In this
 promise all the saints down to Abraham believed, and were redeemed; as
 we are redeemed by the word of the Gospel which we believe. The fire
 from heaven served them as a sign, as baptism does us, which is added
 to the word of God.
 
 10. Such signs were repeated again and again at various times, the
 last sign being given by Christ in his own person--the Gospel with
 baptism, granted to all nations. For instance, God gave Noah the
 promise that he should survive the flood, and granted him a sign in
 the ship, or ark, he built. And by faith in the promise and sign Noah
 was justified and saved, with his family. Afterward God gave him
 another promise, and for a sign the rainbow. Again, he gave Abraham a
 promise, with the sign of circumcision. Circumcision was Abraham's
 baptism, just as the ark and the flood were that of Noah. So also our
 baptism is to us circumcision, ark and flood, according to Peter's
 explanation. 1 Pet 3, 21. Everywhere we meet the Word and the Sign of
 God, in which we must believe in order to be saved through faith from
 sin and death.
 
 11. Thus the children of Israel had God's word that they should
 inherit the promised land. In addition to that word they were given
 many signs, in particular those Paul here names--the sea, the cloud,
 the bread from heaven, the water from the rock. These he calls their
 baptism; just as our baptism might be called our sea and cloud. Faith
 and the Spirit are the same everywhere, though the signs and the words
 vary. Signs and words indeed change from time to time, but faith in
 the one and same God continues. Through various signs and revelations,
 God at different times bestows the same faith and the same Spirit,
 effecting through these in all saints remission of sins, redemption
 from death, and salvation, whether they lived in the beginning or at
 the end of time, or while time progressed.
 
 12. Such is Paul's meaning when he says the fathers did eat the same
 meat, and drink the same drink as we. He, however, qualifies with the
 word "spiritual." Externally and individually Israel had signs and
 revelations different from ours; but the Spirit and their faith in
 Christ was identical with our own. Spiritual eating and drinking is
 simply believing in God's Word and sign. Christ says (Jn 6, 56), "He
 that eateth my flesh and drinketh my blood abideth in me, and I in
 him." And in the preceding verse, "My flesh is meat indeed, and my
 blood is drink indeed." That is, He that believeth in me shall live.
 
 "For they drank of a spiritual rock that followed them."
 
 13. In other words, they believed in the same Christ in whom we
 believe, though he was yet to come in the flesh; and the sign of their
 faith was the material rock, from which they physically drank water,
 just as we in partaking of the material bread and wine at the altar
 spiritually eat and drink the true Christ. With the outward act of
 eating and drinking we exercise inward faith. Had the Israelites not
 possessed the word of God and faith as they drank from the rock, the
 act of drinking would not have benefited their souls. Neither would it
 profit us to receive bread and wine at the altar if we were without
 faith. Indeed, had not the Word of God come first, the rock would not
 have yielded water and command faith. Likewise, if God's Word did not
 accompany bread and wine, they would not be spiritual food nor
 exercise faith.
 
 14. So it is ever the same spiritual meat and drink which God embodies
 in his word and sign, whatever its material and external form may be.
 Were he to command me to lift up a mere straw, immediately the straw
 would hold for me spiritual food and drink. Not because of any virtue
 in the straw, but because it is a revelation and sign of the divine
 truth and presence. Again, if God's Word and his sign be lacking or
 unrecognized, the very presence of God himself has no effect. Christ
 says of himself (Jn 6, 63), "The flesh profiteth nothing." He makes
 that statement because his hearers pay no heed to the words in which
 he speaks of his flesh, though it is these which make his body the
 true meat, according to his declaration (v. 58), "This is the bread
 which came down out of heaven." Therefore we are not to regard unduly,
 as blind reason does, the works, signs and miracles of God; rather we
 are to recognize his message therein. This is the act of faith.
 
 15. The apostle refers to a single type--the rock, saying: "They drank
 of a spiritual rock that followed them: and the rock was Christ." By
 this statement he makes all the figures and signs granted to the
 people of Israel by the Word of God refer to Christ; for where the
 Word of God is, there Christ is. All the words and promises of God are
 concerning Christ. Christ himself refers the serpent of Moses to
 himself, giving it a typical significance, Jn 3, 14. We may truly say
 the Israelites looked upon the same serpent we behold, for they saw
 the spiritual serpent that followed them, or Christ on the cross.
 Their beholding was believing in the Word of God, with the serpent for
 a sign; even as their spiritual drinking was believing in the Word of
 God with the rock for a sign. Without the Word of God, the serpent
 could have profited them nothing; nor could brazen serpents
 innumerable, had the Israelites gazed upon them forever. Likewise the
 rock would have profited them nothing without the word of God; they
 might have crushed to powder all the rocks of the world or drank from
 them to no purpose.
 
 16. According to the general principle here laid down by Paul, by
 using the rock as illustration, we may say the Israelites partook of
 the same bread of heaven whereof we eat; and they ate of the spiritual
 bread of heaven which followed them--Christ. With them, eating was
 believing in the Word of God, while they had for their sign the bread
 from heaven whereof they physically partook. Had not this Word
 accompanied the bread, it would have been simply material food,
 incapable of profiting the soul or calling forth faith. Christ says
 (Jn 6, 32), "It was not Moses that gave you the bread out of heaven;
 but my Father giveth you the true bread out of heaven." And (verse
 58), "Not as the fathers ate [manna], and died." Even Moses says (Deut
 8, 3), "And fed thee with manna ... that he might make thee know that
 man doth not live by bread only, but by everything that proceedeth out
 of the mouth of Jehovah."
 
 In other words, "In the material manna you must not merely see the
 work--the act of satisfying the appetite--but much rather the word of
 promise bringing you the bread of heaven; for by that word you live
 forever if you have faith."
 
 17. We may say the same concerning the sea and the cloud. The children
 of Israel walked under the same cloud that shadows us; that means,
 they walked under the spiritual cloud that followed them--Christ.
 Otherwise expressed, walking under the cloud was simply believing in
 the word of God, the word they had in their hearts, which told them to
 follow the cloud. Without that word they would have been unable to
 believe or to follow; indeed, with the word lacking, the cloud would
 never have appeared. Therefore, the cloud was called the glory of the
 Lord whose appearance had been promised.
 
 So we see how we must in all things have regard to the word of God. To
 it faith must attach itself. Without it, either there are no signs and
 works of God, or else, existing, and regarded with the physical eyes
 only, without reference to the Word, they cause one to open his mouth
 in wonderment for a while like everything else which is new, but they
 do not profit the soul nor do they appeal to faith.
 
 18. Some take the words "which followed them" to mean that the
 spiritual rock accompanied the children of Israel, companioning with
 them--"comitante petra," not "petra consequente," Christ being
 spiritually present in the word and by faith. This view they endeavor
 to base upon the Greek text. I have rendered it: "the rock following."
 The point is not worth contention. Let each understand it as he may.
 Both interpretations given are correct. I hold to what I have offered
 because all the circumstances of the incident, and earlier words of
 God, pointed to a future Christ, a Christ who should follow, in whom
 they should all believe. Thus Abraham saw behind him the ram in the
 thicket and took and sacrificed him; that is, he believed in the
 Christ who afterward should come and be sacrificed.
 
 19. Again, some say the common noun in the clause "and the rock was
 Christ" means the material rock; and since Christ cannot be material
 rock they explain the inconsistency by saying the rock signifies
 Christ. They here make the word "was" equivalent to "signifies." The
 same reasoning they apply to certain words of Christ; for instance,
 they say where Christ, referring to the Holy Supper (Mt 26, 26),
 commands, "Take, eat; this is my body"--they say the meaning is, "This
 bread signifies, but is not truly, my body." They would thereby deny
 that the bread is the body of Christ. In the same manner do they deal
 with the text (Jn 15, 1) "I am the true vine," in making it "I am
 signified by the vine." Beware of such reasoners. Their own malice has
 led them to such perverting of Scripture. Paul here expressly
 distinguishes between material and spiritual rocks, saying: "They
 drank of a spiritual rock that followed them: and the rock was
 Christ." He does not say the material rock was Christ, but the
 spiritual rock. The material rock was not spiritual, and did not
 follow or go with them.
 
 20. The explanations and distortions of such false reasoners are not
 needed here. The words are true as they read; they are to be
 understood in substance and not figuratively. So in John 15, 1,
 Christ's reference is not to a material but a spiritual vine. How
 would this read, "I am signified by a spiritual vine"? Christ is
 speaking of that which exists, and must so be understood--"I am"; here
 is a true spiritual vine. Similar is John 6, 55, "My flesh is meat
 indeed." The thought is not, "My flesh signifies, or is signified by,
 true meat"; spiritual meat is spoken of and the meaning is, "My flesh
 is substantially a food; not for the stomach, physically, but for the
 soul, spiritually." Neither must you permit the words "This is my
 body" to be perverted to mean that the body is but signified by the
 bread, as some pretend; you must accept the words precisely as they
 mean--"This bread is essentially, by a real presence, my body." The
 forcing of Scripture to meet one's own opinions cannot be tolerated. A
 clear text proving that the infinitive "to be" is equivalent to
 "signify" would be needed; and, even though this might be proven in a
 few instances, it would not suffice. It would still have to be
 indisputably shown true in the place in question. This can never be
 done. Now, the proposition being impossible, we must surrender to the
 Word of God and accept it as it stands.
 
 21. Christ has been typified by various signs and objects in the Old
 Testament, and the rock is one of them. Note first, the material rock
 spoken of had place independently of man's labor and far from man's
 domain, in the wilderness, in desolate solitude. So Christ is a truly
 insignificant object in the world, disregarded, unnoticed; nor is he
 indebted to human labor.
 
 22. Further, water flowing from the rock is contrary to nature; it is
 purely miraculous. The water typifies the quickening spirit of God,
 who proceeds from the condemned, crucified and dead Christ. Thus life
 is drawn from death, and this by the power of God. Christ's death is
 our life, and if we would live we must die with him.
 
 23. Moses strikes the rock at the command of God and points to it,
 thus prefiguring the ministerial office which by word of mouth strikes
 from the spiritual rock the Spirit. For God will give his Spirit to
 none without the instrumentality of the Word and the ministerial
 office instituted by him for this purpose, adding the command that
 nothing be preached but Christ. Had not Moses obeyed the command of
 God to smite the rock with his rod, no water would ever have flowed
 therefrom. His rod represents rod of the mouth whereof Isaiah speaks
 (ch. 11, 4): "He shall smite the earth with the rod of his mouth; and
 with the breath of his lips shall he slay the wicked." "A sceptre of
 equity is the sceptre of thy kingdom." Ps 45, 6.
 
 
 
 
 _Second Sunday Before Lent_
 
 Text: Second Corinthians 11, 19-33; 12, 1-9.
 
 19 For ye bear with the foolish gladly, being wise yourselves. 20 For
 ye bear with a man, if he bringeth you into bondage, if he devoureth
 you, if he taketh you captive, if he exalteth himself, if he smiteth
 you on the face. 21 I speak by way of disparagement, as though we had
 been weak. Yet whereinsoever any is bold (I speak in foolishness), I
 am bold also. 22 Are they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am
 I. Are they the seed of Abraham? so am I. 23 Are they ministers of
 Christ? (I speak as one beside himself) I more; in labors more
 abundantly, in prisons more abundantly, in stripes above measure, in
 deaths oft. 24 Of the Jews five times received I forty stripes save
 one. 25 Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I stoned, thrice I
 suffered shipwreck, a night and a day have I been in the deep; 26 in
 journeyings often, in perils of rivers, in perils of robbers, in
 perils from my countrymen, in perils from the Gentiles, in perils in
 the city, in perils in the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils
 among false brethren; 27 in labor and travail, in watchings often, in
 hunger and thirst, in fastings often, in cold and nakedness. 28
 Besides those things that are without, there is that which presseth
 upon me daily, anxiety for all the churches. 29 Who is weak, and I am
 not weak? who is caused to stumble, and I burn not? 30 If I must needs
 glory, I will glory of the things that concern my weakness. 31 The God
 and Father of the Lord Jesus, he who is blessed for evermore knoweth
 that I lie not. 32 In Damascus the governor under Aretas the king
 guarded the city of the Damascenes in order to take me: 33 and through
 a window was I let down in a basket by the wall, and escaped his
 hands.
 
 1 I must needs glory, though it is not expedient; but I will come to
 visions and revelations of the Lord. 2 I know a man in Christ,
 fourteen years ago (whether in the body, I know not; or whether out of
 the body, I know not; God knoweth), such a one caught up even to the
 third heaven. 3 And I know such a man (whether in the body, or apart
 from the body, I know not; God knoweth), 4 how that he was caught up
 into Paradise, and heard unspeakable words, which it is not lawful for
 a man to utter. 5 On behalf of such a one will I glory: but on mine
 own behalf I will not glory, save in my weakness. 6 For if I should
 desire to glory, I shall not be foolish; for I shall speak the truth:
 but I forbear, lest any man should account of me above that which he
 seeth me to be, or heareth from me. 7 And by reason of the exceeding
 greatness of the revelations, that I should not be exalted overmuch,
 there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, a messenger of Satan to
 buffet me, that I should not be exalted overmuch. 8 Concerning this
 thing I besought the Lord thrice, that it might depart from me. 9 And
 he hath said unto me, My grace is sufficient for thee: for my power is
 made perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I rather glory in
 my weaknesses, that the power of Christ may rest upon me.
 
 
 PAUL'S GLORY IN HIS LABOR AND SUFFERING.
 
 1. They who praise themselves are fools according to the views and
 speech of the world. The saying is, "Self-praise is unsavory." It is
 forbidden by Solomon in Proverbs 27, 2: "Let another man praise thee,
 and not thine own mouth." And Christ says (Jn 8, 54), "If I glorify
 myself, my glory is nothing." Paul acknowledges that he had to become
 a fool, something for which he had no desire, by reason of the
 necessity laid upon him to praise himself. The false apostles, as
 false spirits habitually do, delivered great, fine, splendid speeches
 to the multitude, in their vainglorious attempt to raise themselves
 above Paul, thereby to make contemptible and insignificant that
 apostle and his doctrine.
 
 2. Paul was little concerned that he personally should be lightly
 esteemed and the false apostles highly honored, but he could not bear
 to have the Gospel perish in that way and his Corinthian converts
 seduced. Therefore he exerts himself to the utmost, at the risk of
 becoming a fool by his boasting. But he, in his strong spiritual
 wisdom, glories in a masterly manner, and skilfully puts to shame the
 boasts of the false apostles.
 
 First, he shows them he can glory in the very things wherein they
 glory, and in even more. At the same time he declares himself a fool
 for glorying. He might have said: "Foolish, indeed, are they, and
 boorish creatures, who glory in themselves. They should feel shame to
 the very depth of their heart. No true, sane man boasts of what he is.
 The wicked and the frivolous do that." But the apostle's attack is not
 quite so severe and harsh. He addresses them civilly and delicately in
 that he makes himself appear a fool, as if to say: "Look! how becoming
 self-praise is in myself, although I have grounds for my glorying. But
 how much more disgraceful for you to boast when perhaps none of your
 claims are true." So Paul wears the foolscap, that those coarse fools
 might have a mirror in which to behold their real selves. This is
 wisely making foolishness minister to the good of the neighbor and to
 the honor of the Gospel. To the just, even folly is wisdom, just as
 all things are pure and holy unto him.
 
 3. Second, Paul deals the false apostles a stout blow when he shows
 them to be ignorant of the grounds in which a true Christian seeks his
 glory. For, as he teaches them, a Christian glories in the things
 whereof other men are ashamed--in the cross and in his sufferings.
 This is the true art of glorying. To this he refers when he says (Gal
 6, 14), "Far be it from me to glory, save in the cross of our Lord
 Jesus Christ." But the false apostles are careful to avoid glorying
 thus; for they flee with alacrity from reproach and affliction, rather
 seeking a life of ease and honor. They ever would have prominence over
 their fellows, be superior to and unlike others--certain indication
 that they lack the right spirit and are not of God. Christ testifies
 (Jn 5, 44), "How can ye believe, who receive glory one of another, and
 the glory that cometh from the only God ye seek not?"
 
 4. The main point of this lesson is that in a preacher or a teacher no
 vice is more injurious and venomous than vainglory. It is true,
 however, that avarice also is an evil characteristic of false
 teachers, being found hand in hand with vainglory. For the sake of
 profit, for the purpose of gain, the false teachers aspire to
 prominence, to honor and position. With them, nothing but current coin
 will pass, and what does not pay dividend is unprofitable. Any other
 vice is more endurable in a preacher than these two, though none is
 compatible with goodness, blamelessness and perfection being required
 in the ministry according to Paul, Titus 1, 7. This is not surprising,
 for the two vices under consideration are essentially and directly
 opposed to the nature of the ministry. The ministry is ordained to
 have as its aim the glory of God and its promotion. Psalm 19, 1
 affirms, "The heavens declare the glory of God." And ministers must,
 for God's glory, suffer reproach and shame. Jeremiah complains (ch.
 20, 8), "The word of Jehovah is made a reproach unto me, and a
 derision, all the day." The world will not endure the Word. For him
 who in preaching seeks his own honor, it is impossible to remain in
 the right path and preach the pure Gospel. Consequently he avoids
 striving for God's honor; he must preach what pleases the people, what
 brings honor to himself and magnifies his skill and wisdom.
 
 5. Avarice, too, is, according to its very nature, opposed to the
 interests of the ministry. Just as the ministry is to be devoted to
 God's honor at the expense of our own, so is it to be devoted to the
 interests of our neighbor and not to our own. Otherwise it is an
 injury rather than a benefit. With the false teacher seeking only his
 own good, it is impossible for him to preach the truth. He is
 compelled to speak what is pleasing to men in order to gratify his
 appetites. Therefore Paul (Rom 16, 18) says of such preachers that
 they serve their own bellies. And in many places the Scriptures
 reprove avarice. Let him, then, who would be a preacher guard
 vigilantly against vainglory and avarice. But, should he feel himself
 in the clutch of these sins, let him avoid the ministry. For under
 such conditions he will accomplish no good; he will only dishonor God,
 seduce souls and be a thief and robber in the acquisition of property.
 With this explanation, the lesson is now easily understood, but we
 will consider a few points.
 
 "For ye bear with the foolish gladly, being wise yourselves."
 
 6. Paul commends the Corinthians for their patience and wisdom in six
 points: as wise men, they cheerfully endure the foolish; they bear
 with those who bring them into bondage and oppress them; with those
 who devour them; with those who take from them [or take them captive];
 with those who exalt themselves; with those who smite them in the
 face. But his commendation is meant to pave the way for his folly--to
 prepare them to suffer him the more readily. He would say, "Since you
 suffer so much from them who injure you--and you are wise in that--I
 trust you will bear with me who have wrought you only good, when I act
 the fool for a little; particularly when my object in it is your
 good--to preserve the Gospel among you in opposition to the false
 apostles." Note how tenderly and patiently he deals with the
 Corinthians when he might have severely reproved them for tolerating
 the false apostles. He commends them as does a father a timid child,
 and yet, while commending them he censures both them and their false
 teachers. He handles them as tenderly as if he held a raw egg in his
 hand, in order not to distract or terrify them.
 
 7. Paul delivers a masterly stroke when with the same words he praises
 the Corinthians and rebukes them and their false apostles. His
 commendation of their patience is in reality reproof, blows and wounds
 for the false teachers. He would say:
 
 "I have preached the Gospel to you at my own expense and jeopardy. By
 my labor have ye attained to its blessing. Ye have done nothing for me
 in return, and I have been no tax upon you. Now, upon my departure,
 others come and exploit you, and seek honor and profit from my labor.
 They would be your masters and I am to be ignored. They boast as if
 the accomplishment were all theirs. Of these ye must be disciples and
 pupils. Their preaching ye must accept, while my Gospel must become
 odious. My case is that of the bee who labors to make honey and then
 the idle drones and the earthworms come and consume the sweet not of
 their making. In me is illustrated Christ's proverb (Jn 4, 37), 'one
 soweth, and another reapeth.' Continually one enters into the fruits
 of another's labor. One must toil and incur danger, while another
 reaps the benefit in security.
 
 8. "Ye can suffer these false apostles, though they be fools and teach
 only foolishness. In this ye display wisdom and patience. But ye do
 not so suffer me, who taught you true wisdom. Nor do ye permit me much
 enjoyment of my labor. Further, ye can permit them to make servants of
 you, to be your lords and to order you to do their bidding. And ye
 obey. But I who have made myself your servant, I who have served you
 without profit to myself, that ye might be lords with Christ, must now
 be ignored and all my labors be lost. They rule you at their pleasure,
 and their pleasure is all they consult. You suffer yourselves to be
 devoured. That is, your property is consumed; for ye bestow it upon
 them abundantly, as Psalm 14, 4 has it, 'Who eat up my people.' Upon
 such as these ye can shower goods and gifts, and can permit them to
 devour you as they please. But I have never enjoyed aught of your
 property. All my service has been without recompense, that ye might
 become rich in Christ.
 
 "Again, ye suffer the false teachers to take from you beyond your
 consent; to exalt themselves above you, to esteem themselves better
 than you and me, and to exercise their arrogance upon you. But ye deal
 not so with me, who have sacrificed my own substance, and have taken
 from others, that I might bring the Gospel to you; who have not
 exalted myself above any, but have yielded to all and served them. The
 false apostles permit you to serve them; in fact, trample you beneath
 their feet. They even smite you in the face; that is, they reproach
 you publicly, put you to shame, and abuse you with rude and insolent
 words. They act as if ye were beasts of burden and they your real
 masters. All this ye suffer. But my patience with you, my parental
 tenderness, past and present, is remembered no more. Paul is now
 represented as having wrought no good at Corinth."
 
 
 PAUL'S DESCRIPTION OF FALSE TEACHERS.
 
 9. Note the master hand wherewith Paul portrays the character of false
 teachers, showing how they betray their avarice and ambition. First,
 they permit true teachers to lay the foundation and perform the labor;
 then they come and desire to do the work over, to reap the honors and
 the benefits. They bring about that the name and the work of the true
 teachers receive no regard and credit; what they themselves have
 brought--that is the thing. They make the poor, simple-minded people
 to stare open-mouthed while they win them with flowery words and
 seduce them with fair speeches, as mentioned in Romans 16, 18. These
 are the idle drones that consume the honey they will not and cannot
 make. That this was the condition of affairs at Corinth is very clear
 from this epistle--indeed, from both epistles. Paul continually refers
 to others having followed him and built upon the foundation he has
 laid. Messengers of the devil, he terms them.
 
 10. And such false teachers have the good fortune that all their folly
 is tolerated, even though the people realize how these act the fool,
 and rather rudely at that. They have success with it all, and people
 bear with them. But no patience is to be exercised toward true
 teachers! Their words and their works are watched with the intent of
 entrapping them, as complained of in Psalm 17, 9 and elsewhere. When
 only apparently a mote is found, it is exaggerated to a very great
 beam. No toleration is granted. There is only judgment, condemnation
 and scorn. Hence the office of preaching is a grievous one. He who has
 not for his sole motive the benefit of his neighbor and the glory of
 God, cannot continue therein. The true teacher must labor, and permit
 others to have the honor and profit of his efforts, while he receives
 injury and derision for his reward. Here the saying holds true: "To
 love without guerdon, nor wearying of the burden." Only the Spirit of
 God can inspire such love. To flesh and blood it is impossible. Paul
 here scores the false prophets when he says, "Ye suffer fools gladly";
 in other words, "I know the false preachers often act as fools, nor
 can they help it, because their teaching is false; yet ye excuse
 them."
 
 11. In the second place such teachers are disposed to bring the people
 into downright bondage and to bind their conscience by forcing laws
 upon them and teaching work-righteousness. The effect is that fear
 impels them to do what has been pounded into them, as if they were
 bond-slaves, while their teachers command fear and attention. But the
 true teachers, they who give us freedom of conscience and create us
 lords, we soon forget, even despise. The dominion of false teachers is
 willingly tolerated and patiently endured; indeed, it is given high
 repute. All those conditions are punishments sent by God upon them who
 do not receive the Gospel with love and gratitude. Christ says (Jn 5,
 43): "I am come in my Father's name, and ye receive me not: if another
 shall come in his own name, him ye shall receive." The Pope, with his
 spiritual office, became our lord, and we became his captives, through
 his doctrine of human works. And our present-day schismatics pursue
 the same object with their fanciful doctrine concerning their works.
 
 12. In the third place, false teachers flay their disciples to the
 bone, and cut them out of house and home, but even this is taken and
 endured. Such, I opine, has been our experience under the Papacy. But
 true preachers are even denied their bread. Yet this all perfectly
 squares with justice! For, since men fail to give unto those from whom
 they receive the Word of God, and permit the latter to serve them at
 their own expense, it is but fair they should give the more unto
 preachers of lies, whose instruction redounds to their injury. What is
 withheld from Christ must be given in tenfold proportion to the devil.
 They who refuse to give the servant of the truth a single thread, must
 be oppressed by liars.
 
 13. Fourth, false apostles forcibly take more than is given them. They
 seize whatever and whenever they can, thus enhancing their insatiable
 avarice. This, too, is excused in them. Thus, the great establishments
 of the Pope did not suffice for him; with various artifices, bulls,
 laws and indulgences, he has brought under his power land and people
 and all they possess, exhausting the world by usury. And so it should
 be, for this state of affairs was richly deserved by men for despising
 the Gospel and its preachers.
 
 14. Fifth, these deceitful teachers, not satisfied with having
 acquired our property, must exalt themselves above us and lord it over
 us. Not only do they possess all property, but they must for that very
 reason become our superiors; must have precedence and receive honor.
 We bow our knees before them, worship them and kiss their feet. And we
 suffer it all, yes, with fearful reverence regard it just and right.
 And it is just and right, for why did we not honor the Gospel by
 accepting and preserving it?
 
 15. Sixth, our false apostles justly reward us by smiting us in the
 face. That is, they consider us inferior to dogs; they abuse us, and
 treat us as foot-rags. I venture to say we became sensible of such
 treatment when, under the Papacy, we were readily put in the van,
 cursed, condemned and delivered to the devil. We endured it all,
 suffered most patiently, and yielded up property, honor, body and
 soul. Fault in a sincere teacher, however, could by no means be
 tolerated. Very well, then; God is just, and it is his judgment that
 we must honor the messengers of Satan a thousand times more than his
 own, and do and suffer everything.
 
 "I speak by way of disparagement [speak as concerning reproach], as
 though we had been weak."
 
 16. There are two ways of interpreting this sentence: First, as
 meaning: "I speak as one of the weak whose folly you must endure; for
 which I deserve reproach, since I ought to bear with you." From such
 meaning I to this day have seen no cause to swerve. The other
 interpretation is: "I speak as one reproached--after the manner of the
 weak." Or, more fully expressed: "I can speak in two ways of myself
 and my class: First, with honor, because of our strength in the sight
 of God and the spiritually-minded, worthy of honor, noble; not weak
 but strong, able. But I will not at present employ this way, for we
 are now despised; we are not known as honorable. And all because of
 the false prophets. I will, then, present myself in the other light,
 as I am regarded--despised, held in reproach and disrespect, weak and
 incapable. But even this condition shall be an occasion of glory for
 me; my reproach and weakness is more honorable than their honor, power
 and strength. What would my glory be should my actual strength inspire
 my speech!" "Weakness," according to Paul's own later interpretation,
 implies being regarded worthless, unfit, a failure. The apostle's
 meaning, then, is: "I, too, will be one of the boasting fools. You
 will excuse it in me for I speak from the standpoint of my critics,
 that of a man contemptible, foolish, incompetent. Before God, however,
 I feel that I am a quite different being."
 
 17. And recollect, Paul says, "Because ye are wise, ye suffer fools
 gladly," implying that one fool cannot tolerate another. The saying
 is, "Two fools in one house will not do." Reason and wisdom are
 required, to bear with another's infirmities and to excuse them.
 
 "Yet whereinsoever any is bold."
 
 18. That is, in whatever the false apostles can boast, I can likewise
 glory. Here we are shown what is the ground of the false apostles'
 boasting: their outward respectability--being of Abraham's seed,
 children of Israel, Christ's preachers. Therein they think to far
 excel the Corinthians, claiming their doctrine and works to be of
 greater weight because they have Moses and the prophets for their
 teachers. But they failed to perceive that their boast is of mere
 externals, that render no one righteous or better before God. The
 majority of the Hebrews, of the Israelites, of the seed of Abraham,
 and of the preachers of Christ are lost. Names are of no consequence;
 they only make a fine show and serve to seduce the simple-minded. Paul
 boasts of his origin and yet derides his boasting, calling it fool's
 work. His object is to destroy the boasting of the false prophets,
 that the people might not be deceived.
 
 19. Note how, even in Paul's time, great men erred concerning the true
 sense of the Gospel, and many noble preachers would have estimated
 Christian life by a merely external appearance and name. The true
 spiritual preachers must have been few. Should it be strange, then,
 that in our time sincere preachers are not numerous, and that the
 majority of ministers riot in what they themselves seem and do? It
 cannot and shall not be otherwise. The thievish drones, which are
 prone to riot, let them riot! We will resist to the utmost of our
 power, commending the matter to God, who doubtless will grant us
 sufficient honor and profit, both temporally and eternally, though we
 must labor gratuitously, accepting injury and derision as our reward.
 Our adversaries will not long continue their persecutions, for, as
 Paul says just preceding our lesson, they will eventually receive
 their deserts.
 
 20. Again, Paul boasts of certain temporal afflictions wherein he
 excels the false apostles, who suffer nothing, for the sake of either
 the word or of souls, but only boast of name and person. Among the
 afflictions he mentions, he names having been a night and a day in the
 deep. Some refer this allusion to the voyage of which Luke writes
 (Acts 27, 20-21), when for fourteen days Paul and his companions ate
 nothing and saw never a star, being day and night continually covered
 by the surges and waves of the sea. Others think Paul was, like Jonah,
 personally sunk into the deep sea, though but for a day and a night.
 Such is the clear meaning of the text. Yet others interpret it as
 having reference to a prison or dungeon, because the Greek text makes
 no mention of the sea--simply "the deep."
 
 "Who is weak, and I am not weak?"
 
 21. Of external afflictions affecting not his own person, but
 distressing others, Paul mentions two: he is weak if another is weak,
 and burns if another is offended. Thereby he plainly portrays the
 ardor of his heart--how full of love he is; the defects and sorrows of
 others pain him as his own. By "weakness," I imagine, he means, not
 bodily infirmity, but weakness of faith. He refers to those who, young
 in the faith, have a tender and frail conscience, thereby betokening
 immaturity and feebleness of faith. He says (Rom 14, 2), "He that is
 weak eateth herbs"; and in First Corinthians 8, 12, that we sin
 against Christ if we wound a weak conscience. These weak ones Paul
 does not reject. He receives them and conducts himself as if he, too,
 were weak. He asserts (1 Cor 9, 22), "To the weak I became weak, that
 I might gain the weak."
 
 22. This interpretation of the sentence is borne out in his allusion
 to "that which presseth upon me daily, anxiety for all the churches."
 Paul would say: "I exert myself, I have a continual care, I urge and
 admonish constantly, that offenses and false doctrine may not invade
 and destroy my planting; may not violate and ruin the weak
 consciences." As seen in his epistle to the Corinthians, directed
 against the false apostles, and in that to the Thessalonians, such is
 his vigilant anxiety to guard them from the tempter that he sends them
 a special messenger, and he exultingly declares it is life to him to
 learn of their steadfastness.
 
 23. Likewise, by the assertion that he burns, we are to understand
 that he is exceedingly grieved and pained if one is offended; that is,
 if through misleading doctrines or examples one in any wise falls from
 the faith. Of the offense to faith, he says much in Romans 14. Not
 desiring to be offended with the offended, as he became weak with the
 weak, he says: "I burn and sorrow for them."
 
 "I know a man in Christ, fourteen years ago."
 
 24. Of the translation of Paul into the third heaven many have
 written, perplexing themselves over what constituted the first, second
 and third heavens, and the paradise. Paul himself, who had the
 experience, does not tell, and declares no man can tell, for none may
 utter the words he heard. Therefore, we must humbly acknowledge we do
 not know the nature of these things. And it matters not. Paul does not
 boast of his experience for the purpose of imparting knowledge to us
 or of enabling us to duplicate it. The purpose of his boasting is
 simply to stop the mouths of the fanatics and to show how paltry was
 their glory in comparison with his own. Certain it is, however, that
 Paul was ravished from this life into a life ineffable; otherwise his
 expression would be meaningless.
 
 
 PAUL'S THORN IN THE FLESH AND HUMILITY.
 
 "There was given to me a thorn in the flesh, a messenger of Satan."
 
 25. And must this mighty apostle, O merciful God, be subject to trials
 lest he exalt himself because of his great revelations? Then how
 should others, how should such infirm beings as we, be free from
 self-exaltation? Many teachers have explained Paul's thorn to be the
 temptations of the flesh. The Latin text is responsible for this
 interpretation; it reads, "stimulus carnis," a spear, or thorn for the
 flesh. Yet that rendering does not do justice to the words. Paul is
 not in the habit of terming temptations of the flesh "thorns." The
 thorn stands rather for something painful and afflicting. In "a thorn
 of the flesh" the thought is not of an instrumentality whereby the
 flesh stings, but of something that stings the flesh. The Greek text
 impels us to the thought of a thorn for the flesh, or a thorn upon or
 in the flesh. The idea is much like that in the German proverb, "The
 clog is bound to the dog's neck." We may imagine Paul expressing
 himself: "As a clog to a dog's neck, as a ring in a bear's nose, a bit
 in a horse's mouth or a gag in the mouth of a swine, in order to
 restrain them from running, biting and general mischief,--so is my
 thorn a clog to my body lest I exalt myself."
 
 26. But Paul himself explains the nature of the clog, or thorn. He
 calls it "a messenger of Satan," a devil, to "buffet" him, or to flay
 and jog him. Hence a spiritual trial cannot be meant. The explanation
 appeals to me that the persecutions and sufferings the apostle
 recounts above constitute the devil's flaying. Thus his meaning would
 be: "I have received great revelations, for which reason the clog is
 bound to the dog; that is, the many dangers and misfortunes with which
 the angel of the devil buffets and humiliates my body will make me
 forget to exalt myself. They are the thorn in my flesh, or upon my
 body; for God will not permit it to come upon my soul."
 
 27. Yet the text seems to imply some peculiar work of the devil upon
 Paul's body, for it says the thorn, or clog, is the messenger Satan
 employs to beat his body; and also that the apostle diligently but
 unavailingly thrice besought the Lord to remove it. I do not imagine
 him praying for the cessation of persecutions in a spirit of
 unwillingness to suffer them. But since he does not specify the
 affliction, we must let it remain a secret one, a distress known only
 to himself. It is enough for us to know that while God had given him
 great revelations, revelations beyond human ken, he also bound the
 clog to him--gave him a thorn for his body--to prevent his exaltation
 of himself; and that the knowledge of the buffetings and flaying
 caused by this clog, or devil, are likewise beyond human ken.
 
 "My power is made perfect in weakness."
 
 28. It is a strange sort of strength which is weak and by its weakness
 grows stronger. Who ever heard of weak strength? or more absurd still,
 that strength is increased by weakness? Paul would here make a
 distinction between human strength and divine. Human strength
 increases with enhancement and decreases with enfeeblement. But God's
 power--his Word in us--rises in proportion to the pressure it
 receives. It is characteristic of God the Creator that he creates all
 things from naught, and again reduces to naught all created things.
 Human power cannot do this. The power of God is the true palm-wood
 which buoys itself in proportion as it is burdened and weighted.
 
 29. Note here, "weakness" is not to be understood in a spiritual
 sense, as on a previous occasion, but externally; as not illness
 alone, but every sort of evil, misfortune, suffering and persecution
 calculated to buffet and humble the body. The power of Christ, in
 connection with which spiritual weakness cannot exist, is invoked
 against this weakness likewise. He says, "Most gladly will I glory in
 my weaknesses, that the power of Christ may rest upon me." And his
 weaknesses he immediately explains as infirmities, injuries,
 necessities, persecutions and distresses. The thought, then, is:
 Christ is not mighty within us, his word and his faith are not strong
 in us, unless our bodies suffer affliction. The false apostles,
 however, take excellent care to escape suffering.
 
 
 
 
 _Sunday Before Lent_
 
 Text: First Corinthians 13.
 
 1 If I speak with the tongues of men and of angels, but have not love,
 I am become sounding brass, or a clanging cymbal. 2 And if I have the
 gift of prophecy, and know all mysteries and all knowledge; and if I
 have all faith, so as to remove mountains, but have not love, I am
 nothing. 3 And if I bestow all my goods to feed the poor, and if I
 give my body to be burned, but have not love, it profiteth me nothing.
 4 Love suffereth long, and is kind; love envieth not; love vaunteth
 not itself, is not puffed up, 5 doth not behave itself unseemly,
 seeketh not its own, is not provoked, taketh not account of evil; 6
 rejoiceth not in unrighteousness, but rejoiceth with the truth; 7
 beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth
 all things. 8 Love never faileth: but whether there be prophecies,
 they shall be done away; whether there be tongues, they shall cease;
 whether there be knowledge, it shall be done away. 9 For we know in
 part, and we prophesy in part; 10 but when that which is perfect is
 come, that which is in part shall be done away. 11 When I was a child,
 I spake as a child, I felt as a child, I thought as a child: now that
 I am become a man, I have put away childish things. 12 For now we see
 in a mirror, darkly; but then face to face: now I know in part; but
 then shall I know fully even as also I was fully known. 13 But now
 abideth faith, hope, love, these three; and the greatest of these is
 love.
 
 
 PAUL'S PRAISE OF CHRISTIAN LOVE.
 
 1. Paul's purpose in this chapter is to silence and humble haughty
 Christians, particularly teachers and preachers. The Gospel gives much
 knowledge of God and of Christ, and conveys many wonderful gifts, as
 Paul recounts in Romans 12 and in First Corinthians 12. He tells us
 some have the gift of speaking, some of teaching, some of Scripture
 exposition; others of ruling; and so on. With Christians are great
 riches of spiritual knowledge, great treasures in the way of spiritual
 gifts. Manifest to all is the meaning of God, Christ, conscience, the
 present and the future life, and similar things. But there are to be
 found few indeed who make the right use of such gifts and knowledge;
 who humble themselves to serve others, according to the dictates of
 love. Each seeks his own honor and advantage, desiring to gain
 preferment and precedence over others.
 
 2. We see today how the Gospel has given to men knowledge beyond
 anything known in the world before, and has bestowed upon them new
 capabilities. Various gifts have been showered upon and distributed
 among them which have redounded to their honor. But they go on
 unheeding. No one takes thought how he may in Christian love serve his
 fellow-men to their profit. Each seeks for himself glory and honor,
 advantage and wealth. Could one bring about for himself the
 distinction of being the sole individual learned and powerful in the
 Gospel, all others to be insignificant and useless, he would willingly
 do it; he would be glad could he alone be regarded as Mister Smart. At
 the same time he affects deep humility, great self-abasement, and
 preaches of love and faith. But he would take it hard had he, in
 practice, to touch with his little finger what he preaches. This
 explains why the world is so filled with fanatics and schismatics, and
 why every man would master and outrank all others. Such as these are
 haughtier than those that taught them. Paul here attacks these
 vainglorious spirits, and judges them to be wholly insignificant,
 though their knowledge may be great and their gifts even greater,
 unless they should humble themselves and use their gifts in the
 service of others.
 
 3. To these coarse and mean people he addresses himself with a
 multitude of words and a lengthy discourse, a subject he elsewhere
 disposes of in a few words; for instance, where he says (Phil 2, 3-4),
 "In lowliness of mind each counting other better than himself; not
 looking each of you to his own things, but each of you also to the
 things of others." By way of illustration, he would pass sentence upon
 himself should he be thus blameworthy; this more forcibly to warn
 others who fall far short of his standing. He says,
 
 "If I speak with the tongues of men and of angels."
 
 4. That is, though I had ability to teach and to preach with power
 beyond that of any man or angel, with words of perfect charm, with
 truth and excellence informing my message--though I could do this,
 "but have not love [charity]," and only seek my own honor and profit
 and not my neighbor's, "I am become sounding brass, or a clanging
 cymbal." In other words, "I might, perhaps, thereby teach others
 something, might fill their ears with sound, but before God I would be
 nothing." As a clock or a bell has not power to hear its own sound,
 and does not derive benefit from its stroke, so the preacher who lacks
 love cannot himself understand anything he says, nor does he thereby
 improve his standing before God. He has much knowledge, indeed, but
 because he fails to place it in the service of love, it is the quality
 of his knowledge that is at fault. 1 Cor 8, 1-12. Far better he were
 dumb or devoid of eloquence, if he but teach in love and meekness,
 than to speak as an angel while seeking but his own interests.
 
 "And if I have the gift of prophecy."
 
 5. According to chapter 14, to prophesy is to be able, by the Holy
 Spirit's inspiration, correctly to understand and explain the prophets
 and the Scriptures. This is a most excellent gift. To "know mysteries"
 is to be able to apprehend the spiritual meaning of the Scriptures, or
 its allegorical references, as Paul does where (Gal 4, 24-31) he makes
 Sarah and Hagar representative of the two covenants, and Isaac and
 Ishmael of the two peoples--the Jews and the Christians. Christ does
 the same (Jn 3, 14) when he makes the brazen serpent of Moses typical
 of himself on the cross; again, when Isaac, David, Solomon and other
 characters of sacred history appear as figures of Christ. Paul calls
 it "mystery"--this hidden, secret meaning beneath the primary sense of
 the narrative. But "knowledge" is the understanding of practical
 matters, such as Christian liberty, or the realization that the
 conscience is not bound. Paul would say, then: "Though one may
 understand the Scriptures, both in their obvious and their hidden
 sense; though he may know all about Christian liberty and a proper
 conversation; yet if he have not love, if he do not with that
 knowledge serve his neighbor, it is all of no avail whatever; in God's
 sight he is nothing."
 
 6. Note how forcibly yet kindly Paul restrains the disgraceful vice of
 vainglory. He disregards even those exalted gifts, those gifts of
 exceeding refinement, charm and excellence, which naturally produce
 pride and haughtiness though they command the admiration and esteem of
 men. Who would not suppose the Holy Spirit to dwell visibly where such
 wisdom, such discernment of the Scriptures, is present? Paul's two
 epistles to the Corinthians are almost wholly directed against this
 particular vice, for it creates much mischief where it has sway. In
 Titus 1, 7, he names first among the virtues of a bishop that he be
 "non superbus," not haughty. In other words that he do not exalt
 himself because of his office, his honor and his understanding, and
 despise others in comparison. But strangely Paul says,
 
 "If I have all faith, so as to remove mountains, but have not love, I
 am nothing."
 
 
 LOVE THE SPIRIT'S FRUIT RECEIVED BY FAITH.
 
 7. We hold, and unquestionably it is true, that it is faith which
 justifies and cleanses. Rom 1, 17; 10, 10; Acts 15, 9. But if it
 justifies and purifies, love must be present. The Spirit cannot but
 impart love together with faith. In fact, where true faith is, the
 Holy Spirit dwells; and where the Holy Spirit is, there must be love
 and every excellence. How is it, then, Paul speaks as if faith without
 love were possible? We reply, this one text cannot be understood as
 subverting and militating against all those texts which ascribe
 justification to faith alone. Even the sophists have not attributed
 justification to love, nor is this possible, for love is an effect, or
 fruit, of the Spirit, who is received through faith.
 
 8. Three answers may be given to the question. First, Paul has not
 reference here to the Christian faith, which is inevitably accompanied
 by love, but to a general faith in God and his power. Such faith is a
 gift; as, for instance, the gift of tongues, the gift of knowledge, of
 prophecy, and the like. There is reason to believe Judas performed
 miracles in spite of the absence of Christian faith, according to John
 6, 70: "One of you is a devil." This general faith, powerless to
 justify or to cleanse, permits the old man with his vices to remain,
 just as do the gifts of intellect, health, eloquence, riches.
 
 9. A second answer is: Though Paul alludes to the true Christian
 faith, he has those in mind who have indeed attained to faith and
 performed miracles with it, but fall from grace through pride, thus
 losing their faith. Many begin but do not continue. They are like the
 seed in stony ground. They soon fall from faith. The temptations of
 vainglory are mightier than those of adversity. One who has the true
 faith and is at the same time able to perform miracles is likely to
 seek and to accept honor with such eagerness as to fall from both love
 and faith.
 
 10. A third answer is: Paul in his effort to present the necessity of
 love, supposes an impossible condition. For instance, I might express
 myself in this way: "Though you were a god, if you lacked patience you
 would be nothing." That is, patience is so essential to divinity that
 divinity itself could not exist without it, a proposition necessarily
 true. So Paul's meaning is, not that faith could exist without love,
 but on the contrary, so much is love an essential of faith that even
 mountain-moving faith would be nothing without love, could we separate
 the two even in theory.
 
 The third answer pleases me by far the best, though I do not reject
 the others, particularly the first. For Paul's very first premise is
 impossible--"if I speak with the tongues of angels." To speak with an
 angelic tongue is impossible for a human being, and he clearly
 emphasizes this impossibility by making a distinction between the
 tongues of men and those of angels. There is no angelic tongue; while
 angels may speak to us in a human tongue men can never speak in those
 of angels.
 
 11. As we are to understand the first clause--"If I speak with the
 tongues of angels"--as meaning, Were it as possible as it is
 impossible for me to speak with the tongues of angels; so are we to
 understand the second clause--"If I have all faith, so as to remove
 mountains"--to mean, Were it as possible as it is impossible to have
 such faith. Equally impossible is the proposition of understanding all
 mysteries, and we must take it to mean, Were it possible for one to
 understand all mysteries, which, however, it is not. John, in the last
 chapter of his Gospel, asserts that the world could not contain all
 the books which might be written concerning the things of the kingdom.
 For no man can ever fathom the depths of these mysteries. Paul's
 manner of expressing himself is but a very common one, such as: "Even
 if I were a Christian, if I believed not in Christ I would be
 nothing"; or, "Were you even a prince, if you neither ruled men nor
 possessed property you would be nothing."
 
 "And if I bestow all my goods to feed the poor."
 
 12. In other words, "Were I to perform all the good works on earth and
 yet had not charity--having sought therein only my own honor and
 profit and not my neighbor's--I would nevertheless be lost." In the
 performance of external works so great as the surrender of property
 and life, Paul includes all works possible of performance, for he who
 would at all do these, would do any work. Just so, when he has
 reference to tongues he includes all good words and doctrines; and in
 prophecy, understanding and faith he comprises all wisdom and
 knowledge. Some may risk body and property for the sake of temporal
 glory. So Romans and pagans have done; but as love was lacking and
 they sought only their own interests, they practically gave nothing.
 It being generally impossible for men to give away all their property,
 and their bodies to be burned, the meaning must be: "Were it possible
 for me to give all my goods to the poor, and my body to be burned."
 
 13. The false reasoning of the sophists will not stand when they
 maliciously deduct from this text the theory that the Christian faith
 is not effectual to blot out sin and to justify. They say that before
 faith can justify it must be garnished with love; but justification
 and its distinctive qualities as well are beyond their ken.
 Justification of necessity precedes love. One does not love until he
 has become godly and righteous. Love does not make us godly, but when
 one has become godly love is the result. Faith, the Spirit and
 justification have love as effect and fruitage, and not as mere
 ornament and supplement. We maintain that faith alone justifies and
 saves. But that we may not deceive ourselves and put our trust in a
 false faith, God requires love from us as the evidence of our faith,
 so that we may be sure of our faith being real faith.
 
 
 THE NATURE OF CHRISTIAN LOVE.
 
 "Love suffereth long, and is kind."
 
 14. Now Paul begins to mention the nature of love, enabling us to
 perceive where real love and faith are to be found. A haughty teacher
 does not possess the virtues the apostle enumerates. Lacking these,
 however many gifts the haughty have received through the Gospel, they
 are devoid of love.
 
 First, love "suffereth long." That is, it is patient; not sudden and
 swift to anger, not hasty to exercise revenge, impatience or blind
 rage. Rather it bears in patience with the wicked and the infirm until
 they yield. Haughty teachers can only judge, condemn and despise
 others, while justifying and exalting themselves.
 
 15. Second, love is "kind." In other words, it is pleasant to deal
 with; is not of forbidding aspect; ignores no one; is kind to all men,
 in words, acts and attitude.
 
 16. Third, love "envieth not"--is not envious nor displeased at the
 greater prosperity of others; grudges no one property or honor.
 Haughty teachers, however, are envious and unkind. They begrudge
 everyone else both honor and possessions. Though with their lips they
 may pretend otherwise, these characteristics are plainly visible in
 their deeds.
 
 17. Fourth, love "vaunteth not itself." It is averse to knavery, to
 crafty guile and double-dealing. Haughty and deceptive spirits cannot
 refrain from such conduct, but love deals honestly and uprightly and
 face to face.
 
 18. Fifth, love is not "puffed up," as are false teachers, who swell
 themselves up like adders.
 
 19. Sixth, love "doth not behave itself unseemly" after the manner of
 the passionate, impatient and obstinate, those who presume to be
 always in the right, who are opposed to all men and yield to none, and
 who insist on submission from every individual, otherwise they set the
 world on fire, bluster and fume, shriek and complain, and thirst for
 revenge. That is what such inflating pride and haughtiness of which we
 have just spoken lead to.
 
 20. Seventh, love "seeketh not her own." She seeks not financial
 advancement; not honor, profit, ease; not the preservation of body and
 life. Rather she risks all these in her ... [text missing from this
 edition] ... is no such thing as the Church of Christ nor as true
 Christians. Many erring spirits, especially strong pretenders to ...
 [text missing from this edition]
 
 21. Eighth, love "is not [easily] provoked" by wrong and ingratitude;
 it is meek. False teachers can tolerate nothing; they seek only their
 own advantage and honor, to the injury of others.
 
 22. Ninth, love "taketh not account of [thinketh no] evil." It is not
 suspicious; it puts the best construction on everything and takes all
 in good faith. The haughty, however, are immeasurably suspicious;
 always solicitous not to be underrated, they put the worst
 construction on everything, as Joab construed Abner's deeds. 2 Sam 3,
 25. This is a shameful vice, and they who are guilty of it are hard to
 handle.
 
 23. Tenth, love "rejoiceth not in unrighteousness [iniquity]." The
 words admit of two interpretations: First, as having reference to the
 delight of an individual in his own evil doings. Solomon (Prov 2, 14)
 speaks of those who "rejoice to do evil." Such must be either
 extremely profligate and shameless, characters like harlots and
 knaves; or else they must be hypocrites, who do not appreciate the
 wickedness of their conduct; characters like heretics and schismatics,
 who rejoice when their knavery succeeds under the name of God and of
 the truth. I do not accept this interpretation, but the other. Paul's
 meaning is that false teachers are malicious enough to prefer to hear,
 above all things, that some other does wrong, commits error and is
 brought to shame; and their motive is simply that they themselves may
 appear upright and godly. Such was the attitude of the pharisee toward
 the publican, in the Gospel. But love's compassion reaches far beyond
 its own sins, and prays for others.
 
 24. Eleventh, love "rejoiceth with [in] the truth." Here is evidence
 that the preceding phrase is to be taken as having reference to
 malicious rejoicing at another's sin and fall. Rejoicing in the truth
 is simply exulting in the right-doing and integrity of another.
 Similarly, love is grieved at another's wrong-doing. But to the
 haughty it is an affliction to learn of uprightness in someone else;
 for they imagine such integrity detracts from their own profit and
 honor.
 
 25. Twelfth, love "beareth all things." It excuses every failing in
 all men, however weak, unjust or foolish one may be apparently, and no
 one can be guilty of a wrong too great for it to overlook. But none
 can do right in the eyes of the haughty, who ever find something to
 belittle and censure as beyond toleration, even though they must hunt
 up an old fence to find the injury.
 
 26. Thirteenth, love "believeth all things." Paul does not here allude
 to faith in God, but to faith in men. His meaning is: Love is of
 decidedly trustful disposition. The possessor of it believes and
 trusts all men, considering them just and upright like himself. He
 anticipates no wily and crooked dealing, but permits himself to be
 deceived, deluded, flouted, imposed upon, at every man's pleasure, and
 asks, "Do you really believe men so wicked?" He measures all other
 hearts by his own, and makes mistakes with utmost cheerfulness. But
 such error works him no injury. He knows God cannot forsake, and the
 deceiver of love but deceives himself. The haughty, on the contrary,
 trust no one, will believe none, nor brook deception.
 
 27. Fourteenth, love "hopeth all things." Love despairs of no man,
 however wicked he may be. It hopes for the best. As implied here, love
 says, "We must, indeed, hope for better things." It is plain from this
 that Paul is not alluding to hope in God. Love is a virtue
 particularly representing devotion to a neighbor; his welfare is its
 goal in thought and deed. Like its faith, the hope entertained by love
 is frequently misplaced, but it never gives up. Love rejects no man;
 it despairs of no cause. But the proud speedily despair of men
 generally, rejecting them as of no account.
 
 28. Fifteenth, love "endureth all things." It endures whatever harm
 befalls, whatever injury it suffers; it endures when its faith and
 hope in men have been misplaced; endures when it sustains damage to
 body, property or honor. It knows that no harm has been done since it
 has a rich God. False teachers, however, bear with nothing, least of
 all with perfidy and the violation of plighted faith.
 
 29. Sixteenth, love never faileth; that means, it abides forever, also
 in the life to come. It never gives up, never permits itself to be
 hindered or defeated by the wickedness or ingratitude of men, as do
 worldly individuals and false saints, who, immediately on perceiving
 contempt or ingratitude, draw back, unwilling to do further good to
 any, and, rendering themselves quite inhuman, become perfect
 misanthropes like Timon in his reputation among the Greeks. Love does
 not so. It permits not itself to be made wicked by the wickedness of
 men, nor to be hindered in well-doing. It continues to do good
 everywhere, teaching and admonishing, aiding and serving,
 notwithstanding its services and benefits must be rewarded, not by
 good, but by evil. Love remains constant and immovable; it continues,
 it endures, in this earthly life and also in the life to come. The
 apostle adds, "Whether there be prophecies, they shall be done away;
 whether there be tongues, they shall cease; whether there be
 knowledge, it shall be done away." Love he commends above all other
 endowments, as a gift that can never pass, even in the life to come.
 Those other gifts, the boast of the false apostles, are bestowed only
 for this present life, to serve in the administering of the
 ministerial office. Prophecy, tongues, knowledge, all must cease; for
 in yonder life each individual will himself perceive perfectly and
 there will be no need for one to teach another. Likewise, all
 differences, all inequalities, shall be no more. No knowledge and no
 diversity of gifts is necessary; God himself will be all in every
 soul. 1 Cor 15, 28.
 
 30. Here Paul gives utterance to the distinction between the life of
 faith here below and that heavenly life of divine vision. He would
 teach that we have in this life and the other the same possession, for
 it is the same God and the same treasures which we have here by faith
 and there by sight. In the objects themselves there is no difference;
 the difference consists in our knowledge. We have the same God in both
 lives, but in different manner of possession. The mode of possessing
 God in this life is faith. Faith is an imperfect, obscure vision,
 which makes necessary the Word, which, in turn, receives vogue through
 the ministry, tongues and prophecy. Without the Word, faith cannot
 live. But the mode of possessing God in the future life is not faith
 but sight. This is perfect knowledge, rendering unnecessary the Word,
 and likewise preaching, tongues and prophecy. These, then, must pass.
 Paul continues,
 
 "We know in part, and we prophesy in part."
 
 31. "We know in part"; that is, in this life we know imperfectly, for
 it is of faith and not of sight. And we "prophesy in part"; that is,
 imperfectly, for the substance of our prophecy is the Word and
 preaching. Both knowledge and prophecy, however, reveal nothing short
 of what the angels see--the one God. "But when that which is perfect
 is come, that which is in part shall be done away."
 
 He proves this by way of illustration and contrasts the child with the
 man. To children, who are yet weak, play is a necessity; it is a
 substitute for office and work. Similarly, we in the present life are
 far too frail to behold God. Until we are able, it is necessary that
 we should use the medium of Word and faith, which are adapted to our
 limitations.
 
 "For now we see in a mirror [through a glass] darkly; but then face to
 face."
 
 32. Faith, Paul tells us, is like a mirror, like a riddle. The actual
 face is not in the glass; there is but the image of it. Likewise,
 faith gives us, not the radiant countenance of eternal Deity, but a
 mere image of him, an image derived through the Word. As a dark riddle
 points to something more than it expresses, so faith suggests
 something clearer than that which it perceives. But in the life to
 come, mirror and riddle, faith and its demonstration, shall all have
 ceased to be. God's face and our own shall be mutually and clearly
 revealed. Paul says, "Now I know in part; but then shall I know fully
 even as also I was fully known [know even also as I am known]." That
 is, God now knows me perfectly, clearly and plainly; no dark veil is
 upon myself. But as to him, a dark veil hides him from me. With the
 same perfect clearness wherewith he now knows me, I shall then know
 him--without a veil. The veil shall be taken away, not from him, but
 from me; for upon him is no veil.
 
 
 THE GREATEST CHRISTIAN VIRTUE IS LOVE.
 
 "But now abideth faith, hope, love, these three; and the greatest of
 these is love."
 
 33. The sophists have transgressed in a masterly manner as regards
 this verse. They have made faith vastly inferior to love because of
 Paul's assertion that love is greater than faith and greater than
 hope. As usual, their mad reason blindly seizes upon the literal
 expression. They hack a piece out of it and the remainder they ignore.
 Thus they fail to understand Paul's meaning; they do not perceive that
 the sense of Paul concerning the greatness of love is expressed both
 in the text and the context. For surely it cannot be disputed that the
 apostle is here referring to the permanent or temporary character
 respectively of love and other gifts, and not to their rank or power.
 As to rank, not faith only, but the Word, surpasses love; for the Word
 is the power of God unto salvation to all that believe. Rom 1, 16. Yet
 the Word must pass. But though love is the fruit of the Word and its
 effect, it shall never be abolished. Faith possesses God himself. It
 possesses and can accomplish all things; yet it must cease. Love gives
 and blesses the neighbor, as a result of faith, and it shall never be
 done away.
 
 34. Now, Paul's statement that love is greater than faith and hope is
 intended as an expression of the permanence, or eternal duration, of
 love. Faith, being limited as to time in comparison with love, ranks
 beneath it for the reason of this temporary duration. With the same
 right I might say that the kingdom of Christ is greater upon earth
 than was Christ. Thereby I do not mean that the Church in itself is
 better and of higher rank than Christ, but merely that it covers a
 greater part of the earth than he compassed; for he was here but three
 years and those he spent in a limited sphere, whereas his kingdom has
 been from the beginning and is coextensive with the earth. In this
 sense, love is longer and broader than either faith or hope. Faith
 deals with God merely in the heart and in this life, whereas the
 relations of love both to God and the whole world are eternal.
 Nevertheless, as Christ is immeasurably better and higher and more
 precious than the Christian Church, although we behold him moving in
 smaller limits and as a mere individual, so is faith better, higher
 and more precious than love, though its duration is limited and it has
 God alone for its object.
 
 35. Paul's purpose in thus extolling love is to deal a blow to false
 teachers and to bring to naught their boasts about faith and other
 gifts when love is lacking. His thought is: "If ye possess not love,
 which abides forever, all else whereof ye boast being perishable, ye
 will perish with it. While the Word of God, and spiritual gifts, are
 eternal, yet the external office and proclamation of the Word, and
 likewise the employment of gifts in their variety, shall have an end,
 and thus your glory and pride shall become as ashes." So, then, faith
 justifies through the Word and produces love. But while both Word and
 faith shall pass, righteousness and love, which they effect, abide
 forever; just as a building erected by the aid of scaffolding remains
 after the scaffolding has been removed.
 
 36. Observe how small the word "love" and how easily uttered! Who
 would have thought to find so much precious virtue and power ascribed
 by Paul to this one excellence as counterpart of so much that is evil?
 This is, I imagine, magnifying love, painting love. It is a better
 discourse on virtue and vice than are the heathen writings. The model
 the apostle presents should justly shame the false teachers, who talk
 much of love but in whom not one of the virtues he mentions is found.
 
 Every quality of love named by him means false teachers buffeted and
 assaulted. Whenever he magnifies love and characterizes her powers, he
 invariably makes at the same time a thrust at those who are deficient
 in any of them. Well may we, then, as he describes the several
 features, add the comment "But you do very differently."
 
 37. It is passing strange that teachers devoid of love should possess
 such gifts as Paul has mentioned here, viz., speaking with tongues,
 prophesying, understanding mysteries; that they should have faith,
 should bestow their goods and suffer themselves to be burned. For we
 have seen what abominations ensue where love is lacking; such
 individuals are proud, envious, puffed up, impatient, unstable, false,
 venomous, suspicious, malicious, disdainful, bitter, disinclined to
 service, distrustful, selfish, ambitious and haughty. How can it
 consistently be claimed that people of this stamp can, through faith,
 remove mountains, give their bodies to be burned, prophesy, and so on?
 It is precisely as I have stated. Paul presents an impossible
 proposition, implying that since they are devoid of love, they do not
 really possess those gifts, but merely assume the name and appearance.
 And in order to divest them of those he admits for the sake of
 argument that they are what in reality they are not.
 
 
 
 
 _First Sunday In Lent_
 
 Text: Second Corinthians 6, 1-10.
 
 1 And working together with him we entreat also that ye receive not
 the grace of God in vain 2 (for he saith, At an acceptable time I
 hearkened unto thee, and in a day of salvation did I succor thee:
 behold, now is the acceptable time; behold, now is the day of
 salvation): 3 giving no occasion of stumbling in anything, that our
 ministration be not blamed; 4 but in everything commending ourselves,
 as ministers of God, in much patience, in afflictions, in necessities,
 in distresses, 5 in stripes, in imprisonments, in tumults, in labors,
 in watchings, in fastings; 6 in pureness, in knowledge, in
 longsuffering, in kindness, in the Holy Spirit, in love unfeigned, 7
 in the word of truth, in the power of God; by the armor of
 righteousness on the right hand on the left, 8 by glory and dishonor,
 by evil report and good report; as deceivers, and yet true; 9 as
 unknown, and yet well known; as dying, and behold, we live; as
 chastened, and not killed; 10 as sorrowful, yet always rejoicing; as
 poor, yet making many rich; as having nothing, and yet possessing all
 things.
 
 
 AN ENTREATY TO LIVE AS CHRISTIANS.
 
 1. This lesson is an admonition to the Corinthians calculated to
 stimulate them in the performance of the duties they already
 recognize. The words are easily enough said, but execution is
 difficult and practice rare. For Paul gives a strange description of
 the Christian life, and the color and characteristics with which he
 exhibits it render it decidedly unprepossessing. First he says:
 
 "And working together with him we entreat also that ye receive not the
 grace of God in vain."
 
 2. He calls the Corinthians co-workers, as in First Corinthians 3, 9,
 where he puts it: "We are God's fellow-workers; ye are God's
 husbandry, God's building." That is, we labor upon you with the
 external Word--teaching and admonishing; but God, working inwardly
 through the Spirit, gives the blessing and the success. He permits not
 our labor with the outward Word to be in vain. Therefore, God is the
 true Master, performing inwardly the supreme work, while we aid
 outwardly, serving him through the ministry.
 
 The apostle's purpose in praising his co-laborers is to prevent them
 from despising the external Word as something inessential to them, or
 well enough known. For though God is able to effect everything without
 the instrumentality of the outward Word, working inwardly by his
 Spirit, this is by no means his purpose. He uses preachers as
 fellow-workers, or co-laborers, to accomplish his purpose through the
 Word when and where he pleases. Now, since preachers have the office,
 name and honor of fellow-workers with God, no one may be considered
 learned enough or holy enough to ignore or despise the most inferior
 preaching; especially since he knows not when the hour may come
 wherein God will, through preachers, perform his work in him.
 
 3. Secondly, Paul shows the danger of neglecting the grace of God. He
 boldly declares here that the preaching of the Gospel is not an
 eternal, continuous and permanent mode of instruction, but rather a
 passing shower, which hastens on. What it strikes, it strikes; what it
 misses, it misses. It does not return, nor does it stand still. The
 sun and heat follow and dry it up. Experience shows that in no part of
 the world has the Gospel remained pure beyond the length of man's
 memory. Only so long as its pioneers lived did it stand and prosper.
 When they were gone, the light disappeared; factious spirits and false
 teachers followed immediately.
 
 Thus Moses announces (Deut 31, 29) that the children of Israel will
 corrupt themselves after his death; and the book of Judges testifies
 that so it really came to pass. Each time a judge died in whose days
 the Word of God obtained sway, the people fell away and became more
 wicked than before. King Joash did what was right so long as the high
 priest Jehoiada lived, but after the latter's death this had an end.
 And following the time of Christ and his apostles, the world was
 filled with seditious spirits and false teachers. Paul, in fact,
 declares (Acts 20, 29): "I know that after my departing grievous
 wolves shall enter in among you, not sparing the flock." So also we
 now have the pure Gospel. This is a time of grace and salvation and
 the acceptable day; but should the world continue, this condition,
 too, will soon pass.
 
 4. To receive the grace of God in vain can be nothing else than to
 hear the pure word of God which presents and offers his grace, and yet
 to remain listless and irresponsive, undergoing no change at all.
 Thus, ungrateful for the Word and unworthy of it, we merit the loss of
 the Word. Such as these are described in the parable (Lk 14, 16-24)
 where the guests bidden to the supper refused to come and went about
 their own business, thus provoking the master's anger until he swore
 they should not taste his supper.
 
 Similar is Paul's threat here, that we may take heed and accept the
 Gospel with fear and gratitude. Christ says (Jn 12, 35), "Walk while
 ye have the light, that darkness overtake you not." I should think we
 might have learned wisdom from experience--from the darkness we
 suffered under the Papacy. But that is all forgotten; we show neither
 gratitude nor amendment of life. Very well, we shall find out the
 consequences.
 
 
 SALVATION WHEREVER THE GOSPEL IS SENT.
 
 "Behold, now is the acceptable time; behold, now is the day of
 salvation."
 
 5. These words portray the richness of the salvation wherever the
 Gospel goes: nothing but grace and help; no wrath or punishment.
 Indeed, these are words of unutterable meaning the apostle here
 employs.
 
 First, he tells us that it is an "acceptable time," as the Hebrew
 expresses it. Our own way of putting it would be: "This is a gracious
 time, a time when God turns away his wrath and is moved only by love
 and benevolence toward us and is pleased to do us good." All our sins
 are forgotten; he takes no note of the sins of the past nor of those
 of the present. In short, we are in a realm of mercy, where are only
 forgiveness and reconciliation. The heavens are now open. This is the
 true golden year when man is denied nothing. So Paul says, "At an
 acceptable time I hearkened unto thee"; that is: "I am kindly disposed
 toward thee. Whatsoever thou shalt even desire and ask for, thou shalt
 surely receive. Be not neglectful, therefore, and ask while the
 acceptable time continues."
 
 6. Second, Paul declares that it is a day of blessing, "a day of
 salvation." It is a day of help, wherein we are not only acceptable
 and assured of God's favor and good will toward us, but we experience
 even as we have been assured--that God really does help us. He
 verifies his assurance, for his beneficence gives testimony that our
 prayers are heard. We call it a happy day, a blessed day, a day of
 abundance; for these two truths are inseparably related--that God is
 favorable toward us, and that his kindness is the proof of his favor.
 God's favor toward us is revealed in the first clause, which speaks of
 an acceptable time; that he extends help to us is revealed in the
 second clause, telling of a blessed day of succor. Both these facts
 are to be apprehended by faith and in good conscience; for a
 superficial judgment would lead to the view that this period of
 blessing is rather an accursed period of wrath and disfavor. Words
 like these, of spiritual meaning, must be understood in the light of
 the Holy Spirit; thus shall we find that these two glorious, beautiful
 expressions refer to the Gospel dispensation and are intended to
 magnify all the treasures and the riches of the kingdom of Christ.
 
 "Giving no occasion of stumbling [no offense] in anything."
 
 7. Since this is a time of blessing, let us make right use of it, not
 spending it to no purpose, and let us take serious heed to give
 offense to none; thus avoiding reproach to our ministry. It is evident
 from the connection to what kind of offense the apostle has reference;
 he would not have the Gospel doctrine charged with teaching anything
 evil.
 
 8. Two kinds of offense bring the Gospel into disgrace: In one case it
 is the heathen who are offended, and this because of the fact that
 some individuals would make the Gospel a means of freedom from
 temporal restraint, substituting temporal liberty for spiritual. They
 thus bring reproach upon the Gospel as teaching such doctrine, and
 make it an object of scandal to the heathen and worldly people,
 whereby they are misled and become enemies to the faith and to the
 Word of God without cause, being the harder to convert since they
 regard Christians as licentious knaves. And the responsibility for
 this must be placed at the door of those who have given offense in
 this respect.
 
 In the other case, Christians are offended among themselves. The
 occasion is the indiscreet exercise of Christian liberty, which
 offends the weak in faith. Concerning this topic much is said in First
 Corinthians 8 and Romans 14. Paul here hints at what he speaks of in
 First Corinthians 10, 32-33: "Give no occasion of stumbling, either to
 Jews, or to Greeks, or to the church of God: even as I also please all
 men in all things, not seeking mine own profit, but the profit of the
 many that they may be saved." He takes up the same subject in
 Philippians 2, 4, teaching that every man should look on the things of
 others. Then no offense will be given.
 
 "That our ministration [the ministry] be not blamed."
 
 9. Who can prevent our office being vilified? for the Word of God must
 be persecuted equally with Christ himself. That the Word of God is
 reviled by unbelievers ignorant of faith in God is something we cannot
 prevent. For, according to Isaiah 8, 14 and Romans 9, 33, the Gospel
 is a "rock of offense." This is the offense of the faith; it will
 pursue its course and we are not responsible.
 
 But for love's offense, offense caused by shortcomings in our works
 and fruits of faith, the things we are commanded to let shine before
 men, that, seeing these, they may be allured to the faith--for offense
 in this respect we cannot disclaim responsibility. It is a sin we
 certainly must avoid, that the heathen, the Jews, the weak and the
 rulers of the world may never be able to say: "Behold the knavery and
 licentiousness of these people! Surely their doctrine cannot be true."
 Otherwise our evil name and fame and the obstacles we place before
 others will extend to the innocent and holy Word God has given us to
 apprehend and to proclaim; it must bear our shame and in addition
 become unfruitful in the offended ones. Grievous is such a sin as
 this.
 
 
 MARKS OF CHRISTIANS AS MINISTERS OF GOD.
 
 "But in everything commending ourselves, as ministers of God, in much
 patience."
 
 10. The apostle here portrays the Christian life in its outward
 expression. Not that it is possible for anyone thereby to become a
 Christian, or godly; but, being servants of God, or Christians and
 godly people, we furnish in this manner, according to Paul's statement
 here, the evidence thereof as by fruits and signs.
 
 Mark his phrase "ministers of God." What a remarkable service for God
 is this wherein we must endure so much suffering, so much affliction,
 privation, anxiety, stripes, imprisonment, tumult or sedition, labor,
 watching, fasting, and so on! No mass here, no vigil, no
 hallucinations of a fictitious service of God; it is the true service
 of God, which subdues the body and mortifies the flesh. Not, indeed,
 as if fasting, watching and toiling are to be despised because they do
 not make just. Though we are not thereby justified, we must
 nevertheless practice those things, instead of giving rein to the
 flesh and indulging our idleness.
 
 11. Paul also mentions sedition. Not that by our teaching or life we
 should be guilty of sedition against others; rather, we should be
 quiet and obedient. See Romans 13. Christ says (Mt 22, 21), "Render
 therefore unto Caesar the things that are Caesar's." Paul's meaning is
 that when we become victims of sedition on the part of others we
 should submit; just as we are not to inflict upon others privations,
 distresses, stripes or imprisonment, but rather to accept them at
 their hands. So Paul heads the list with patience; which does not
 produce sedition, but endures it.
 
 It is a consolation in these times when we are charged with raising
 seditions, to reflect that it is the very nature and color of the
 Christian life that it be criticised as seditious when the fact is it
 patiently bears sedition directed against itself. Thus was it with
 Elijah, who was accused by King Ahab of troubling Israel and exciting
 turbulence. 1 Kings 18, 17-18. Then, when we are charged with guilt in
 this respect, let us remember that not only did the apostles have to
 hear the same accusation, but even Christ himself, with all his
 innocence, was so accused. More than that, he was falsely reviled upon
 the cross with a superscription charging sedition; in fact, he was
 even put to death as a Jewish king guilty of opposition to Caesar and
 of enticing and inciting the people.
 
 12. The remaining marks of the Christian life--patience, affliction,
 necessities, distresses, stripes, imprisonments, labor, watching,
 fasting, purity, etc., are easily interpreted; it is readily seen how
 they are instrumental in our service to God. God will not have
 indolent, idle gluttons, nor sleepy and impatient servants. Most
 adroitly does Paul score in particular our fine idle youths who draw
 interest from their money, have an easy life, and imagine their
 tonsures, their long robes and their howling in the churches excuse
 them from labor. All men should labor and earn their bread, according
 to Paul. 2 Thes 3, 12. By labor, our text teaches, we serve God; more
 than that, our labor is testimony to the fact that we serve God.
 
 "In knowledge."
 
 13. What is meant here? With Paul, knowledge signifies discretion,
 understanding, reason. He speaks of the Jews (Rom 10, 2) as having "a
 zeal for God, but not according to knowledge"; that is, a zeal without
 reason, without understanding, without discretion. His message here,
 then, is: "We should conduct ourselves in Christian affairs with
 becoming reason and moderation lest we give offense to the weak by a
 presumptuous use of Christian liberty. Rather we should, with
 discretion and understanding, adapt ourselves to that which promotes
 the neighbor's welfare. Likewise, when we labor, fast, or when we
 regulate our sexual relations, we are to exercise reason, lest the
 body should be injured by too much fasting, watching and toil, and
 also by needless abstention from sexual intercourse. Let everyone take
 heed to remain within bounds by using reason and discretion. The
 apostle counsels the married (1 Cor 7, 5) not to defraud each other
 too long, lest they be tempted. In all such matters, he would impose
 no measures and rules, no limits and laws, after the manner of the
 councils, the popes and the monks. He leaves it wholly to each
 individual's discretion to decide and to test for himself all
 questions of time and quantity bearing upon the restraints of his
 flesh.
 
 "In longsuffering, in kindness."
 
 14. The meaning of these phrases has been stated in many other places,
 particularly in connection with Romans 2 and Galatians 5.
 
 "By the Holy Spirit."
 
 15. What are we to understand here? The words may have one of two
 meanings: First, the apostle may have reference to the Holy Spirit in
 person, who is God. Second, he may have reference to the spirit of
 individuals, or their spiritual condition. "Holy Spirit" may be
 intended to stand for "spirituality," Paul's meaning being: "Beware of
 the professedly spiritual, or of things glittering and purporting to
 be spiritual; beware of them who make great boast of the Spirit and
 nevertheless betray only a false, unclean, unholy spirit, productive
 of sects and discord. Abide ye in that true, holy spirituality
 proceeding from God's Holy Spirit, who imparts unity and harmony,
 determination and courage." As Paul expresses it elsewhere (Eph 4, 3),
 "Giving diligence to keep the unity of the Spirit in the bond of
 peace." They, then, who continue in one faith, one mind and
 disposition, give testimony by the reality and saintliness of their
 spiritual life and by the presence of the Holy Spirit that they are
 servants of God. For true spirituality, or a holy walk in the Spirit,
 means to be in heart and mind at one with the Spirit, through faith.
 
 "In love unfeigned, in the word of truth."
 
 16. As the apostle opposes the Holy Spirit to false sects and false
 prophets, so he opposes unfeigned love to indolent Christians who in
 true faith and unity of mind possess marks of true spirituality, but
 are nevertheless indolent, cold, in fact false as regards love.
 
 Again, he opposes the "Word of Truth" to abusers of the Word of God,
 who misconstrue it and comment upon it according to their own fancy,
 and for their own honor and profit. While much that purports to be
 spiritual has not the Word as source and gives honor to the Spirit at
 the expense of the Word, the class under consideration profess to
 magnify the Word; they would be master interpreters of the Scriptures,
 confident that their explanations are correct and superior. In
 condemnation of this class, Peter says (1 Pet 4, 11), "If any man
 speaketh, speaking as it were oracles of God," and not his own word.
 In other words, let him be assured he speaks the Word of God and not
 his own. God's Word Paul here terms the "Word of truth"; that is, the
 true Word of God and not our own misconstrued, falsified word palmed
 off as God's Word. In our idiom we would say "the real Word" where the
 Hebrew has "Word of truth," or "true Word."
 
 "In the power of God."
 
 17. Peter speaks also of this power, in the verse before mentioned:
 "If any man ministereth, ministering as of the strength which God
 supplieth." And Paul elsewhere declares (Col 1, 29): "Whereunto I
 labor also, striving according to his working, which worketh in me
 mightily"; and again (Rom 15, 18): "For I will not dare to speak of
 any things save those which Christ wrought through me, for the
 obedience of the Gentiles." Christians should have the assurance that
 they are the kingdom of God, and that in whatever they do, especially
 in undertakings of a spiritual character, which have the salvation of
 souls as aim, they beware of everything not absolutely known as true,
 so that the work be not theirs but God's.
 
 In God's kingdom God alone is to speak, reign and act. Christ says (Mt
 5, 16): "Even so let your light shine before men, that they may see
 your good works and glorify your Father who is in heaven"--may glorify
 him as the worker, and not yourselves. Seductive spirits, however,
 come cavorting in their own power, throw the pictures out of the
 churches and establish rules of their own, without caring whether it
 is done in the power of God. The consequence is that their work is
 neither permanent nor fruitful.
 
 
 THE ARMOR OF RIGHTEOUSNESS.
 
 "By the armor of righteousness."
 
 18. This armor Paul more fully describes in Ephesians and in
 Thessalonians. Sufficient explanation of it has been given in the
 lesson for Advent. There is the "shield of faith," the "helmet of
 salvation," the shoes of "the preparation of the Gospel of peace," and
 so on. Paul includes them all under the term "armor of righteousness,"
 and, in his epistle to the Ephesians, under the phrase "armor of God,"
 to teach Christians to eschew and to forsake carnal, worldly weapons
 for these. He would have them know themselves a spiritual people,
 spiritually warring against the spiritual enemies enumerated here and
 pointed out on the right hand and on the left.
 
 19. On the left hand he places dishonor and evil report, in that we
 appear to men as deceivers, unknown, in conflict with death,
 chastened, sorrowful, poor and needy. Scorn is hurled in our faces and
 the reputation accorded us is that of deceivers. The Christian must
 not only be unknown, friendless and a stranger, but men will also be
 ashamed of him--even his best friends--in consequence of the reproach
 and evil report under which he lies in the eyes of the great, the
 wealthy, the wise and the powerful of the world.
 
 He must be as one dying--continually expecting death by reason of the
 hatred and envy directed against him, and the various persecutions he
 suffers. He must be beaten and scourged; must at times feel the weight
 of the enmity and envy wherewith the world inflicts torment. He is
 like the sorrowful, for so ill does he fare in the world, he has
 reason to sorrow. He resembles the poor in that nothing is given him
 but injuries; he possesses nothing, for if he has not been deprived of
 all his possessions he daily expects that extremity.
 
 Lest he despair of his hope in God and grow faint, he must be armed on
 the left hand against these enemies with a divine armor: with a firm
 faith, with the comfort of the divine Word, with hope, so that he may
 endure and exercise patience. Thereby he proves himself to be a true
 servant of God, inasmuch as false teachers and hypocrites, with all
 their pompous worship, are incapable of these things.
 
 20. On the right he places honor and good report, inasmuch as we are
 after all true, well known, alive, defiant of death, full of joy,
 rich, possessing all things. The Christian will have always a few to
 honor and commend him; some there will be to give him a good report,
 to praise him as true and honest in doctrine. And there will be some
 who receive and acknowledge him, who are not ashamed of him. Life
 remains in spite of death oft faced, even in scourgings. He rejoices
 when things with him are at the worst, for his heart remains joyful in
 God, that joy finding expression in words, deeds and manner. Though
 poor in the goods of the world, he does not die of hunger, and he
 makes many spiritually rich through the Word. Even though he have no
 possessions at all, he suffers no lack but has in hand all things; for
 all creatures must serve the believer. As Christ promised (Mk 9, 23),
 "All things are possible to him that believeth." For himself, it is
 true, he possesses nothing, and gladly he endures his need; but for
 his neighbor's sake he can do all things, and all he has he is ready
 to place at the disposal of his neighbor whenever need requires. These
 blessings also give occasion for a powerful armor, for we must guard
 against pride and haughtiness.
 
 21. Thus the Christian is quite untrammeled. His eyes are fixed upon
 God alone. Always choosing the safe middle path he steers clear of
 danger on the right and on the left. He permits not the evil to
 overthrow him nor the good to exalt, but makes use of both to the
 honor of God and the benefit of his neighbor. This, Paul instructs us,
 should be the manner of our life now while the season of grace
 continues; nor must we fail to heed this! This is the true service of
 God, the service well pleasing to him; unto which may God help us.
 Amen.
 
 
 
 
 _Second Sunday In Lent_
 
 Text: First Thessalonians 4, 1-7.
 
 1 Finally then, brethren, we beseech and exhort you in the Lord Jesus,
 that, as ye received of us how ye ought to walk and to please God,
 even as ye do walk,--that ye abound more and more. 2 For ye know what
 charge we gave you through the Lord Jesus. 3 For this is the will of
 God, even your sanctification, that ye abstain from fornication; 4
 that each one of you know how to possess himself of his own vessel in
 sanctification and honor, 5 not in the passion of lust, even as the
 Gentiles who know not God; 6 that no man transgress, and wrong his
 brother in the matter: because the Lord is an avenger in all these
 things, as also we forewarned you and testified. 7 For God called us
 not for uncleanness, but in sanctification.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO HOLINESS.
 
 1. This lesson is easy of interpretation. It is a general and earnest
 admonition on the part of Paul, enjoining us to an increasing degree
 of perfection in the doctrine we have received. This admonition, this
 exhortation, is one incumbent upon an evangelical teacher to give, for
 he is urging us to observe a doctrine commanded of God. He says, "For
 ye know what charge [commandments] we gave you through the Lord
 Jesus." Whatever Christians do, it should be willing service, not
 compulsory; but when a command is given, it should be in the form of
 exhortation or entreaty. Those who have received the Spirit are they
 from whom obedience is due; but those not inclined to a willing
 performance, we should leave to themselves.
 
 2. But mark you this: Paul places much value upon the gift bestowed
 upon us, the gift of knowing how we are "to walk and to please God."
 In the world this gift is as great as it is rare. Though the offer is
 made to the whole world and publicly proclaimed, further exhortation
 is indispensable, and Paul is painstaking and diligent in
 administering it. The trouble is, we are in danger of becoming
 indolent and negligent, forgetful and ungrateful--vices menacing and
 great, and which, alas, are altogether too frequent.
 
 Let us look back and note to what depths of darkness, of delusion and
 abomination, we had sunk when we knew not how we ought to walk, how to
 please God. Alas, we have forgotten all about it; we have become
 indolent and ungrateful, and are dealt with accordingly. Well does the
 apostle say in the lesson for the Sunday preceding this (2 Cor 6, 1):
 "And working together with him we entreat also that ye receive not the
 grace of God in vain, for he saith, At an acceptable time I hearkened
 unto thee, and in a day of salvation did I succor thee."
 
 3. In our present lesson he treats chiefly of two vices: unchastity,
 which is a sin against oneself and destructive of the fruits of faith;
 and fraud in business, which is a sin against the neighbor and
 likewise destructive of faith and charity. Paul would have every man
 keep himself chaste and free from wrong against every man, pronouncing
 the wrath of God on offenses of this character.
 
 4. It was a fact reflecting much credit and honor on the Thessalonians
 in contrast to the Corinthians and the Galatians, that they continued
 upright in doctrine and true in the knowledge of the faith, though
 perhaps deficient in the above-mentioned two self-evident features of
 Christian life. While it is true that if sins of immorality are not
 renounced God will punish, yet punishment in such cases is for the
 most part temporal, these sins being less pernicious than such gross
 offenses as error in faith and doctrine.
 
 5. Paul, however, threatens such sins with the wrath of God, lest
 anyone become remiss and indolent, imagining the kingdom of Christ a
 kingdom to tolerate with impunity such offenses. As Paul expresses it,
 "God called us not for uncleanness, but in sanctification [holiness]."
 The thought is: Unchastity does not come within the limits of
 Christian liberty and privilege, nor does God treat the offender with
 indulgence and impunity. No, indeed. In fact, he will more rigorously
 punish this sin among Christians than among heathen. Paul tells us (1
 Cor 11, 30) that many were sickly and many had succumbed to the sleep
 of death in consequence of eating and drinking unworthily. And Psalm
 89, 32 testifies, "Then will I visit their transgression with the
 rod."
 
 6. True, they who sin through infirmity, who, conscious of their
 transgressions, suffer themselves to be reproved, repenting at
 once--for these the kingdom of Christ has ready pity and forbearance,
 commending them to acceptance and toleration (Rom 15; Gal 6, 1; 1 Cor
 13, 7); but that such vices be regarded generally lawful and
 normal--this will not do! Paul declares, "This is the will of God,
 even your sanctification." And he speaks of "how ye ought to ...
 please God." His thought is: Some consider these sins a matter of
 little moment, treat them as if the wind blew them away and God rather
 had pleasure in them as trivial affairs. But this is not true. While
 God really bears with the fallen sinner, he would have us perceive our
 errors and strive to mend our lives and to abound more and more in
 righteousness. His grace is not intended to cloak our shame, nor
 should the licentious abuse the kingdom of Christ as a shield for
 their knavery. Paul commands (Gal 5, 13), "Use not your freedom for an
 occasion to the flesh"; and Peter (1 Pet 2, 16), "As free, and not
 using your freedom for a cloak of wickedness, but as bondservants of
 God."
 
 7. Paul, following the Hebrew way of speaking, has reference to
 chastity where he says "your sanctification." He terms the body "holy"
 when it is chaste, chastity being, in God's sight, equivalent to
 holiness. "Holiness," in the Old Testament, is a synonym for "purity."
 Again, "holiness" and "purity" are regarded as the same thing in First
 Corinthians 7, 14: "Else were your children unclean; but now are they
 holy."
 
 8. The nature of the holiness and purity whereof he speaks he makes
 plain himself in the words: "That ye abstain from fornication; that
 each one of you know how to possess himself of his own vessel in
 sanctification and honor." The apostle does not here prohibit
 matrimony, but licentiousness, and unchastity outside the marriage
 state. He who is careful to keep his vessel--his body--chaste, who
 does not commit adultery and is not guilty of whoredom--this man
 preserves his body in holiness and purity, and properly is called
 chaste and holy. The same thought is borne out in the succeeding
 verse:
 
 "Not in the passion of lust [in the lust of concupiscence], even as
 the Gentiles."
 
 9. The Gentiles, who know not God, give themselves up to all manner of
 uncleanness, or disgraceful vices, as Paul records in Romans 1, 29-31.
 Not that all gentiles are guilty in that respect. Paul is not saying
 what all heathen do; he merely states that with the gentiles such
 conduct is apparent, and quite to be expected from people "who know
 not God." Under such conditions, one allows the sin to pass
 unreproved, as does Paul himself. Notwithstanding he censures them who
 consent to sin of this character when knowing better, and who do not
 restrain the evil-doers. Rom 1, 32. But in the case of Christians,
 when any fall into such sin they are to be reproved and the sin
 resisted; the offense must not be allowed to pass as with the
 gentiles. In the case of the latter the lust of concupiscence holds
 sway; no restraints are exercised and the reins are given to lust, so
 that its nature and passion are given free expression, just as if this
 were a provision of nature, when the fact is it is a pest to be
 healed, a blemish to be removed. But there is none to heal and
 deliver, so the gentiles decay and go to ruin through evil lust. "Lust
 of concupiscence" would be, with us, "evil lust." The conclusion is
 simple:
 
 "That no man transgress and wrong his brother in the matter."
 
 10. In other words, that no one take for himself what belongs to
 another, or use the property of another for his own benefit, which may
 be done by a variety of tricks. To "defraud in any matter" is to seek
 gain at the expense of a neighbor. On this latter subject much has
 been written elsewhere, particularly in the little treatise on
 Merchants and Usury, showing the great extent to which extortion is
 practiced and how charity is rarely observed. It is on this topic that
 Paul here would fix our attention.
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday In Lent_
 
 Text: Ephesians 5, 1-9.
 
 1 Be ye therefore imitators of God, as beloved children; 2 and walk in
 love, even as Christ also loved you, and gave himself up for us, an
 offering and a sacrifice to God for an odor of a sweet smell. 3 But
 fornication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not even be
 named among you, as becometh saints; 4 nor filthiness, nor foolish
 talking, or jesting, which are not befitting: but rather giving of
 thanks. 5 For this ye know of a surety, that no fornicator, nor
 unclean person, nor covetous man, who is an idolater, hath any
 inheritance in the kingdom of Christ and God. 6 Let no man deceive you
 with empty words: for because of these things cometh the wrath of God
 upon the sons of disobedience. 7 Be not ye therefore partakers with
 them; 8 for ye were once darkness, but are now light in the Lord: walk
 as children of light 9 (for the fruit of the light is in all goodness
 and righteousness and truth).
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO BE IMITATORS OF GOD.
 
 1. This is a letter of admonition, instructing Christians, according
 to the plan underlying Paul's epistles, not to become sluggish and
 careless, but by their deeds to evince their faith, and honor and
 proclaim the Word he has taught them; for the sake of the gentiles and
 unbelievers, that these may not take offense at the doctrine of
 Christ.
 
 2. To begin with, having shown that we were made children of God
 through Christ, he admonishes us to be followers, or imitators, of the
 Father, as beloved children. He employs the most endearing of
 terms--"beloved children"--to persuade us by the Father's love to love
 even as we are loved. But what manner of love has God manifested
 toward us? It was not simply that love manifest in the fact that he
 gives temporal support to us unworthy beings in common with all the
 wicked on earth; that he permits his sun to rise on the just and on
 the unjust and sends rain on the grateful and on the ungrateful, as
 Christ mentions (Mt 5, 45) in connection with his command to be
 perfect even as our Father in heaven is perfect. Not only thus did God
 love us, but in a special way: he has given his Son for us. In
 addition to showering upon us both temporal and eternal blessings he
 has given his own self; he has completely poured out himself for us,
 with all he is, with all he has, with all he does,--and we were
 nothing but sinners, unworthy creatures, enemies and servants of the
 devil. More than this would be beyond even his grace and power.
 
 He who despises such glow of love, which fills all heaven and earth
 and is beyond all power to comprehend it; who does not permit this
 love to kindle and incite in him love for his neighbor whether enemy
 or friend--such a one is not likely ever to become godly or loving by
 such measures as laws or commandments, instruction, constraint or
 compulsion.
 
 3. "Walk in love," counsels the apostle. He would have our external
 life all love. But not the world's love is to be our pattern, which
 seeks only its own advantage, and loves only so long as it is the
 gainer thereby; we must love even as Christ loved, who sought neither
 pleasure nor gain from us but gave himself for us, not to mention the
 other blessings he bestows daily--gave himself as a sacrifice and
 offering to reconcile God unto ourselves, so that he should be our God
 and we his children.
 
 Thus likewise should we give, thus should we lend, or even surrender
 our goods, no matter whether friends claim them or enemies. Nor are we
 to stop there; we must be ready to give our lives for both friends and
 enemies, and must be occupied with no other thought than how we can
 serve others, and how both our life and property can be made to
 minister to them in this life, and this because we know that Christ is
 ours and has given us all things.
 
 "To God for an odor of a sweet smell [for a sweet-smelling savor]."
 
 4. This expression Paul takes from the Old Testament. There the
 temporal sacrifices are described as being "a sweet-smelling savor"
 unto God: that is, they were acceptable and well-pleasing to him; but
 not, as the Jews imagined, because of the value of the work or of the
 sacrifices in themselves. For such thoughts they were chastised by the
 prophets often enough. They were acceptable on the ground of the true
 sacrifice which they foreshadowed and encircled. Paul's thought is
 this: The sacrifices of the Old Testament have passed. Now all
 sacrifices are powerless but that of Christ himself; he is the
 sweet-smelling savor. This sacrifice is pleasing to God. He gladly
 accepts it and would have us be confident it is an acceptable offering
 in our stead. Moreover, there is no other sacrifice the Christian
 Church can offer for us. The once-offered Christ alone avails.
 Although, following his example, we present our bodies a sacrifice, as
 taught in Romans 12, 1, yet we do not do so in behalf of ourselves or
 others; that is the function of the one sacrifice alone--Christ.
 Therefore, all sacrifices offered in the mistaken notion that they
 avail for us, or even secure forgiveness of sin, are wicked and
 unsavory. But more of this elsewhere.
 
 
 SINS NOT TO BE NAMED AMONG CHRISTIANS.
 
 "But fornication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not
 even be named among you, as becometh saints."
 
 5. In naming uncleanness in addition to fornication, the reference is
 to all sensual affections in distinction from wedded love. They are
 too unsavory for him to mention by name, though in Romans 1, 24 he
 finds it expedient to speak of them without disguise. However, also
 wedded love must be characterized by moderation among Christians.
 While there is a conjugal duty to be required by necessity, it is for
 the very purpose of avoiding unchastity and uncleanness. The ideal and
 perfect condition, it is true, would be cohabitation with a sole view
 to procreation; however, that is too high for attainment by all.
 
 6. Paul declares that the sin he indicates should not be named of the
 Ephesians. Unquestionably, among Christians there will always be some
 infirm one to fall; but we must labor diligently, correcting, amending
 and restraining. We must not suffer the offense to go unchallenged,
 but curtail and remedy it, lest, as remarked in the preceding lesson,
 the heathen stumble, saying: "Christians tolerate such vices among
 themselves; their conduct is not different from our own." An
 occasional fall among Christians must be borne with so long as right
 prevails in general, and such things are neither tolerated nor taught,
 but reproved and amended. Paul gives the counsel (Gal 6, 1) that the
 brethren restore the fallen in a spirit of meekness; and he blames the
 Corinthians for not reproving them who sin. 1 Cor 5, 2. A sin, once
 punished, is as if the sin did not exist; it is no longer a matter of
 reproach.
 
 7. Likewise with covetousness: we are to understand that it is not to
 be named of Christians. That is, should one be covetous, should one
 defraud another or contend with him about temporal advantage, as
 evidently was true of the Corinthians (1 Cor 6, 1), the offense must
 not be suffered to go unreproved and uncorrected. The Gospel must be
 carefully upheld and preserved among the multitude, "that our
 ministration be not blamed." 2 Cor 6, 3.
 
 I make this point for the sake of those who, so soon as they observe
 that all Christians are not perfectly holy, but will occasionally
 stumble and fall, imagine there is no such thing as a Christian and
 the Gospel is impotent and fruitless. Just as if to be a Christian
 meant the mountain already climbed and complete, triumphant victory
 over sin! The fact is, it is rather a contest, a battle. Wherever
 there is a contest, or a battle, some of the combatants will flee,
 some will be wounded, some will fall and some even be slain. For
 warfare is not unaccompanied by disaster if it be real warfare.
 
 8. The writer of the epistle goes on to assign the reason why it does
 not sound well to hear such things concerning Christians--because they
 are saints and it behooves saints to be chaste and moderate, and to
 practice and teach these virtues. Note, he calls Christians "saints,"
 notwithstanding that in this life they are clothed with sinful flesh
 and blood. Doubtless the term is not applied in consequence of their
 good works, but because of the holy blood of Christ. For Paul says (1
 Cor 6, 11): "But ye were washed, but ye were sanctified, but ye were
 justified in the name of the Lord Jesus Christ, and in the Spirit of
 our God." Being holy, we should manifest our holiness by our deeds.
 Though we are still weak, yet we ought duly to strive to become chaste
 and free from covetousness, to the glory and honor of God and the
 edifying of unbelievers.
 
 "Nor filthiness, nor foolish talking, or jesting, which are not
 befitting."
 
 9. "Filthiness"--scandalous talk--is unchaste language suggestive of
 fornication, uncleanness and carnal sins. It is common in taverns and
 generally found as accompaniment of gluttony, drunkenness and
 gambling. Especially were the Greeks frivolous and adepts in this
 respect, as their poets and other writers attest. What Paul refers to
 in particular is the lewd conversation uttered in public without fear
 and self-restraint. This will excite wicked thoughts and give rise to
 serious offenses, especially with the young. As he states elsewhere (1
 Cor 15, 33), "Evil companionships [communications] corrupt good
 morals." Should there be any Christians forgetful enough to so
 transgress, the offense must be reproved; otherwise it will become
 general and give the congregation an ill repute, as if Christians
 taught and tolerated it the same as the heathen.
 
 
 FOOLISH TALKING AND JESTING.
 
 10. By "foolish talking" is indicated the fables and tales and other
 lore in which the Greeks particularly abound--a people who possess a
 special faculty for fiction of this sort. Similar are the tales
 commonly related by our women and maidens while spinning at the
 distaff, also those which knaves are fond of relating. Here belong
 also worldly songs which either relate lewd matters or turn upon
 slippery, frivolous themes. Such are "The Priest of Kalenburg,"
 "Dietrich of Berne" and innumerable others.
 
 11. Particularly unchristian is every kind of such buffoonery in the
 church when men are gathered to hear and learn the Word of God. But
 the practice is common where many come together. Even where at first
 things of a serious nature are discussed, men soon pass to frivolous,
 wanton, foolish talk, resulting in a waste of time and the neglect of
 better things. For instance, on the festival of Easter, foolish,
 ridiculous stories have been introduced into the sermon to arouse the
 drowsy. And at the Christmas services, the absurd pantomime of rocking
 a babe, and silly declamations in rhyme, have found vogue. Similarly
 the festivals commemorating the three holy kings, the passion of
 Christ, Dorothy and other saints were characterized.
 
 12. In this category should also be classed the legends of the saints
 and the confused mass of lies concerning miracles, pilgrimages,
 masses, worship of saints, indulgencies, and so on, which once
 dominated the pulpit. Yet these falsehoods are too gross to be called
 merely foolish. They are not just frivolous lies merely destructive of
 good morals, such as Paul refers to here, but they completely
 overthrow faith and the Word of God, making sainthood impossible. Such
 kind of jesting is altogether too serious. Those, however, who have
 seen into them treat them as lies of the same frivolous and abominable
 character as the fables or old women's tales mentioned by Paul 1 Tim
 4, 7. But while the latter are mere human tales which nobody believes,
 which no one will place reliance on, serving as mere occasion of
 merriment, without becoming a source of general moral corruption, an
 obstacle to improvement and a cause of cold, indolent Christianity,
 the falsehoods of the pulpit are diabolical tales held as truth in all
 seriousness, but a comedy for the devil and his angels.
 
 13. "Jesting" has reference to those conversational expedients which
 pander to gaiety in the form of scandal; they are called among us
 banter and badinage. Laughter, mirth and gaiety is their purpose, and
 we meet with them generally in society and high life. Among the
 heathen, jesting was counted a virtue, and therefore received the
 title "eutrapelia" by Aristotle. But Paul calls it a vice among
 Christians, who certainly may find conversational expedients of a
 different kind, such as will inspire a cheerful and joyous spirit in
 Christ. True, Christians are not all so pure but that some may err in
 this matter; but the Christian Church does not command jesting, nor
 suffer any member to abandon himself to the practice. It reproves and
 prohibits it, particularly in religious assemblies, and in teaching
 and preaching. For Christ says (Mt 12, 36) that at the last day men
 must give account of every idle, unprofitable word they have spoken.
 Christians should be a very firm, though courteous, people. Courtesy
 should be coupled with seriousness, and seriousness with courtesy,
 according to the pattern of the life of Christ supplied in the Gospel.
 
 "Which are not befitting."
 
 14. Paul apparently would include in the catalog all unprofitable
 language of whatever name. I would call those words unprofitable which
 serve not to further the faith nor to supply the wants of the body and
 preserve it. We have enough else to talk about during this short
 lifetime, if we desire to speak, enough that is profitable and
 pleasant, if we talk only of Christ, of love and of other essential
 things. The apostle mentions the giving of thanks. It should be our
 daily and constant employment to praise and thank God, privately and
 publicly, for the great and inexpressible treasures he has given us in
 Christ. But it appears that what is needful is relegated to the rear,
 while objects of indifference are brought to the fore.
 
 Now, mark you, if Paul will not tolerate banter and suggestive
 conversation among Christians, what would he say of the shameful
 backbiting which is heard whenever people meet, though but two
 individuals? Yes, what would be his judgment of those who in public
 preaching clinch and claw, attack and calumniate each other?
 
 
 FRUITLESS CHRISTIANS ARE HEATHEN.
 
 "For this ye know of a surety, that no fornicator, nor unclean person,
 nor covetous man, who is an idolater, hath any inheritance in the
 kingdom of Christ and God."
 
 15. Hereby he declares in dry words that the man who does not exhibit
 the fruits of faith is a heathen under the name of a Christian. Here
 is absolute condemnation in a word. The whoremonger is a denier of the
 faith; the unclean person is a denier of the faith; the covetous
 individual is a denier of the faith: all are rebellious, perjured and
 faithless toward God. Paul tells Timothy (1 Tim 5, 8): "But if any
 provideth not for his own, and specially his own household, he hath
 denied the faith, and is worse than an unbeliever." How could he utter
 anything more severe, more terrifying?
 
 He begins, "For this ye know." In other words: Doubt not; do not find
 vain comfort in the thought that this is a jest or an aspersion. A
 Christian name, and association with Christians, will count for
 nothing. It will profit you as little as it profits the Jews to be
 Abraham's seed and disciples of Moses. Christ's words (Mt 7, 21)
 concern every man: "Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord,
 shall enter into the kingdom of heaven." There must be performance;
 faith must be manifested by works.
 
 16. If the great fire of divine love which he uses as his first
 argument will not draw us, then may the terrible threat of hell fire
 prove a sufficient incentive. In other words, if men follow not God,
 walking in love and showing their faith by their deeds, let them know
 they are not God's children, not heirs in his kingdom, and therefore
 are unquestionably heirs of the evil one in hell. He who is unmoved by
 the threats of hell fire must truly be a stick or a stone; indeed, he
 must have a heart like an anvil, as Job says.
 
 17. The writer of the epistle passes unusually severe sentence upon
 the covetous man, for he calls him an idolater, or a worshiper of a
 false God. Plainly, Paul entertained special enmity against the
 covetous, for in Colossians 3, 5 he defines this sin in a similar
 manner. His reasoning, I judge, is this: All other sinners turn to use
 what they have and make it subservient to their lusts. Fornicators and
 the unclean make their bodies serve their pleasure. The haughty employ
 property, art, reputation and men to secure honor to themselves. The
 unhappy idolater alone is servant to his possessions; his sin is to
 save, guard and preserve property. He dare not make use of it either
 for himself or for others, but worships it as his god. Rather than
 touch his money, he would suffer both the kingdom of God and of the
 world to perish. He will not give a farthing to the support of a
 preacher or a schoolmaster for the sake of advancing God's kingdom.
 Because he places his confidence, his trust, in his money rather than
 in the living God, whose promises concerning ample support are
 abundant, his real God is his money, and to call him an idolater is
 entirely just. And, in addition, he must renounce heaven! A shameful
 vice, indeed! O contemptible Unbelief! what a dangerous vice art thou!
 
 
 DECEPTION BY EMPTY WORDS.
 
 "Let no man deceive you with empty words."
 
 18. This applies to those who gloss their unchastity over, as if it
 were but a trivial sin. And some have been even such vulgar teachers
 as to consider no unchastity evil except adultery, and to accept it as
 a normal function, like eating and drinking. The Greek philosophers
 and poets were of this class. And Terence says, "It is neither a sin
 nor a shame for a youth to commit fornication." To obey such doctrine
 would be to know nothing of God and to live in the lust of
 concupiscence, like the gentiles who know not God, of whom we heard in
 the preceding lesson. All arguments of this character are vain words;
 they may fascinate the reason after a fashion; yet they are vain and
 futile, unable to profit their authors.
 
 Covetousness likewise has much false show and glitter. When one
 defrauds another or seeks his own advantage to the injury of others,
 his act is not at all called sin, but cleverness, economy and
 sagacity, though meanwhile the poor must suffer want and even die of
 hunger. Such arguments are merely the specious and blind utterances of
 heathen, contrary to Christian love.
 
 19. But we have additional light upon this subject, showing that
 because of such practices the wrath of God comes upon the unbelieving.
 In First Corinthians 10, 18 are cited numerous examples of punishment
 for the sin of fornication. See also Num 25. Again, because of
 wantonness, covetousness and unchastity, the entire world was
 destroyed by the flood. This is a severe utterance but true and
 indubitable.
 
 "For because of these things cometh the wrath of God upon the sons of
 disobedience."
 
 "Sons of disobedience"--in other words, they who have fallen from the
 faith. Thus we see that he who does not show his faith by his deeds,
 is accounted practically an infidel. In fact, he is worse than an
 infidel; he is an apostate Christian, or an apostate from the faith.
 Therefore comes the wrath of God upon such, even here on earth. This
 is why we Germans must suffer so much famine, pestilence, war and
 bloodshed to come upon us.
 
 20. Among these idle chatterers and misleading teachers the sluggards
 and drones should beware of being classified, who, with better light
 than the heathen, know full well that covetousness and unchastity are
 sin. While they teach nothing to controvert this, they notwithstanding
 trust for salvation in a faith barren of works, on the ground that
 works cannot effect salvation. They know full well that a faith barren
 of works is nothing, is a false faith; that fruit and good works must
 follow a genuine faith of necessity. Nevertheless they go on in carnal
 security, without fear of the wrath and judgment of God, who wants the
 old Adam to be crucified, and to find good fruit on good trees.
 
 It is possible that St. Paul does not refer in this passage to those
 who, like the heathen, teach and maintain by specious arguments that
 unchastity is no sin; nevertheless there is reason to apprehend that
 the reward of the heathen will be meted out to them likewise; for they
 live like the heathen, being strangers to both chastity and kindness.
 And our apprehension is so much more justified because they have a
 better knowledge of the wrong they commit. This is Paul's standpoint
 when he asks (Rom 2, 3): "And reckonest thou this, O man, who judgest
 them that practice such things, and doest the same, that thou shalt
 escape the judgment of God?" "After thy hardness and impenitent
 heart," he adds, thou "treasurest up for thyself wrath."
 
 "Be not ye therefore partakers with them; for ye were once darkness,
 but are now light in the Lord."
 
 21. Peter similarly counsels (1 Pet 4, 3) to let the time past of our
 lives suffice us to have wrought the will of the gentiles, and no
 longer be partakers with them, but live the rest of our time to the
 will of God. While we were gentiles we knew not that all those things
 were sin, because of the darkness of unbelief, which prevented our
 knowing God. But now we have become a light in the Lord. That is, we
 have been so amply enlightened through Christ that we not only know
 God and what he desires, and understand what sin and wrong are, but we
 are also able to light others, to teach them what we know. Paul
 commends the Philippians for being a light in the world, among an evil
 and untoward generation. Phil 2, 15. And, similarly, when we were
 gentiles we not only were darkened, not only were ignorant and went
 astray, but we were darkness itself, leading others into the same
 condition by our words and deeds. We have reason, then, to be thankful
 unto him who has called us out of darkness into his marvelous light (1
 Pet 2, 9), and to "walk as children of light."
 
 "For the fruit of the light [Spirit] is in all goodness and
 righteousness and truth."
 
 22. Since Paul is speaking of light, it would have been more to the
 point had he said "fruit of the light," in accordance with the Latin
 version, than "fruit of the Spirit," the Greek rendering. And who
 knows but it may, in the Greek, have been altered to harmonize with
 Galatians 5, 22, where Paul speaks of the "fruit of the Spirit"? It
 matters little, however; evidently "Spirit" and "light" are synonymous
 in this place.
 
 "Goodness" is the fruit of light, or of the Spirit, as opposed to
 covetousness. The Christian is to be good; that is, useful, gladly
 working his neighbor's good. "Righteousness," as fruit of the Spirit
 among men--for the Spirit also is righteous before God--is opposed to
 covetousness. The Christian must not take another's possessions by
 force, trickery or fraud, but must give to each his due, his own, even
 to the heathen authorities. See Rom 13, 1. "Truth" is the fruit of the
 Spirit as opposed to hypocrisy and lies. A Christian is not only to be
 truthful in word, but honest in life. He should not bear the name
 without the works; he cannot be a Christian and yet live a heathenish
 life, a life of unchastity, covetousness and other vices.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday In Lent_
 
 Text: Galatians 4, 21-31.
 
 21 Tell me, ye that desire to be under the law, do ye not hear the
 law? 22 For it is written, that Abraham had two sons, one by the
 handmaid, and one by the freewomen. 23 Howbeit the son by the handmaid
 is born after the flesh; but the son by the freewoman is born through
 promise. 24 Which things contain an allegory: for these women are two
 covenants; one from mount Sinai, bearing children unto bondage, which
 is Hagar. 25 Now this Hagar is mount Sinai in Arabia, and answereth to
 the Jerusalem that now is: for she is in bondage with her children. 26
 But the Jerusalem that is above is free, which is our mother. 27 For
 it is written,
 
   Rejoice, thou barren that bearest not;
   Break forth and cry, thou that travailest not:
   For more are the children of the desolate than of her that hath the
     husband.
 
 28 Now we, brethren, as Isaac was, are children of promise. 29 But as
 then he that was born after the flesh persecuted him that was born
 after the Spirit, so also it is now. 30 Howbeit what saith the
 scripture? Cast out the handmaid and her son; for the son of the
 handmaid shall not inherit with the son of the freewoman. 31
 Wherefore, brethren, we are not children of a handmaid, but of the
 freewoman.
 
 
 THE CHILDREN OF PROMISE.
 
 This lesson is amply expounded in my commentary on the Epistle to the
 Galatians. It is unnecessary to repeat the exposition here, for it may
 be found and read there. He who desires further information on the
 subject may read the postils on the epistle lesson for the Sunday
 after Christmas and that for New Year's Day. There he will find all
 information. Thus will be obviated the necessity of repeating the
 discourse in various places.
 
 
 
 
 _Fifth Sunday In Lent_
 
 Text: Hebrews 9, 11-15.
 
 11 But Christ having come a high priest of the good things to come,
 through the greater and more perfect tabernacle, not made with hands,
 that is to say, not of this creation, 12 nor yet through the blood of
 goats and calves, but through his own blood, entered in once for all
 into the holy place, having obtained eternal redemption. 13 For if the
 blood of goats and bulls, and the ashes of a heifer sprinkling them
 that have been defiled, sanctify unto the cleanness of the flesh: 14
 how much more shall the blood of Christ, who through the eternal
 Spirit offered himself without blemish unto God, cleanse your
 conscience from dead works to serve the living God? 15 And for this
 cause he is the mediator of a new covenant, that a death having taken
 place for the redemption of the transgressions that were under the
 first covenant, they that have been called may receive the promise of
 the eternal inheritance.
 
 
 CHRIST OUR GREAT HIGH PRIEST.
 
 1. An understanding of practically all of the Epistle to the Hebrews
 is necessary before we can hope to make this text clear to ourselves.
 Briefly, the epistle treats of a two-fold priesthood. The former
 priesthood was a material one, with material adornment, tabernacle,
 sacrifices and with pardon couched in ritual; material were all its
 appointments. The new order is a spiritual priesthood, with spiritual
 adornments, spiritual tabernacle and sacrifices--spiritual in all that
 pertains to it. Christ, in the exercise of his priestly office, in the
 sacrifice on the cross, was not adorned with silk and gold and
 precious stones, but with divine love, wisdom, patience, obedience and
 all virtues. His adornment was apparent to none but God and possessors
 of the Spirit, for it was spiritual.
 
 2. Christ sacrificed not goats nor calves nor birds; not bread; not
 blood nor flesh, as did Aaron and his posterity: he offered his own
 body and blood, and the manner of the sacrifice was spiritual; for it
 took place through the Holy Spirit, as here stated. Though the body
 and blood of Christ were visible the same as any other material
 object, the fact that he offered them as a sacrifice was not apparent.
 It was not a visible sacrifice, as in the case of offerings at the
 hands of Aaron. Then the goat or calf, the flesh and blood, were
 material sacrifices visibly offered, and recognized as sacrifices. But
 Christ offered himself in the heart before God. His sacrifice was
 perceptible to no mortal. Therefore, his bodily flesh and blood
 becomes a spiritual sacrifice. Similarly, we Christians, the posterity
 of Christ our Aaron, offer up our own bodies. Rom 12, 1. And our
 offering is likewise a spiritual sacrifice, or, as Paul has it, a
 "reasonable service"; for we make it in spirit, and it is beheld of
 God alone.
 
 3. Again, in the new order, the tabernacle or house is spiritual; for
 it is heaven, or the presence of God. Christ hung upon a cross; he was
 not offered in a temple. He was offered before the eyes of God, and
 there he still abides. The cross is an altar in a spiritual sense. The
 material cross was indeed visible, but none knew it as Christ's altar.
 Again, his prayer, his sprinkled blood, his burnt incense, were all
 spiritual, for it was all wrought through his spirit.
 
 4. Accordingly, the fruit and blessing of his office and sacrifice,
 the forgiveness of our sins and our justification, are likewise
 spiritual. In the Old Covenant, the priest with his sacrifices and
 sprinklings of blood effected merely as it were an external
 absolution, or pardon, corresponding to the childhood stage of the
 people. The recipient was permitted to move publicly among the people;
 he was externally holy and as one restored from excommunication. He
 who failed to obtain absolution from the priest was unholy, being
 denied membership in the congregation and enjoyment of its privileges;
 in all respects he was separated like those in the ban today.
 
 5. But such absolution rendered no one inwardly holy and just before
 God. Something beyond that was necessary to secure true forgiveness.
 It was the same principle which governs church discipline today. He
 who has received no more than the remission, or absolution, of the
 ecclesiastical judge will surely remain forever out of heaven. On the
 other hand, he who is in the ban of the Church is hellward bound only
 when the sentence is confirmed at a higher tribunal. I can make no
 better comparison than to say that it was the same in the old Jewish
 priesthood as now in the Papal priesthood, which, with its loosing and
 binding, can prohibit or permit only external communion among
 Christians. It is true, God required such measures in the time of the
 Jewish dispensation, that he might restrain by fear; just as now he
 sanctions church discipline when rightly employed, in order to punish
 and restrain the evil-doer, though it has no power in itself to raise
 people to holiness or to push them into wickedness.
 
 6. But with the priesthood of Christ is true spiritual remission,
 sanctification and absolution. These avail before God--God grant that
 it be true of us--whether we be outwardly excommunicated, or holy, or
 not. Christ's blood has obtained for us pardon forever acceptable with
 God. God will forgive our sins for the sake of that blood so long as
 its power shall last and its intercession for grace in our behalf,
 which is forever. Therefore, we are forever holy and blessed before
 God. This is the substance of the text. Now that we shall find it easy
 to understand, we will briefly consider it.
 
 "But Christ having come a high priest of the good things to come."
 
 7. The adornment of Aaron and his descendants, the high priests, was
 of a material nature, and they obtained for the people a merely formal
 remission of sins, performing their office in a perishable temple, or
 tabernacle. It was evident to men that their absolution and
 sanctification before the congregation was a temporal blessing
 confined to the present. But when Christ came upon the cross no one
 beheld him as he went before God in the Holy Spirit, adorned with
 every grace and virtue, a true High Priest. The blessings wrought by
 him are not temporal--a merely formal pardon--but the "blessings to
 come"; namely, blessings which are spiritual and eternal. Paul speaks
 of them as blessings to come, not that we are to await the life to
 come before we can have forgiveness and all the blessings of divine
 grace, but because now we possess them only in faith. They are as yet
 hidden, to be revealed in the future life. Again, the blessings we
 have in Christ were, from the standpoint of the Old Testament
 priesthood, blessings to come.
 
 "Through the greater and more perfect tabernacle, not made with hands,
 that is to say, not of this creation."
 
 8. The apostle does not name the tabernacle he mentions; nor can he,
 so strange its nature! It exists only in the sight of God, and is ours
 in faith, to be revealed hereafter. It is not made with hands, like
 the Jewish tabernacle; in other words, not of "this building." The old
 tabernacle, like all buildings of its nature, necessarily was made of
 wood and other temporal materials created by God. God says in Isaiah
 66, 1-2: "What manner of house will ye build unto me?... For all these
 things hath my hand made, and so all these things came to be." But
 that greater tabernacle has not yet form; it is not yet finished. God
 is building it and he shall reveal it. Christ's words are (Jn 14, 3),
 "And if I go and prepare a place for you."
 
 "Nor yet through the blood of goats and calves, but through his own
 blood, entered in once for all into the holy place, having obtained
 eternal redemption."
 
 9. According to Leviticus 16, the high priest must once a year enter
 into the holy place with the blood of rams and other offerings, and
 with these make formal reconciliation for the people. This ceremony
 typified that Christ, the true Priest, should once die for us, to
 obtain for us the true atonement. But the former sacrifice, having to
 be repeated every year, was but a temporary and imperfect atonement;
 it did not eternally suffice, as does the atonement of Christ. For
 though we fall and sin repeatedly, we have confidence that the blood
 of Christ does not fall, or sin; it remains steadfast before God, and
 the expiation is perpetual and eternal. Under its sway grace is
 perpetually renewed, without work or merit on our part, provided we do
 not stand aloof in unbelief.
 
 "For if the blood of goats and bulls, and the ashes of a heifer," etc.
 
 10. Concerning the water of separation and the ashes of the red
 heifer, read Numbers 19; and concerning the blood of bulls and goats,
 Leviticus 16, 14-15. According to Paul, these were formal and temporal
 purifications, as I stated above. But Christ, in God's sight, purifies
 the conscience of dead works; that is, of sins meriting death, and of
 works performed in sin and therefore dead. Christ purifies from these,
 that we may serve the living God by living works.
 
 "And for this cause he is the mediator of a new covenant [testament],"
 etc.
 
 11. Under the old law, which provided only for formal, or ritualistic,
 pardon, and restored to human fellowship, sin and transgressions
 remained, burdening the conscience. It--the old law--did not benefit
 the soul at all, inasmuch as God did not institute it to purify and
 safeguard the conscience, nor to bestow the Spirit. It existed merely
 for the purpose of outward discipline, restraint and correction. So
 Paul teaches that under the Old Testament dispensation man's
 transgressions remained, but now Christ is our Mediator through his
 blood; by it our conscience is freed from sin in the sight of God,
 inasmuch as God promises the Spirit through the blood of Christ. All,
 however, do not receive him. Only those called to be heirs eternal,
 the elect, receive the Spirit.
 
 12. We find, then, in this excellent lesson, the comforting doctrine
 taught that Christ is he whom we should know as the Priest and Bishop
 of our souls; that no sin is forgiven, nor the Holy Spirit given, by
 reason of works or merit on our part, but alone through the blood of
 Christ, and that to those for whom God has ordained it. This matter
 has been sufficiently set forth in the various postils.
 
 
 
 
 _Palm Sunday_
 
 Text: Philippians 2, 5-11.
 
 5 Have this mind in you, which was also in Christ Jesus: 6 who,
 existing in the form of God, counted not the being on an equality with
 God a thing to be grasped, 7 but emptied himself, taking the form of a
 servant, being made in the likeness of men; 8 and being found in
 fashion as a man, he humbled himself, becoming obedient even unto
 death, yea, the death of the cross. 9 Wherefore also God highly
 exalted him, and gave unto him the name which is above every name; 10
 that in the name of Jesus every knee should bow, of things in heaven
 and things on earth and things under the earth, 11 and that every
 tongue should confess that Jesus Christ is Lord, to the glory of God
 the Father.
 
 
 CHRIST AN EXAMPLE OF LOVE.
 
 1. Here Paul again presents to us as a powerful example of the
 celestial and eternal fire, the love of Christ, for the purpose of
 persuading us to exercise a loving concern for one another. The
 apostle employs fine words and precious admonitions, having perceived
 the indolence and negligence displayed by Christians in this matter of
 loving. For this the flesh is responsible. The flesh continually
 resists the willing spirit, seeking its own interest and causing sects
 and factions. Although a sermon on this same text went forth in my
 name a few years ago, entitled "The Twofold Righteousness," the text
 was not exhausted; therefore we will now examine it word by word.
 
 "Have this mind in you, which was also in Christ Jesus."
 
 2. You are Christians; you have Christ, and in him and through him all
 fullness of comfort for time and eternity: therefore nothing should
 appeal to your thought, your judgment, your pleasure, but that which
 was in the mind of Christ concerning you as the source of your
 welfare. For his motive throughout was not his own advantage;
 everything he did was done for your sake and in your interest. Let men
 therefore, in accord with his example, work every good thing for one
 another's benefit.
 
 "Who, existing in the form of God, counted not the being on an
 equality with God a thing to be grasped, but emptied himself, taking
 the form of a servant."
 
 ["Who, being in the form of God, thought it not robbery to be equal
 with God; but made himself of no reputation, and took upon him the
 form of a servant."]
 
 3. If Christ, who was true God by nature, has humbled himself to
 become servant of all, how much more should such action befit us who
 are of no worth, and are by nature children of sin, death and the
 devil! Were we similarly to humble ourselves, and even to go beyond
 Christ in humility--a thing, however, impossible--we should do nothing
 extraordinary. Our humility would still reek of sin in comparison with
 his. Suppose Christ to humble himself in the least degree--but a
 hair's breadth, so to speak--below the most exalted angels; and
 suppose we were to humble ourselves to a position a thousand times
 more abased than that of the devils in hell; yet our humility would
 not compare in the least with that of Christ. For he is an infinite
 blessing--God himself--and we are but miserable creatures whose
 existence and life are not for one moment secure.
 
 4. What terrible judgment must come upon those who fail to imitate the
 ineffable example of Christ; who do not humble themselves below their
 neighbors and serve them, but rather exalt themselves above them!
 Indeed, the example of Christ may well terrify the exalted, and those
 high in authority; and still more the self-exalted. Who would not
 shrink from occupying the uppermost seat and from lording it over
 others when he sees the Son of God humble and eliminate himself?
 
 5. The phrase "form of God" does not receive the same interpretation
 from all. Some understand Paul to refer to the divine essence and
 nature in Christ; meaning that Christ, though true God, humbled
 himself. While Christ is indeed true God, Paul is not speaking here of
 his divine essence, which is concealed. The word he uses--"morphe," or
 "forma"--he employs again where he tells of Christ taking upon himself
 the form of a servant. "Form of a servant" certainly cannot signify
 "essence of a real servant"--possessing by nature the qualities of a
 servant. For Christ is not our servant by nature; he has become our
 servant from good will and favor toward us. For the same reason
 "divine form" cannot properly mean "divine essence"; for divine
 essence is not visible, while the divine form was truly seen. Very
 well; then let us use the vernacular, and thus make the apostle's
 meaning clear.
 
 6. "Form of God," then, means the assumption of a divine attitude and
 bearing, or the manifestation of divinity in port and presence; and
 this not privately, but before others, who witness such form and
 bearing. To speak in the clearest possible manner: Divine bearing and
 attitude are in evidence when one manifests in word and deed that
 which pertains peculiarly to God and suggests divinity. Accordingly,
 "the form of a servant" implies the assumption of the attitude and
 bearing of a servant in relation to others. It might be better to
 render "Morphe tu dulu," by "the bearing of a servant," that means,
 manners of such character that whoever sees the person must take him
 for a servant. This should make it clear that the passage in question
 does not refer to the manifestation of divinity or servility as such,
 but to the characteristics and the expression of the same. For, as
 previously stated, the essence is concealed, but its manifestation is
 public. The essence implies a condition, while its expression implies
 action.
 
 7. As regards these forms, or manifestations, a threefold aspect is
 suggested by the words of Paul. The essence may exist without the
 manifestation; there may be a manifestation without the corresponding
 essence; and finally, we may find the essence together with its proper
 manifestation. For instance, when God conceals himself and gives no
 indication of his presence, there is divinity, albeit not manifest.
 This is the case when he is grieved and withdraws his grace. On the
 other hand, when he discloses his grace, there is both the essence and
 its manifestation. But the third aspect is inconceivable for God,
 namely, a manifestation of divinity without the essence. This is
 rather a trick of the devil and his servants, who usurp the place of
 God and act as God, though they are anything but divine. An
 illustration of this we find in Ezekiel 28, 2, where the king of Tyre
 is recorded as representing his heart, which was certainly decidedly
 human, as that of a god.
 
 8. Similarly, the form, or bearing, of a servant may be considered
 from a threefold aspect. One may be a servant and not deport himself
 as such, but as a lord, or as God; as in the instance just mentioned.
 Of such a one Solomon speaks (Prov 29, 21), saying: "He that
 delicately bringeth up his servant from a child shall have him become
 a son at the last." Such are all the children of Adam. We who are
 rightly God's servants would be God himself. This is what the devil
 taught Eve when he said, "Ye shall be as God." Gen 3, 5. Again, one
 may be a servant and conduct himself as one, as all just and faithful
 servants behave before the world; and as all true Christians conduct
 themselves in God's sight, being subject to him and serving all men.
 Thirdly, one may be not a servant and yet behave as one. For instance,
 a king might minister to his servants before the world. Before God,
 however, all men being servants, this situation is impossible with
 men; no one has so done but Christ. He says at the supper (Jn 13,
 13-14): "Ye call me, Teacher, and, Lord: and ye say well; for so I
 am," and yet I am among you as a servant. And in another place (Mt 20,
 28), "The Son of man came not to be ministered unto, but to minister."
 
 9. From these explanations Paul's meaning must have become clear. His
 thought is: Christ was in the form of God; that is, both the essence
 and the bearing of Deity were his. He did not assume the divine form
 as he did that of a servant. He was, I repeat it; he was in the form
 of God. The little word "was" expresses that divinity was his both in
 essence and form. The meaning is: Many assume and display an
 appearance of divinity, but are not themselves actually divine; the
 devil, for instance, and Antichrist and Adam's children. This is
 sacrilege--the assumption of divinity by an act of robbery. See Rom 2,
 22. Though the offender does not look upon such conduct as robbery, it
 is none the less robbing divine honor, and is so regarded by God and
 angels and saints, and even by his own conscience. But Christ, who had
 not come by divinity through arrogating it to himself, but was divine
 by nature according to his very essence, did not deem his divinity a
 thing he had grasped; nor could he, knowing divinity to be his very
 birthright, and holding it as his own natural possession from
 eternity.
 
 10. So Paul's words commend Christ's essential divinity and his love
 toward us, and at the same time correct all who falsely assume a
 divine form. Such are we all so long as we are the devil's members.
 The thought is: The devil's members all would be God, would rob the
 divinity they do not possess; and they must admit their action to be
 robbery, for conscience testifies, indeed must testify, that they are
 not God. Though they may despise the testimony of conscience and fail
 to heed it, yet the testimony stands, steadfastly maintaining the act
 as not right--as a malicious robbery.
 
 But the one man, Christ, who did not assume the divine form but was in
 it by right and had a claim upon it from eternity; who did not and
 could not hold it robbery to be equal with God; this man humbled
 himself, taking upon him the form of a servant--not his rightful
 form--that he by the power of his winning example, might induce them
 to assume the bearing of servants who possessed the form and character
 of servants, but who, refusing to own them, appropriated the
 appearance of divinity upon which they had no claim, since the essence
 of divinity was forever beyond them.
 
 11. That some fail to understand readily this great text, is due to
 the fact that they do not accept Paul's words as spoken, but
 substitute their own ideas of what he should have said, namely: Christ
 was born true God and did not rob divinity, etc. The expression "who,
 existing in the form of God" sounds, in the Greek and Latin, almost as
 if Christ had merely borne himself as God, unless particular regard be
 given to the words "existing in," which Paul contrasts with the phrase
 "took upon him." Christ took upon himself the form of a servant, it is
 true, but in that form was no real servant. Just so, while dispensing
 with a divine appearance, behind the appearance chosen was God. And we
 likewise take upon ourselves the divine form, but in the form we are
 not divine; and we spurn the form of servants, though that is what we
 are irrespective of appearance. Christ disrobes himself of the divine
 form wherein he existed, to assume that of a servant, which did not
 express his essential character; but we lay aside the servant form of
 our real being and take upon ourselves, or arrogate to ourselves, the
 form of God to which we are not fitted by what we are in reality.
 
 12. They are startled by this expression also: "Christ thought it not
 robbery to be equal with God." Now, at first sight these words do not
 seem to refer solely to Christ, since even the devil and his own, who
 continually aspire to equality with God, do not think their action
 robbery in spite of the testimony of their conscience to the contrary.
 But with Paul the little word "think," or "regard," possesses a
 powerful significance, having the force of "perfect assurance."
 Similarly he says (Rom 3, 28), "We reckon therefore that a man is
 justified by faith apart from the works of the law"; and (1 Cor 7,
 40), "I think [deem] that I also have the spirit of God." But the
 wicked cannot boast it no robbery when they dare take upon themselves
 the form of God; for they know, they are satisfied in themselves, that
 they are not God. Christ, however, did not, nor could he, think
 himself not equal to God; in other words, he was confident of his
 equality with God, and knew he had not stolen the honor.
 
 Paul's words are chosen, not as an apology for Christ, but as a severe
 rebuke for those who arrogate to themselves the form of God against
 the protest of conscience that it is not their own but stolen. The
 apostle would show how infinitely Christ differs from them, and that
 the divine form they would take by theft is Christ's by right.
 
 13. Paul does not use this expression, however, when he refers to
 Christ's assumption of the servant form which is his, not by nature,
 but by assumption. The words produce the impression that Christ took
 by force something not his own. Paul should be expected to say: "He
 held it not robbery to assume the form of a servant." Why should he
 rather have chosen that form of expression in the first instance,
 since Christ did not assume the divine form, but possessed it as his
 very own--yes, laid it aside and assumed a form foreign to his nature?
 The substance of the matter is that he who becomes a servant does not
 and cannot assume anything, but only gives, giving even himself. Hence
 there is no warrant here to speak of robbery or of a disposition to
 look upon the matter in this light.
 
 On the other hand, assumption of the divine form necessarily involves
 taking, and altogether precludes giving. Hence there is warrant to
 speak of robbery in this connection, and of men who so view it. But
 this charge cannot be brought against Christ. He does not render
 himself guilty of robbery, nor does he so view his relation, as all
 others must do. Divinity is his by right, and so is its appropriate
 form a birthright.
 
 14. Thus, it seems to me, this text very clearly teaches that to have
 divine form is simply to assume in regard to others, in word and deed,
 the bearing of God and Lord; and that Christ meets this test in the
 miraculous signs and life-giving words, as the Gospels contend. He
 does not rank with the saints who lack the divine essence; he has, in
 addition to divine form, the divine essence and nature. On the other
 hand, the servant, or servile, form implies acting toward others, in
 word and deed, like a servant. Thus Christ did when he served the
 disciples and gave himself for us. But he served not as the saints,
 who are servants by nature. Service was, with him, something assumed
 for our benefit and as an example for us to follow, teaching us to act
 in like manner toward others, to disrobe ourselves of the appearance
 of divinity as he did, as we shall see.
 
 15. Unquestionably, then, Paul proclaims Christ true God. Had he been
 mere man, what would have been the occasion for saying that he became
 like a man and was found in the fashion of other men? and that he
 assumed the form of a servant though he was in form divine? Where
 would be the sense in my saying to you, "You are like a man, are made
 in the fashion of a man, and take upon yourself the form of a
 servant"? You would think I was mocking you, and might appropriately
 reply: "I am glad you regard me as a man; I was wondering if I were an
 ox or a wolf. Are you mad or foolish?" Would not that be the natural
 rejoinder to such a foolish statement? Now, Paul not being foolish,
 nor being guilty of foolish speech, there truly must have been
 something exalted and divine about Christ. For when the apostle
 declares that he was made like unto other men, though the fact of his
 being human is undisputed, he simply means that the man Christ was
 God, and could, even in his humanity, have borne himself as divine.
 But this is precisely what he did not do; he refrained: he disrobed
 himself of his divinity and bore himself as a mere man like others.
 
 16. What follows concerning Christ, now that we understand the meaning
 of "form of God" and "form of a servant," is surely plain. In fact,
 Paul himself tells us what he means by "form of a servant." First: He
 makes the explanation that Christ disrobed, or divested himself; that
 is, appeared to lay aside his divinity in that he divested himself of
 its benefit and glory. Not that he did, or could, divest himself of
 his divine nature; but that he laid aside the form of divine
 majesty--did not act as the God he truly was. Nor did he divest
 himself of the divine form to the extent of making it unfelt and
 invisible; in that case there would have been no divine form left. He
 simply did not affect a divine appearance and dazzle us by its
 splendor; rather he served us with that divinity. He performed
 miracles. And during his suffering on the cross he, with divine power,
 gave to the murderer the promise of Paradise. Lk 23, 43. And in the
 garden, similarly, he repelled the multitude by a word. Jn 18, 6.
 
 Hence Paul does not say that Christ was divested by some outside
 power; he says Christ "made himself" of no repute. Just so the wise
 man does not in a literal way lay aside wisdom and the appearance of
 wisdom, but discards them for the purpose of serving the simple-minded
 who might fittingly serve him. Such man makes himself of no reputation
 when he divests himself of his wisdom and the appearance of wisdom.
 
 17. Second: Christ assumed the form of a servant, even while remaining
 God and having the form of God; he was God, and his divine words and
 works were spoken and wrought for our benefit. As a servant, he served
 us with these. He did not require us to serve him in compensation for
 them, as in the capacity of a Lord he had a just right to do. He
 sought not honor or profit thereby, but our benefit and salvation. It
 was a willing service and gratuitously performed, for the good of men.
 It was a service unspeakably great, because of the ineffable greatness
 of the minister and servant--God eternal, whom all angels and
 creatures serve. He who is not by this example heartily constrained to
 serve his fellows, is justly condemned. He is harder than stone,
 darker than hell and utterly without excuse.
 
 18. Third: "Being made in the likeness of men." Born of Mary, Christ's
 nature became human. But even in that humanity he might have exalted
 himself above all men and served none. But he forbore and became as
 other men. And by "likeness of men" we must understand just ordinary
 humanity without special privilege whatever. Now, without special
 privilege there is no disparity among men. Understand, then, Paul says
 in effect: Christ was made as any other man who has neither riches,
 honor, power nor advantage above his fellows; for many inherit power,
 honor and property by birth. So lowly did Christ become, and with such
 humility did he conduct himself, that no mortal is too lowly to be his
 equal, even servants and the poor. At the same time, Christ was sound,
 without bodily infirmities, as man in his natural condition might be
 expected to be.
 
 19. Fourth: "And being found in fashion as a man." That is, he
 followed the customs and habits of men, eating and drinking, sleeping
 and waking, walking and standing, hungering and thirsting, enduring
 cold and heat, knowing labor and weariness, needing clothing and
 shelter, feeling the necessity of prayer, and having the same
 experience as any other man in his relation to God and the world. He
 had power to avoid these conditions; as God he might have demeaned and
 borne himself quite differently. But in becoming man, as above stated,
 he fared as a human being, and he accepted the necessities of ordinary
 mortals while all the time he manifested the divine form which
 expressed his true self.
 
 20. Fifth: "He humbled himself," or debased himself. In addition to
 manifesting his servant form in becoming man and faring as an ordinary
 human being, he went farther and made himself lower than any man. He
 abased himself to serve all men with the supreme service--the gift of
 his life in our behalf.
 
 21. Sixth: He not only made himself subject to men, but also to sin,
 death and the devil, and bore it all for us. He accepted the most
 ignominious death, the death on the cross, dying not as a man but as a
 worm (Ps 22, 6); yes, as an arch-knave, a knave above all knaves, in
 that he lost even what favor, recognition and honor were due to the
 assumed servant form in which he had revealed himself, and perished
 altogether.
 
 22. Seventh: All this Christ surely did not do because we were worthy
 of it. Who could be worthy such service from such a one? Obedience to
 the Father moved him. Here Paul with one word unlocks heaven and
 permits us to look into the unfathomable abyss of divine majesty and
 to behold the ineffable love of the Fatherly heart toward us--his
 gracious will for us. He shows us how from eternity it has been God's
 pleasure that Christ, the glorious one who has wrought all this,
 should do it for us. What human heart would not melt at the
 joy-inspiring thought? Who would not love, praise and thank God and in
 return for his goodness, not only be ready to serve the world, but
 gladly to embrace the extremity of humility? Who would not so do when
 he is aware that God himself has such precious regard for him, and
 points to the obedience of his Son as the pouring out and evidence of
 his Fatherly will. Oh, the significance of the words Paul here uses!
 such words as he uses in no other place! He must certainly have burned
 with joy and cheer. To gain such a glimpse of God--surely this must be
 coming to the Father through Christ. Here is truly illustrated the
 truth that no one comes to Christ except the Father draw him; and with
 what power, what delicious sweetness, the Father allures! How many are
 the preachers of the faith who imagine they know it all, when they
 have received not even an odor or taste of these things! How soon are
 they become masters who have never been disciples! Not having tasted
 God's love, they cannot impart it; hence they remain unprofitable
 babblers.
 
 "Wherefore also God highly exalted him."
 
 23. As Christ was cast to the lowest depths and subjected to all
 devils, in obeying God and serving us, so has God exalted him Lord
 over all angels and creatures, and over death and hell. Christ now has
 completely divested himself of the servant form--laid it aside.
 Henceforth he exists in the divine form, glorified, proclaimed,
 confessed, honored and recognized as God.
 
 While it is not wholly apparent to us that "all things are put in
 subjection" to Christ, as Paul says (1 Cor 15, 27), the trouble is
 merely with our perception of the fact. It is true that Christ is thus
 exalted in person and seated on high in the fullness of power and
 might, executing everywhere his will; though few believe the order of
 events is for the sake of Christ. Freely the events order themselves,
 and the Lord sits enthroned free from all restrictions. But our eyes
 are as yet blinded. We do not perceive him there nor recognize that
 all things obey his will. The last day, however, will reveal it. Then
 we shall comprehend present mysteries; how Christ laid aside his
 divine form, was made man, and so on; how he also laid aside the form
 of a servant and resumed the divine likeness; how as God he appeared
 in glory; and how he is now Lord of life and death, and the King of
 Glory.
 
 This must suffice on the text. For how we, too, should come down from
 our eminence and serve others has been sufficiently treated of in
 other postils. Remember, God desires us to serve one another with
 body, property, honor, spirit and soul, even as his Son served us.
 
 
 
 
 SUMMER PART
 
 
 
 
 _Easter Sunday_
 
 Text: First Corinthians 5, 6-8.
 
 6 Your glorying is not good. Know ye not that a little leaven
 leaveneth the whole lump? 7 Purge out the old leaven, that ye may be a
 new lump, even as ye are unleavened. For our passover also hath been
 sacrificed, even Christ: 8 wherefore let us keep the feast, not with
 old leaven, neither with the leaven of malice and wickedness, but with
 the unleavened bread of sincerity and truth.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO WALK AS CHRISTIANS.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This and all the following sermons on the Epistle Texts
 were first printed in 1540 and 1543 and included in the Epistle
 Postil.]
 
 1. When God was about to lead the Israelites out of Egypt, he
 commanded, shortly before their departure, that they should eat the
 Passover the night they started; and as a perpetual memorial of their
 redemption, they were annually, on the recurrence of the season, to
 celebrate the feast of Easter for seven days. A specially urgent
 feature of the command was that on the first evening of the feast they
 must put out of their houses all leaven and leavened bread, and during
 the seven days eat none but the unleavened bread, or cakes. Hence the
 evangelists speak of the feast as the Feast (or Days) of Unleavened
 Bread. Mk 14, 1; Lk 22, 1.
 
 2. Paul, in this lesson, explains the figure in brief but beautiful
 and expressive words. He is prompted to introduce the subject by the
 fact that in the preceding verses of this chapter he has been
 reproving the Corinthians for their disposition to boast of the Gospel
 and of Christ while abusing such liberty unto unchastity and other
 sins. He admonishes them that, possessing the Gospel and having become
 Christians, they ought, as becomes Christians, to live according to
 the Gospel, avoiding everything not consistent with the faith and with
 Christian character--everything not befitting them as new creatures.
 
 3. So the apostle uses the figure of the Paschal lamb and unleavened
 bread requisite at the Jews' Feast of the Passover, in his effort to
 point the Corinthians to the true character and purpose of the New
 Testament made with us in the kingdom of Christ. He explains what is
 the true Paschal Lamb and what the unleavened bread, and how to
 observe the real Passover, wherein all must be new and spiritual. In
 the joy and wealth of his mind he presents this analogy to remind them
 that they are Christians and to consider what that means.
 
 His meaning is: Being Christians and God's true people, and called
 upon to observe a Passover, you must go about it in the right way,
 putting away from you all remaining leaven until it shall have been
 purged out utterly.
 
 What Paul means by "leaven" is told later in his phrase "neither with
 the leaven of malice and wickedness"; he means whatever is evil and
 wicked. Everything foreign to Christianity in both doctrine, or faith,
 and life, is "leaven." From all this Paul would have Christians purge
 themselves with the same thoroughness with which the leaven was to be
 put away from their Easter according to the law. And, holding to the
 figure, he would have us observe our Passover in the use of the sweet
 bread, which, in distinction from the leaven, signifies sincerity and
 truth, or a nature and life completely new.
 
 4. The text, then, is but an admonition to upright Christian works,
 directed to those who have heard the Gospel and learned to know
 Christ. This is what Paul figuratively calls partaking of the true
 unleavened bread--or wafers, or cakes. We Germans have borrowed our
 word "cakes" from the phraseology of the Jewish Church, abbreviating
 "oblaten," wafers, into "fladen," or cakes. How else should we
 gentiles get the idea of cakes on Easter, when at our Passover we, by
 faith, eat the Paschal Lamb, Christ? We are admonished to partake of
 the true unleavened bread, that life and conduct may accord with faith
 in Christ, whom we have learned to know. Paul's admonition begins:
 
 "Know ye not that a little leaven leaveneth the whole lump?"
 
 5. This by way of introducing the succeeding admonitions. Leaven is a
 common figure with the apostle, one he uses frequently, almost
 proverbially; employing it, too, in his epistle to the Galatians (ch.
 5, 9). Christ, also, gives us a Scripture parable of the leaven. Mt
 13, 33. It is the nature of leaven that a small quantity mixed with a
 lump of dough will pervade and fill the whole lump until its own acid
 nature has been imparted to it. This Paul makes a figure of spiritual
 things as regards both doctrine and life.
 
 6. In Galatians 5, 9 he makes it more especially typify false
 doctrine. For it is just as true that the introduction of an error in
 an article of faith will soon work injury to the whole and result in
 the loss of Christ. Thus it was with the Galatians. The one thing
 insisted upon by the false apostles was circumcision, though they
 fully intended to preach the Gospel of Christ. Such innovation will
 pursue its course with destructive sweep until even the uncontaminated
 part becomes worthless; the once pure mass is wholly corrupted. The
 apostle writes to the Galatians (ch. 5, 2): "Behold, I Paul say unto
 you, that, if ye receive circumcision, Christ will profit you
 nothing." Again (verse 4), "Ye are severed from Christ--ye are fallen
 away from grace."
 
 But in this text he has reference more particularly to an erroneous
 idea concerning life and conduct. In this instance it is likewise true
 that, once the flesh be allowed any license, and liberty be abused,
 and that under the name of the Gospel, there is introduced a leaven
 which will speedily corrupt faith and conscience, and continue its
 work until Christ and the Gospel are lost. Such would have been the
 fate of the Corinthians had not Paul saved them from it by this
 epistle admonishing and urging them to purge out the leaven of
 license; for they had begun to practice great wantonness, and had
 given rise to sects and factions which tended to subvert the one
 Gospel and the one faith.
 
 7. This is, then, wise counsel and serious admonition, that faithful
 guard be maintained against the infusion or introduction into doctrine
 of what is false, whether it pertains to works or faith. The Word of
 God, faith and conscience are very delicate things. The old proverb
 says: "Non patitur jocum fama, fides, oculus;"--Good reputation, faith
 and the eye--these three will bear no jest.
 
 Just as good wine or precious medicines are corrupted by a single drop
 of poison or other impurity, and the purer they are, the more readily
 defiled and poisoned; so, also, God's Word and his cause will bear
 absolutely no alloy. God's truth must be perfectly pure and clear, or
 else, it is corrupt and unprofitable. And the worst feature of the
 matter is, the sway and intrenchment of evil is so strong that it
 cannot be removed; just as leaven, however small the quantity, added
 to the lump of dough, soon penetrates and sours the whole lump, while
 it is impossible to arrest its influence or once more to sweeten the
 dough.
 
 8. The proposal of certain wise minds to mediate, and effect a
 compromise, between us and our opponents of the Papacy, is wrong and
 useless. They would permit preaching of the Gospel but at the same
 time retain the Papistical abuses, advocating that these errors be not
 all censured and rejected, because of the weak; and that for the sake
 of peace and unity we should somehow moderate and restrict our
 demands, each party being ready to yield to the other and patiently
 bear with it. While in such case no perfect purity can be claimed to
 exist, the situation can be made endurable if discretion is used and
 trouble is taken to explain.
 
 Nay, not so! For, as you hear, Paul would not mix even a small
 quantity of leaven with the pure lump, and God himself has urgently
 forbidden it. The slight alloy would thoroughly penetrate and corrupt
 the whole. Where human additions are made to the Gospel doctrine in
 but a single point, the injury is done; truth is obscured and souls
 are led astray. Therefore, such mixture, such patchwork, in doctrine
 is not to be tolerated. As Christ teaches (Mt 9, 16), we must not put
 new cloth upon an old garment.
 
 9. Nor may we in our works and in our daily life tolerate the yielding
 to the wantonness of the flesh and at the same time boast the Gospel
 of Christ, as did the Corinthians, who stirred up among themselves
 divisions and disorder, even to the extent of one marrying his
 stepmother. In such matters as these, Paul says, a little leaven
 leavens and ruins the whole lump--the entire Christian life.
 
 These two things are not consistent with each other: to hold to the
 Christian faith and to live after the wantonness of the flesh, in sins
 and vices condemned by the conscience. Paul elsewhere warns (1 Cor 6,
 9-10): "Be not deceived; neither fornicators, nor idolaters, nor
 adulterers, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with men, nor
 thieves, nor covetous, nor drunkards, nor revilers, nor extortioners,
 shall inherit the kingdom of God." Again (Gal 5, 19-21): "The works of
 the flesh are manifest ... of which I forewarn you, even as I did
 forewarn you, that they who practice such things shall not inherit the
 kingdom of God."
 
 10. Warrant is given here likewise for censuring and restraining the
 rash individuals who assert that men should not be terrified by the
 Law, nor surrendered to Satan. No! it is our duty to teach men to
 purge out the old leaven; we must tell them they are not Christians,
 but devoid of the faith, when they yield to the wantonness of the
 flesh and wilfully persevere in sin against the warning of conscience.
 We should teach that such sins are so much the more vicious and
 damnable when practiced under the name of the Gospel, under cover of
 Christian liberty; for that is despising and blaspheming the name of
 Christ and the Gospel: and therefore such conduct must be positively
 renounced and purged out, as irreconcilable with faith and a good
 conscience.
 
 "Purge out the old leaven, that ye may be a new lump, even as ye are
 unleavened."
 
 11. If we are to be a new, sweet lump, Paul says, we must purge out
 the old leaven. For, as stated, a nature renewed by faith and
 Christianity will not admit of our living as we did when devoid of
 faith and in sin, under the influence of an evil conscience. We cannot
 consistently be "a new lump" and partake of the Passover, and at the
 same time permit the old leaven to remain: for if the latter be not
 purged out, the whole lump will be leavened and corrupted; our
 previous sinful nature will again have supremacy and overthrow the
 faith, the holiness upon which we have entered and a good conscience.
 
 12. Paul does not here speak of leaven in general; he commands to
 purge out the "old leaven," implying there may be good leaven.
 Doubtless he is influenced by respect for the words of the Lord Christ
 where (Mt 13, 33) he likens the kingdom of heaven also to leaven. In
 this latter case leaven cannot be bad in quality; rather, the object
 in mixing it with the lump is to produce good, new bread. Reference is
 to the Word of God, or the preaching of the Gospel, whereby we are
 incorporated into the kingdom of Christ, or the Christian Church.
 Though the Gospel appears to be mean, is despicable and objectionable
 to the world, yet such is its power that wherever introduced it
 spreads, finding disciples in whom it works; it transforms them,
 giving to them its own properties, even as leaven imparts its powers
 to the dough and causes it to rise.
 
 But Paul refers here to old, inactive and worthless leaven. He means
 teachings, views, or manner of life resulting from the Old Adam, from
 flesh and blood, and destructive of the pure, new doctrine, or a
 nature renewed by Christianity. Later on he terms it the "leaven of
 malice and wickedness," and in the verse under consideration bids the
 Corinthians be a new, pure lump.
 
 13. Note the apostle's peculiar words. He enjoins purging out the old
 leaven, assigning as reason the fact: Ye are a new and unleavened
 lump. By a new unleavened lump he means that faith which clings to
 Christ and believes in the forgiveness of sin through him; for he
 immediately speaks of our Passover: Christ, sacrificed for us. By this
 faith the Corinthians are now purified from the old leaven, the leaven
 of sin and an evil conscience, and have entered upon the new life; yet
 they are commanded to purge out the old leaven.
 
 14. Now, how shall we explain the fact that he bids them purge out the
 old leaven that they may be a new lump, when at the same time he
 admits them to be unleavened and a new lump? How can these Corinthians
 be as true, unleavened wafers, or sweet dough, when they have yet to
 purge out the old leaven?
 
 This is an instance of the Pauline and apostolic way of speaking
 concerning Christians and the kingdom of Christ; it shows us what the
 condition really is. It is a discipline wherein a new, Christian life
 is entered upon through faith in Christ the true Passover; hence,
 Easter is celebrated with sweet, unleavened bread. But at the same
 time something of the old life remains, which must be swept out, or
 purged away. However, this latter is not imputed, because faith and
 Christ are there, constantly toiling and striving to thoroughly purge
 out whatever uncleanness remains.
 
 15. Through faith we have Christ and his purity perfectly conferred
 upon ourselves, and we are thus regarded pure; yet in our own personal
 nature we are not immediately made wholly pure, without sin or
 weakness. Much of the old leaven still remains, but it will be
 forgiven, not be imputed to us, if only we continue in faith and are
 occupied with purging out that remaining impurity.
 
 This is Christ's thought when he says to his disciples (Jn 15, 3),
 "Already ye are clean because of the word which I have spoken unto
 you," and in the same connection he declares that the branches in him
 must be purged that they may bring forth more fruit. And to Peter--and
 to others--he says (Jn 13, 10), "He that is bathed needeth not save to
 wash his feet, but is clean every whit: and ye are clean, but not
 all." These passages, as is also stated elsewhere, teach that a
 Christian by faith lays hold upon the purity of Christ, for which
 reason he is also regarded pure and begins to make progress in purity;
 for faith brings the Holy Spirit, who works in man, enabling him to
 withstand and to subdue sin.
 
 16. They are to be censured according to whose representations and
 views a Christian Church is to be advocated which should be in all
 respects without infirmity and defect, and who teach that, when
 perfection is not in evidence, there is no such thing as the Church of
 Christ nor as true Christians. Many erring spirits, especially strong
 pretenders to wisdom, and precocious, self-made saints, immediately
 become impatient at sight of any weakness in Christians who profess
 the Gospel faith; for their own dreams are of a Church without any
 imperfections, a thing impossible in this earthly life, even they
 themselves not being perfect.
 
 17. Such, we must know, is the nature of Christ's office and dominion
 in his Church that though he really does instantaneously, through
 faith, confer upon us his purity, and by the Spirit transforms our
 hearts, yet the work of transformation and purification is not at once
 completed. Daily Christ works in us and purges us, to the end that we
 grow in purity daily. This work he carries on in us through the agency
 of the Word, admonishing, reproving, correcting and strengthening; as
 in the case of the Corinthians through the instrumentality of Paul.
 Christ also uses crosses and afflictions in effecting this end.
 
 He did not come to toil, to suffer and to die because he expected to
 find pure and holy people. Purity and holiness for us he has acquired
 in his own person to perfection, inasmuch as he was without sin and
 perfectly pure from the moment he became man, and this purity and
 holiness he communicates to us in their flawless perfection in so far
 our faith clings to him. But to attain personal purity of such
 perfection requires a daily effort on the part of Christ, until the
 time shall have come that he has wrought in us a flawless perfection
 like his own.
 
 So he has given us his Word and his Spirit to aid us in purging out
 the remaining old leaven, and in holding to our newly-begun purity
 instead of lapsing from it. We must retain the faith, the Spirit and
 Christ; and this, as before said, we cannot do if we give place to the
 old carnal disposition instead of resisting it.
 
 18. Note, one thing the text teaches: Even the saints have weakness,
 uncleanness and sin yet to be purged out, but it is not imputed unto
 them because they are in Christ and occupied in purging out the old
 leaven.
 
 19. Another thing, it teaches what constitutes the difference between
 the saints and the unholy, for both are sinful; it tells the nature of
 sins despite the presence of which saints and believers are holy,
 retaining grace and the Holy Spirit, and also what sins are
 inconsistent with faith and grace.
 
 20. The sins remaining in saints after conversion are various evil
 inclinations, lusts and desires natural to man and contrary to the Law
 of God. The saints, as well as others, are conscious of these sins,
 but with this difference: they do not permit themselves to be overcome
 thereby so as to obey the sins, allowing them free course; they do not
 yield to, but resist, such sins, and, as Paul expresses it here,
 incessantly purge themselves therefrom. The sins of the saints,
 according to him, are the very ones which they purge out. Those who
 obey their lusts, however, do not do this, but give rein to the flesh,
 and sin against the protest of their own consciences.
 
 They who resist their sinful lusts retain faith and a good conscience,
 a thing impossible with those who fail to resist sin and thus violate
 their conscience and overthrow their faith. If you persist in that
 which is evil regardless of the voice of conscience, you cannot say,
 nor believe, that you have God's favor. So then, the Christian
 necessarily must not yield to sinful lusts.
 
 21. The Holy Spirit is given for the very purpose of opposing sin and
 preventing its reign. Paul says (Gal 5, 17): "For the flesh lusteth
 against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh ... that ye may
 not do the things that ye would." And again (Rom 8, 13): "If by the
 Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye shall live." Also
 (Rom 6, 12): "Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye
 should obey the lusts thereof."
 
 "For our passover also hath been sacrificed, even Christ."
 
 ["For even Christ our Passover is sacrificed for us."]
 
 22. Here Paul assigns his reason for the statement just made--"Ye are
 unleavened." They are a new, unleavened or sweet lump, not because of
 any merit on their part, not because of their own holiness or
 worthiness, but because they have faith in Christ as the Passover
 sacrificed for them. This sacrifice makes them pure and holy before
 God. They are no more the old leaven they were when out of Christ. By
 this sacrifice they are reconciled with God and purified from sin.
 
 23. Likewise for us God institutes a new ordinance, a new festival.
 The old has given place to something wholly new. A different and
 better Passover sacrifice succeeds that of the Jews. The Jews had
 annually to partake of their offered sacrifice, but they were not
 thereby made holy nor pure from sin. Theirs was a sign or earnest of
 the true Passover to come, the Passover promised by God, in the shed
 blood of which we are washed from sin and wholly healed--a Passover
 the partaking whereof we must enjoy by faith. We have now one
 perpetual and eternal Easter festival, wherein faith is nourished,
 satisfied and gladdened; in other words, we receive remission of sins
 and comfort and strength through this our Passover, Christ.
 
 24. The meaning of the phrase "sacrificed for us" has been explained
 in the sermon on the Passion of Christ. Two thoughts are there
 presented: First, necessity of considering the greatness and terror of
 the wrath of God against sin in that it could be appeased and a ransom
 effected in no other way than through the one sacrifice of the Son of
 God. Only his death and the shedding of his blood could make
 satisfaction. And we must consider also that we by our sinfulness had
 incurred that wrath of God and therefore were responsible for the
 offering of the Son of God upon the cross and the shedding of his
 blood.
 
 Well may we be terrified because of our sins, for God's wrath cannot
 be trivial when we are told no sacrifice save alone the Son of God can
 brave such wrath and avail for sin. Do you imagine yourself able to
 endure that wrath of God, or to withstand it if you will not consider
 this and accept it?
 
 25. The second thought presented in the sermon mentioned is, the
 necessity of recognizing the inexpressible love and grace of God
 toward us. Only so can the terrified heart of man regain comfort. It
 must be made aware why God spared not his own Son but offered him a
 sacrifice upon the cross, delivered him to death; namely, that his
 wrath might be lifted from us once more. What greater love and
 blessing could be shown? The sacrifice of Christ is presented to us to
 give us sure comfort against the terrors of sin. For we may perceive
 and be confident that we shall not be lost because of our sins when
 God makes such a sacrifice the precious pledge to us of his favor and
 promised salvation.
 
 Therefore, though your sins are great and deserve the awful wrath of
 God, yet the sacrifice represented by the death of the Son of God is
 infinitely greater. And in this sacrifice God grants you a sure token
 of his grace and the forgiveness of your sins. But that forgiveness
 must be apprehended by the faith which holds fast the declaration,
 "Christ our Passover is sacrificed for us." By this promise must faith
 be comforted and strengthened.
 
 "Wherefore let us keep the feast, not with old leaven, neither with
 the leaven of malice and wickedness, but with the unleavened bread of
 sincerity and truth."
 
 26. Having, then, a Paschal Lamb and a true Easter, let us rightly
 value them. Let us observe the festival with the gladness it ought to
 inspire. Let us no longer eat the old leaven, but true wafers and
 paschal cakes. Where the Paschal Lamb is, there must be the unleavened
 bread. The former is Christ sacrificed for us. To this sacrifice we
 can add nothing; we can only receive and enjoy it by faith,
 recognizing it as a gift to us.
 
 However, possessing the Paschal Lamb, it is incumbent upon us to
 partake also of the sweet festal bread; in other words, while
 embracing the faith of the Passover, we are to maintain the true
 doctrine of the Gospel, illustrating it by the godly example of our
 own lives. We should live an eternal Easter life, as it were, to carry
 out Paul's analogy, a life wherein we, as justified, sanctified and
 purified people, continue in peace and the joy of the Holy Spirit, so
 long as we remain on earth.
 
 27. In this verse, as in the preceding one, Paul contrasts the leaven
 and the unleavened bread. He makes leaven a general term for
 everything which proceeds from flesh and blood and an unrenewed sinful
 nature, but classifies it under two heads--the leaven of malice and
 the leaven of wickedness. By "malice" we understand the various open
 vices and sins which represent manifest wrong to God and our neighbor.
 "Wickedness" stands for those numerous evil tricks, those nimble,
 subtle, venomous artifices practiced upon Christian doctrine and the
 Word of God with intent to corrupt and pervert them, to mislead hearts
 from the true meaning thereof. Paul warns (2 Cor 11, 3): "But I fear,
 lest by any means, as the serpent beguiled Eve in his craftiness, your
 minds should be corrupted from the simplicity and the purity that is
 toward Christ." Under "wickedness" comes also such evils as hypocrisy
 and other false, deceptive dealing practiced in the name of God by way
 of adorning and covering the sin; false teaching and deceptive action
 passed off as right, proper and Christian. Such wickedness Christ
 terms "the leaven of the Pharisees and the leaven of Herod." Mk 8, 15.
 This sort of leaven, particularly, we have in the world to an
 unspeakable extent in this last and worst of times.
 
 28. To the leaven of malice and of wickedness, Paul opposes the leaven
 of sincerity and truth. To be sincere is to live and act in an upright
 Christian way, prompted by a faithful, godly heart, a heart kindly
 disposed to all and meditating wrong and injury to none; and to deal
 as you would be dealt with. To be true is to refrain from false and
 crafty dealing, from deceit and roguery, and to teach and live in
 probity and righteousness according to the pure Word of God. Truth and
 sincerity must prevail and be in evidence with Christians, who have
 entered upon a relation and life altogether new; they should celebrate
 the new Easter festival by bringing faith and doctrine and life into
 accord with it.
 
 
 
 
 _Easter Monday_
 
 Text: Acts 10, 34-43.
 
 34 And Peter opened his mouth, and said: Of a truth I perceive that
 God is no respecter of persons: 35 but in every nation he that feareth
 him, and worketh righteousness, is acceptable to him. 36 The word
 which he sent unto the children of Israel, preaching good tidings of
 peace by Jesus Christ (he is Lord of all)--37 that saying ye
 yourselves know, which was published throughout all Judaea, beginning
 from Galilee, after the baptism which John preached; 38 even Jesus of
 Nazareth, how God anointed him with the Holy Spirit and with power:
 who went about doing good, and healing all that were oppressed of the
 devil; for God was with him. 39 And we are witnesses of all things
 which he did both in the country of the Jews, and in Jerusalem; whom
 also they slew, hanging him on a tree. 40 Him God raised up the third
 day, and gave him to be made manifest, 41 not to all the people, but
 unto witnesses that were chosen before of God, even to us, who ate and
 drank with him after he rose from the dead. 42 And he charged us to
 preach unto the people, and to testify that this is he who is ordained
 of God to be the Judge of the living and the dead. 43 To him bear all
 the prophets witness, that through his name every one that believeth
 on him shall receive remission of sins.
 
 
 THE BLESSINGS OF CHRIST'S RESURRECTION.
 
 1. This sermon Peter preached to Cornelius, the Cesarean centurion, a
 gentile but a believer, and to the centurion's assembled friends,
 Peter having been summoned by Cornelius and having responded to the
 call in obedience to a revelation and to the Holy Spirit's command, as
 related in the preceding verses of the chapter. It is an excellent
 sermon and bears strong testimony to Christ's resurrection. As should
 ever be the case with the sermons of apostles and preachers of the
 Gospel, it is not only a historical record of Christ's life, death and
 resurrection, but portrays the power and blessing thereof. The entire
 sermon being easily understood without explanation--for it is itself
 an exposition of the article on Christ's resurrection--we will go over
 it but briefly.
 
 2. First, Peter begins with the inception of the preaching of the
 Gospel of Christ, suggesting how it was promised in the Scriptures,
 being declared by the prophets, that Christ should come with a new
 doctrine, confirming it by miracles; also that he must suffer and die
 and rise from the dead, establishing thus a new kingdom; and how the
 promise was fulfilled. For confirmation of his words Peter appeals to
 his hearers, reminding them of their own knowledge that such was the
 promise of the Scriptures, and that the message has gone forth, not
 being uttered secretly, in a corner, but being proclaimed throughout
 all Judea; and how John the Baptist had shortly before testified he
 was sent as Christ's herald to prepare his way by directing and
 leading the people to Christ, etc.
 
 
 THE GOSPEL A DOCTRINE OF PEACE.
 
 3. Then Peter explains this new Gospel message as the doctrine of
 peace, the peace proclamation commanded of God; in other words,
 salvation and every good thing. The apostle portrays it as a
 comforting message, a Gospel of joy and grace, a message not accusing,
 threatening and terrifying with a vision of God's wrath for our sin,
 as did Moses with his doctrine of the Law. Peter offers to the
 hitherto terrified, God's favor, remission of sins and eternal life.
 
 Similarly, of old did the prophets prophesy of this Gospel, calling it
 the message of peace. Peter's language is borrowed from them. For
 instance, Zechariah prophesies (ch. 9, 10), "He shall speak peace unto
 the nations." And Isaiah (ch. 52, 7), "How beautiful upon the
 mountains are the feet of him that bringeth good tidings, that
 publisheth peace!" Paul offers the same thought (Eph 2, 17), "And he
 came and preached peace to you that were far off, and peace to them
 that were nigh." A delightful message is this in which God recalls his
 wrath and, as Paul says (2 Cor 5, 18-20), reconciles us unto himself,
 having commanded the Gospel to be preached to the world for that very
 purpose, and the office of preaching to be called the ministry of
 reconciliation; and God admonishes us to be reconciled unto himself,
 to be his friends, that we may from him receive grace and every good
 thing.
 
 4. Second: Peter declares what the Gospel message records concerning
 Christ: what he has wrought and the nature of his office--how he
 preached and worked miracles in the service, and for the relief, of
 all men; what thanks and reward his own people accorded him, in that
 they nailed him to the cross and put him to death; that nevertheless
 Christ was not destroyed by the power of the world nor overcome by
 death, but even retained his freedom, showing himself after death and
 letting his voice be heard; and that he is now exalted Lord and Judge
 over all.
 
 
 THE ARTICLE OF FAITH ON THE RESURRECTION.
 
 5. Here are comprised in a few words the entire history of the Gospel,
 and the articles of the Christian faith; but particularly does Peter
 deal with the article of the resurrection, the fact that Christ has,
 in his own person, completely overcome death and reigns eternal King
 and Lord of life. In proof of the truth of this article, the apostle
 adduces the fact of Christ's manifesting himself alive to his
 disciples, eating and drinking with them and appointing them special
 witnesses to these things as men to whom the doctrine had been proven,
 had been established by actual sight of the miracles.
 
 6. Third: Peter states the item of chief importance in the article,
 the blessing resulting to us. He explains first why Christ suffered
 all these things, and how the Gospel was to be published and received;
 Christ's motive in it all was not his advantage but our good. Before
 we could know the truth and be blessed, it was necessary that the
 message be preached. God commanded the apostles, Peter says, to preach
 the Gospel in all the world that all men might know it; and thus the
 blessing is brought to men through the public office of the ministry.
 
 7. Fourth: Our obligation concerning the message brought to us, and
 what it works in ourselves, is indicated in these concluding words of
 Peter's sermon:
 
 "To him bear all the prophets witness, that through his name every one
 that believeth on him shall receive remission of sins."
 
 8. This verse constitutes the principal theme of the sermon. It is one
 of the greatest in the writings of the apostles. It contains the vital
 element of the Gospel message, teaching how we may appropriate its
 blessing, how obtain what it offers, namely, by faith; faith lays hold
 of what is offered us in the Gospel. The message is preached that we
 may receive and retain it. Through the Word the blessing is pronounced
 our own--it is offered to, or given, us; but by faith we receive it,
 make it our own, permit it to work in us.
 
 9. This power and work in us is called by Peter "remission of sins."
 This is the blessing, the possession, conferred through the preaching
 of the doctrine of Christ, or the articles of faith, particularly the
 articles of the resurrection. The meaning of the new message of
 comfort, the new declaration of peace, is that Christ, through his
 resurrection, has in himself conquered our sin and death, has turned
 away the wrath of God and procured grace and salvation; that he has
 commanded forgiveness to be preached unto us, desiring us to believe
 he gives it and confidently to receive it through faith.
 
 10. Faith must be of such character as to apprehend and hold fast the
 truth Peter declares in this verse. It must say "in his name." That
 is, must ascribe to Christ alone the entire agency, merit and power
 responsible for remission of sins; must believe we have forgiveness,
 not through our own worthiness, but for Christ's sake alone; must
 believe that by virtue of Christ's resurrection we obtain remission of
 sins, every namable element not from Christ being completely excluded,
 and the honor given to him alone.
 
 What does the work, the ability, of all mankind amount to when it
 comes to accomplishing or meriting a thing of such magnitude as
 remission of sins and redemption from death and eternal wrath? How
 will it compare with the death and shed blood of the Son of God, with
 the power of his resurrection? How will it divide honors with him in
 having merit to secure remission of sin and redemption from death? The
 efficacy of Christ's death and blood alone God would have preached in
 all the world and accepted by mankind. Therein he rejects the boasting
 of the Jews and of all aspirers to holiness through their own works,
 teaching them they cannot obtain his favor through the Law, or by
 their own efforts. In Christ's name alone is remission of sins
 received, and that through faith.
 
 11. Salvation through Christ, according to Peter, was before that time
 proclaimed in the Scriptures, being declared by all the prophets. This
 is truly strong testimony adduced by the apostle; the Jewish people
 certainly ought to believe their own prophets unless they wilfully are
 hardened and lost. Much more should we gentiles have faith in Christ's
 atonement, being obliged to confess that not in any wise have we done
 aught that such grace should be offered and given to us. We certainly
 ought to be honest enough to honor Christ to the extent of believing
 the apostles, in fact the Scriptures entire. We ought to be ashamed to
 doubt or question the fact of forgiveness of sins and justification
 before God through Christ alone, to which all Scripture testifies. If
 we are honest with ourselves, we must confess it the truth, or secure
 forgiveness of sins or be justified before God by our own works.
 
 12. Now we have heard what is the substance, the chief doctrine, of
 the Scriptures, the teaching to which all portions lead; namely, to
 teach and confirm the article of faith: we have remission of sins for
 Christ's sake, through faith. We have heard that such was the faith of
 the fathers, the prophets and all saints, from the beginning of the
 world, and later was the doctrine preached by Christ himself, and also
 the doctrine of the apostles, who were commanded to publish it to the
 world. To this day the same doctrine prevails, and it will until the
 end be unanimously accepted by the whole Christian Church, with the
 exception of our present opponents. The Christian Church has ever, as
 a unit, believed, confessed and contended for this article, the
 article maintaining that only in the name of the Lord Christ is
 remission of sin obtained; and in this faith its members have been
 justified before God and saved. Thus by such testimony is the
 foundation of our doctrine laid sufficiently firm; that article was
 with power contended for, defended and established long before our
 time.
 
 13. He who inquires, who would know exactly, what the Christian Church
 ever holds and teaches, especially concerning the all-important
 article of justification before God, or the forgiveness of sins, over
 which there has always been contention, has it here plainly and
 exactly in this text. Here is the unwavering testimony of the entire
 Church from the beginning. It is not necessary, then, to dispute about
 the doctrine any more. No one can name any just reason, or have any
 excuse, for doubts on the subject; or reasonably wait for further
 determinations of investigating councils.
 
 In this text we see that the reliability of the article of faith has
 long ago been proven, even in ancient time, by the Church of the
 primitive fathers, of the prophets and the apostles. A solid
 foundation is established, one all men are bound to believe and
 maintain at the risk of their eternal salvation, whatever councils may
 establish, or the world advance and determine, to the contrary.
 Indeed, the sentence has been declared to us; we are commanded to shun
 every other doctrine that may be believed, taught or ordained. Paul
 says (Gal 1, 8): "But though we, or an angel from heaven, should
 preach unto you any gospel other than that which we preached unto you,
 let him be anathema."
 
 14. You see now against what the Papacy with all its adherents
 blusters and rages, and how they are to be regarded who refuse to hear
 and to tolerate the article Peter here advances and confirms by the
 testimony of all the prophets and of the Scriptures entire; who cease
 not to persecute godly and innocent ones for their acceptance of this
 article of faith, under the pretense of being themselves the Church
 and of magnifying its name to the utmost while opposing us, though at
 the same time their doctrine, faith and deeds openly testify against
 them, proclaiming their belief and teaching to be contrary to the
 testimony of all the prophets and of the entire Church.
 
 By no means can they be the Church who so rashly contradict Peter and
 the Scriptures, who even trample under foot, in his Word, Christ
 himself, the Head. Rather, they must be wicked devils, a miserable
 rabble, the worst enemies of the Christian Church; more wicked and
 pernicious than heathen or Turks.
 
 15. Lastly: Peter, by way of proving conclusively to the world that
 this one Lord, as he names him, Jesus of Nazareth, is the true Messiah
 promised of old in the Scriptures, says: "To him bear all the prophets
 witness." The prophets plainly speak of such a person, one to be born
 of David's flesh and blood, in the city of Bethlehem, who should
 suffer, die and rise again, accomplishing just what this Jesus has
 accomplished and even proven by miraculous signs. Therefore, truly the
 Jews and the non-Christians have no reason to doubt concerning Christ,
 no reason to await the coming of another.
 
 16. Further, Peter, citing the testimony of the prophets, indicates
 the nature of Christ's kingdom as not external power; not temporal
 dominion like that of earthly lords, kings, and emperors; not dominion
 over countries or control of people, property and temporal concerns;
 but a spiritual, eternal kingdom, a kingdom in the hearts of men, an
 authority over, and power opposed to, sin, everlasting death and hell,
 a power able to redeem us from those things and bestow upon us
 salvation. Salvation is ours, Peter teaches, through the preaching of
 the Gospel, and is received by faith. Faith is the obedience every man
 must render unto the Lord. By faith he makes himself subject to Christ
 and partaker of his grace and blessings. Paul also (Rom 1, 5) uses the
 term "unto obedience of faith."
 
 
 
 
 _Easter Tuesday_
 
 Text: Acts 13, 26-39.
 
 26 Brethren, children of the stock of Abraham, and those among you
 that fear God, to us is the word of this salvation sent forth. 27 For
 they that dwell in Jerusalem, and their rulers, because they knew him
 not, nor the voices of the prophets which are read every sabbath,
 fulfilled them by condemning him. 28 And though they found no cause of
 death in him, yet asked they of Pilate that he should be slain. 29 And
 when they had fulfilled all things that were written of him, they took
 him down from the tree, and laid him in a tomb. 30 But God raised him
 from the dead: 31 and he was seen for many days of them that came up
 with him from Galilee to Jerusalem, who are now his witnesses unto the
 people. 32 And we bring you good tidings of the promise made unto the
 fathers, 33 that God hath fulfilled the same unto our children, in
 that he raised up Jesus; as also it is written in the second psalm,
 Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten thee. 34 And as concerning
 that he raised him up from the dead, now no more to return to
 corruption, he hath spoken on this wise, I will give you the holy and
 sure blessings of David. 35 Because he saith also in another psalm,
 Thou wilt not give thy Holy One to see corruption. 36 For David, after
 he had in his own generation served the counsel of God, fell asleep,
 and was laid unto his fathers, and saw corruption: 37 but he whom God
 raised up saw no corruption. 38 Be it known unto you therefore,
 brethren, that through this man is proclaimed unto you remission of
 sins: 39 and by him every one that believeth is justified from all
 things, from which ye could not be justified by the law of Moses.
 
 
 1. This sermon Paul preached in the synagogue at Antioch in Pisidia,
 to the assembled Jews and gentiles. Note, he says, "whosoever among
 you feareth God." It is a counterpart of the sermon in the preceding
 epistle lesson delivered by Peter at Cesarea. Here also the first part
 of the sermon is simply a narration of the historical facts of
 Christ's resurrection, and designed to prove Christ the true Messiah
 promised in the Scriptures. This is sufficiently demonstrated by the
 facts in the case that by his own divine power and strength Christ
 rescued himself from death and the grave, and rose from the dead and
 showed himself alive and talked with men, something no man but Christ
 alone had ever done or ever can do. Paul elsewhere (Rom 1, 3-4) says
 that this Jesus our Lord was born of the seed of David according to
 the flesh, and was declared to be the Son of God with power by the
 resurrection from the dead.
 
 2. Not content with a mere narration of the history of the
 resurrection, Paul cites Scripture testimony incontestably proving
 that Christ necessarily must rise from the dead and set up his
 spiritual and eternal kingdom through the Word he commanded the
 apostles to publish world-wide. He also discloses the true meaning of
 Scripture from revelation itself, showing how to seek and find Christ
 therein. The preceding Gospel lesson also spoke of this.
 
 3. Third, as was true of Peter, Paul does not fail to mention what is
 of surpassing importance, the use of the historical parts of Scripture
 and the blessing and benefit accruing to us from that which Scripture
 proclaims and witnesses; also the method of appropriating its power
 and blessing. And he concludes with a beautiful utterance of apostolic
 power, showing how we are to obtain remission of sins and be saved. He
 says: "Through this man is proclaimed unto you remission of sins: and
 by him every one that believeth is justified from all things, from
 which ye could not be justified by the law of Moses." This certainly
 is a powerful passage and so plain it needs no comment, no further
 explanation. It is a point most firmly established and emphasized
 everywhere in Paul's epistles. We should note well and remember such
 clear passages, that we may gain strength and assurance as to the
 ground of Christian doctrine. Seeing how perfectly, as faithful,
 truthful and harmonious witnesses, these two apostles agree in their
 preaching, we are justified in confidently drawing the conclusion that
 any doctrine at variance with theirs, any teaching concerning the
 remission of sins and our salvation contrary to theirs, is not of the
 church, but of the devil's accursed teachers, a doctrine of Satan's
 own. Gal 1.
 
 
 
 
 _Easter Tuesday_
 
 Second Sermon. Same Text. Acts 13, 26-39.
 
 
 THE WORD AND THE RESURRECTION.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon appeared first in the Church Postil, the
 Explanation of the Epistle and Gospel Texts from Easter to Advent.
 Printed by Hans Lufft, Wittenberg, 1559.]
 
 1. This sermon was preached by Paul in the synagogue at Antioch of
 Pisidia, where were gathered with the Jews some Greek converts.
 Wherever in a city Jews were to be found, there also were their
 synagogues in which they taught and preached; and many gentiles,
 coming to hear, were converted to God through the preaching of his
 Word. Undoubtedly it was by God's wonderful direction that the Jews
 were dispersed throughout the world among the gentiles, after the
 first destruction of Jerusalem by the Assyrians. Inasmuch as this
 dispersion resulted in the spread of the Word, they were instrumental
 in securing salvation for the gentiles and in preparing the way for
 the world-wide preaching of the Gospel by the apostles. For wherever
 the apostles went they found Jewish synagogues and the opportunity to
 preach to a regular congregation, through whom their Gospel might be
 widely disseminated because of the many gentiles also in attendance.
 Had not these gentiles been already accustomed to the Jewish
 synagogues, they would not have listened to the apostles, nor even
 permitted them publicly to preach, strangers that they were.
 
 2. Thus it is Paul comes into the synagogue on the Sabbath, a time
 when the congregation was wont to assemble and read the Scriptures. He
 and Barnabas being guests from the country of the Jews, Paul is
 besought to give an exhortation, or sermon, to the people, whereupon
 he rises and delivers a fine, lengthy discourse concerning Christ: how
 in the Scriptures he had been promised unto the fathers and to David
 the king, had been born of the seed of David and had received the
 public testimony of John the Baptist; how Christ was sacrificed by the
 Jews (Peter gives the same account in the preceding epistle lesson);
 how he rose from the dead and for some time showed himself alive; how
 he then commanded his apostles to publish to the world the new
 doctrine that God's promise to the Jews had been fulfilled; and how,
 by his resurrection, he brought to them the promised blessing, namely,
 the remission of sins unattainable through the Law of Moses and all
 their ordinances, but dispensed and imparted alone to faith in the
 Christ proclaimed.
 
 3. As stated later in the text, there were, beside the Jews, many
 gentiles present at the preaching of this sermon, and at its
 conclusion they besought Paul to speak to them again between sabbaths.
 Accordingly, when he came to the synagogue the next sabbath, he found
 almost the whole city assembled.
 
 But to return to the first sermon: Paul says, "Brethren, children of
 the stock of Abraham"--or, native Jews--"and those among you that fear
 God"--who are gentiles. Now, though this could not but be a discourse
 objectionable and highly offensive to the Jews, Paul opens with tender
 and nicely chosen words meant to conciliate and to secure their
 respectful attention. He highly honors them by addressing them as the
 people chosen by God in preference to all the gentiles; as children of
 the holy fathers who had a special claim to the promise of God. But,
 again, he vitiates his pleasing impression when he proclaims to the
 Jews naught else but the crucified and risen Christ, and concludes
 with the statement that with nothing but Moses' Law and ordinances
 they ranked no higher in the sight of God than the gentiles.
 
 
 THE WORD OF SALVATION.
 
 4. Paul's discourse is in perfect harmony with Peter's sermon. Peter
 speaks of God having sent unto the Jews heralds proclaiming peace; and
 Paul here says, "To you [us] is the word of this salvation sent."
 Notwithstanding the joy and comfort wherewith these words are fraught,
 they could not please the Jews. The Jews disdained the idea--in fact,
 it was intolerable to them to hear it expressed--that after their long
 expectation of a Messiah to be lord and king of the world, they should
 receive a mere message, and at that a message rendering of no
 significance at all that Law and government for which they had
 expected, through that Messiah, exaltation and world-wide acceptance.
 Indeed, such an issue could only mean to them having entertained a
 vain hope.
 
 5. Paul makes his teaching yet more offensive by not referring to the
 Gospel simply as the word of peace, as Peter does, but by giving it
 the greater and grander title, "the word of salvation"; in other
 words, a doctrine calculated to heal and save. No grander name could
 be found for the Gospel; for a message of salvation is an expression
 of God's grace, forgiveness of sins, abiding peace and life eternal.
 Moreover, these blessings were not to be bestowed upon the Jews alone;
 they were to be equally shared with the gentiles, who had no knowledge
 of God, of the Law, or of divine worship. The gentiles were thus to be
 made the equals of the Jews, leaving the latter without preference or
 special merit before God, and without advantage and lordship over the
 former in the world.
 
 6. Thus early in his discourse Paul grows blunt and severe, kneading
 Jews and gentiles into one lump. Indeed, he plainly tells the Jews
 that the Law of Moses did not secure to them the favor of God in the
 past and would be equally profitless in the future; that through the
 Gospel message, and only so, they, and all gentiles as well, were to
 be delivered from sin, death and the power of the devil, and to become
 God's people, with power over all. Yet he presents no other tangible
 token of the great boon he calls salvation and blessedness than his
 preaching alone.
 
 Now, one may say: "The word I hear, and Paul I see, a poor human
 being; but this salvation--grace, life and peace--I behold not. On the
 contrary, I daily see and experience sin, terror, adversity, suffering
 and death, until it seems as if in all humanity none are so utterly
 forsaken by God as the Christians, who hear this message."
 
 7. But this is precisely the precious doctrine to be learned if we are
 to be God's children and sensible of his kingdom within us, a doctrine
 beyond the knowledge and experience of the Jews with their Law and of
 the gentiles with their wisdom drawn from reason--this it is: our
 salvation stands in the word Paul here declares of Christ, a word
 which, in name and reality, is a word of salvation and peace; for
 salvation and peace are the blessings which it offers and imparts.
 
 8. God has sent this word, Paul says. Its origin and conception is not
 with man. It is not the edict of the Roman emperor, nor the command of
 the high-priest at Jerusalem. It is the Word of the God of heaven. In
 it he speaks. He will have the message preached by poor human beings
 as a power unto happiness and salvation, both in name and reality.
 Such the Law never was. Paul says (Rom 1, 16): "I am not ashamed of
 the Gospel: for it is the power of God unto salvation to every one
 that believeth." And God himself has bound up with it our salvation
 when he manifests himself in the voice heard from heaven at Jordan,
 saying of Christ, "This is my beloved Son"--who is to be heard.
 
 9. God desires Christ's Word to be heard. Otherwise expressed, his
 command is: "Here ye have the Word of peace and salvation. Not
 elsewhere may you seek and find these blessings. Cling to this Word if
 you desire peace, happiness and salvation. Let befall what may,
 crosses, afflictions, discord, death--whether you be beheaded, or fall
 victim to pest or stroke, or in whatever manner God may call you
 home--in it all, look only upon me, whose Word promises that you shall
 not die, what seems death being but a sweet sleep, ay, the entrance
 into life eternal." Christ says (Jn 8, 51): "Verily, verily, I say
 unto you. If a man keep my Word, he shall never see death."
 
 Note, it is the keeping of the Word on which Christ lays stress.
 "Keeping" is holding fast to the promise, feeling and all senses to
 the contrary, doubting not the truth of the message heard. For he who
 promises is not man; it is the Lord of heaven and earth and all that
 in them is, who has to this moment controlled and preserved the same.
 One hundred years ago, what were you and I and all men now living but
 absolutely nothing? How and from what was creation effected when there
 was nothing to start with? "He spake and it was done"--that was
 created which before had not existence--declares Psalm 33, 9, quoting
 from Genesis 1; "he commanded, and it stood fast."
 
 10. Being the Word of God, the Gospel is an entirely different thing
 from man's word, no matter though it be spoken by a mere man or even a
 donkey. Therefore, let there be, now or henceforth, discord, terror of
 sin; the menace of death and hell, of the grave and corruption: come
 upon you what may--only press to your heart this Word that Christ has
 sent you a message of salvation--of redemption, of triumph over all
 things; and that he commands you to believe it. Then you will perceive
 that he, as your God and Creator, will not deceive you. What are
 death, the devil and all creatures as a match for Christ?
 
 11. The glory of Christ's message, then, here called by Paul "the word
 of salvation," is much greater and higher than would have been the
 promise of all the kingdoms, all the riches and splendors of the
 world, yes, of both heaven and earth. For what could they benefit if
 one possessed not the Word of salvation and eternal life? With all
 these, when assailed by sins, or by the distress and danger of death,
 one must still say, "Away with all the blessings and joys of the
 world, so that I may hear and have altogether the message of salvation
 sent by Christ." You must hold fast to it and know that it alone gives
 eternal peace and joy; that it must receive your faith in spite of all
 apparent contradiction; that you must not be governed by your reason
 or your feelings, but must regard that as divine, unchangeable and
 eternal truth which God has spoken and commands to be proclaimed. Such
 is Paul's exhortation addressed primarily to the Jews to accept this
 message as sent by God and as being the bearer of wondrous blessings.
 
 12. Next, he proceeds to remove their chief stumbling-block, the thing
 of greatest offense to them. He warns them against the course adopted
 by them of Jerusalem, who had the Word of salvation from Christ
 himself, who read it in the prophets every day, who should have had no
 trouble perceiving that the prophets testified to Christ and that
 there was complete harmony between their teaching and that of Christ
 and the apostles, yet would not understand. Because Christ came not in
 the manner they desired, they condemned the very One whom they read of
 in the Scriptures as appearing with this Word of salvation, the time
 of whose coming had been pointed out, leaving them to know it had long
 since arrived and they had no reason to wait for another. They
 understood not the Scriptures because their minds were completely
 hardened and dominated by the fixed idea that Christ should reign as a
 temporal king. So thoroughly was the whole Jewish nation impressed
 with this belief that the very apostles had no other conception of
 Christ's kingdom, even after his resurrection. As John says (ch. 12,
 16), they did not understand the Scriptures until Christ ascended to
 heaven and the Holy Spirit came.
 
 So long as there hangs before one's eyes this curtain--the carnal
 fancy of a temporal kingdom for Christ, an earthly government for his
 Church--the Scriptures cannot be understood. As Paul says of the Jews
 (2 Cor 3, 14), the veil remaineth in the reading of the Scriptures.
 But this lack of understanding is inexcusable. That is gross and
 wilful blindness which will not receive the instruction and direction
 imparted by the apostles. The Jews continue to rave against the
 Gospel; they will hear nothing of the Christ, though even after
 crucifying him they receive the offer of repentance and remission of
 sins at the hands of the apostles.
 
 13. That Paul should make bold to tell the most prominent men and
 rulers of the whole Jewish nation--the heads of God's people, pillars
 of the Church, as we would say--that not only the common rabble, but
 likewise they themselves did not know and understand the Scriptures
 committed to them; ay, that, not content with such ignorance and
 error, they had themselves become the individuals of whom they read,
 the murderers and crucifiers of the Son of God, their Saviour--this
 was a matter of grave offense indeed!
 
 Offensive indeed was it to have this accusation brought against them,
 a people among whom God had ordained his worship, his temple and
 priesthood, and for whom he had instituted a peculiar government,
 giving the high-priest power to say, Do so or you will be put to
 death. Deut 17, 12. And of them were the glorious and great council of
 the seventy-two elders originally ordained through Moses (Ex 18,
 25-26), the council called the Sanhedrim. They ruled the entire people
 and certainly knew right and wrong according to their law.
 
 Was there not reason here to tear Paul to pieces with red-hot pinchers
 as a seditious character, a public blasphemer, speaking not only
 against the Jewish government but against the honor of God himself;
 daring to accuse all the princes of the nation of being in error, of
 knowing nothing of the Scriptures, even of being murderers of the Son
 of God? The Pope and his crowd lack the credentials of such glory and
 endorsement by God. They have merely reared a system of self-devised
 doctrine and idolatry, which they still defend. Hence, whatever
 censure and condemnation we heap upon the Pope and his crowd is small
 in comparison to the thrust Paul dealt the Jewish leaders.
 
 14. Note, Paul does not stand back for anything. He teaches men
 utterly to disregard the hue and cry of the offended Jews that they
 were the high-priests, teachers, rulers in a government ordained by
 God and commanding the obedience of the people; that teaching
 disobedience to them was equivalent to teaching disobedience to
 parents and to civil government, yes, to God himself--something in the
 nature of the case not to be tolerated. Yet Paul fearlessly does so
 teach, as an apostle of God and in fulfilment of God's command. How
 much more would Paul oppose our popish deceivers who, without the
 authority of God's Word, boast themselves heads of the Church and of
 the people of God, at the same time neither teaching nor understanding
 the Scriptures, but offering their own drivel as God's commands!
 
 15. But what cause has Paul at heart that he dares so boldly condemn
 the judgment of these exalted officials? It is this, according to his
 own statement: There is One called Jesus Christ, of whom the prophets,
 in fact the entire Scriptures, speak. Him the Jews refuse to know. He
 is higher and greater than the high-priests and the rulers, greater
 than the temple or the whole city of Jerusalem. And the Jews know his
 coming means their passing, and their obedience to him as Lord and
 Supreme Ruler. Therefore, they are inexcusable in their rejection of
 Christ. Of no avail is their evasion, "God has given us the dominion
 and the supreme power, and has commanded obedience to us in equal
 degree with obedience to parents."
 
 16. The fact that an individual is a lord or a prince, a father or a
 mother, a child or a subject, administers authority or obeys it, will
 not excuse him from being baptized and believing in Christ. For Christ
 is sole and supreme Lord over all kings, princes and governors. True,
 we should be obedient to parents and to civil authority, but not to
 the extent of disobeying the Lord, him who has created and subjected
 to himself emperors and magistrates equally with the lowliest of men.
 
 But the gentlemen and lords at Jerusalem, like those of our day, were
 unwilling to permit obedience to any but themselves. From such
 conditions arises the present dispute about ecclesiastical authority.
 To go counter to it in obeying God's command--this the ecclesiasts
 unjustly call disobedience and sedition. But such must be our course
 if we are to be loyal to our Lord and theirs, whom they deny.
 
 17. In the matter of salvation, Caiaphas or Pope, Caesar or king,
 avails naught; none avails but Jesus Christ. "Him," says Paul, "the
 rulers of Jerusalem, the Holy City, have killed. Though ye were
 ordained by God and given authority, God no longer regards you,
 because ye reject Christ. Ye have become great blockheads, blind
 leaders, understanding not at all the Scriptures. Yet ye should and
 would teach others, just as Moses and the prophets have pointed to
 this Christ promised to you and to all the world for salvation and
 solace. Persisting in your blindness, ye have brought him to the
 cross, though finding in him no cause for condemnation. Surely, he did
 you no injury; he deprived you of naught, neither money, goods, honor
 nor power, but has brought you all good--even salvation--if ye will
 but receive him. But ye made yourselves the very ones who fulfilled
 the Scriptures ye daily read--those who put Christ to death and
 brought to pass the fact that he rose from the dead (though without
 thanks to you or to Satan) and became a Lord commanding the obedience
 of all creatures.
 
 "We shall no longer regard what ye, or all the world, have to say of
 our preaching Christ; it is all the same to us whether you rage or
 smile. For we boast the Lord, the Son of God, made Lord over all the
 fathers through his resurrection. It is his will that we preach of
 him, and that all men believe. Since ye refuse him, your God-given
 privilege ceases, which, however, was granted only until the advent of
 the Messiah. We must withdraw from you, renouncing your authority and
 priesthood, and Jerusalem itself. We tell you plainly that we cannot
 and will not obey you in opposition to the will of the Lord."
 
 18. Mark you, in order to make the Jews Christians, Paul had to preach
 that Christ was already come; that he was no longer to be looked for.
 He was obliged to bring home to them what they had done to Christ,
 they the rulers and chief of those bearing the name of God's people
 and entrusted with the Law and the order of divine worship--he was
 forced to do so that they might perceive their sin and quit their
 boast of having the true Law and worship, having nothing whatever
 wherein to glory before God. For, though possessing the Law of Moses
 and having heard often enough the Word of God, they would not
 recognize and receive the Messiah sent by God in accordance with his
 promise, but condemned him and became his murderers.
 
 In view of this fact, what does their boast about being Abraham's
 children, God's people, possessors of the prophets and the Law and the
 priesthood, amount to? These privileges only magnify their sins, only
 make their guilt the more grievous, before God. Not as blind, ignorant
 heathen, but as a people who have, and should know, the Word of God,
 they wilfully put to death God's Son. Thus we have the first part of
 Paul's sermon.
 
 
 THE RESURRECTION AND FAITH.
 
 19. The second part deals with the resurrection of Christ and its
 power through faith. This is the goal Paul has in view when he tells
 them that they have slain the Christ, thus effecting their
 condemnation by God and forfeiting whatever glory they possessed as
 Jews, gaining shame and wrath before God in its stead. To be still
 delivered from such condemnation, and to obtain justification and
 salvation, as he expresses himself toward the end, it is necessary to
 hear and believe the word concerning the selfsame Christ. Moreover,
 inasmuch as they with their leaders have refused to receive and
 recognize this Messiah when he preached and wrought miracles in
 person; now, that he is invisible and absent in the body, they are
 called upon to receive him whom they themselves have crucified unto
 death, and to believe that he is risen from the dead as Lord over all,
 according to the testimony of the apostles.
 
 The dreams of the past they are now utterly to forsake, and their
 expectations of a Messiah still to come and elevate them with their
 Law and manner of worship to fame, riches and position, and to spread
 abroad their Moses and their priesthood in all the earth. They must
 now thank God for being placed on the same footing with the gentiles,
 in that they may come with them to the Word of salvation for the
 purpose of obtaining God's favor, remission of sins and life eternal.
 
 
 OLD TESTAMENT TESTIMONY.
 
 20. Paul supports his discourse on the resurrection of Christ with
 many strong Scripture texts. There is no doubt that he dwelt on these
 at length and preached quite a sermon, which, however, has not been
 recorded here in full, but only in part. The apostle's purpose was to
 point us to the Old Testament Scriptures, that we might there make
 diligent study for ourselves of how forcibly the prophets have spoken
 concerning Christ, his works and his kingdom.
 
 21. The first text Paul cites is from the Second Psalm, which treats
 throughout of the Messiah and his reign, as even the Jews at the time
 when wisdom still prevailed had to admit. Christ's own words are: "I
 will tell of the decree: Jehovah said unto me, Thou art my Son; this
 day have I begotten thee." Paul says he is here quoting from the First
 Psalm, though in all editions, old and new, this psalm comes second in
 order.[2] But the apostle does not have reference to the technical
 arrangement of the psalms in a book, but to the order of his
 quotations. The thought is: "First, I will prove it from the psalm,"
 or, "First, as written in the psalm." Just as the preacher of today
 says, "I observe, first," or, "It is written, first, in the psalm,"
 whether the psalm be the first, second, twentieth or thirtieth, he not
 having reference to the order of the psalm but to the order in which
 he cites it.
 
 [Footnote 2: Since Luther's time this discrepancy has been removed by
 allowing the change, "second psalm."]
 
 22. But how does Paul make this text prove the resurrection of Christ?
 It is truly a strong statement, and no doubt the apostle fully
 explained it, amplifying it beautifully and well. The psalm refers to
 that Messiah, or King, who shall reign in the Jewish nation, among the
 people; for the writer says plainly, "I have set my king upon my holy
 hill of Zion," or Jerusalem. The King, then, must be true man like
 other men. Indeed, the psalmist adds that the kings and rulers of
 earth shall rage and persecute him, which could not be unless he
 reigned upon earth.
 
 23. But this verse also makes the King true God, for here God calls
 him his own Son, begotten of himself in his divine, eternal essence
 and majesty. He is, then, not an adopted Son, but the true Son of God
 by birth. Being man, however, just like others, he must, in accord
 with his human nature, die; indeed, he must suffer crucifixion and
 death at the hands of the lords of the world. But, again, if he be
 also the begotten Son of God and therefore true God, he cannot, even
 according to his human nature, remain in death; he must come forth
 from it, must triumph over it, becoming Lord of life and death
 forever. Here is an indivisible Being, at the same time a Son of the
 virgin of the house of David and of God. Such cannot remain in death.
 If he enter death, it must be to overcome and conquer it, yes, to slay
 it, to destroy it; and to bring to pass that in him as Lord shall
 reign naught but life, life for all who receive him. This subject is
 elsewhere more fully expounded.
 
 24. But the succeeding text cited on the resurrection--from Isaiah 55,
 3--reads yet more strangely: "I will give you the holy and sure
 blessings of David," which in the Hebrew is: "I will make an
 everlasting covenant with you, even the sure mercies of David." The
 prophet has reference to the promise made to David in Second Samuel 7,
 concerning Christ. In the preceding verses of the chapter, Isaiah most
 tenderly entreats and invites the whole world to receive the promises
 of salvation, for thereby shall the poor, the wretched and the
 afflicted obtain the great treasures of joy and salvation. And
 immediately following the verse quoted, he speaks of the Messiah, the
 promised seed of David, as given to the Levites for a "witness"--in
 other words, a preacher sent by God--and for "a leader and commander
 to the peoples." The thought is of a King and Ruler differing from
 Moses and his priests and exponents of the Law; a ruler differing from
 every other lord, ruler and king, from David and all worldly rulers
 whatever, subjecting everything to himself. Not that this Leader
 should set up a new temporal government, or extend Jewish authority
 among the gentiles, but that both Jews and gentiles should receive him
 and believe in him, obtaining the fulfilment of that promise he here
 terms a covenant of the sure mercies of David. This covenant, God
 says, he enters into and keeps, a divine, sure covenant: through
 Christ shall be given whatever blessings God's mercy shall bestow,
 with remission or blotting out of sins, redemption from death and life
 eternal.
 
 25. Now, if the Christ of this covenant is true man and, as the
 promise to David is, of David's flesh and blood; and if he is to bring
 eternal mercy, he must likewise be God, such gift being in the
 province and power of God alone. This being true, he cannot remain in
 death, although he may suffer death by reason of his human nature; he
 must of his own power rise from the dead. Only so can he raise others
 and give them everlasting life; only so can he truly be called eternal
 King of grace, righteousness and life, according to the sure promise
 of God.
 
 26. Therefore, wherever the Scriptures speak of Christ's eternal
 kingdom, and of everlasting grace, they point out this article of the
 resurrection of Christ. No doubt, the apostle in explanation of the
 text from the Second Psalm quoted other Old Testament passages; for
 instance. Psalm 110, 1: "Jehovah saith unto my lord, Sit thou at my
 right hand, until I make thine enemies thy footstool"; also verse 4:
 "Jehovah hath sworn, and will not repent: Thou art a priest for ever."
 In these passages God has promised to give us Christ, him who was to
 sit at his right hand--that is, have the omnipotent, divine power
 possible only to an eternal Lord and King--and at the same time to
 have his kingdom on earth, at Zion--or Jerusalem; and who was,
 moreover, to be a priest forever, being taken from among men and like
 unto them, even in his ability to die, yet at the same time continuing
 a priest forever, thereby forestalling the necessity of remaining in
 death and grave.
 
 27. The third passage cited by Paul is taken from the Sixteenth Psalm,
 which is in reality one of the Messianic psalms. This is the psalm
 Peter in his first sermon on the day of Pentecost more fully explains,
 drawing from it the irresistible conclusion, so apparent in his own
 words, that Christ indeed has died; not, however, to become victim to
 decay in the tomb, but, proof against mortal destruction and hurt, to
 arise on the third day.
 
 
 
 
 _Easter Wednesday_
 ALSO SUITED TO EASTER TUESDAY.
 
 Text: Colossians 3, 1-7.
 
 1 If then ye were raised together with Christ, seek the things that
 are above, where Christ is, seated on the right hand of God. 2 Set
 your mind on the things that are above, not on the things that are
 upon the earth. 3 For ye died, and your life is hid with Christ in
 God. 4 When Christ, who is our life, shall be manifested, then shall
 ye also with him be manifested in glory. 5 Put to death therefore your
 members which are upon the earth; fornication, uncleanness, passion,
 evil desire, and covetousness, which is idolatry; 6 for which things'
 sake cometh the wrath of God upon the sons of disobedience: 7 wherein
 ye also once walked, when ye lived in these things.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO TRULY GOOD WORKS.
 
 1. We have been hearing of the glorious message of Christ's
 resurrection, how that resurrection took place and how we must
 believe, for our own blessing, comfort and salvation. Now, that we may
 be sincerely thankful to God for this inestimable blessing, and that
 our attitude toward the doctrine of the resurrection may be one to
 truly honor and glorify it, we must hear also, and practice, the
 apostles' teaching of its essential fruits, and must manifest them in
 our lives. Therefore, we will select Paul's admonition to the
 Colossians (ch. 3), which has to do with this topic particularly.
 
 Observe here, Paul exhorts Christians to be incited by the
 resurrection of Christ unto works truly good and becoming; the text
 declares unto us the supreme blessing and happiness the resurrection
 brings within our reach--remission of sins and salvation from eternal
 death. Lest, however, our wanton, indolent nature deceive itself by
 imagining the work is instantaneously wrought in ourselves, and that
 simply to receive the message is to exhaust the blessing, Paul always
 adds the injunction to examine our hearts to ascertain whether we
 rightly apprehend the resurrection truth.
 
 
 HOW WE ARE RISEN WITH CHRIST.
 
 2. By no means are we simply to assent to the words of the doctrine.
 Christ does not design that we be able merely to accept and speak
 intelligently of it, but that its influence be manifest in our lives.
 How is a dead man profited, however much life may be preached to him,
 if that preaching does not make him live? Or of what use is it to
 preach righteousness to a sinner if he remain in sin? or to an erring,
 factious individual if he forsake not his error and his darkness? Even
 so, it is not only useless but detrimental, even pernicious in effect,
 to listen to the glorious, comforting and saving doctrine of the
 resurrection if the heart has no experience of its truth; if it means
 naught but a sound in the ears, a transitory word upon the tongue,
 with no more effect upon the hearer than as if he had never heard.
 
 According to Paul in the text, this nobly-wrought and precious
 resurrection of Christ essentially must be, not an idle tale of fancy,
 futile as a dead hewn-stone or painted-paper image, but a powerful
 energy working in us a resurrection through faith--an experience he
 calls being risen with Christ; in other words, it is dying unto sin,
 being snatched from the power of death and hell and having life and
 happiness in Christ. In the second chapter (verse 12), the apostle
 puts it plainly, "buried with him in baptism, wherein ye were also
 raised with him through faith in the working of God, who raised him
 from the dead."
 
 3. If, Paul says, ye have apprehended by faith the resurrection of
 Christ and have received its power and consolation, and so are risen
 with him, that resurrection will surely be manifest in you; you will
 feel its power, will be conscious of its working within. The doctrine
 will be something more than words; it will be truth and life. For them
 who do not thus apprehend the resurrection, Christ is not yet risen,
 although his rising is none the less a fact; for there is not within
 them the power represented by the words "being risen with Christ," the
 power which renders them truly dead and truly risen men.
 
 So Paul's intent is to make us aware that before we can become
 Christians, this power must operate within us; otherwise, though we
 may boast and fancy ourselves believing Christians, it will not be
 true. The test is, are we risen in Christ--is his resurrection
 effective in us? Is it merely a doctrine of words, or one of life and
 operating power?
 
 4. Now, what is the process of the life and death mentioned? How can
 we be dead and at the same time risen? If we are Christians we must
 have suffered death; yet the very fact that we are Christians implies
 that we live. How is this paradox to be explained? Indeed, certain
 false teachers of the apostles' time understood and explained the
 words in a narrow sense making them mean that the resurrection of the
 dead is a thing of the past according to Paul's words in Second
 Timothy 1, 10, and that there is no future resurrection from temporal
 death. The believer in Christ, they said, is already risen to life; in
 all Christians the resurrection is accomplished in this earthly life.
 They sought to prove their position by Paul's own words, thus
 assailing the article of the resurrection.
 
 5. But we will ignore these teachers as being condemned by Paul, and
 interpret the words as he meant them, his remarks both preceding and
 following making it clear and unquestionable that he refers to the
 spiritual resurrection. This fact is certain: If we are, at the last
 day, to rise bodily, in our flesh and blood, to eternal life, we must
 have had a previous spiritual resurrection here on earth. Paul's words
 in Romans 8, 11 are: "But if the Spirit of him that raised up Jesus
 from the dead dwelleth in you, he that raised up Christ Jesus from the
 dead shall give life also to your mortal bodies through his Spirit
 that dwelleth in you." In other words: God having quickened, justified
 and saved you spiritually, he will not forget the body, the building
 or tabernacle of the living spirit; the spirit being in this life
 risen from sin and death, the tabernacle, or the corruptible
 flesh-and-blood garment, must also be raised; it must emerge from the
 dust of earth, since it is the dwelling-place of the saved and risen
 spirit, that the two may be reunited unto life eternal.
 
 6. The apostle, then, is not in this text referring to the future
 resurrection of the body, but to the spiritual rising which entails
 the former. He regards as one fact the resurrection of the Lord
 Christ, who brought his body again from the grave and entered into
 life eternal, and the resurrection of ourselves, who, by virtue of his
 rising, shall likewise be raised: first, the soul, from a trivial and
 guilty life shall rise into a true, divine and happy existence; and
 second, from this sinful and mortal body shall rise out of the grave
 an immortal, glorious one.
 
 So Paul terms believing Christians both "dead" and "alive." They are
 spiritually dead in this life and also spiritually alive.
 Nevertheless, this sinful temporal life must yet come to an end in
 physical death, for the destruction of the sin and death inherent
 therein, that body and spirit may live forever. Therefore he says:
 
 "If then ye were raised together with Christ, seek the things that are
 above, where Christ is, seated on the right hand of God."
 
 7. In other words: Seek and strive after what is above--the things
 divine, heavenly and eternal; not the terrestrial, perishable,
 worldly. Make manifest the fact that you are now spiritually raised
 and by the same power will later be raised bodily.
 
 8. But does this mean that we, as Christians, are no more to eat and
 drink, to till the ground, to attend to domestic or public duties, or
 to engage in any kind of labor? Are we to live utterly idle,
 practically dead? Is that what you mean, Paul, when you say we are not
 to seek the things of earth, though all these are essentially incident
 to life? What can you say to the fact that Christ the Lord is,
 himself, with us on earth? for he said before his ascension to heaven
 (Mt 28, 20): "Lo, I am with you always, even unto the end of the
 world"; and also the baptism which he commands, the sacrament and the
 office of Gospel ministry whereby he governs his Church here--these
 are things of earth.
 
 9. Paul, however, explains in the succeeding verse what he means by
 "things that are upon the earth" and "things that are above." He is
 not telling us to despise earthly objects. He does not refer to God's
 created things, all which are good, as God himself considered them;
 nor has he reference to the Christian who, in his earthly life, must
 deal with the things of creation. He has in mind the individual
 without knowledge of God; who knows no more, and aims no further, than
 reason teaches, that reason received from parents at physical birth;
 who is an unbeliever, ignorant of God and the future life and caring
 not for them; who follows only natural understanding and human desire
 and seeks merely personal benefit, honor, pride and pleasure. The
 apostle calls that a worldly life where the Word of God is lacking, or
 at least is disregarded, and where the devil has rule, impelling to
 all vices.
 
 Paul would say: Ye must be dead to a worldly life of this sort, a life
 striven after by the heathen, who disregard God's Word and suffer the
 devil to have his way with them. Ye must prove the resurrection of
 Christ in you to be something more than vain words. Ye must show there
 is a living power manifest in you because ye are risen, a power which
 makes you lead a different life, one in obedience to the Word and will
 of God, and called the divine, heavenly life. Where this change does
 not take place, it is a sign ye are not yet Christians but are
 deceiving yourselves with vain fancies.
 
 10. Under the phrase "things that are upon the earth"--worldly
 things--Paul includes not only gross, outward vices, sins censurable
 in the eyes of the world, but also greater immoralities; everything,
 in fact, not in accordance with the pure Word of God, faith and true
 Christian character.
 
 
 SPIRITUAL AND CARNAL WORLDLINESS.
 
 11. In order to a better understanding of the text, we shall adopt
 Paul's customary classification of life as spiritual and carnal. Life
 on earth is characterized as of the spirit, or spiritual; and of the
 flesh, or carnal. But the spiritual life may be worldly. The worldly
 spiritual life is represented by the vices of false and self-devised
 doctrine wherein the soul lives without the Word of God, in unbelief
 and in contempt of God; or, still worse, abuses the Word of God and
 the name of Christ in false doctrine, making them a cover and ornament
 for wicked fraud, using them falsely under a show of truth, under
 pretense of Christian love.
 
 This is worldly conduct of the spiritual kind. It is always the worst,
 ever the most injurious, since it is not only personal sin, but
 deceives others into like transgression. Paul refers, in the epistle
 lesson for Easter, to this evil as the "old leaven" and the "leaven of
 wickedness." And in Second Corinthians 7, 1, he makes the same
 classification of spiritual and carnal sin, saying, "Let us cleanse
 ourselves from all defilement of flesh and spirit." By defilement of
 the spirit he means those secret, subtle vices wherewith man pollutes
 and corrupts his inner life in the sight of God; his sins not being
 manifest to the world, but deceiving human reason and wisdom.
 
 12. If we would be Christians we must, first of all, be dead to
 conduct of this sort. We must not receive nor tolerate the worldly
 doctrine and corrupt inventions originating with ourselves, whether in
 the nature of reason, philosophy or law, theories ignoring the Word of
 God or else falsely passing under its name. For such are wholly of the
 world; under their influence man has no regard to God's will and seeks
 not his kingdom and eternal life. They are meant merely to further the
 individual's own honor, pride, renown, wisdom, holiness or something
 else. Though boast is made of the Gospel and of faith in Christ, yet
 it is not serious, and the individual continues without power and
 without fruit.
 
 13. If we are risen with Christ through faith, we must set our
 affections upon things not earthly, corruptible, perishable, but upon
 things above--the heavenly, divine, eternal; in other words, upon
 doctrine right, pure and true, and whatever is pleasing to God, that
 his honor and Christ's kingdom may be preserved. Thus shall we guard
 ourselves against abuse of God's name, against false worship and false
 trust and that presumption of self-holiness which pollutes and
 defrauds the spirit.
 
 14. Under carnal worldliness Paul includes the gross vices,
 enumerating in particular here, fornication, uncleanness,
 covetousness, and so on, things which reason knows to be wicked and
 condemns as such. The spiritual sins take reason captive and deceive
 it, leaving it powerless to guard against them. They are termed
 spiritual sins not simply because of their spirit-polluting character,
 for all vices pollute the spirit, the carnal vices among them; but
 because they are too subtle for flesh and blood to discern. The sins
 of the flesh, however, are called carnal, or body-polluting, because
 committed by the body, in its members.
 
 Now, as we are to be dead unto spiritual sins, so are we to be dead
 unto carnal sins, or at least to make continual progress toward that
 end, striving ever to turn away from all such earthly things and to
 look toward the heavenly and divine. He who continues to seek carnal
 things and to be occupied with them, has not as yet with Christ died
 unto the world. Not having died, he is not risen; the resurrection of
 Christ effects nothing in him. Christ is dead unto him and he unto
 Christ.
 
 15. Paul's admonition is particularly necessary at the present time.
 We see a large and constantly-increasing number who, despite their
 boast of the Gospel and their certain knowledge of the polluting and
 condemning power of spiritual and carnal sins, continue in their evil
 course, forgetful of God's wrath, or endeavoring to trust in false
 security. Indeed, it is a very common thing for men to do just as they
 please and yet pretend innocence and seek to avoid censure. Some would
 represent themselves guileless as lambs and blameless; no act of
 theirs may be regarded evil or even wrong. They pretend great virtue
 and Christian love. Yet they carry on their insidious, malicious
 frauds, imposing falsehoods upon men. They ingeniously contrive to
 make their conduct appear good, imagining that to pass as faultless
 before men and to escape public censure means to deceive God also. But
 they will learn how God looks upon the matter. Paul tells us (Gal 6,
 7) God will not, like men, be mocked. To conceal and palliate will not
 avail. Nothing will answer but dying to vice and then striving after
 what is virtuous, divine and becoming the Christian character.
 
 16. Paul enumerates some gross and unpardonable vices--fornication, or
 unchastity, and covetousness. He speaks also of these in Ephesians 5,
 3-5 and in First Thessalonians 4, 3-7, as we have heard in the epistle
 lessons for the second and third Sundays in Lent. He enjoins
 Christians to guard against these sins, to be utterly dead to them.
 For they are sensual, acknowledged such even among the gentiles; while
 we strive after the perfect purity becoming souls who belong to Christ
 and in heaven. It is incumbent upon the Christian to preserve his body
 modest, and holy or chaste; to refrain from polluting himself by
 fornication and other unchastity, after the manner of the world.
 
 17. Similarly does the apostle forbid covetousness, to which he gives
 the infamous name of idolatry in the effort to make it more hideous in
 the Christian's eyes, to induce him to shun it as an abominable vice
 intensely hated of God. It is a vice calculated to turn a man wholly
 from faith and from divine worship, until he regards not, nor seeks
 after, God and his Word and heavenly treasures, but follows only after
 the treasures of earth and seeks a god that will give him enough of
 earthly good.
 
 18. Much might be said on this topic were we to consider it relative
 to all orders and trades in succession. For plainly the world,
 particularly in our day, is completely submerged in the vice of
 covetousness. It is impossible to enumerate the subtle arts it can
 invent, and the good and beautiful things it knows how to pass off
 whereunder it masks itself as a thing not to be considered sinful, but
 rather extremely virtuous and indicative of uprightness. And so
 idolatry ever does. While before God it is the worst abomination,
 before the world its appearance and reputation are superior. So far
 from being recognized as sin, it is considered supreme holiness and
 divine worship.
 
 The very worship of Mammon wears an imposing mask. It must not be
 called covetousness or dishonest striving after property, but must be
 known as upright, legitimate endeavor to obtain a livelihood, a
 seeking to acquire property honestly. It ingeniously clothes itself
 with the Word of God, saying God commands man to seek his bread by
 labor, by his own exertions, and that every man is bound to provide
 for his own household. No civil government, no, nor a preacher even,
 can censure covetousness under that guise unless it be betrayed in
 gross robbing and stealing.
 
 19. Let every man know that his covetousness will be laid to the
 charge of his own conscience, that he will have to answer for it, for
 God will not be deceived. It is evident the vice is gaining ground.
 With its false appearance and ostentation, and its world-wide
 prevalence, it is commonly accepted as legal. Without censure or
 restraint, men are engrossed in coveting and accumulating to the
 utmost. Those having position and power think they have the right to
 acquire by violence as much as they can, daily making assessments and
 imposts, and new oppressions and impositions upon the poor. And the
 common rabble seek gain by raising prices, by extortion, fraud, and so
 on. Yet all desire not to be charged with wrong-doing; they would not
 they should be called unchristian on account of their conduct. Indeed,
 such excess of covetousness obtains that the public robbing and
 stealing, and the faithlessness and fraud, of the meanest hirelings,
 servants and maids everywhere can no longer be restrained.
 
 20. But who would care to recount the full extent of this vice in all
 dealings and interests of the world between man and man? Enough has
 been said to induce every one who aims to be a Christian to examine
 his own heart and, if he find himself guilty of such vice, to refrain;
 if not, to know how to guard against it. Every individual can readily
 perceive for himself what is consistent with Christian character in
 this respect, what can be allowed with a good conscience; for he has
 Christ's rule of dealing as we would be dealt with, which insures
 equality and justice. Where unfairness exists, covetousness must
 obtain to some extent.
 
 21. If you will not desist from the vice of covetousness, then know
 you are not a Christian, not a believer, but, as Paul calls you, a
 base, detestable idolater, having no part in God's kingdom; for you
 are living wholly to the world and without intent to rise with Christ.
 You will receive no blessing from the joy-inspiring and gracious
 revelation that Christ died and rose for sinners. You cannot say,
 "Therefore he died for me, I trust." Truly, Christ died for you, but
 if you continue in your wickedness, using this revelation as a cloak
 for your mean covetousness, do not--such is the declaration of the
 text--by any means apply that comforting promise to yourself. Although
 Christ indeed died and rose for all, yet unto you he is not risen; you
 have not apprehended his resurrection by faith. You have seen the
 smoke but have not felt the fire; you have heard the words but have
 received nothing of their power.
 
 
 THE NEW LIFE IN CHRIST.
 
 22. If you would be able honestly to boast of this revelation as unto
 you, if you would have the comfort of knowing that Christ, through his
 death and resurrection, has blessed you, you must not continue in your
 old sinful life, but put on a new character. For Christ died and rose
 for the very purpose of effecting your eventual death with him and
 your participation in his resurrection: in other words, he died that
 you might be made a new man, beginning even now, a man like unto
 himself in heaven, a man having no covetous desire or ambition for
 advantage over a neighbor, a man satisfied with what God grants him as
 the result of his labor, and kind and beneficent to the needy.
 
 23. In his desire to arouse Christians to the necessity of guarding
 against such vices as he mentions, Paul strengthens his admonition, in
 conclusion, by grave threats and visions of divine wrath, saying, "for
 which things' sake cometh the wrath of God upon the sons of
 disobedience"; that is, upon the unbelieving world, which regards not
 the Word of God, does not fear or believe in it nor strive to obey it,
 and yet is unwilling to be charged with idolatry and other unchristian
 principles, desiring rather to be considered righteous and God's own
 people.
 
 In the last quoted clause Paul also implies that worldly conduct, the
 life of worldly lusts such as covetousness and other vices, is
 inconsistent and impossible with faith, and that the power of Christ's
 resurrection cannot reach it. For this reason he terms them "sons of
 disobedience," who have not faith and who, by their unchristian
 conduct, bring God's wrath upon themselves and are cast out from the
 kingdom of God. God seriously passes sentence against such conduct,
 declaring he will reveal his wrath against it in bodily punishment in
 this world and eternal punishment in the world hereafter. Elsewhere
 Paul says practically the same thing (Eph 5, 6): "For because of these
 things cometh the wrath of God upon the sons of disobedience." See
 also Rom 1, 18.
 
 24. Such is the admonition of Paul unto all who would be called
 Christians. He reminds them whereunto the Gospel of Christ calls them
 and what his resurrection should work in them--death to all life and
 doctrine not in harmony with God's Word and God's will--and that if
 they believe in the risen and living Christ, they, as risen with him,
 should seek after the same heavenly life where he sits at the right
 hand of God, a life where is no sin nor worldly error, but eternal
 life and imperishable treasures to be possessed and enjoyed with
 Christ forever.
 
 25. But the revelation of Christ's resurrection can be apprehended by
 nothing but faith. The things Paul here tells us of life and glory for
 Christians in the risen Christ are not apparent to the world; in fact,
 Christians themselves do not perceive them by external sense. Notice,
 he says, "Ye died, and your life is hid with Christ in God." The world
 does not understand the Christian life and has no word of praise for
 it; it is hostile to the faith and cannot tolerate the fact that you
 believe in Christ and refuse to join hands with it in love for worldly
 lusts. A hidden life indeed is the Christian's; not only hidden to the
 world, but, so far as external perception goes, to the Christian
 himself. Nevertheless, it is a life sure and in safe keeping, and in
 the hereafter its glory shall be manifest to all the world. For Paul
 says:
 
 "When Christ, who is our life, shall be manifested, then shall ye also
 with him be manifested in glory."
 
 26. Here is comfort for Christians in this earthly life where, though
 they receive the doctrine of Christ and apprehend him by faith, their
 resurrection seems to the world and to their own perceptions untrue;
 where they must contend with sin and infirmities and moreover are
 subject to much affliction and adversity; and where consequently they
 are extremely sensible of death and terror when they would experience
 joy and life. In this verse Paul comforts them, showing them where to
 seek and surely apprehend their life.
 
 27. Be of good cheer, he would say, for ye are dead to the worldly
 life. This life ye must renounce, but in so doing ye make a precious
 exchange. Dying unto the world is a blessed experience, for which ye
 will obtain a life far more glorious. Ye are now, through Christ's
 death, redeemed from sin and from death eternal and are made
 imperishable. Upon you is conferred everlasting glory. But this risen
 life ye cannot yet perceive in yourselves; ye have it in Christ,
 through faith.
 
 Christ is spoken of as "our life." Though the life is still unrevealed
 to you, it is certain, insured to you beyond the power of any to
 deprive you of it. By faith in Christ's life, then, are ye to be
 preserved and to obtain victory over the terrors and torments of sin,
 death and the devil, until that life shall be revealed in you and made
 manifest to men.
 
 In Christ ye surely possess eternal life. Nothing is lacking to a
 perfect realization except that the veil whereby it is hidden so long
 as we are in mortal flesh and blood, is yet to be removed. Then will
 eternal life be revealed. Then all worldly, terrestrial things, all
 sin and death, will be abolished. In every Christian shall be manifest
 only glory. Christians, then, believing in Christ, and knowing him
 risen, should comfort themselves with the expectation of living with
 him in eternal glory; the inevitable condition is that they have
 first, in the world, died with him.
 
 28. Paul does not forget to recognize the earthly environment of
 Christians and saints, for he says: "Put to death therefore your
 members which are upon the earth." Though acknowledging Christians
 dead with Christ unto worldly things and possessing life in Christ, he
 yet tells them to mortify their members on earth, and enumerates the
 sins of fornication, covetousness, etc.
 
 This is truly a strange idea, that it should be necessary for men who
 have died and risen with Christ and hence have been made really holy,
 to mortify worldly inclinations in their bodily members. The apostle
 refers to this subject in Romans 7: 5, 8, 23, and elsewhere,
 frequently explaining how, in the saints, there continue to remain
 various lusts of original sin, which constantly rise in the effort to
 break out, even gross external vices. These have to be resisted. They
 are strong enough utterly to enslave a man, to subject him to the
 deepest guilt, as Paul complains (Rom 7, 23); and they will surely do
 it unless the individual, by faith and the aid of the Holy Spirit,
 oppose and conquer them.
 
 29. Therefore, saints must, by a vigorous and unceasing warfare,
 subdue their sinful lusts if they would not lose God's grace and their
 faith. Paul says in Romans 8, 13: "If ye live after the flesh, ye must
 die; but if by the Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye
 shall live." In order, then, to retain the Spirit and the incipient
 divine life, the Christian must contend against himself.
 
 This cannot be accomplished by the monastic hypocrisies wherewith some
 expect to resist sin. For the pollution of sin is not merely something
 adhering to the clothing, or to the skin externally, and easily washed
 off. It is not something to be discharged from the body by fasting and
 castigation. No, it penetrates the flesh and blood and is diffused
 through the whole man. Positive mortification is necessary or it will
 destroy one. And this is how to mortify sin: It must be perceived with
 serious displeasure and repented of; and through faith Christ's
 forgiveness must be sought and found. Thus shall sinful inclinations
 be resisted, defeated and restrained from triumphing over you. More
 has been said on this topic elsewhere.
 
 
 
 
 _Sunday After Easter_
 
 Text: First John 5, 4-12.
 
 4 For whatsoever is begotten of God overcometh the world: and this is
 the victory that hath overcome the world, even our faith. 5 And who is
 he that overcometh the world, but he that believeth that Jesus is the
 Son of God? 6 This is he that came by water and blood, even Jesus
 Christ; not with the water only, but with the water and with the
 blood. 7 And it is the Spirit that beareth witness, because the Spirit
 is the truth. 8 For there are three who bear witness, the Spirit, and
 the water, and the blood: and the three agree in one. 9 If we receive
 the witness of men, the witness of God is greater: for the witness of
 God is this, that he hath borne witness concerning his Son. 10 He that
 believeth on the Son of God hath the witness in him: he that believeth
 not God hath made him a liar; because he hath not believed in the
 witness that God hath borne concerning his Son. 11 And the witness is
 this, that God gave unto us eternal life, and this life is in his Son.
 12 He that hath the Son hath the life; he that hath not the Son of God
 hath not the life.
 
 
 VICTORIOUS FAITH.
 
 1. This epistle selection was primarily arranged for this particular
 Sunday because it treats of baptism and of the new birth of the
 believing Christian. It was in former time customary in the Church to
 baptize immediately after Easter those who had accepted the Christian
 faith and had been instructed in its precepts. This day is also called
 "Dominicam in albis," and by us Germans "Weiszer Sonntag" (White
 Sunday), because the candidates for baptism were clad in white linen
 as indicative of their cleansing and new birth; just as today children
 to be baptized are arrayed in a white christening-robe.
 
 
 THE NEW BIRTH.
 
 2. While this lesson does not treat of the resurrection of Christ, it
 has reference to its fruits: faith, the very essence of Christianity,
 here expressed as being born of God; and the evidence of the Holy
 Spirit, received through baptism, which assures us we are children of
 God and have, through Christ, eternal life and all blessings.
 
 3. Though John's language is, as usual, plain and simple, yet, in the
 ears of men generally, it is unusual and unintelligible. The world
 estimates it as similar to the prattle of children or fools. What,
 according to the world's construction, is implied by the statement,
 "Whatsoever is begotten [born] of God overcometh the world?"
 Overcoming the world, the unconverted would understand to mean
 bringing into subjection to oneself every earthly thing and assuming
 the position of sovereign of the world. Yet more absurd in the ears of
 this class is the saying that we must be born of God. "Did one ever
 hear of such a thing," they might exclaim, "as children born of God?
 It would be less ridiculous to say we must be born of stones, after
 the idea of the heathen poets." To the world there is no birth but
 physical birth. Hence such doctrine as our lesson sets forth will ever
 be strange, unintelligible, incomprehensible, to all but Christians.
 But the latter speak with new tongues, as Christ in the last chapter
 of Mark (verse 17) says they shall, for they are taught and
 enlightened by the Holy Spirit.
 
 4. Clearly, then, when the Scriptures speak of being born of God, it
 is not in a human sense; the reference is not to the conditions of our
 temporal lives, but to those exalted ones of a future existence. To
 say we must be born of God is equivalent to saying that if man is to
 be redeemed from sin and eternal death, to enter into the kingdom of
 God and into happiness, his physical birth will not suffice; all which
 nature, reason, free-will and human endeavor may afford is inadequate.
 Physical birth, it is true, answers for everything in the way of
 temporal possession and achievement, everything great, powerful,
 noble, rich, wise, learned; in short, every exalted and desirable
 thing of earth. But all such possession and achievement serves only
 the physical existence; it is swept away by death, to which event it
 is ever subject.
 
 Hence becomes necessary a new and different birth, a birth more
 significant than that of the natural man even in the case of emperors,
 kings, or the wisest and most influential of earth. For as Isaiah says
 (ch. 40, 6): "All flesh is grass, and all the goodliness thereof is as
 the flower of the field. The grass withereth, the flower fadeth." The
 demand is for a divine birth, a birth in which parentage is wholly of
 God; a birth signifying the operation of God's divine power in man, a
 power achieving something beyond the attainment of his natural
 capacities and effecting in him new understanding and a new heart.
 
 5. The process is this: When the individual hears the Gospel message
 of Christ--a message revealed and proclaimed not by the wisdom and
 will of man, but through the Holy Spirit--and sincerely believes it,
 he is justly recognized as conceived and born of God. John in his
 gospel (ch. 1, 12) says: "As many as received him, to them gave he the
 right to become children of God, even to them that believe on his
 name." And in the first verse of the chapter including our text, he
 tells us: "Whosoever believeth that Jesus is the Christ is begotten of
 God." Through that faith, for the sake of his Son, God accepts us as
 his children, pleasing to him and heirs of eternal life; and the Holy
 Spirit will be sent into our hearts, as is explained later.
 
 6. This doctrine condemns those arrogant teachers who presumptuously
 expect to be justified before God by their own merits and works. They
 imagine that their wisdom, learning, good judgment, intelligence, fair
 reputation and morality entitle them, because of the good they are
 thus enabled to do, to the favor of God and to reception up into
 heaven. But the Scriptures clearly teach the very reverse, that all
 these things are nothing in the eyes of God. It is sheer human effort;
 it is not being born of God. However wise and powerful you might be,
 if even the noblest, most beautiful, fruit human nature can produce,
 you could not see the kingdom of God unless you became a wholly
 different person, unless you were born anew, according to Christ's
 words in John 3, 3. And this is something impossible to your natural
 powers. You certainly cannot make yourself of other parentage than you
 are. God must begin the work in you, communicating his seed--his
 Word--by virtue of which the Holy Spirit operates in you, enabling
 you, by faith, to cling to the promise, as said before.
 
 7. Now, he who is thus born of God, John declares, overcomes the
 world. Verily, this is a significant and forcible assertion the Holy
 Spirit makes; it represents a tremendous power, a great work. The
 child of God must, indeed, attempt and accomplish great things. The
 birth effected through the Word and faith makes men true sovereigns,
 above all earthly rulers; it gives them power even to overcome the
 world, something impossible to any Roman or Turkish potentate. They
 effect not their victory by physical force or temporal power, but by
 the spiritual birth, through faith. As John says immediately after the
 clause we are discussing, "This is the victory that hath overcome the
 world, even our faith." Here is his own explanation of what he means
 by being born of God.
 
 
 THE TWO KINGDOMS.
 
 8. Now, in order to understand the nature of the spiritual victory and
 how it is effected, we must know just what John means by the term
 "world." The reference is not to dominion over territory, to property
 or money. He implies the existence of two kingdoms. In one, the
 kingdom of God, the heavenly kingdom of Christ, is included, first,
 the angels in heaven, who are the chief lords, the inner circle of
 counselors; second, the entire Christian Church on earth, under one
 head, Christ the Lord and King. In the other kingdom, the hellish
 kingdom, the devil is prince, and his mighty counselors and servants
 are the angels who with him fell from heaven; it also includes the
 world, those on earth who teach, believe and live contrary to Christ,
 who represent the heathen, the Jews, the Turks and false Christians.
 
 By the heavenly kingdom of God we must understand, not only spiritual
 life and godly people, but the lord and regent of that kingdom--Christ
 with his angels, and his saints both living and dead. Thus, too, the
 kingdom of the world represents not only the earthly life with its
 worldly interests, but particularly its lord and regent--the devil and
 his angels, and all unchristian, godless, wicked people on earth. So,
 when John says, "Whatsoever is begotten of God overcometh the world,"
 he means by "world" the devil and his whole earthly dominion.
 
 9. Now, the workings of these two kingdoms are plainly evident, though
 the leaders--Christ the Lord, and the devil--are not visible to mortal
 eyes. Christ rules direct and effectually, in his own power, through
 the Word and through the Holy Spirit in the hearts of believers,
 maintaining them in the faith and in the knowledge of his Word, and
 protecting from the devil's wrath and subtlety; further, he rules
 through his angels, who guard his followers; again, he rules through
 his people themselves, who exercise authority one over another in
 loving service, each teaching, instructing, comforting and admonishing
 a noble little band of godly, obedient, patient, chaste, kind,
 tractable, benevolent souls.
 
 The nature of the devil's kingdom, the manner of life the world leads,
 is easily apparent. This kingdom is simply a huge booth filled with
 faithless, shameless, wicked individuals, impelled by their god to
 every sort of disobedience, ingratitude and contempt of God and his
 Word; to idolatry, false doctrine, persecution of Christians and the
 practice of all wantonness, mischief, wickedness and vice.
 
 10. These two kingdoms are opposed. They continually contend for the
 crown; they war with each other for supremacy. Christians are brought
 into the conflict to hold the field against God's enemy, whose rule of
 the world is one of falsehood and murder; they must contend with the
 enemy's servants, his horde of factious spirits and basely wicked
 individuals, in an effort to restrain evil and promote good.
 Christians must be equipped for the fray; they must know how to meet
 and successfully resist the enemy, how to carry the field unto
 victory, and hold it.
 
 
 FAITH THE VICTOR.
 
 11. Therefore, when John says, "Whatsoever is begotten of God
 overcometh the world: and this is the victory that hath overcome the
 world, even our faith," his purpose is to admonish Christians that
 believers must manifest the power and working of faith in life and
 deed. In fact, his chief aim in writing this text was to reprove false
 Christians who are pleased to hear the doctrine that we are saved
 through Christ alone, our works and merits not earning our salvation;
 and who imagine the hearing of this doctrine constitutes them
 Christians and that there is no necessity for any effort or contention
 on their part. They forget that they must, through faith, become new
 persons fitted to overcome the world and the devil.
 
 12. Victory over the devil is the sign of the true Christian. Thereby
 we may know men are born of God, may distinguish them from the false
 children who enjoy but the semblance of God's Word and never
 experience its power. Such are mere "mondkinder"
 (moon-children)--still-born, destitute of real divine life, or divine
 power. It cannot be said we have been born of God when we continue in
 our old dead and worldly course, and as before lie and live in sin at
 the devil's pleasure. No, as children of God we must resist the devil
 and his entire kingdom. If, then, instead of overcoming the world you
 allow it to overcome you, then, boast as you may of faith and Christ,
 your own conduct testifies that you are not a child of God.
 
 To illustrate, beginning with some of the lower and grosser sins: If
 you boast of being a child of God, but still live in fornication,
 adultery, and such vices, the devil has already overcome you and
 wrested you from the kingdom of God. If you are miserly, injuring your
 neighbor by usury, by overcharging, by false wares and fraudulent
 business, you have permitted the world and your own flesh to overcome
 you for a penny. If you entertain envy and hatred toward your
 neighbor, you are at once thereby a captive servant of the devil. The
 same principle holds in the case of sins more subtle and refined,
 where the malicious knavery of the devil must be resisted. For
 instance, the devil deceives with misleading doctrines, impelling men
 to idolatry, false faith, presumption, despair, blasphemy, and so on.
 Now, if you yield to him, suffering yourself to be seduced, what will
 it profit you to boast of the Gospel faith? for you have not properly
 grasped God's Word, you have not rightly recognized God in Christ, but
 continue in error, in false fancies, captivated and deceived by the
 devil.
 
 13. It requires something more than mere human wisdom and skill, more
 than human power, to withstand and overcome an enemy so formidable as
 the devil. As said before, the Christian must be fortified with the
 knowledge of how to guard against his wiles and deceptions and how to
 withstand him. Hence a Christian is called a person who is born of
 God. He must be different from an intelligent heathen and a skillful
 worldling to rightly understand God's Word and apprehend Christ
 through faith, and must use such knowledge as weapons of offense and
 defense in the conflict. Thus will he be able to withstand the devil
 and the world and to gain the victory. God's Word and faith are the
 power which will bring him through; he cannot be overcome so long as
 he adheres to them.
 
 In this connection are John's words immediately preceding our text:
 "This is the love of God, that we keep his commandments; and his
 commandments are not grievous." Then he goes on, "For whatsoever is
 begotten of God overcometh the world," etc. Such is the power
 represented by genuine new birth, that therein the devil, the world
 and all evil are overcome. Just as, in physical birth, a normal child
 fully born into the world may overcome a slight offensive disease,
 while an abnormal or still-born child perishes of its own weakness.
 
 14. For example, if I have faith and am born of God, I will not
 pollute myself with unchastity and fornication, I will not bring
 disgrace upon another's spouse or child. The new birth will indeed
 teach me not to reject shamefully the treasure I have in Christ, not
 to lose it willingly, and not to drive from me the indwelling Holy
 Spirit. Faith, if it truly dwells in me, will not permit me to do
 aught in violation of my conscience and of the Word and the will of
 God.
 
 Should I be tempted by avarice to deceive and defraud my neighbor, or
 to close my hand when I should give him aid, if I am a Christian and
 born anew my faith will protest and turn me from such action. Can I
 injure my neighbor or permit him to suffer want when I might
 contribute to his relief, if I am aware that Christ has given his body
 and shed his blood for me? How can there enter into the heart of the
 Christian who believes he has received ineffable and eternal treasures
 through the Son of God, the inclination to permit his neighbor to
 suffer a trivial want when he can easily extend relief? Much less
 would it be possible for the Christian to injure or to do injustice to
 his neighbor for the sake of shamefully gaining some small advantage.
 Rather he would reflect: "If I am, through Christ, a child of God and
 an heir of heaven, the sum of this world's goods is far too
 insignificant to induce me, for the sake of a penny, to deceive or
 defraud anyone."
 
 Then, too, if the devil tempt you by his tyrannical, factious spirits,
 or even by your own thoughts, to forsake your pure doctrine for his
 deceptions, you as a Christian are to resist the temptation,
 remembering the blessings you have through faith received from Christ
 in the Gospel; you have been liberated from darkness, blindness and
 error; have learned rightly to know God; and have obtained the sure
 consolation of grace and salvation, being aware upon what you must
 depend in life and death. Why, then, yield to the devil, allowing
 yourself to be robbed of salvation and eternal life? Why not much
 rather let go every earthly thing than to deny the Word of God or to
 permit this blessed consolation to be perverted, falsified and wrested
 from you?
 
 15. So, then, John says, "This is the victory that hath overcome the
 world, even our faith." It is, indeed, saying very much for the
 Christian faith to attribute to it such power over the devil and the
 world--a power transcending all human ability. It requires an agency
 greater and higher than human strength to triumph over the devil,
 especially in the perplexing conflicts of conscience, when he vexes
 and tortures the heart with terror of God's wrath in the attempt to
 drive us to despair. At such times all our works must immediately sink
 out of sight, leaving no help or victory except the faith that clings
 to the word of Christ the Lord, believing that, for the sake of his
 beloved Son, God will be merciful and will not condemn us for our sins
 and unworthiness if we believe in him. Such faith as this stands fast
 and gains the victory; neither the devil nor the gates of hell can
 prevail against it.
 
 16. The same is true in all temptations. Before we can resist and
 overcome, we must have faith to believe that through Christ we have
 remission of sins and the favor of God; that God gives us help and
 strength to enable us to stand in the conflict and successfully resist
 the devil, the world, the flesh and death; that we obtain the victory
 by the divine power of the Holy Spirit, lacking whose help we all
 would be far too weak to win. Without faith, we are under the power of
 the devil and sin, being subject to them by natural birth. We can be
 liberated in no other way than through faith in Christ.
 
 17. That John has reference to faith in Christ is plainly evident from
 his query, "Who is he that overcometh the world, but he that believeth
 that Jesus is the Son of God?" The apostle's purpose therein is to
 make plain just what the true Scriptural faith is and what it implies.
 For there are other beliefs which the world calls faith. The Jews, the
 Turks, the Papists, claim they also believe in God who created heaven
 and earth. That such belief is not the true faith, however, is proved
 by the fact of its ineffectiveness. It does not contend and overcome,
 and it permits the believer to remain as he is, in his natural birth
 and under the power of the devil and sin.
 
 But the faith which believes Jesus is the Son of God is the true,
 triumphant sort. It is an invincible power wrought in the hearts of
 Christians by the Holy Spirit. It is a sure knowledge, that does not
 gaze and vacillate hither and thither according to its own thoughts.
 It apprehends God in Christ the Son sent from heaven, through whom God
 reveals his will and his love and transfers us from sin to grace, from
 death to a new and eternal life; a refuge and trust that relies not
 upon its own merit or worthiness, but upon Christ the Son of God, and
 in his might and power battles against the world and the devil.
 Therefore, the Christian faith is not the cold, ineffective, empty,
 lifeless conception which Papists and others imagine it to be; no, it
 is a living, active power, ever followed by victories and other
 appropriate fruits. Where such fruits are lacking, faith and the new
 birth are not there.
 
 
 THE SOURCE OF FAITH.
 
 18. Thus we have the first part of our sermon on the new birth and
 faith. For the second part, John shows whence and by what means comes
 the faith productive of victory; he says: "This is he that came by
 water and blood, even Jesus Christ; not with the water only, but with
 the water and with the blood. And it is the Spirit that beareth
 witness, because the Spirit is the truth. For there are three who bear
 witness [in earth], the Spirit, and the water, and the blood," etc.
 
 19. John speaks of Christ's kingdom, and of the office the Holy Spirit
 bears outwardly and visibly in the Christian Church, represented in
 the ministerial office and the sacraments. He says: "There are three
 who bear witness [in earth]." John, as usual, employs the word
 "witness" in connection with the thought of preaching; it is a word he
 frequently uses. For instance, in the beginning of his gospel, where
 he speaks of John the Baptist, he says (ch. 1, 7): "The same came for
 a witness, that he might bear witness of the light." So, in his use of
 the phrase "witness" or "bearing witness," we are to understand simply
 the public preaching of God's Word. Again, Christ says (John 16,
 9-14), that the Holy Spirit shall bear witness of him; that is, he
 shall publicly fill the ministerial office. This is God's own witness
 to his Son. And here John tells us we have the victory over the devil
 and the world, through faith, for the sake of Christ the Son of God.
 
 20. This witness Christ himself ordains shall ever go forth, and
 remain, in the Church. To this end Christ sent the Holy Spirit; to
 this end Christ himself called and gave the Holy Spirit to the
 apostles and their successors, ministers, preachers and teachers, as
 Paul tells us (Eph 4, 11-13), who are to exercise the Word, that the
 Word may resound always and everywhere in the world, reaching to
 children's children, and on down to future generations. Were the
 witness not in the Church, the pulpit--in fact, the entire outward
 administration of the Church--would be useless, for every man could
 read the Scriptures for himself. But for the sake of the uninstructed
 masses and the constantly rising young who, as yet in ignorance of the
 Word, need admonition--for the sake of these, the Spirit must bear
 public witness or administer the preaching office that they, too, may
 learn to know the grace of God manifest and given to us through
 Christ, and that God's wondrous works may be publicly recognized and
 extolled by us in opposition to the devil and the world.
 
 21. Wherever such witness is borne, there certainly will be some
 fruit. The witness never fails of effect. Some surely will be reached;
 some will accept and believe it. Since it is the witness of the Holy
 Spirit, and the apostle says here, the Spirit beareth witness, he will
 be effective, producing in us that to which John refers when he says
 we are children of God, and have the victory and eternal life. So the
 Word--or the Gospel message accompanied by the witness of the
 Spirit--and faith are vitally related. In the last analysis they are
 inseparable. Without faith, preaching will be fruitless; and faith has
 origin in the Word alone. Therefore, we should gladly hear and handle
 the Word. Where it is, there is also the Holy Spirit; and where the
 Spirit is, there must be at least some believers. Even if you have
 already heard the Word and obtained faith, it will always continue to
 strengthen you as you hear it. One knows not at what hour God may
 touch and illumine his or another's heart. It may be in a time when we
 least look for it, or in the individual of whom we have least
 expectation. For the Spirit, as Christ says, breathes where he will,
 and touches hearts when and where he knows them to be receptive.
 
 22. It is relative to the power and energy wrought by the Holy Spirit
 that John speaks, indicating the source and means of the power of this
 witness, when he says of Christ, "This is he that came by water and
 blood," etc. In this sentence is included all we possess in the
 kingdom of Christ, and here is extolled the efficacy of our beloved
 baptism and the blood or sufferings of Christ. Here John unites all
 the elements in one bundle, so to speak, making a triune witness. They
 bear joint witness to our faith and confirm it--these three: the
 water, the blood and the Spirit.
 
 
 BAPTISM BY WATER AND BLOOD.
 
 23. Christ comes, first, "by water"; that is, by holy baptism. He
 employs baptism as an outward sign of his work in the new birth of man
 and in man's sanctification. This water by which Christ comes cannot
 be a mere, empty sign; for he comes not merely to cleanse or bathe the
 body with water, but to purify the whole man from all pollution and
 blemishes inherent in him from Adam. Christ has instituted a cleansing
 wholly unlike the Mosaic ablutions under the Old Testament
 dispensation. Moses came with various laws relating to washings and
 purifications, but they were only cleansings of the body or of the
 flesh and had daily to be repeated. Now, since these ceremonials
 contributed nothing to man's purification in God's sight--a thing to
 be effected by nothing short of a new birth--Christ came with a new
 order of cleansing, namely, baptism, which is not a mere external
 ablution from physical impurities, but a washing effective in man's
 purification from the inward pollution of his old sinful birth and
 from an evil conscience, and bringing remission of sin and a good
 conscience toward God, as Peter says. 1 Pet 3, 21. Paul, also (Tit 3,
 5), calls baptism the "washing of regeneration and renewing of the
 Holy Spirit."
 
 24. Christ first instituted baptism through John the Baptist. To
 distinguish it from the Mosaic baptism, the old Jewish rite of
 washings, Christ styles it "a baptism unto repentance and the
 remission of sins." He designs that therein man shall perceive his
 inner impurities and know them to be, in God's sight, beyond the power
 of outward Mosaic ablutions to reach; shall know also that
 purification of the conscience and remission of sins must be sought
 and obtained through the power of Christ the Lord, who instituted
 baptism.
 
 25. Secondly, that this cleansing of sin may be effected in us through
 baptism, something more than mere water must be present. Mere water
 could effect no more than do ordinary washings, and no more than
 Jewish and Turkish baptisms and washings effect. There must be a power
 and force accompanying the water effective to work inward
 purification, the purification of the soul. Therefore, John says,
 Christ came, not by water alone, but also by blood; not the blood of
 bulls, or of calves, or of goats, those Old Testament sacrifices, but
 his own blood, as Paul declares. Heb 9, 12. He comes through the
 preaching office of the New Testament, which is his rule upon earth,
 imparts to us the effective power of his shed blood, his sacrifice for
 our sins, and thus applies to us the treasure wherewith he purchased
 our redemption.
 
 26. Hence there is now in baptism this efficacy of the blood of
 Christ. That is the true caustic soap which not only removes the
 uncleanness of the outer man, but penetrates to the inner nature,
 consuming its impurities and cleansing them away, that the heart may
 become pure in God's sight. Thus, the blood of Christ is so
 effectively mingled with the baptismal water that we must not regard
 it as mere water, but water beautifully dyed with the precious crimson
 blood of our dear Saviour, Christ. Baptism, then, cannot rightly be
 regarded a physical cleansing, like the Mosaic ablutions, or like the
 cleansing the bathhouse affords; it is a healing baptism, a baptism or
 washing with blood, instituted by none but Christ, the Son of God, and
 that through his own death.
 
 27. In the record of Christ's passion, careful note is made of the
 fact that blood and water flowed immediately from the spear-thrust in
 Christ's side as he hung upon the cross; it is pointed out as a
 special miracle. The design there is to teach that Christ's shed blood
 is not without significance, but stands for a washing or bath whose
 efficacy is present in the baptism with water; and that from the slain
 body of Christ issues an unceasing stream of water and blood, flowing
 on down through the entire Christian Church, wherein we must all be
 cleansed from our sins. What makes baptism so precious, so holy and
 essential is the mingling and union of the water with the blood of
 Christ; to be baptized into Christ with water is really to be washed
 and cleansed with the blood of Christ.
 
 
 THE SPIRIT.
 
 28. To these two John adds a third witness, "the Spirit." The Spirit
 bears witness with the water and the blood; in fact, through these
 other two he operates. It is the Holy Spirit himself; not as he is
 invisible up in heaven in his divine essence, but the Spirit who
 publicly manifests himself through his external office and permits
 himself to be heard through his Word. As John here asserts, the Spirit
 bears witness on earth with both the water and the blood.
 
 29. Neither Moses nor any other teacher in his doctrines of personal
 effort and external purifications, his washings and his sprinklings of
 the blood of sheep and goats--no such teacher brings and gives the
 Spirit. With them is no Spirit, no divine power, no regeneration of
 man. Any unbelieving, spiritless, wicked knave can exercise human
 effort and practice physical cleansing. But Christ alone brings with
 him the power and presence of the Holy Spirit, who sanctifies us
 through the blood and water issuing from the divine side. The Spirit
 makes us partakers of its cleansing influence through the external
 office of preaching and through the sacraments, which are called the
 office and gifts of the Holy Spirit. Through these the Spirit works in
 the Christian Church just as he did at first, among the apostles on
 the Day of Pentecost, and will continue to do in the whole world, unto
 the last day. Without his ministration we would never obtain, nor know
 anything about, the saving power of Christ's blood in baptism.
 
 30. Such is the kingdom Christ unceasingly develops through the
 Christian Church. In him we have eternal purification when to the
 water is added the Spirit, who through the Word enkindles the heart
 and purifies it, not with the cleansing qualities of the water alone,
 but with the healing efficacy of the blood of Christ, whereby sins are
 exterminated and God's wrath appeased. Although the work of our
 redemption was wrought once for all in Christ's blood shed upon the
 cross and is sufficient to cancel the sins of the entire world, yet
 Christ so instituted it that the same efficacy should remain forever,
 and be daily distributed and offered to us through the Holy Spirit.
 
 31. This work of the Holy Spirit is neither received nor perceived
 except through faith in this witness, the preached word of
 Christ--when with the heart man grasps it and confidently believes it
 is fulfilled in himself as the Word declares. Thus is the heart really
 cleansed, the individual born anew, through the Holy Spirit present in
 the sacred cleansing of water and of the blood of Christ.
 
 Peter (1 Pet 1, 2) speaks of the sanctification of Christians as the
 "sprinkling of the blood of Jesus Christ" upon us by the Holy Spirit
 through the public preaching of the Gospel. This sprinkling radically
 differs from the Jewish sprinkling of water, or of the ashes of a red
 heifer, or of the blood of a dead lamb or goat, round about the altar
 and upon the applicants for purification. In the sanctification of
 Christians, the true consecrated water and the sprinkled blood of
 Christ are combined; that is, the message concerning the shed blood of
 our Lord Jesus Christ is "sprinkled," so to speak, upon the soul, and
 wherever that Word touches the soul it is effective. The blood in this
 case is not the ineffective, lifeless blood of a slain animal, but the
 potent, living blood of the Son of God. Under its application the soul
 cannot remain impure. Christ's blood purifies and heals from sin and
 death; it strikes at their very foundation, and entirely releases us
 from their power and grants us eternal life for soul and body.
 
 32. Note, this text is a grand sermon on the witness Christians have
 here on earth, which the apostle in concluding explains and extols in
 beautiful and comforting words. He calls it a witness that God himself
 bears to his Son and that serves to assure us of being the children of
 God and possessors of eternal life. For he says: "And the witness is
 this, that God gave unto us eternal life," etc. This is indeed an
 excellent witness, which God himself witnesses and declares to you,
 and the Holy Spirit brings and reveals to you. God cannot lie nor
 deceive, he is the eternal, unchangeable truth, as already mentioned.
 If you believe this witness, you certainly have received and possess
 it, as John again says: "He that believeth on the Son of God hath the
 witness in him."
 
 
 FAITH TO BE IMPLICIT.
 
 33. The true, saving doctrine of the Christian faith is this: There
 must be witness and confidence of heart so absolute as to leave no
 room for doubt that, through Christ, we are God's children and have
 remission of sins and eternal life. By way of showing us how God
 earnestly enjoins such faith upon us and forbids us to have any doubts
 on the subject, John says, "He that believeth not God hath made him a
 liar; because he hath not believed in the witness that God hath borne
 concerning his Son."
 
 34. This passage annihilates the pernicious, damnable, diabolical
 doctrine of the Papists, who shamelessly claim it is right to doubt
 and that a Christian should doubt his title to grace. This doctrine is
 equivalent to teaching the propriety of disbelieving the testimony of
 God. It is charging God with falsehood, dishonoring and blaspheming
 the Lord Christ, openly affronting the Holy Spirit, knowingly plunging
 people into unpardonable sins and blasphemies and consequently sending
 them to the devil without hope or comfort of salvation.
 
 35. Such is the beautiful fruit of papistical doctrine; such is
 papistical holiness. This is what they who would be the Christian
 Church recommend to us. They would have us, with them, openly and
 fearlessly charge God with falsehood, trample his Word under foot and
 worship the devil in his stead. Further, they require us to praise and
 honor them and render them thanks, rejoicing to be offered their
 stipulated terms of friendship. At the same time they have not in a
 single instance repented of their abominable idolatry or acknowledged
 their error; rather they plume themselves on having in their purity
 taught no wrong. If we will not accede to their demands, we must be
 persecuted, put to death, exterminated everywhere in the world with
 fire and sword. But the devil and death may accede in our stead. Let
 the godly Christian desire and pray that God may hurl such accursed
 doctrine into the abyss of hell and punish as they deserve the
 impenitent blasphemers since they will not cease. And let all the
 people say, Amen, amen.
 
 36. Note particularly the consolation of Paul's concluding words. Here
 he embraces in one clear word the whole substance of the Gospel when
 he says: "He that hath the Son hath the life; he that hath not the Son
 of God hath not the life." How could he speak plainer and more
 forcibly? What is the need of further inquiry and investigation or
 discussion of this theme? Do you wish to have assurance of eternal
 life? According to this verse, you have it truly if you possess Christ
 the Son of God; and you have Christ when you believe this witness and
 preaching as John says, and you should confidently rely upon it in
 life and in death as the divine, eternal truth. But if you believe
 not, you have not life; and all effort and suffering on your part,
 yes, combined with the effort and suffering of the whole world, will
 profit you nothing. You have not the Son of God if you do not believe
 God's witness of him but charge God with falsehood.
 
 
 
 
 _Second Sunday After Easter_
 
 Text: First Peter 2, 20-25.
 
 20 For what glory is it, if, when ye sin, and are buffeted for it, ye
 shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do well, and suffer for it,
 ye shall take it patiently, this is acceptable with God. 21 For
 hereunto were ye called: because Christ also suffered for you, leaving
 you an example, that ye should follow his steps: 22 who did no sin,
 neither was guile found in his mouth: 23 who, when he was reviled,
 reviled not again; when he suffered, threatened not; but committed
 himself to him that judgeth righteously: 24 who his own self bare our
 sins in his body upon the tree, that we, having died unto sins, might
 live unto righteousness; by whose stripes ye were healed. 25 For ye
 were going astray like sheep; but are now returned unto the Shepherd
 and Bishop of your souls.
 
 
 PATIENCE UNDER TRIBULATION.
 
 1. This epistle lesson is a beautiful selection from apostolic
 teaching. Doubtless it was intentionally arranged for this Sunday; for
 Peter's concluding words, "For ye were going astray like sheep; but
 are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop of your souls," accord
 with the gospel selection about the Good Shepherd. Yet it might also
 properly serve in part for the text of a sermon on the passion of
 Christ; for the sufferings of Christ are here presented as an example
 unto us. In the preceding part of the chapter, Peter taught the
 Christians how, having obtained faith, they are to exhibit its
 fruits--good works in the various stations of life. Particularly does
 he admonish them to manifest the fruit of patience under crosses and
 afflictions.
 
 2. When the individual accepts Christ and begins to profess his faith
 in word and life, invariably--it cannot be otherwise--the world, that
 eternal enemy of Christ and faithfully-obedient servant of the devil,
 will be dissatisfied. The world regards it contemptible, disgraceful,
 to live any life but one pleasing to itself, to do and speak aught but
 as it desires. Its rage is excited toward the Christian and it
 proceeds to persecute, to torture, even to murder him when possible.
 We often hear the wiseacre scoffers say that Christ could have enjoyed
 peace had he desired to. The same may be said of Christians; they
 could have peace and pleasure if they would but take advice and
 conform to the world.
 
 3. What are we to do? It is a fact that to maintain and obey the truth
 is to stir up wrath and hatred. Even the heathen assert as much. But
 the fault lies not with the advocate of truth but with its rejecters.
 Is the truth not to be preached at all? Must we be silent and permit
 all mankind to go direct to hell? Who could or would heap upon himself
 the guilt of such negligence? The godly Christian, who looks for
 eternal life after the present one and who aims to help others to
 attain unto the same happy goal, assuredly must act the part he
 professes, must assert his belief and show the world how it travels
 the broad road to hell and eternal death. And to do so is to
 antagonize the world and incur the displeasure of the devil.
 
 4. Now, since there is no escaping the fact that he who would confess
 Christ and make the world better must, in return for his service and
 benefactions, heap upon himself the enmity of the devil and his
 adherents, as Peter says--since this is the case, we must remember
 that it is incumbent upon us to have patience when the world manifests
 its bitterest, most hateful enmity toward our doctrine and toward our
 very lives, when it reviles and slanders and persecutes us to the
 utmost for our principles. Peter here admonishes and persuades
 Christians unto patience under these circumstances, and at the same
 time seeks to comfort them with tender and impressive words.
 
 5. First, Peter reminds the believers of their calling--of their
 reason and purpose in embracing Christianity. He says, in effect:
 "Remember, belief in Christ necessitates confession of him, and the
 entire Christian Church is numbered in the holy, divine calling that
 stands for the praise of God and the promotion of his kingdom." An
 essential feature of this calling is the suffering of evil in return
 for good. It seems inevitable that Christians be condemned in the eyes
 of the world and incur its highest displeasures; that they be destined
 to take up the gauntlet against the devil and the world. It is said
 (Ps 44, 22): "For thy sake are we killed all the day long; we are
 accounted as sheep for the slaughter," or for the sacrifice.
 Sacrificial sheep were kept in an enclosure, not permitted to go to
 pasture with the others. They were not kept for breeding, but to be
 daily, one after another, slaughtered.
 
 6. Paul would say: "What will you do, beloved Christians? Will you
 live in the world and not encounter any persecution because of your
 good deeds? Will you rage at the wickedness of the world, and in your
 rage become wicked yourself and commit evil? Understand, you are
 called to suffer persecutions; they are a consequence of your baptism,
 your Christianity. For these you renounced the devil and professed
 Christ. You are baptized unto the suffering of every sort of
 misfortune, unto the enduring of the world and the devil." You cannot
 escape the smoke when compelled to live in the inn where the devil is
 host and the whole house is filled with it. Again, if you would have
 fire, you must have smoke as a consequence; if you would be a
 Christian and a child of God, you must endure the resultant evils that
 befall you.
 
 7. In short, the Christian, because he is a Christian, is subjected to
 the holy and precious cross. He must suffer at the hands of men and of
 the devil, who plague and provoke him; outwardly with misery,
 persecution, poverty and illness, or inwardly--in heart--with their
 poisonous darts. The cross is the Christian's sign and watchword in
 his holy, precious, noble and happy calling unto eternal life. To such
 a calling must we render full dues and regard as good whatever it
 brings. And why should we complain? Do not even wicked knaves and
 opposers of Christians often suffer at the hands of one another what
 they are not pleased to endure? And every man must frequently suffer
 injuries and misfortunes relative to body, property, wife and
 children.
 
 8. Then, if you would be a Christian and live justly in your calling,
 be not so terribly alarmed, so filled with hostile rage, so extremely
 impatient, at the torments of the world and the devil. If you are
 unwilling to suffer and to be reviled and slandered, if you prefer
 honor and ease, then deny Christ and embrace the delights of the world
 and the devil. You will not, even then, be wholly free from suffering
 and sorrow, though it will be your prerogative not to suffer as a
 Christian and for the sake of Christ. At the same time, you will
 discover that even though you enjoy only pleasure on earth, it will be
 but for a brief time and ultimately you will find the bitter end of
 the pleasure sought.
 
 
 CHRIST OUR PATTERN.
 
 9. In the second place, by way of rendering more impressive his
 admonition, Peter holds up the example of our real Master, our Leader
 and Lord, Christ, who endured persecutions similar to ours, and
 himself suffered more than any. The apostle refers to him in a truly
 scriptural way--as of a twin or dual character. He presents him not as
 an example of a saint in the ordinary sense, but as the real Shepherd
 and Bishop of our souls, who suffered for us, making sacrifice for our
 sins in his own body on the cross. In this capacity, he is our
 treasure, comfort and salvation.
 
 10. The apostle beautifully and strikingly points out the sublime
 perfections of our Pattern, in his suffering, by way of gently urging
 us to patience. He presents the chief points of Christ's endurance,
 examples of real patience; all our sufferings, when compared with
 those of Christ, are cast into the shade. "The passion of Christ,"
 Peter would say, "the suffering of the Lord, is a surpassing, a
 preeminent and sublimely glorious thing, transcending every other
 instance of suffering; first, because it was for an example to us;
 second, because he suffered to save us; third, because he suffered
 innocently in all respects, never having committed any sin." In these
 three points we must leave to him alone the distinction, humbling
 ourselves before them; even had we suffered death in its every form,
 we must cry that all our suffering is nothing in comparison with his.
 
 Even if we could attain to the sublimest, the supreme, the most
 glorious degree of suffering, it would be but walking in his
 footprints, following his example; it would be but to fall far short
 of his suffering. He would stand preeminent--the Master. He would
 maintain immeasurable superiority and we would still be left to follow
 as best we could. The extent of his agony, the intensity and
 bitterness of his sufferings, no one on earth can comprehend. And if
 it be beyond our comprehension, how much more is it beyond our power
 to imitate or experience. We may thank God we have it before us for an
 example to behold and follow. True, we fall far short of perfect
 following, but we may approach it in proportion to our sufferings,
 faith and patience; for one may exceed another in these things.
 
 Christ is an example, Peter says, for all saints; not for a certain
 few. Contrasted with Christ, all saints must with downcast eyes
 confess: "Intense, bitter, grievous as our sufferings truly are, when
 the sufferings of Christ our Lord are mentioned we will willingly keep
 silent; for no human example of suffering will compare with that of
 Christ."
 
 11. Now, this one fact, that one so exalted as Christ himself, the
 only and eternal Son of God, has trod the path of suffering before us,
 enduring unlimited distress, agony transcending the power of humanity
 to experience--this alone should be enough to admonish and urge anyone
 to patiently endure affliction. Why, then, should we disciples, we who
 are so insignificant and inexperienced in comparison with our
 Master--why should we be at all troubled at any suffering for his
 sake? especially when all he asks of us is to follow him, to learn of
 him and to remain his disciples. Here, mark you, is the example set
 before the entire Christian Church, the pattern she is to follow to
 the extent of at least walking in Christ's steps, at the same time,
 however, remembering that her most intense sufferings are naught in
 comparison to a single drop of his shed blood, as we shall hear later.
 
 12. Again, this example assumes its ineffable and inimitable character
 from the fact that Christ suffered not for himself, nor yet merely as
 an example, but in our stead. This act, to say the least, transcends
 all human ability. No saint can boast of equaling this example, can
 say he suffered for another as Christ suffered for our sins. No, here
 all boasting is summarily disposed of. In respect to atonement, Christ
 left us no example, for none can imitate him in that. He stands alone
 there. He alone was called to suffer for all men; for those
 individuals now called and holy, and for the still uncalled and
 sinners.
 
 13. The atonement is the chief, the most exalted, article of the
 Christian doctrine. Faith alone apprehends it as the highest good, the
 greatest blessing, of our salvation, and recognizes that we cannot, by
 our works or our sufferings, do or merit anything in atoning for sin.
 The manner in which this subject is scripturally presented prohibits
 us from adding to it anything of human origin. But so the accursed
 popedom has done in the teachings of its pillars and supporters the
 monks, who regard the sufferings of Christ as merely an example to us.
 They pervert and render immaterial the fact that he suffered for us;
 they place the entire responsibility upon ourselves, as if we, by our
 own works or our suffering are to make satisfaction for our sins, to
 appease God's wrath and to merit grace. This is a doctrine not found
 in the Word of God, but is of their own trivial, self-selected,
 self-devised and false human teachings.
 
 14. They have carried their untruthful, worthless inventions to the
 extent of claiming for the saints not only sufficient acquired merit
 for their own salvation, but a large accumulated surplus available for
 others, which they have bequeathed to the Pope, thus furnishing him
 with an abundant treasury. The Pope, through indulgences, is to
 distribute this excess, these superfluous merits, as he feels
 disposed, at the same time dipping out for himself and his shorn fat
 swine the riches of the world; indeed, the ecclesiasts distribute
 their own merits and works. This is the refined monastic chastity,
 poverty and rigid obedience of the orders--nothing but shameless
 falsehood and scandalous vice, practiced under that covering, both
 privately and publicly, with the exception of a few who were sincere
 in their desire to be monks, of whom I was one. These falsehoods the
 orders readily sold to the laity on deathbeds and under other
 circumstances.
 
 Indeed, wretched mortals who had incurred a death penalty and were
 about to be publicly executed, they referred not to Christ for
 comfort, but counseled patience in their own well-deserved suffering
 and death; as if God would accept their pain as atonement for their
 sins if only they suffered patiently. Purchasing of merit was the
 ecclesiasts' chief doctrine, their strongest point. They fearlessly
 proclaimed it in public, and through its influence erected numerous
 churches and cloisters and satiated the avarice and cupidity of the
 Pope. And I too, alas, was one of these knaves until God delivered me.
 And now, God be praised, I am execrated and condemned by the hellish
 seat of the Roman dragon with its scales because I assailed this papal
 doctrine and would not justify it.
 
 15. Oh, the shameful abomination, that in the temple of God and in the
 Christian Church must be taught and received things which make wholly
 insignificant the sufferings and death of Christ! Gracious God! what
 can be said for human merit--for superfluity of human merit--when not
 one saint on earth has, with all his pains, suffered enough to cancel
 his own obligations; much less to be entitled to the honor of making
 his sufferings avail anything before God's judgment-seat, by way of
 remuneration or satisfaction for the mortal sins of others in the face
 of divine wrath? Note, Peter says Christ left us an example that we
 should follow his steps; which is but concluding that no saint ever
 wrought or suffered enough to warrant the claim: "I have accomplished
 the measure--reached the limit; Christ is no more an example and
 pattern for me." No; the saint ought to be ashamed to boast of his
 sufferings in comparison to those of Christ, and ought to rejoice in
 the privilege of being partaker of the divine pain, of sharing it so
 far as he can, and thus be found in the footsteps of Christ.
 
 16. The theme of Christ's passion, then, must far outrank every other.
 His sufferings are like pure and precious gold, compared to which ours
 are as nothing. No one but Christ has suffered for the sins of
 another. No man has ever paid the price of his own sins, great or
 small. Even if man's suffering could avail aught for sin, the
 individual could not go beyond expiating his own sins. But Christ had
 no need at all to suffer for himself; for, as follows in the text, he
 had committed no sin. He suffered to leave us an example, but yet also
 to bring to man the great blessing of being able to say, "My sins and
 the sins of the whole world were atoned for upon the cross, blotted
 out, through Christ's death." Peter, Mary, John the Baptist, and every
 soul born of woman must include himself or herself in this statement,
 "Christ also suffered for you."
 
 17. In the third place, Christ stands preeminent, above all others, in
 the affirmation of Peter, quoted from Isaiah 53, 9:
 
 "Who did no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth."
 
 18. You may draw your own conclusions as to the eminence of such a
 one; for certainly there is to be found no other human being who has
 not at some time sinned in word or deed. "If any man stumbleth not in
 word, the same is a perfect man," says James 3, 2. But where is this
 perfect man, and what is his name? It is this Christ, he alone of all,
 James should have added. For Peter excludes all other individuals, in
 one class, saying, "Ye were going astray like sheep." And later on
 (ch. 3, 18) he tells us plainly, "Christ also suffered for sins once,
 the righteous for the unrighteous." This statement leaves no man
 innocent of sin, either in word or deed; and in word and deed is
 included man's whole life. Speech and action are associated in various
 Scripture references; as in Psalm 34, 13-14: "Keep thy tongue from
 evil, and thy lips from speaking guile. Depart from evil, and do
 good." But in speech is the greatest liability to error. In teaching,
 counseling, admonishing, consoling and censuring, and in confessing
 the truth, no one indeed will be found so perfect in his utterances as
 never to commit a blunder.
 
 19. But Christ is the one perfect example in this respect. It is
 impossible for saints to attain to his faultlessness. Surely no
 man--unless he desires to be a liar and a true disciple of the devil
 instead of a child of God and a faithful Christian--will be
 presumptuous enough to put himself on an equality with Christ, will
 dare boast himself without sin in word and act. Christ alone has
 suffered, the righteous for the unrighteous; that prerogative can
 honorably and truthfully be ascribed only to Christ the Lord, and is
 his perpetually. No man is just and innocent in word and act. All must
 confess their sufferings, of whatever nature, to be the result of
 their own sins, and well deserved chastisement. For the fact of having
 escaped the eternal wrath, condemnation and punishment of God, they
 must thank this just one alone, he who, being himself blameless,
 voluntarily suffered to make satisfaction for the unrighteous, and
 appeased God's wrath. The sufferings of all saints, then, must be
 rated far below those of Christ the Lord. The saints must clothe and
 adorn themselves with his innocence, and with the entire Christian
 Church pray, "Forgive us our trespasses"; and they must confess the
 article, "I believe in the forgiveness of sins."
 
 20. Now, let us sum up the three arguments Peter uses in admonishing
 Christians to patience in suffering. First: He says, "Hereunto were ye
 called." Though you do have to suffer much and severely, you have ever
 before you the example of Christ, to the limit of whose sufferings you
 can never attain. You dare not boast even if you have suffered
 everything. Moreover, you are under obligation to suffer for God's
 sake. Second: Christ did not suffer for his own sake, nor of
 necessity; he suffered for your sake, and all from good will toward
 you. Third: He was wholly innocent--free from sin; internally--in
 heart--and externally--in word and deed. For where evil dwells in the
 heart, it cannot long remain concealed. It must manifest itself in
 words, at least. Christ says (Mt 12, 34), "Out of the abundance of the
 heart the mouth speaketh."
 
 21. Why, then, should you complain of your suffering or refuse to
 suffer what your sins really deserve? Indeed, you deserve much more
 than you receive--even eternal suffering. But God forgives you and
 remits the eternal punishment for the sake of Christ the Lord,
 desiring that you patiently endure the lesser suffering for the utter
 mortification of the sins inherent in your flesh and blood. To make
 such lot the less grievous to you, Christ has gone before and left you
 an example of perfect patience under the most intense suffering, an
 example equaled nowhere in the world. The Supreme Majesty, God's own
 Son, suffered in the most ignominious manner the extremity of torture,
 pain and anguish in body and soul, something intolerable to mere human
 nature; and that innocently, and for us condemned sinners--suffering
 for the sins of strangers.
 
 "Who, when he was reviled, reviled not again; when he suffered
 threatened not."
 
 22. To further emphasize and make effectual in us the example of
 Christ's patience, Peter proceeds to analyze it, to show it in its
 true colors, to mention the details and make plain how it differs from
 any other example of suffering. He has told us before that Christ did
 no sin, neither was guile found in his mouth. Why, then, did the Jews
 persecute and crucify him--put him to death? Inquire into his entire
 life history and you will find that no one could justly impeach, nor
 could convict, him for any sin. He himself appealed to his enemies to
 prove aught of sin in him. No one could show an injury he had ever
 done to anyone, or a wrong he had ever taught or practiced. On the
 contrary, he had gone about to bring to the Jewish nation the grace
 and salvation of God. He had revealed God's Word, opened the eyes of
 the blind, healed the sick, cast out devils, fed great multitudes when
 hungry and lacking food. In short, in all his life, there was nothing
 in word or act but truth, goodness, beneficence and a disposition to
 aid. In return for the good he wrought, he was compelled to receive
 the ungrateful reward of man's hatred and condemnation. His enemies
 were moved solely by obdurate, diabolical hatred, and could not cease
 their persecutions until they brought him to the cross, where he was
 disgracefully hung up nude between two murderers, being lifted up as
 unworthy to touch the earth and to live among men.
 
 23. Christ was under no obligation to endure disgrace and
 ill-treatment. He might have refrained from his benevolent
 ministrations when he saw the futility of his efforts with the Jews.
 But he did not so; even in his sufferings upon the cross he charitably
 prayed for his enemies. He had authority, he had power enough, and he
 would have been justified in the action, had he revenged himself on
 his furious enemies, invoked evil upon them, and execrated them as
 they deserved to be execrated; for they had treated him with gross
 injustice before all the world, as even the testimony of his betrayer
 and his judge and all creatures admitted, and had bitterly reviled him
 when he hung upon the cross. But he did none of these things. He bore
 with ineffable meekness and patience all the ill-treatment his enemies
 could heap upon him. Even in his extremity of anguish, he benevolently
 interceded for them to his Heavenly Father, to which act the prophet
 Isaiah (ch. 53) offers a tribute of high praise.
 
 24. Notice, we have here in all respects a perfect and inimitable
 example of patience--patience of the most exalted kind. In this
 example we may behold as in a glass what we have yet to learn of calm
 endurance, and thus be impelled to imitate that example in some small
 measure at least.
 
 25. Not without reason does Peter applaud the fact that when Christ
 was reviled he reviled not again, and when he suffered he threatened
 not. Though to endure undeserved violence and injustice is hard
 enough, that which more than aught else naturally renders suffering
 grievous and makes men impatient is to experience the monstrous
 unfairness of receiving the mean and vexatious reward of ingratitude
 from individuals who have enjoyed one's favors and greatest
 benefactions. Base ingratitude is extremely painful for human nature
 to endure. It makes the heart flutter and the blood boil with a spirit
 of revenge. When no alternative presents, an outburst of reviling,
 execration and threatening follows. Flesh and blood has not the power
 of restraint to enable it to remain calm when evil is returned for
 favors and benevolence, and to say, "God be thanked."
 
 26. Mark the example of Christ, however, and there learn to censure
 yourself. Beloved, how can you complain when you see how infinitely
 greater was the grief and how much more painful the anxiety endured by
 your beloved Lord and faithful Saviour, the Son of God himself, who
 yet bore all patiently and submissively and, more than that, prayed
 for those instrumental in causing that agony? Who with a single drop
 of Christian blood in his heart would not blush with shame to be
 guilty of murmuring at his sufferings when, before God, he is so
 sinful and is deserving of much more affliction? Wicked, unprofitable
 and condemned servant must he be who does not follow his Lord's
 example of endurance but presumes to think himself better and nobler
 than Christ; who with inimical spirit murmurs, complaining of great
 injustice, when he really deserves affliction, and when he suffers
 infinitely less than did his dear, righteous, innocent Lord. Beloved,
 if Christ so suffered in return for the great blessing he conferred,
 be not too indolent to imitate him in some degree by suffering without
 anger and reproaches. Less reason have you to be angry and reproachful
 from the fact that you, too, were one whose sins brought Christ to the
 cross.
 
 27. But you may say: "What? Did not Christ revile when (Mt 23) he
 called the scribes and pharisees hypocrites, murderers, serpents, a
 generation of vipers, and even more severely rebuked them?" I reply:
 Oh yes, we would gladly follow Christ's example here; we could
 cheerfully revile and accuse. It is much easier than being patient. We
 would need no Master to help us in this. But note what Peter says:
 When Christ was about to suffer death, having fulfilled the obligation
 of his ministry--having proclaimed the truth, rebuked falsehood and
 been brought to the cross therefor--and being about to conclude his
 mission by suffering, he reviled not; as a sheep for the slaughter, he
 permitted himself to be executed and opened not his mouth against his
 calumniators and murderers. See Isaiah 53, 7.
 
 28. It is necessary, then, to make a distinction here. Reviling--or
 pronouncing execrations and threats--is of two kinds. In one case it
 is official and pronounced of God; in the other, without authority and
 comes from man. It was one of the duties of Christ's office on earth,
 and one now incumbent upon those called to bear that office after him,
 to assert the truth and censure the evil. Such a course is essential
 to the honor of God and the salvation of souls; for if the truth were
 to be ignored, who would come to God? Official chastisement is a work
 of divine, Christian love. It is a parental duty imposed of God. God
 has implanted in the parent nature intense love for the child; at the
 same time, if parents are godly and have proper affection for their
 children they will not connive at, or let pass unpunished, the
 disobedience of the latter. They must chastise, both with reproof and
 with keen rods. These are official strokes--love stripes--enjoined of
 God, and their infliction is our duty. They are not injurious, but
 beneficial. Solomon says (Prov 13, 24): "He that spareth his rod
 hateth his son; but he that loveth him chasteneth him betimes." And
 Jesus the son of Sirach says in Ecclesiasticus: "He that loveth his
 son causeth him oft to feel the rod, that he may have joy of him in
 the end."
 
 29. So everyone may, and should, reprove when official duty or his
 neighbor's case requires; it serves to reform the subject. To quote
 Solomon again (Prov 27, 6): "Faithful are the wounds of a friend; but
 the kisses of an enemy are profuse [deceitful]." Reproofs and stripes
 prompted by love and a faithful heart are beneficial. On the other
 hand, an enemy may use fair and flattering words when he has enmity
 and deceit at heart, preferring to let you go on to ruin rather than
 by gentle reproof to warn of danger and rescue you from destruction.
 The faithful, conscientious physician must often, of necessity and
 with great pain to the patient, amputate a limb in order to save the
 body.
 
 Paul, too, commands pious bishops to be urgent in season, out of
 season; to reprove, rebuke, exhort, with all longsuffering. 2 Tim 4,
 2; Tit 2, 15. By our silence to commend or to encourage to evil the
 wrong-doer would not be to manifest one's love to the offender, but
 rather to give him over wholly to death and the devil.
 
 30. It was this love and sincerity of heart which prompted Christ in
 his office to censure and rebuke, for which he merited only wrath and
 hatred; as we say, he sought his stripes. But the duty of his office
 required such action on his part. His motive was to turn the
 transgressors from their blindness and malice, and to rescue them from
 perdition; and he could not be deterred by the consequent persecution,
 cross and death which awaited. But having fulfilled his official
 duties, and the hour of his suffering having arrived, he suffered
 patiently, permitting his enemies to heap upon him all possible evil
 in return for his manifested love and blessings. Instead of angrily
 reviling and execrating while, suspended from the cross, he endured
 the most shameful calumnies, he, with strong cries and with tears,
 prayed, "Father, forgive them." It was, indeed, a heart of
 unfathomable love that, in the midst of extreme suffering, had
 compassion on its persecutors and blessed them in greater measure than
 parent can bless child or one individual bless another.
 
 31. Observe, then, the distinction between official and unofficial
 censure and rebuke; the former is prompted by love, and the latter by
 wrath and hatred. The world, however, is artful and cunning enough
 when it hears this distinction, to pervert and confuse the two,
 exercising its own revenge under the name of official zeal and
 reproof. For instance, if a preacher is disposed to act the knave, he
 can easily give vent to his personal anger and vengeance in his pulpit
 utterances, censuring and rebuking as he pleases, and then claim it is
 all in obedience to the demand of office and for the good of the
 people.
 
 Again, a judge, a mayor, or other prominent official, desiring
 revengefully to satisfy a personal grudge, can more successfully
 accomplish his object under the title of the office he bears and the
 obligations imposed upon him for the punishment of the wicked than in
 any other way. This practice now frequently obtains since the world
 has learned to use the Gospel to conceal its malice and knavery, to
 adorn it with the name of a divinely appointed office. It ever uses
 the name and Word of God to cloak its infamy. But who is vigilant
 enough to elude such knavery and to make the children of the devil
 honest? Let him who would be a Christian, then, take heed how he shall
 answer such accusation. Assuredly God will not allow himself to be
 deceived. He will, in due time, relieve the innocent victim of
 injustice, and his punishment will seek out the wicked. Peter says,
 further:
 
 "But committed himself to him that judgeth righteously."
 
 32. Who revealed to Peter the nature of Christ's thoughts upon the
 cross? The apostle has just been saying that Christ reviled not nor
 thought of revenge, but rather manifested love and good-will toward
 his virulent enemies. How could Christ approve such malice? Truly he
 could not endorse it. Nor could he commend his enemies for crucifying
 him and putting him to death upon the cross without cause. No such
 conclusion may be drawn. The devil and his adherents must not construe
 the passage to mean license to heap all manner of torture and distress
 upon Christ and his saints as upon those who must not only patiently
 bear these things, unmoved by revengeful desires, but must render
 gratitude to their persecutors as if their acts were praiseworthy. No;
 this can by no means be permitted.
 
 Could I be said to suffer innocently if I am obliged to confess I am
 well treated? Several times in this epistle Peter admonishes
 Christians not to suffer as evil-doers, thieves, murderers. But if I
 suffer innocently and am unjustly treated, I am not to justify the
 ill-treatment and strengthen the enemy in his sins; for, so doing, I
 would approve his conduct and assume the guilt attributed. That
 principle would be pleasing to the Pope and the devil and to tyrants;
 they would willingly have it obtain. They are not wholly satisfied
 even to murder the innocent; they would prefer to be justified in
 their action--to have us confess to wrong-doing. But that is something
 no Christian heart will do; it may be left to the devil.
 
 33. But the Papists will say: "However, it is written, You must suffer
 and not revile; you must thank God for persecution and pray for your
 enemies." That is true; but it is one thing to suffer patiently, the
 while wishing your enemies well and praying for them, and quite a
 different thing to justify them in their conduct. I must cease not to
 confess the truth and maintain my innocence, both in heart and with my
 lips. But if men will not accept my word, my heart must tell me I have
 suffered injustice. Rather should I endure ten deaths, could my
 enemies inflict them, than to condemn myself in violation of
 conscience. So, when Peter made this little statement about Christ not
 reviling nor threatening, which was true, he did not mean that Christ
 justified his persecutors in their treatment of him. But what are we
 to do? If we do not justify our enemies when they make us suffer, they
 will do even worse things to us; for they desire the name and the
 credit, in the eyes of the world, of having done right by us. Yes, as
 Christ has somewhere said, they would have it thought they do God
 great service by murdering us. Now, who is to judge and decide the
 question?
 
 34. Peter declares that Christ committed the matter to him who judges
 righteously. How should he do otherwise, knowing that his persecutors
 treated him unjustly and yet maintained the contrary? There was for
 him no judge on earth. He was compelled to commit the matter to that
 righteous judge, his Heavenly Father. Well he knew that such sins and
 blasphemies could not go unpunished. No, the sentence was already
 passed, the sword sharpened, the angels given orders, for the
 overthrow of Jerusalem. Previous to his sufferings, on his way to
 Jerusalem, as Christ beheld the city, he announced its coming doom and
 wept over it. Therefore, he prays for his enemies, saying: "Dear
 Father, I must commit the matter to thee, since they refuse to hear or
 to see the wrong they do. Well I know they are rushing into thy wrath
 and thy terrible punishment, but I pray thee to forgive them what they
 do to me." And so they would have been forgiven had they afterward
 repented at the apostles' preaching, and had they not further sinned
 in persecuting God's Word and thus brought upon their unrepentant
 selves ultimate punishment.
 
 
 CHRIST OUR EXAMPLE IN SUFFERING.
 
 35. Observe, as Christ did, so should we conduct ourselves in our
 sufferings; not approving or assenting to whatever may be heaped upon
 us, but yet not seeking revenge. We are to commit the matter to God,
 who will judge aright. We cannot maintain our rights before the world;
 therefore we must commit our cause to God, who judges righteously and
 who will not allow calumniation of his Word and persecution of
 believers to pass unpunished. We must, however, pray for our
 persecutors, that they may be converted and escape future wrath and
 punishment; and so we do. If it is possible for some of the bishops
 and other Gospel-persecuting tyrants to be converted, we will heartily
 pray and desire that their conversion may come to pass. But if it be
 impossible, as now, alas, is to be feared, since, after having been
 much admonished and often prayed for and having enjoyed the best
 advantages, they wittingly rage against the known truth--if so, then
 we must commit them to God's judgment. What more can we do?
 
 I am persuaded that the intolerable persecution and calumniating of
 the Gospel prevalent today cannot be permitted to pass with impunity.
 It must ultimately meet the coming judgment upon the Papacy and
 Germany. Of this there can be no doubt. But it is ours to continue
 preaching, praying, admonishing and beseeching, in the hope of
 effecting repentance. Then, if our enemies still refuse to turn from
 their evil ways, if they perish in their impenitence, what can we do
 but say: "Dear God, we commit the matter to thee. Thou wilt punish
 them; thou canst, indeed, most terribly."
 
 36. Such, mark you, is the example of Christ, presented to the entire
 Christian Church--set up as a pattern for her. Hence it is the duty of
 the Church, as Peter elsewhere tells us, to arm herself with the same
 mind which was Christ's, to suffer as Christ did and to think: If
 Christ, my Lord and Leader, has suffered for me with so great meekness
 and patience, how much more reason have I to submit to suffering! And
 what can it harm me to suffer when I know it is God's will? Not
 because the suffering in itself is so perfecting and precious, but for
 the sake of the dear Saviour who suffered for me. I know, too, that my
 persecutors thus commit most abominable sins against God and incur his
 wrath and punishment. Why, then, should I be impatient or desire
 revenge? I am already too highly honored of God in the fact that my
 sufferings meet his approbation and that he will perfectly avenge me
 of mine enemies. What can it advantage me for them to burn eternally
 in hell? I will rather pray and use my utmost efforts for their
 conversion. If I fail and they are determined to persist in their
 course, I must bring the matter home to God--must commit it to him.
 
 "Who his own self bare our sins in his body upon the tree, that we,
 having died unto sins, might live unto righteousness."
 
 37. Peter's is the true preaching concerning the passion of Christ. He
 teaches not only the merit in Christ's sufferings, but introduces both
 themes--its efficacy and example. Such is Paul's custom, also. In this
 verse Peter presents Christ's sufferings in the light of a sacrifice
 for sin. They constitute a work acceptable to God as satisfaction for
 the sins of the whole world and effective to reconcile him to men. So
 great is God's wrath toward sin that none but that eternal one, the
 Son of God, could avert it. He had himself to be the sacrifice, to
 allow his body to be nailed to the cross. The cross was the altar
 whereupon the sacrifice was consumed--wholly burned--in the fire of
 his unfathomable love. He had to be his own high priest in this
 sacrifice: for no earthly mortal, all being sinners and unclean, could
 offer to God the sacrifice of his beloved and wholly sinless Son; the
 boasting of the priests of Antichrist in regard to their masses, to
 the contrary notwithstanding. Now, by the single sacrifice of God's
 Son, our sins are remitted and we obtain grace and forgiveness; and
 this fact can be grasped in no other way than through faith.
 
 38. Peter mentions the ultimate object of the divine sacrifice made
 for us, what it accomplished in us, the fruit Christ's passion shall
 yield; for he would not have the Christian Church overlook that point,
 or neglect to preach it. Christ, he tells us, took upon himself our
 sins, suffering the penalty. Therefore, Christ alone is entitled to be
 called a sacrifice for all our sins. It was not designed, however,
 that after the sacrifice we should remain as before; on the contrary,
 the purpose was ultimately to work in us freedom from sins, to have us
 live no longer unto sin but unto righteousness. Now, if in Christ our
 sins are sacrificed, they are put to death, blotted out; for to
 sacrifice means to slay, to kill. Under the Old Testament
 dispensation, all sacrifices had to be presented to God slain. Now, if
 our sins are put to death, it is not meant that we are to live in
 them.
 
 39. Therefore, the saving doctrine of remission of sins and of
 Christ's grace cannot be so construed as to admit of our continuing in
 the old life and following our own desires. According to Paul (Rom 6,
 1-8), enjoying grace and remission of sins does not give license to
 live in sin. How shall we who are dead to sin live any longer therein?
 The very fact that we may be reckoned dead unto sins means they may no
 longer live and reign in us. In Christ's holy body were they throttled
 and slain expressly that they might also be slain in us.
 
 40. Be careful, then, what you believe and how you live, that the
 efficacy of Christ's sufferings may be manifestly fulfilled in you.
 If, through faith, you have rightly apprehended his sacrifice, its
 virtue will be indicated in the subduing and mortifying of your sins,
 even as they are already slain and dead through his death on the
 cross. But if you continue to live in sins, you cannot say they are
 dead in you. You but deceive yourself, and your own evidence is false
 when you boast of Christ in whom all sins are put to death, if sin
 remains vigorous in you. We naturally conclude it is inconsistent for
 sin to be dead in us and yet alive; for us to be free from sin and yet
 captive or fast therein. This fact has already been sufficiently
 pointed out.
 
 41. It is ours, Peter says, not only to believe that Christ has,
 through the sacrifice of his own body, put to death sin and liberated
 us therefrom--a thing the combined sacrifices of all mortal bodies
 could never have effected--but, sin being put to death by him, to
 endeavor to become ever more and more free from sin's sway in our
 bodies, and to live henceforth unto righteousness, until we shall be
 completely and finally released from sin through death. Therefore, if
 before you believed on Christ you were an adulterer, a miser, a
 coveter, a maligner, you ought now to regard all these sins as dead,
 throttled through Christ; the benefit is yours through faith in his
 sacrifice, and your sins should henceforth cease to reign in you. If
 you have not so received the sacrifice, you cannot boast of Christ and
 faith. Though Christ has died for you, though your sins have been put
 upon him and reckoned dead, still you are not rid of those sins if you
 do not desire to be, if you do not, through faith, apprehend Christ
 and his blessing, nor in your life and conduct follow his example.
 
 42. Now you will say: "But you teach that we are all sinners, that
 there is not even a saint on earth without sin. And surely we must
 confess the article, 'I believe in the remission of sins,' and must
 pray, 'Forgive us our debts.'" I reply, most assuredly you never will
 attain sinless perfection here on earth; if such were the case you
 would have no further need for faith and Christ. At the same time, it
 is not designed that you should continue as you were before obtaining
 remission of sins through faith. I speak of known sins wittingly
 persisted in, in spite of the rebuke and condemnation of conscience.
 These should be dead in you; in other words, they are not to rule you,
 but you are to rule them, to resist them, to undertake their
 mortification. And if occasionally you fail, if you stumble, you
 should immediately rise again, embrace forgiveness and renew your
 endeavor to mortify your sins.
 
 "By whose stripes ye were healed."
 
 43. It seems as if Peter could not sufficiently exalt and make
 impressive Christ's sufferings. He brings in nearly the entire
 Fifty-third chapter of Isaiah in the attempt. Note how, in regard to
 the efficacy of works, he always significantly introduces the two
 themes at the same time--how he carefully distinguishes between
 performing human works in obedience to Christ's example, and receiving
 by faith the merit of Christ's work. First, we have, "Who his own self
 bare our sins in his body upon the tree ... by whose stripes ye were
 healed." This is the vital part in our salvation. Christ alone could
 fully accomplish the work. This doctrine must be taught in its purity
 and simplicity, and must so be believed, in opposition to the devil
 and his factions. Only so can we maintain the honor and the office of
 Christ wherein is anchored our salvation. But the second part of the
 doctrine must not be overlooked. There are false Christians who accept
 only the first part and make no effort to reform themselves; but,
 being liberated from our sins and in a state of salvation, we may not
 again defile ourselves therewith. Where these two principals of the
 Christian doctrine are not maintained in their proper relation, injury
 must result to the truth in two respects: they who are occupied solely
 with their own works corrupt the true doctrine of faith; they who
 neglect to follow the example of Christ retard the efficacy and fruit
 of that faith.
 
 "For ye were going astray like sheep."
 
 44. Here Peter bluntly and clearly points out the fact I have stated,
 that liberation from sin and death was effected not by our works and
 merits, but by Christ's wounds and death alone. Forgiveness cost you
 nothing, Peter teaches; no blood, no wounds. You were powerless in
 this direction. You were but miserable, erring, lost sheep, separated
 from God, condemned to hell and unable to council or help yourselves.
 In just such condition are all they who are out of Christ. As Isaiah
 the prophet says more plainly in the chapter from which these words
 are taken (verse 6): "All we like sheep have gone astray; we have
 turned every one to his own way." That is, whatever our lives,
 whatever our intent, we but turned farther away from God. As it is
 written (Ps 14, 3): "They are all gone aside; they are together become
 filthy; there is none that doeth good, no, not one."
 
 45. That men are prone to go astray like sheep is clearly exhibited in
 their conduct; history proves it. It has ever been the case that when
 mankind was divided into various idolatries or false services of God,
 into superstitions numerous and varied, even when God's people thought
 to have attained the perfection of holiness--then one ran here and
 another there, ever seeking and seeking to come upon the road to
 heaven but getting farther and farther from it. It was exactly the
 case of the sheep straying from the flock and lost to the shepherd:
 the farther it runs and the more it follows the voice of strangers,
 the farther astray it goes. It continues to wander and to flee until
 it finally perishes, unless it hears again the voice of the shepherd.
 Let no one, then, dare boast of having himself found the right way to
 heaven, of having merited God's grace and the remission of sins by his
 own manner of life. All men must confess the truth of Scripture
 testimony that we were but erring sheep, fleeing ever farther from our
 Shepherd and Saviour, until he turned us back to himself.
 
 "But are now returned unto the Shepherd and Bishop of your souls."
 
 46. You have now heard the voice of your Shepherd, who has brought you
 back to himself, from your erring and idolatrous ways. It was not your
 own effort that effected your return; it was accomplished at the cost
 of your Shepherd's wounds and shed blood. Be careful, then, Peter
 would say, to live not like erring and lost sheep; but, being
 converted--turned back--follow your beloved Saviour. In him you have a
 godly Shepherd who faithfully pastures and cares for you; and also a
 loyal Bishop who ever watches over and guards you, not permitting you
 to stray.
 
 47. Immeasurably gracious and comforting are these words. But the
 meaning of the word "bishop" has been miserably obscured and perverted
 by our idolatrous priests and episcopal frauds. Likewise have they
 perverted and corrupted the terms "ecclesiasts," "Church," "divine
 service," "priest," etc., by their antichristian rule. Only those have
 right to the name "ecclesiast" who have been redeemed from their sins
 through Christ's wounds, and who live holy lives. But the Papists have
 taken the name away from true Christians and applied it to the Pope's
 besmeared, and shaven-headed ones. Again, when we hear the word
 "bishop" we think only of great, pointed caps and of silver staves. As
 if it were sufficient to place in the Church such masks, such carved
 and hewn idols! For they are nothing better; in fact, they do more
 harm.
 
 According to the Scriptures, a true bishop is an overseer, a guardian,
 a watchman. He is like unto the householder, the warder of the city,
 or any judicial officer or regent who exercises constant oversight of
 state or municipal affairs. Formerly there were bishops in each
 parish, deriving their name from the fact that their office required
 oversight of the Church and the guarding against the devil, against
 false doctrines and all manner of offenses. Paul, too (Acts 20, 28),
 reminds the bishops of their office, saying: "Take heed unto
 yourselves, and to all the flock, in which the Holy Spirit hath made
 you bishops [overseers]." And overseers should bishops still be, as in
 fact all godly preachers and carers for souls are. But in all Popedom
 the office now is but a mere name, to the sin and shame of the entire
 Christian Church.
 
 48. Now, Christ our Lord is that faithful Guardian, that true Bishop,
 who above all others is entitled to the name (with him office and name
 are identical), and who bears it with due honor, to our eternal
 happiness. For, standing at the right hand of God and showing his
 wounds, he unceasingly intercedes for us before the Father; and
 moreover, on earth he rules, sustains, nourishes and protects, through
 his Word, his sacraments and the efficacy of the Holy Spirit, the
 little flock that believe in him. Were he not present with and
 watching over us here, the devil would long ago have overthrown and
 destroyed us, and also the Word of God and the name of Christ. And
 such is the case when God in wrath turns away his eyes from the world
 to punish its ingratitude. Then immediately everything falls into the
 devil's power. Therefore, pure doctrine, faith, confession and the use
 of the sacraments are dependent for their perpetuity solely upon the
 vigilant guardianship of our beloved Shepherd and Bishop.
 
 49. Comforting, indeed, is it to have in Christ a priest so faithful
 and righteous; though, alas, the worthy name of "priest" also has been
 subjected to shame and contempt because of the Pope's disgraceful,
 shaven, shallow-headed occupants of the office. Comforting, indeed, it
 is to be the happy lambs who have a welcome refuge in the Shepherd and
 find in him joy and comfort in every time of need, assured that his
 perfect faithfulness cares for and protects us from the devil and the
 gates of hell. Relative to this subject, the entire Twenty-third Psalm
 is a beautiful and joyous song, of which the refrain is, "The Lord is
 my Shepherd."
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday After Easter_
 
 Text: First Peter 2, 11-20.
 
 11 Beloved, I beseech you as sojourners and pilgrims, to abstain from
 fleshly lusts, which war against the soul; 12 having your behavior
 seemly among the Gentiles; that, wherein they speak against you as
 evil-doers, they may by your good works, which they behold, glorify
 God in the day of visitation.
 
 13 Be subject to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake: whether
 to the king, as supreme; 14 or unto governors, as sent by him for
 vengeance on evil-doers and for praise to them that do well. 15 For so
 is the will of God, that by well-doing ye should put to silence the
 ignorance of foolish men: 16 as free, and not using your freedom for a
 cloak of wickedness, but as bondservants of God. 17 Honor all men.
 Love the brotherhood. Fear God. Honor the king.
 
 18 Servants, be in subjection to your masters with all fear; not only
 to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. 19 For this is
 acceptable, if for conscience toward God a man endureth griefs,
 suffering wrongfully. 20 For what glory is it, if, when ye sin, and
 are buffeted for it, ye shall take it patiently? but if, when ye do
 well, and suffer for it, ye shall take it patiently, this is
 acceptable with God.
 
 
 OUR CHRISTIAN DUTIES.
 
 1. This epistle selection, too, is an admonition to good works, or the
 fruits of faith. It touches upon nearly every condition of life,
 teaching how each individual should live and conduct himself. But
 first, Peter admonishes Christians in general that in their
 intercourse with gentiles, or the unbelieving world, they give no real
 occasion for censure or reproach concerning their conduct. The
 admonition seems to hinge upon the fact that Christians, as the
 apostle reminds them in the first and second chapters, have been
 called to a lively, a never-dying, hope of an imperishable inheritance
 in heaven, and of eternal joy and salvation; that they are now
 redeemed, having obtained remission of sins through the precious blood
 of Christ; and again, that they are become a holy nation and royal
 priesthood, to show forth and magnify the grace of God, they who in
 time past were not God's people and had not obtained grace. "But now,"
 Peter would say, "you have obtained grace through the divine calling
 of Christ, through the suffering of your Lord. Live, then, as a holy
 people of God and citizens of heaven."
 
 2. We have already heard that in the Christian life are two essential
 principles, two principles upon which Christian teachers may lay
 emphasis. First, faith in the fact that through Christ's blood we are
 released from sin and have forgiveness; second, being forgiven, our
 natures are to be changed and we are to walk in newness of life. In
 baptism, when we first believe, we obtain not only remission of sins
 whereby we are of grace made children of God, but also the power to
 purge out, to mortify, the remaining sins. Our transgressions are not
 forgiven, Paul says (Rom 1, 6), with the privilege of continuing in
 them, as the insolent rejecters of grace imagine. It is this way: Our
 sins being blotted out through the blood of Christ, we need not to
 make remuneration or render satisfaction for them; we are children of
 grace and enjoy forgiveness. Nevertheless, inherent sin is not
 entirely purged out, or mortified.
 
 
 REMISSION AND MORTIFICATION DEFINED.
 
 3. There is difference between remission of sins and mortification of
 them. The distinction should be made clear for the sake of combating
 those who confound and pervert the two principles by their false
 doctrines. In regard to remission, the Pope and many others have
 taught that forgiveness of sins is obtained through the foolishness of
 men's own self-elected works, the satisfactions of their own devising.
 This error has ever prevailed in the world. Cain was the first to make
 it, and it will continue to the end. And where this error is refuted,
 false teachers are found who, on the other hand, accept and boast of
 the doctrine of grace without enjoying its happy results. They proceed
 as if mere forgiveness were enough, and without further effect than
 averting punishment; as if it leaves us where we were before, not
 ameliorating in any wise our moral condition; and as if no more is to
 be known about Christ and the Gospel.
 
 Therefore, they who claim to be Christians must learn that, having
 obtained forgiveness without merit on their part, they should
 henceforth give no place to sins, but rather resist their former evil
 lusts and avoid and flee from the fruits and works thereof. Such is
 the substance of this lesson.
 
 4. But note from the apostle's words how his view has changed since
 the time when, as a fisherman of Bethsaida, he went about with the
 Lord previous to the Lord's death and resurrection. At that time Peter
 and the other apostles, in fact the entire Jewish nation, had no other
 conception of Christ's kingdom--or the kingdom of God--than as an
 earthly one wherein they should know only happiness, figuring as
 wealthy farmers, citizens, noblemen, counts and lords. The sum of the
 world's goods should be theirs, and all the gentiles their vassals.
 They were to be thenceforth undisturbed by enemies, wars, famine or
 misfortune, and to enjoy the extremity of peace, leisure and happiness
 under their supreme King, the Messiah. Such were their hopes, even
 their expectations. With these pleasing fancies were their minds
 filled. And just so today are the Jews full and drunken with their
 visionary dreams.
 
 
 THE NATURE OF CHRIST'S KINGDOM.
 
 5. Observe here, however, Peter teaches that the lot of the sharer in
 Christ's kingdom is quite the reverse of what he once imagined. "O
 beloved Christians," he would say, "who are called and baptized into
 the royal and priestly kingdom of Christ, I have now to tell you
 things quite different from the ideas and dreams you and I used to
 entertain. We are, it is true, citizens, counts and lords in the
 kingdom where Christ reigns supreme over all earthly kings and lords,
 and where is only eternal riches, peace and happiness in every form;
 but the life of that kingdom is unlike that of earthly kings and
 dominions. You are not, be it known, lords and noblemen in a worldly
 sense; neither is Christ a king as the world regards kingliness, and
 the kingdom of the world is not in harmony with his. Know, then, you
 must regard yourselves strangers and pilgrims in the kingdom of the
 world.
 
 "Therefore, I admonish you that, having now become
 Christians--brothers in the eternal heavenly kingdom--your manner of
 life should be such as becomes them who are no longer of a worldly
 kingdom. Regard this earthly life only as the traveler or pilgrim
 regards the country wherein he journeys, the inn where he procures a
 night's lodging. He does not expect to remain in the city, to be mayor
 or even a citizen. He finds there his food, but his thoughts are cast
 beyond its gates, to the place where home is. So," Peter says, "must
 you look upon your earthly course. You did not become Christians with
 the prospect of reigning here on earth, as the Jews fancy they shall
 reign and be established. The dwelling-place, the citizenship and the
 authority of Christians are to be found in another direction, not in
 this world. Therefore, think of yourselves as pilgrims on earth,
 directing your attention toward other possessions and another country,
 wherein you shall be lords forever, and where no discord nor
 misfortune such as you must endure in this earthly harbor shall ever
 enter."
 
 
 CHRISTIAN USE OF THIS LIFE.
 
 6. But how is indifference to this life to be accomplished? Peter goes
 on to say: "Be subject to every ordinance of man ... whether to the
 king ... or unto governors"; again, "Servants, be in subjection to
 your masters ... also to the froward." How is it consistent with royal
 citizenship in a celestial country to be a pilgrim on earth? How can
 we live here with wives and children, houses and lands, and being
 citizens under a temporal government, and yet not be at home? There is
 a distinction here which, as before said, was at first difficult for
 the beloved apostles themselves to understand. But to Christians,
 especially those of today, it should be clear. Christ and the apostles
 do not, in this teaching, design the rejection of external government
 and human authority--what Peter here terms ordinances of men. No, they
 permit these to remain as they are; moreover, they enjoin us to submit
 to and make use of them.
 
 7. This is the difference to be kept in mind: We are to conduct
 ourselves in our earthly stations and occupations as not regarding
 this life our true kingdom and best good. And we are not to think the
 life beyond holds nothing more nor better than what we possess here,
 as do the Jews and the Turks. Although they believe in the
 resurrection of the dead, they carnally imagine the future life will
 be like the present except for its perfect peace and happiness, its
 freedom from misfortune, persecution and all ills. It is the
 prerogative of the Pope and his holy epicures to believe nothing in
 any respect.
 
 Every Christian, be he lord or servant, prince or subject, should
 conduct himself as befits his station, using in trust whatever God has
 given him--dominion and subjects, house and home, wife and children,
 money and property, meat and drink. He is to regard himself solely as
 a guest of earth, as one eating his morsel of bread or taking his
 lunch in an inn; he must conduct himself in this earthly harbor as a
 pious guest. Thus may he actually be a king reigning with fidelity, or
 a lord faithful to his office, and at the same time declare: "I count
 nothing on this life. I do not expect to remain here. This is but a
 strange country to me. True, I am seated in the uppermost place at
 table in this inn; but the occupant of the lowest seat has just as
 much as I, here or yonder. For we are alike guests. But he who
 assigned my duty, whose command I execute, gave me orders to conduct
 myself piously and honorably in this inn, as becomes a guest."
 
 8. So should Christians in all stations of life--lords and ladies,
 servants and maids--conduct themselves as guests of earth. Let them,
 in that capacity, eat and drink, make use of clothing and shoes,
 houses and lands, as long as God wills, yet be prepared to take up
 their journey when these things pass, and to move on out of life as
 the guest moves on out of the house or the city which is not his home.
 Let them conduct themselves as does the guest, with civility toward
 those with whom they come in contact, not infringing on the rights of
 any. For a visitor may not unrestrainedly follow his own pleasure and
 inclinations in the house of a stranger. The saying is: "If you would
 be a guest, you must behave civilly; otherwise you may promptly be
 shown the door or the dungeon."
 
 9. Christians should be aware of their citizenship in a better
 country, that they may rightly adapt themselves to this world. Let
 them not occupy the present life as if intending to remain in it; nor
 as do the monks, who flee responsibility, avoiding civil office and
 trying to run out of the world. For Peter says rather that we are not
 to escape our fellows and live each for himself, but to remain in our
 several conditions in life, united with other mortals as God has bound
 us, and serving one another. At the same time, we are to regard this
 life as a journey through a country where we have no citizenship--where
 we are not at home; to think of ourselves as travelers or pilgrims
 occupying for a night the same inn, eating and drinking there and then
 leaving the place.
 
 10. Let not the occupants of the humbler stations--servants and
 subjects--grumble: "Why should I vex myself with unpleasant household
 tasks, with farm work or heavy labor? This life is not my home anyway,
 and I may as well have it better. Therefore, I will abandon my station
 and enjoy myself; the monks and priests have, in their stations,
 withdrawn themselves from the world and yet drunk deeply, satisfying
 fleshly lusts." No, this is not the right way. If you are unwilling to
 put up with your lot, as the guest in a tavern and among strangers
 must do, you also may not eat and drink.
 
 Similarly, they who are favored with loftier positions in life may
 not, upon this authority, abandon themselves to the idea of living in
 the sheer idleness and lustful pleasure their more favored station
 permits, as if they were to be here always. Let them reason thus:
 "This life, it is true, is transitory--a voyage, a pilgrimage, leading
 to our actual fatherland. But since it is God's will that everyone
 should serve his fellows here in his respective station, in the office
 committed to him, we will do whatever is enjoined upon us. We will
 serve our subjects, our neighbors, our wives and children so long as
 we can; we would not relax our service even if we knew we had to
 depart this very hour and leave all earthly things. For, God be
 praised, had we to die now we would know where we belong, where our
 home is. While we are here, however, on the way, it is ours to fulfill
 the obligations of our earthly citizenship. Therefore, we will live
 with our fellows in obedience to the law of our abiding-place, even
 unto the hour wherein we must cross the threshold outward, that we may
 depart in honor, leaving no occasion for complaint."
 
 11. Thus, mark you, should every Christian conduct himself here on
 earth, according to Peter. In the first place, he should know where is
 his real home, his fatherland. We learn this through faith in Christ,
 whereby we become children of God, heirs of eternal life, citizens of
 heaven. Accordingly, we sing: "Now we pray thee, Holy Spirit, for true
 faith," etc., when we depart home from this wretchedness. This
 sentiment accords beautifully with the text here where Peter calls us
 "sojourners and pilgrims"--wayfarers in earthly wretchedness, desiring
 home and casting our thoughts beyond the gates of our sojourning-place.
 Second, though we must suffer this wretched condition in a foreign
 land, we are under obligation to render every honor to the host and to
 respect the inn, making the best of whatever may befall us.
 
 12. The prophet Jeremiah found it necessary to give admonition of this
 sort to his wretched Jewish countrymen in Babylon who longed
 unspeakably to be home again and almost despaired because of having so
 long to suffer misery among strangers when many of their brethren were
 at home. Other prophets had encouraged them with the promise of soon
 being returned. Consequently many of them ceased to till the land and
 neglected to provide for a livelihood. To these Jeremiah writes (ch.
 29, 10): "Ye must have patience, for ye are not so soon to return--not
 till seventy years be accomplished." Meanwhile, though in wretchedness
 and captivity, they were to do as he bids in verses 5-7: "Build ye
 houses, and dwell in them; and plant gardens, and eat the fruit of
 them. Take ye wives, and beget sons and daughters; and take wives for
 your sons, and give your daughters to husbands, that they may bear
 sons and daughters: and multiply ye there, and be not diminished. And
 seek the peace of the city whither I have caused you to be carried
 away captive, and pray unto Jehovah for it; for in the peace thereof
 shall ye have peace."
 
 That there in their misery they should build houses and make
 themselves citizens of Babylon, should marry and rear children--yes,
 give their children in marriage--as if they were to remain there
 permanently--this injunction of the prophet was altogether
 disagreeable and annoying to them. And still more offensive was the
 command to pray for the city and kingdom wherein they were captives.
 Much rather would they have prayed for liberation; for, influenced by
 the other prophets, they hoped to return home the following year.
 
 13. Now, how was it with them? The godly, faithful ones had reason to
 hope and trust in release and a return to their own kingdom. Surely
 there was no pleasure, no joy, for them in their present miserable
 condition, as in Psalm 137 they testify and complain by the rivers of
 Babylon. There they cried and wept and had not an hour of enjoyment
 when they thought of home. The long seventy years their hearts
 continually stood at the gate ready to depart, so that they had no
 inclination whatever to build houses, to cultivate farms, to make
 gardens, to take wives and rear children. Nevertheless, the prophet
 bids them meet all the requirements of citizens of that country; and
 more than that, to pray for their hosts in the same spirit in which
 they would pray for their neighbors and fellow-citizens, asking God
 for peace and prosperity upon the city.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS SUBJECTS OF TWO KINGDOMS.
 
 14. So, too, Christians are subjects of two kingdoms--they have
 experience of two kinds of life. Here on earth where the world has its
 home and its heavenly kingdom, we surely are not citizens. According
 to Paul (Phil 3, 20), "our conversation"--our citizenship--"is with
 Christ in heaven"; that is, in yonder life, the life we await. As the
 Jews hoped to be released from Babylon, we hope to be released from
 this present life and to go where we shall be lordly citizens forever.
 But being obliged to continue in this wretched state--our Babylon--so
 long as God wills, we should do as the Jews were commanded to
 do--mingle with other mortals, eat and drink, make homes, till the
 soil, fill civil offices and show good will toward our fellows, even
 praying for them, until the hour arrives for us to depart unto our
 home.
 
 15. He who is guided by these facts, who comprehends the distinction
 between the kingdom of heaven and the kingdom of the world, will know
 how to resist successfully all classes of fanatics. For these latter
 paint this life in a terrible aspect. They want to run out of the
 world entirely, and are unwilling to associate with anyone; or they
 proceed to disturb civil regulations and to overthrow all order; or
 again, as with the Pope, they interfere in secular rule, desiring
 temporal authority, wholly under the name and color of Christianity.
 
 Having as Christians forgiveness of sins, and being now people of God,
 children of his kingdom, citizens no longer of Babylon but of heaven,
 let us know that during the period of our sojourn here among
 strangers, it is ours to live righteously, honorably and chastely, to
 further civil and domestic peace and to lend counsel and aid to
 benefit even the wicked and ungrateful, meanwhile constantly striving
 after our inheritance and keeping in mind the kingdom whither we are
 bound.
 
 16. In short, a Christian must be one who, as Paul says (1 Cor 7,
 29-31), uses this world as not abusing it, who buys and possesses as
 though he possessed not, who has wife and children as though he had
 them not and who builds as though not building. How is it possible to
 reconcile these seeming inconsistencies? By making the Christian faith
 distinct from the faith of the Jews and Turks--yes, of the Papists
 even: by accepting the fact that the Christian's attitude toward this
 earthly life is the attitude of the guest; that in such capacity is he
 to build, to buy, to have dealings and hold intercourse with his
 fellows, to join them in all temporal affairs--a guest who respects
 his host's wishes, the laws of the realm and of the city and the
 customs of the inn, but at the same time the Christian refrains from
 attesting his satisfaction with this life as if he intended to remain
 here and hoped for nothing better. Thus will the Christian pass
 through every temporal event in the right way--having every possession
 as though not having it, using and yet not cleaving to it; not so
 occupied with the temporal as to lose the eternal, but leaving
 behind--forgetting--the former while striving after the latter as the
 goal set before him.
 
 17. Therefore, they who presume to run out of the world by going into
 the desert or the wilderness; who, unwilling to occupy the inn but
 finding it indispensable nevertheless, must become their own
 hosts--these are great and unreasonable fools. Surely they must eat
 and drink and have clothing and shelter. With these things they cannot
 dispense, even if they can withdraw from all society. Nor is their
 action forsaking and fleeing the world, as they imagine it to be.
 Whatever your station and condition, whatever your occupation in life,
 of necessity you must be somewhere on earth while mortal life is
 yours. Nor has God separated you from men; he has placed you in
 society. Each individual is created and born for the sake of other
 individuals. But observe, wherever you are and whatever your station,
 you are, I say, to flee the world.
 
 
 HOW TO ESCAPE THE WORLD.
 
 18. But how are we to flee the world? Not by donning caps and creeping
 into a corner or going into the wilderness. You cannot so escape the
 devil and sin. Satan will as easily find you in the wilderness in a
 gray cap as he will in the market in a red coat. It is the heart which
 must flee, and that by keeping itself "unspotted from the world," as
 James 1, 27 says. In other words, you must not cling to temporal
 things, but be guided by the doctrine of faith in Christ, and await
 the eternal, heavenly inheritance; and in that faith and that hope are
 you to execute the trust and work committed to you here, declaring the
 while: "That which I do here is not the chief good, the thing of real
 value, for which I live; though such is the case with the world, the
 Jews, the Turks and the Papists. I hold this temporal life as a
 tavern, valuing it no more than the guest values the inn where he
 enjoys food and lodging, while heart and mind turn ever to his own
 home."
 
 What tolerance would there be for one foolish enough to declare: "I
 will not eat nor drink here. I will behave peculiarly, smashing
 windows and turning things upside down, for this is not my
 abiding-place"? For the very purpose of advancing himself on his
 journey, the traveler should make use of the inn, accepting whatever
 is offered.
 
 19. Likewise should Christians use the world, constantly casting their
 thoughts beyond this life, notwithstanding they have here house and
 home, wife and children. These are for the present life only, yet the
 Christian owes them due consideration, the while he asserts: "Today we
 are here, tomorrow elsewhere. Now we avail ourselves of this inn, the
 next day of another. We do not expect to remain here."
 
 Relative to this subject, Peter in his beautiful Pentecostal sermon
 says concerning David, who nevertheless was a holy king, that he did
 not ascend into the heavens, but, having fulfilled the will of God,
 fell asleep. Peter, so far from being willing to disparage David's
 office and rule, to criticise him therein for wrong-doing, rather
 magnifies it in glowing terms. David was a king, and cast not aside
 his crown; no, he retained his royal glory. He held his office as a
 God-intrusted one, in the execution whereof he served God. Similarly
 should the righteous ruler do--in fact, all men in their respective
 offices and stations. Let them remember they are not placed where they
 are to choose their own pleasure, but solely for the service of God.
 Such is their duty so long as they are here--transients, like the
 stranger at the inn with other guests, who conducts himself with
 respect to the needs and the pleasure of his fellows, doing as they
 do, and in case of danger and necessity uniting with them in the
 effort to help and protect.
 
 20. King David did not regard his kingdom and his God-bestowed
 blessings as his real glory, but as his office, his opportunities for
 service in this earthly pilgrimage. In it all he remains a guest,
 expecting to leave this tarrying-place for a certain abode. Hence he
 says (Ps 39, 12): "I am a stranger with thee, a sojourner, as all my
 fathers were." How is that? Has a king of David's glorious rank
 occasion to speak thus? Is he a guest who occupies a royal throne, who
 is lord of landed estate and of more than twelve hundred thousand
 people according to his own calculation? This is David's meaning: In
 his kingdom he serves God as a transient here on earth, and set apart
 by God for that purpose; but at the same time as a citizen of God's
 kingdom in another life, another existence, which he regards more
 glorious than earthly glory, and as affording something better than a
 temporal crown.
 
 
 REASONS TO ABSTAIN FROM CARNAL LUST.
 
 21. Such is Peter's teaching. He admonishes Christians to Christlike
 lives and works in view of the fact that they are called to great
 glory, having become through Christ a royal priesthood, a people of
 God and citizens of heaven. He would have them occupy this temporal
 world as guests, striving after another and eternal kingdom; that is,
 to abstain from all carnal lusts and maintain a blameless walk, a life
 of good works. The apostle assigns two reasons for such self-denial:
 First, that we may not, through carnal, lustful habits, lose the
 spiritual and eternal; second, that God's name and the glory we have
 in Christ may not be slandered among our heathen adversaries, but
 rather, because of our good works, honored. These are the chief
 reasons for doing good works. They ought most forcibly to urge us to
 the performance of our duties.
 
 22. Peter admonishes, first, to "abstain from fleshly lusts, which war
 against the soul." He implies that if we do not resist carnal
 inclinations, but rather follow them, we shall lose our priceless
 eternal inheritance. To be a stranger on earth, striving after another
 and better life, is inconsistent with living in fleshly lusts as if
 one's sole intent was to remain in the world forever. If you would
 have the things of one life, Peter says, you must forsake the things
 of the other. If you forget your fatherland and lie drunken with this
 carnal life, as does the heathen world in living in unbelief and
 without hope of eternal life, you will never reach yonder existence;
 for so you reject it.
 
 It is necessary to strive if we are to withstand the lusts of the
 flesh; for these, Peter says, war against the soul--against faith and
 the good conscience in man. If lust triumphs, our hold on the Spirit
 and on faith is lost. Now, if you would not be defeated, you must
 valiantly contend against carnal inclinations, being careful to
 overcome them and to maintain your spiritual, eternal good. In this
 instance, our own welfare demands the conquest.
 
 23. In the second place, God's honor calls for it. God's honor here on
 earth is affected by our manner of life. We are to avoid giving
 occasion for our enemies to open their mouths in calumniation of God's
 name and his Word. Rather must we magnify the name of God by our
 confession and general conduct, and thus win others, who shall with us
 confess and honor him. Christ commands (Mt 5, 16): "Even so let your
 light shine before men; that they may see your good works, and glorify
 your Father who is in heaven."
 
 24. Peter proceeds to enumerate certain good works appropriate to
 Christians in all stations of life, particularly those Christians
 under authority, or in a state of servitude--men-servants and
 maid-servants. In the apostle's day, Christians had to submit to
 heathen authority--to serve unbelieving masters. Peter admonishes
 Christians to glorify God by their conduct, patiently bearing the
 violence and injustice offered, and forbearing to return evil; as we
 heard in the epistle lesson for the preceding Sunday which follows
 today's text. But to take up all the good works Peter enumerates here
 would require too much time at present.
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday After Easter_
 Second Sermon.
 
 Text: First Corinthians 15, 20-28.
 
 20 But now hath Christ been raised from the dead, the firstfruits of
 them that are asleep. 21 For since by man came death, by man came also
 the resurrection of the dead. 22 For as in Adam all die, so also in
 Christ shall all be made alive. 23 But each in his own order: Christ
 the firstfruits; then they that are Christ's, at his coming. 24 Then
 cometh the end, when he shall deliver up the kingdom to God, even the
 Father; when he shall have abolished all rule and all authority and
 power. 25 For he must reign, till he hath put all his enemies under
 his feet. 26 The last enemy that shall be abolished is death. 27 For,
 He put all things in subjection under his feet. But when he saith, All
 things are put in subjection, it is evident that he is excepted who
 did subject all things unto him. 28 And when all things have been
 subjected unto him, then shall the Son also himself be subjected to
 him that did subject all things unto him, that God may be all in all.
 
 
 We have no desire to reject the Sunday epistle readings in common use
 up to this time, particularly as some of them are excellent and
 profitable; nevertheless, a different order and selection might well
 have been made. For portions have been taken from James for the two
 Sundays following, the intent of the compilers having been to choose
 something from each of the apostles, among whom they regarded James
 one of the chief. These selections, however, seem not to have been
 written by an apostle; they do not at all compare with the selections
 from the other apostles. It were better for the instruction and
 comfort of the people, and as befitting this season, to handle the
 article of the resurrection--concerning the resurrection of both
 Christ and ourselves, or of all the dead--between Easter and
 Pentecost. It seems appropriate so to do, making selections from the
 preaching of the apostles; for instance, the entire fifteenth chapter
 of Paul's first epistle to the Corinthians, which treats throughout of
 the resurrection of the dead. Therefore, we shall arrange this chapter
 to the present and following Sundays. It is our intent to so use it
 hereafter, and they who feel disposed may adopt it likewise. But it is
 not our purpose in so doing to restrict those who prefer the old
 arrangement. The entire fifteenth chapter, however, being amply
 explained in special sermons, we would advise everyone to read those
 expositions.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday After Easter_
 
 Text: First Corinthians 15, 35-50.
 
 35 But some one will say, How are the dead raised? and with what
 manner of body do they come? 36 Thou foolish one, that which thou
 thyself sowest is not quickened except it die: 37 and that which thou
 sowest, thou sowest not the body that shall be, but a bare grain, it
 may chance of wheat, or of some other kind; 38 but God giveth it a
 body even as it pleased him, and to each seed a body of its own. 39
 All flesh is not the same flesh; but there is one flesh of men, and
 another flesh of beasts, and another flesh of birds, and another of
 fishes. 40 There are also celestial bodies, and bodies terrestrial;
 but the glory of the celestial is one, and the glory of the
 terrestrial is another. 41 There is one glory of the sun, and another
 glory of the moon, and another glory of the stars; for one star
 differeth from another star in glory. 42 So also is the resurrection
 of the dead. It is sown in corruption; it is raised in incorruption:
 43 it is sown in dishonor; it is raised in glory: it is sown in
 weakness; it is raised in power; 44 it is sown a natural body; it is
 raised a spiritual body. If there is a natural body, there is also a
 spiritual body. 45 So also it is written, The first man Adam became a
 living soul. The last Adam became a life-giving spirit. 46 Howbeit
 that is not first which is spiritual, but that which is natural; then
 that which is spiritual. 47 The first man is of the earth, earthy; the
 second man is of heaven. 48 As is the earthy, such are they also that
 are earthy: and as is the heavenly, such are they also that are
 heavenly. 49 And as we have borne the image of the earthy we shall
 also bear the image of the heavenly.
 
 50 Now this I say, brethren, that flesh and blood cannot inherit the
 kingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption.
 
 
 This selection follows immediately after the one we have arranged for
 the preceding Sunday, concerning the resurrection of the dead. In the
 text Paul deals with the question, How are the dead raised, and with
 what body do they come? This passage likewise is treated fully enough
 in the sermons on the fifteenth chapter, and they who desire may read
 those discourses; they are too lengthy to insert here.
 
 The selection from the first chapter of James, however, having
 commonly been read for this Sunday, and as it contains good
 instruction and admonition, we will, for the sake of some who may
 desire to retain it, allow it to remain; and we will make some
 explanation of it lest we be thought to desire its rejection
 altogether. It was not, however, written by an apostle. It does not
 bear the apostolic stamp in all particulars, and is not in every
 respect compatible with the true doctrine.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday After Easter_
 Second Sermon.[1]
 
 Text: James 1, 16-21.
 
 16 Be not deceived, my beloved brethren. 17 Every good gift and every
 perfect gift is from above, coming down from the Father of lights,
 with whom can be no variation, neither shadow that is cast by turning.
 18 Of his own will he brought us forth by the word of truth, that we
 should be a kind of firstfruits of his creatures.
 
 19 Ye know this, my beloved brethren. But let every man be swift to
 hear, slow to speak, slow to wrath: 20 for the wrath of man worketh
 not the righteousness of God. 21 Wherefore putting away all filthiness
 and overflowing of wickedness, receive with meekness the implanted
 word, which is able to save your souls.
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon was printed first in the "Two Sermons on
 Anger," by Luther, Wittenberg, 1536.]
 
 
 1. This lesson was addressed to all Christians. Particularly was it
 meant for the time when they had to endure from the unbelieving world
 persecutions severe and oft; as James indicates at the outset, where
 he says (verses 2-4): "Count it all joy, my brethren, when ye fall
 into manifold temptations; knowing that the proving of your faith
 worketh patience. And let patience have its perfect work, that ye may
 be perfect and entire." Again (verse 12): "Blessed is the man that
 endureth temptation."
 
 
 WHY MEN REJECT THE GOSPEL.
 
 2. Two things there are which part men from the Gospel: one is angry
 impatience, and the other evil lust. Of these James speaks in this
 epistle. The former sin, he says, arises under persecution--when for
 the sake of Christ the Lord you must give up property and honor, and
 risk body and life; must be regarded as fools, as the drudges, yes,
 the footstool, of the world. Painful and intolerable to the point of
 discouragement and weariness is such a lot, particularly when it is
 apparent that your persecutors enjoy good fortune, having honor, power
 and wealth, while you suffer constantly. Peter, too, admonishes (1 Pet
 3, 10), upon authority of Psalm 34, 12-14: He who would be a Christian
 must be prepared to avoid evil and do good, to seek peace, to refrain
 his tongue from evil and his lips from speaking guile, and must commit
 himself to God.
 
 In the case of a great many people otherwise favorably disposed toward
 the Gospel, it is nothing but persecution which deters and repels them
 from it. They cannot endure the injuries and reproaches they must
 suffer for its sake. But for the precious holy cross which is laid
 upon Christians, and their inability to overcome indignation and
 impatience, the world would long ago have been crowded with
 Christians. But on account of trials men recoil, saying: "Rather than
 endure these, I will remain with the majority; as it is with them, so
 be it with me."
 
 3. The second thing to which James refers is worldly
 lust--"filthiness," as James terms it. This, too, is a prevailing
 evil, particularly with the common people. When they once hear the
 Gospel they are prone to think right away that they know all about it.
 They cease to heed it and drown in lust, pride and covetousness of the
 world, being concerned entirely with accumulating wealth and seeking
 pleasure.
 
 4. That these two evils prevail is apparent to the eyes of all men
 today. We fear that we shall fare no better than the prophets and the
 apostles; these things are likely to continue. Nevertheless, we must
 unceasingly exert ourselves in behalf of ourselves and others to guard
 diligently against both these evils. Particularly must we not
 impatiently murmur and rage against God; we must also show meekness
 toward our fellowmen, to the end that wrath everywhere may be quelled
 and subdued, and only patience and meekness reign among Christians.
 
 5. As I said before, such seems to be the trend of the whole text. The
 apostle gives a reason why we should be patient to the extent of not
 allowing ourselves to be vexed with them who injure us, especially
 ungrateful rejecters of the Word of God or persecutors of Christians.
 The reason he assigns is the debt of gratitude we owe: we are to
 remember the great good we receive from God in heaven--"Every good
 gift and every perfect gift is from above, coming down from the Father
 of lights."
 
 
 OUR BLESSINGS OUTWEIGH OUR ILLS.
 
 6. If you carefully balance our gifts and trials against each other
 and weigh them carefully, you will find the blessings conferred upon
 you so numerous and rich as far to outweigh the injuries and
 reproaches you must incur. Therefore, if you are assailed by the
 world, and are provoked to impatience by ingratitude, contempt and
 persecution, compare with your trials the blessings and consolations
 you have in Christ and his Gospel. You will soon find you have more
 reason to pity your enemies than you have to murmur and to rage
 against them.
 
 7. Again, concerning them who live in worldly lusts--in "filthiness,"
 as the apostle terms it: let not their conduct induce you to forsake
 the Gospel to be like them; for their portion is altogether paltry in
 comparison with your glorious blessings and divine riches. Take
 thought, then, and do not allow yourselves to be misled either by the
 wanton wickedness of the world, through the injury and pain it may
 inflict, or by the prosperity of the world's wealthy, who live
 riotously in all manner of voluptuousness. Look upon what you have
 from the Father in comparison--his divine blessings, his perfect
 gifts.
 
 8. For the sake of distinction, we shall designate by "good gifts" the
 blessings we enjoy here in this life; by "perfect gifts" those
 awaiting us in the life to come. James implies this distinction when
 he says: "Of his own will he brought us forth by the word of truth,
 that we should be a kind of first-fruits of his creatures." In the
 terms "good gifts" and "perfect gifts," the apostle comprehends all
 our blessings, those we have already received in the present life and
 those to be ours in the life to come.
 
 9. I will not now speak particularly of earthly, transient and
 changeable blessings, such as temporal goods, honor, a healthy body
 and others, but could we only compare our blessings with these and
 weigh our treasures and surpassing blessings, we should presently
 conclude that ours transcend in value a hundred thousand times
 anything the world possesses and boasts. Many individuals there are
 who would give thousands of dollars to have the sight of both eyes. So
 much do they prize the blessing of sight, they would willingly suffer
 a year's illness or endure other great inconveniences to obtain it.
 Less sensible would they be to such discomforts than to the
 deprivation of the thing they desire.
 
 Of physical blessings particularly, we shall not now speak, however,
 save to mention that they are never equaled by physical ills. Who can
 purchase or merit, even by enduring tenfold his present physical ills,
 the very least of God's gifts; as, for instance, the beholding of the
 light of the beautiful sun for a single day? And so long as mortal
 life itself remains, you have the greatest of blessings, one
 outweighing far all gold and silver and all the misfortunes you may
 endure.
 
 
 OUR BLESSINGS IN CHRIST'S RESURRECTION.
 
 But we shall speak now particularly of the blessings we have in
 Christ's resurrection, a subject appropriate to this Paschal season.
 The text says, Every good gift and every perfect gift cometh down from
 the Father of lights. For God has begun the work of edifying us, of
 building us up, and will constitute us his own children, his heirs.
 This work, James says, is wrought through the Gospel, or "the word of
 truth," as he terms it.
 
 10. But what does the resurrection advantage us? It has already
 brought us this gain: our hearts are enlightened and filled with joy,
 and we have passed from the darkness of sin, error and fear into the
 clear light; the Christian is able to judge all sects, all doctrines
 of devils, that may arise on earth. Is it not a thing of unspeakable
 value, a precious gift, to be enlightened and taught of God to the
 extent of being able to judge correctly every doctrine and every kind
 of conduct exhibited in this world, and to show all men how to
 live--what to do and what to avoid? Well may we boast, then, of having
 here on earth also a Father--"the Father of lights"--from whom we
 receive blessings of such magnitude that man should willingly yield
 body and life for their attainment.
 
 What would I in my darkness not have given to be liberated from the
 very dread which prompted the celebration of masses and other
 abominations, yes, from the torture and anguish of conscience which
 left me no rest? or to have instruction enabling me rightly to
 interpret a single psalm? I would, for such enlightenment, readily
 have crawled on the ground to the ends of the earth. Thank God, we now
 have the blessed treasure abundantly, the great and precious light,
 the gracious Word. What is the sum of all suffering and misfortune
 compared to this light?
 
 11. Secondly, through Christ's resurrection we have a good, joyous
 conscience, one able to withstand every form of sin and temptation and
 to maintain a sure hope of eternal life. The great, glorious gifts and
 blessings of the resurrection are these: the Gospel, Holy Baptism, the
 power of the Holy Spirit, and comfort in all adversity. What is a
 slight injury or the loss of some temporal blessing in comparison with
 these? What reason has any man to murmur and to rage when such divine
 blessings are his, even here in this life, blessings which none can
 take away or abridge?
 
 If, then, you are called to renounce money, possessions, honor and
 men's favor, remember you have a treasure more precious than all the
 honors and all the possessions of the world. Again, when you see one
 living in great splendor, in pleasure and presumption, following his
 own inclinations, think thus: "What has he? A wretched portion, a
 beggarly morsel. In contrast, I have divine grace enabling me to know
 God's will and the work he would have me do, and all in heaven and on
 earth is mine." Look, says James, upon the treasure already obtained
 from the Father of lights--his great and glorious gifts.
 
 12. But these do not represent the consummation of resurrection
 blessings. We must yet await the real, the perfect, gifts. Our earthly
 condition does not admit of perfection; hence we cannot truly
 perceive, cannot comprehend, our treasure. We are but "a kind of
 first-fruits of his creatures." God has only commenced to work in us,
 but he will not leave us in that state. If we continue in faith, not
 allowing ourselves to be turned away through wrath and impatience, God
 will bring us to the real, eternal blessings, called "perfect gifts,"
 the possession of which excludes error, stumbling, anger, and any sin
 whatever.
 
 
 THE FUTURE LIFE OF BLESSEDNESS.
 
 13. That future existence, James goes on to say, will be one wherein
 is "no variation, neither shadow that is cast by turning"--no
 alternating of light and darkness. In other words, there will not be
 the variation and instability characteristic of this world, even of
 the Christian life--today joyous, tomorrow sad; now standing but soon
 tottering. It is in the Christian life just as in the physical world:
 we find variableness and continual change--light is succeeded by
 darkness, day by night, cold by heat; here are mountains, there
 valleys; today we are well, tomorrow ill; and so it goes. But all this
 change shall be abolished. The present life shall be succeeded by one
 wherein is no variation, but a permanence and eternity of blessing. We
 shall unceasingly behold God in his majesty where dwells no darkness,
 no death, plague nor infirmity, but pure light, joy and happiness.
 Look to this future life! call it to mind, when assailed by the world
 and enticed to anger or evil lust. Remember the great blessings of
 heaven assuredly promised you, and whereof Christ your Head has
 already taken possession, that he may make sure your entrance into the
 same blessings. These should be to you far more precious and desirable
 than the things of earth, which all men must leave behind.
 
 14. To these things the Christian should direct his thoughts and
 efforts, that he may learn to prize his blessings, to recognize his
 treasures as great and glorious, and to thank God for the beginnings
 of his grace and blessing bestowed here below. Let us ever look and
 turn toward true knowledge and understanding, toward righteousness and
 life; so shall we attain that perfection wherein we are freed from the
 present imperfect, unstable existence, the yoke we now bear upon our
 necks and which continually weighs upon us and renders us liable to
 fall from the Gospel.
 
 Impulse and aid for such pursuit we are to receive from the holy cross
 and persecution, as well as from the example of the world. With what
 ease the poor, wretched people are wrested from the Word and from
 faith, wherein they might enjoy unspeakable grace and blessings, by
 the sordid, beggarly pleasures to be sought for here!
 
 15. Therefore, James says: "Why trouble yourselves about earthly
 blessings, which though God-given are transitory? Why not much rather
 rejoice in the comforting prospect of the great heavenly blessings
 already abundantly yours and which cannot be taken from you?" And by
 way of explanation he says further: "Of his own will he brought us
 forth by the word of truth."
 
 
 GOD'S CHILDREN BEGOTTEN BY THE WORD.
 
 16. The first, and in fact the best, thing Christ has sent us from on
 high is sonship. He brought us forth, made us his children, or heirs.
 We are truly called children born of God. But how are we born? Through
 "the Word of truth," or the true Word. By this statement James makes a
 wide thrust at all factions and sects. For they also have a word and
 boast much of their doctrine, but theirs is not the Word of truth
 whereby men are made children of God. They teach naught, and know
 naught, about how we are to be born God's children through faith. They
 prate much about the works done by us in the state derived from Adam.
 
 But we have a Word whereby, as we are assured, God makes us his
 beloved children and justifies us--if we believe in that Word. He
 justifies us not through works or laws. The Christian must derive his
 sonship from his birth. All whittling and patching is to no purpose.
 The disciples of Moses, and all work-mongers, would effect it by
 commandments, extorting a work here and a work there, effecting
 nothing. New beings are needed, children of God by birth, as John 1,
 12 says.
 
 17. The children of God, John tells us, are they who believe on the
 name of Christ; that is, who sincerely cling to the Word. John extols
 the Word as the great, the mighty, gift. They are children who cleave
 to the message that through Christ God forgives their sins and
 receives them into his favor; who adhere to this promise in all
 temptations, afflictions and troubles. The Word here on earth is the
 jewel which secures sonship. Now, since God has so greatly blessed you
 as to make you his own begotten children, shall he not also give you
 every other good?
 
 18. Whence, then, do you derive sonship? Not from your own will, not
 from your own powers or efforts. Were it so, I and other monks surely
 should have obtained it, independently of the Word; it would have been
 ours through the numerous works we performed in our monastic life. It
 is secured, James says, "of his will." For it never entered into the
 thought of any man that so should we be made children of God. The idea
 did not grow in our gardens; it did not spring up in our wells. But it
 came down from above, "from the Father of lights," by Word and Spirit
 revealed to us and given into our hearts through the agency of his
 apostles and their successors, by whom the Word has been transmitted
 to us. Hence we did not secure it through our efforts or merits. Of
 his Fatherly will and good pleasure was it conferred upon us; of pure
 grace and mercy he gave it.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS THE FIRST-FRUITS.
 
 19. James says, "That we should be a kind of first-fruits of his
 creatures"; that is, the newly-begun creature, or work, of God. By
 this phrase the apostle distinguishes the creatures of God from the
 creatures of the world, or creatures of men. Likewise does Peter when
 he says (1 Pet 2, 13), "Be subject to every ordinance [or creature] of
 man"; that is, to everything commanded, ordained, instituted, made, by
 men. For instance, a prince constitutes men tax-gatherers, squires,
 secretaries, or anything he desires, within the limits of his power.
 
 But new creatures are found with God. They are styled "creatures of
 God" because he has created them as his own work, independently of
 human effort or human power. And so the Christian is called a "new
 creature of God," a creature God himself has made, aside from all
 other creatures and higher than they. At the same time, such creation
 of God is only in its initial stage. He still daily operates upon it
 until it becomes perfect, a wholly divine creature, as the very sun in
 clearness and purity, without sin and imperfection, all aglow with
 love divine.
 
 20. Take into careful consideration these facts. Keep before you the
 great blessing, honor and glory God has conferred upon you in making
 you heirs of the life to come, the life wherein shall be no
 imperfection nor variation, the life which shall be an existence in
 divine purity and protection like God's own. Do not, then, by any
 means allow yourselves to be provoked to anger by the wretched,
 sordid, beggar's wallet which the world craves. Rather, much rather,
 rejoice in the divine blessings, and thank God for having made you
 worthy of them. Whether sweet or bitter--in comparison with these let
 everything else be spurned. "For I reckon that the sufferings of this
 present time are not worthy to be compared with the glory which shall
 be revealed to us-ward"--to us the children of God--says Paul in
 Romans 8, 18.
 
 
 IMPATIENT ANGER FORBIDDEN.
 
 21. So James draws the conclusion: "Let every man be swift to hear,
 slow to speak, slow to wrath." In other words, in receiving counsel or
 comfort be swift; but do not permit yourselves readily to criticise,
 curse, or upbraid God or men. James does not mean to prohibit reproof,
 censure, indignation and correction where the command of God or
 necessity requires; but he forbids rashness or hastiness on our part,
 despite our provocation in the premises. When we are provoked we
 should first hear what the Word of God says and be advised thereby. It
 is the right and true counsel, and we should ever permit ourselves to
 be led by it; according to its teaching should all our decisions,
 reproofs and censures be regulated. In immediate connection, James
 bids us receive the Word with meekness; we are not to be incensed when
 censured by its authority, or to become impatient and murmur when we
 have to suffer something because of it.
 
 The reason James assigns for restraining our anger is: "For the wrath
 of man worketh not the righteousness of God." This is a truth admitted
 even by the heathen--"Ira furor brevis est," etc.--and verified by
 experience. Therefore, upon authority of Psalm 4, 4, when you feel
 your wrath rising, sin not, but go to your chamber and commune with
 yourself. Let not wrath take you by surprise and cause you to yield to
 it. When slander and reproach is heaped upon you, or curses given, do
 not rashly allow yourself to be immediately inflamed with anger.
 Rather, take heed to overcome the provocation and not to respond to
 it.
 
 22. The apostle's first point, then, is: Christians should guard
 against yielding to wrath and impatience, and should remember the
 great blessings they enjoy--gifts wherewith all the advantages and
 favors of the world are unworthy of comparison.
 
 23. Similarly, James says regarding the other point: "Wherefore
 putting away all filthiness and overflowing of wickedness," etc. By
 "filthiness" he means the impure life of the world--indulgence,
 voluptuousness and knavery of every sort. These things, he would say,
 should be far from you Christians who enjoy blessings so great and
 glorious. Could you rightly recognize and appreciate these blessings,
 you would regard all worldly pursuits and pleasures mere filth in
 comparison. Nor is this overdrawn; they are such when contrasted with
 the good and perfect heavenly gifts and treasures.
 
 24. "Receive with meekness the implanted word." You have the Word,
 James says, a Word which is yours not by your own fancy or effort, but
 which God, by grace, gave to you--implanted in you. It has free
 course--is preached, read and sung among you. (By the grace of God, it
 is free among us, too.) In this respect, God be praised, there is no
 lack. It is of the utmost importance, however, to receive it, to make
 profitable use of it; to handle it with meekness that we may hold it
 fast and not allow it to be effaced by anger under persecution or by
 the allurements of worldly lusts. Christ says (Lk 21, 19), "In your
 patience possess ye your souls [ye shall win your souls]."
 
 
 MEEKNESS AND PATIENCE ENJOINED.
 
 Meekness and patience are necessary to enable us to triumph over the
 devil and the world. Without them we shall not be able to hold fast
 the Word in our strife against those evil forces. We must fight and
 contend against sin, but if we essay to cool our wrath by grasping the
 devil and his followers by the hair and wreaking vengeance upon them,
 we will accomplish nothing and may thereby lose our treasure, the
 beloved Word. Therefore, lay hold of the Word planted or engrafted
 within you, that you may be able to retain it and have it bring forth
 its fruit in yourself.
 
 
 THE POWER OF THE WORD.
 
 25. It is a Word, says James in conclusion, "which is able to save
 your souls." What more could be desired? You have the Word, the
 promise of all divine blessings and gifts. It is able to save you if
 you but steadfastly cleave to it. Why, then, need you take any account
 of the world, and anything it may do, whether good or evil? What
 injury can the world render, what help can it offer, so long as you
 hold the treasure of the Word? Observe that the apostle ascribes to
 the spoken Word, the preached Gospel, the power to save souls.
 Similarly, Paul commends it to the Romans (ch. 1, 16), in almost the
 same words, as "the power of God unto salvation to every one that
 believeth."
 
 26. Now, the Word is implanted within you in a way to give you the
 certain comfort and sure hope of your salvation. Be careful, then, not
 to permit yourselves to be wrested from it by the wrath or the filth
 of the world. Take heed to accept in purity and to maintain with
 patience the Word so graciously and richly given you by God without
 effort or merit on your part. Those who are without the Word, and yet
 endeavor to attain heaven, what efforts have they made in the past!
 what efforts are they making today! They might torment themselves to
 death; they might institute and celebrate every possible service--they
 would accomplish nothing. Is it not better to cling to the Word and
 maintain this treasure whereby you attain salvation and divine sonship
 than to permit the world to wrest you from it through persecution,
 passion or moral filth the source of its own ruin and perdition?
 
 
 
 
 _Fifth Sunday After Easter_
 
 Text: First Corinthians 15, 51-58.
 
 51 Behold, I tell you a mystery: We all shall not sleep, but we shall
 all be changed, 52 in a moment, in the twinkling of an eye, at the
 last trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be raised
 incorruptible, and we shall be changed. 53 For this corruptible must
 put on incorruption, and this mortal must put on immortality. 54 But
 when this corruptible shall have put on incorruption, and this mortal
 shall have put on immortality, then shall come to pass the saying that
 is written, Death is swallowed up in victory. 55 O death, where is thy
 victory? O death, where is thy sting? 56 The sting of death is sin;
 and the power of sin is the law: 57 but thanks be to God, who giveth
 us the victory through our Lord Jesus Christ. 58 Wherefore, my beloved
 brethren, be ye stedfast, unmovable, always abounding in the work of
 the Lord, forasmuch as ye know that your labor is not vain in the
 Lord.
 
 
 You will find this lesson explained in the special sermons on the same
 chapter.
 
 
 
 
 _Ascension Day_
 
 Text: Acts 1, 1-11.
 
 1 The former treatise I made, O Theophilus, concerning all that Jesus
 began both to do and to teach, 2 until the day in which he was
 received up, after that he had given commandment through the Holy
 Spirit unto the apostles whom he had chosen: 3 to whom he also showed
 himself alive after his passion by many proofs, appearing unto them by
 the space of forty days, and speaking the things concerning the
 kingdom of God: 4 and being assembled together with them, he charged
 them not to depart from Jerusalem, but to wait for the promise of the
 Father, which, said he, ye heard from me: 5 for John indeed baptized
 with water; but ye shall be baptized in the Holy Spirit not many days
 hence.
 
 6 They therefore, when they were come together, asked him, saying,
 Lord, dost thou at this time restore the kingdom to Israel? 7 And he
 said unto them, It is not for you to know times or seasons, which the
 Father hath set within his own authority. 8 But ye shall receive
 power, when the Holy Spirit is come upon you: and ye shall be my
 witnesses both in Jerusalem, and in all Judea and Samaria, and unto
 the uttermost part of the earth. 9 And when he had said these things,
 as they were looking, he was taken up; and a cloud received him out of
 their sight. 10 And while they were looking stedfastly into heaven as
 he went, behold two men stood by them in white apparel; 11 who also
 said, Ye men of Galilee, why stand ye looking into heaven? this Jesus,
 who was received up from you into heaven, shall so come in like manner
 as ye beheld him going into heaven.
 
 
 This epistle text is simply a narrative concerning the visible
 ascension of Christ into heaven. It is in itself clear. Whatever it
 may be necessary to say relative to the article of Christ's ascension,
 we shall leave for the sermons on the Festivals of Christ as they
 occur at intervals during the year, at which times it is fitting to
 speak particularly of each article concerning Christ.
 
 
 
 
 _Sunday After Ascension Day_
 
 Text: First Peter 4, 7-11.[1]
 
 7 But the end of all things is at hand: be ye therefore of sound mind,
 and be sober unto prayer: 8 above all things being fervent in your
 love among yourselves: for love covereth a multitude of sins: 9 using
 hospitality one to another without murmuring: 10 according as each
 hath received a gift, ministering it among yourselves, as good
 stewards of the manifold grace of God; 11 if any man speaketh,
 speaking as it were oracles of God; if any man ministereth,
 ministering as of the strength which God supplieth: that in all things
 God may be glorified through Jesus Christ, whose is the glory and the
 dominion for ever and ever. Amen.
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon appeared as early as 1525 in pamphlet form.]
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO CHRISTIAN LIVING.
 
 1. This text, too, is an admonition to Christian living, a discourse
 concerning the fruits of a good tree, a figure applied to the
 Christian; in other words, concerning the fruits of the one who,
 through faith, has obtained redemption from sin and death and has a
 place in the kingdom of grace and of eternal life. Such a one is
 exhorted to live henceforth in a manner indicative of the fact that he
 has apprehended the treasure of salvation and is become a new man.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO SOBERNESS.
 
 2. Certain good works are also introduced, and in the first part of
 our text Peter makes an especially emphatic continuation of the
 admonition in the foregoing part of the chapter, warning Christians to
 abstain from gross vices--carnal lusts--which in the world lead to
 obscenity, and from the wild, disorderly, swinish lives of the heathen
 world, lives of gormandizing, guzzling and drunkenness. Peter
 admonishes Christians to endeavor to be "sober unto prayer." The
 epistle was written chiefly to the Greeks, the masses of which people
 were very social, and inclined to carouse and gormandize. And we
 Germans are accused of the same excess; not without some reason
 either.
 
 3. With intent to turn Christians from these vices unto temperance and
 sobriety, Peter reminds them, as all the apostles are wont to do, of
 the obligations particularly incident to the Christian calling, to the
 only true, divine service, the things for the sake of which they have
 become Christians and which distinguish them from the remainder of the
 world. His meaning is: It is not for Christians to lead lives
 heathenish, profligate and riotous; to indulge in gormandizing,
 guzzling, carousing and demoralizing of themselves. They have
 something nobler to do. First, in that they are to become different
 beings, and be occupied with the Word of God wherefrom they derive
 their new birth and whereby they preserve it. Second, being born anew,
 they have enemies to fight; so long as they live on earth, they must
 combat the devil, also their own flesh, which is corrupted by the
 devil until it is full of evil lusts. Having, then, to assume the
 obligations of this calling and contest, they must not give way to
 drowsy indolence; much less may they become foolish, drunken sots,
 indifferent to all issues and heedless of their obligations. Rather,
 they have need to be watchful and sober, ever ready with the Word of
 God and with prayer.
 
 4. These are the two kinds of armor, two weapons of defense, whereby
 the devil is vanquished and of which he is afraid: First, diligence in
 hearing, learning and practicing the Word of God, that instruction,
 comfort and strength may be received; second, sincere petitioning upon
 the authority of that Word, a crying and calling to God for help when
 temptations and conflicts arise. One or the other of these weapons of
 defense must continually be in active exercise, effecting perpetual
 intercourse between God and man--either God speaking to us while we
 quietly listen, or God hearing our utterances to him and our petitions
 concerning our needs.
 
 Whichever the weapon we wield, it is unendurable to the devil; he
 cannot abide it. Christians need both equipments, that their hearts
 may ever turn to God, cleave to his Word, and continually, with
 ceaseless longing, pray a perpetual Lord's Prayer. Truly, the
 Christian should learn from the temptations and straits wherewith the
 devil, the world and the flesh constantly oppress him, to be ever on
 his guard, watching for the enemy's point of attack; for the enemy
 sleeps not nor rests a single moment.
 
 5. Here is applicable Peter's injunction for the Christian to keep
 within the bounds of physical temperance and sobriety; not to overload
 the body and injure it by excessive eating and drinking: so as to be
 watchful, intelligent, and in a mood, to pray. He who is not careful
 to discharge the obligations of his office or station with temperance
 and sobriety, but is daily in a sottish condition, is incapable of
 praying or performing any other Christian duty; he is unfit for any
 service.
 
 6. Right here a special admonitory sermon might well be preached to us
 dissolute Germans, in warning for our excesses and drunkenness. But
 where would be forthcoming a sermon forcible enough to restrain the
 shameful sottishness and the drink devil among us? The evil of
 overindulgence has, alas, swept in upon us like a torrent,
 overwhelming as a flood all classes. It daily spreads further and
 further throughout the nation, embracing every station from the lowest
 to the highest. All preaching, all admonition, seem far too weak--not
 vain and impotent, but despised and scorned--to meet the emergency.
 But the apostles, and even Christ himself, declared that in the end of
 the world such a state of affairs should obtain. For that very reason
 did Christ (Lk 21, 34) admonish Christians to take heed to themselves
 lest at any time their hearts be overcharged with surfeiting and
 drunkenness and the cares of this life, and so that day come upon them
 unawares.
 
 7. Now, God having in his infinite goodness so richly shed upon us
 Germans in these latter times the Gospel light, we ought, in honor and
 gratitude to him, to try to reform ourselves in the matter of
 intemperance. We should fear lest through this evil besides committing
 other sins we draw upon us the wrath and punishment of God. For naught
 else can result from the pernicious life of intemperance but false
 security, and contempt of God. Individuals continually dead in
 drunkenness, buried in excesses, living like swine, cannot fear God,
 cannot be occupied with divine things.
 
 8. Had we no other incentive to abandon our intemperate living, the
 scandalous reputation we have among the nations ought to move us to
 reform. Other countries, particularly those bordering on Germany,
 regard us with extreme contempt, calling us drunken Germans. For they
 have virtue enough to abstain from excessive drinking. The Turks are
 real monks and saints in this respect; so far are they from the evil
 of intemperance that in obedience to the teaching of their Mohammed
 they prohibit the drinking of wine or any other intoxicant, and punish
 the offense as the greatest evil in their midst. For this very reason
 are they better soldiers than our drunken masses. They are always
 awake and vigilant, alert concerning their own interests, planning
 attacks upon us and continually extending their dominion, while we lie
 sleeping in our excesses as if we could withstand the Turks by
 drunkenness and carousing.
 
 9. But what is the use of multiplying words on the subject when the
 evil prevails to such extent as to be common custom in the land? No
 longer confined to the rude, illiterate rabble, to country villages
 and public taverns, it has penetrated all cities and entered nearly
 every house, being particularly prevalent among the nobility--in the
 courts of princes. I recall that when I was young drunkenness was
 regarded an inexpressibly shameful thing among the peerage, and that
 the dear lords and princes restrained it with serious prohibitions and
 punishments. But now it is more alarmingly prevalent among them than
 among farmers. It is generally the case that when the great and good
 begin to go down, they sink to a lower level than others. Yes,
 intemperance has attained such prevalence that even princes and lords
 have learned the habit from their young noblemen and are no longer
 ashamed of it. Rather, they call it honorable, making it a civil
 virtue befitting princes and noblemen. Whosoever will not consent to
 be a drunken sot with them, must be discountenanced; while the knights
 who stand for beer and wine obtain high honors, and great favors and
 privileges, on account of their drinking. They desire fame in this
 respect, as if they had secured their nobility, their shield and
 helmet, by the very fact that they exceed others in the shamelessness
 of their tippling.
 
 10. Yes, and have we not further reason for checking the evil when
 even the young practice it without fear or shame? They learn it from
 the aged, and unrestrained they disgracefully and wantonly injure
 themselves in the very bloom of life, destroying themselves as corn is
 cut down by hail and tempest. The majority of the finest, most
 promising young people, particularly the nobility, they of court
 circles, ruin their health, body and life, before arriving at
 maturity. How can it be otherwise when they who should restrain and
 punish commit the same sins themselves?
 
 11. Hence Germany has always been a wretched country, chastised and
 plagued by the drink devil, and completely immersed in this vice,
 until the bodies and lives of her people, as well as their property
 and honor, are shamefully consumed and only a sordid existence
 remains. He who would paint the conditions must portray something
 swinish. Indeed, but a small proportion of the inhabitants of Germany
 are undebased by this evil. These are children, girls and women. Some
 sense of propriety in the matter remains to them, though occasionally
 we find even under the veil some intemperance; however, it is with
 restraint. Enough modesty remains to inspire the universal sentiment
 that so disgraceful a thing is it for a woman to be drunk, such a one
 deserves to be trampled upon in the streets.
 
 12. In the light of their example, let us men learn to see our own
 shame and to blush for it. While noting how disgraceful is drunkenness
 for women, let us remember it is much more so for ourselves. We ought
 to be saner and more virtuous; for, according to Peter, the woman is
 the weaker vessel. Because of the weakness of women, we ought to have
 more patience with them. Man being endowed with a broader mind,
 stronger faculties and firmer nature, he should be the saner being,
 the farther removed from the brute. It stands to reason that it is a
 much greater disgrace for him to indulge in the vice of drunkenness.
 In proportion to the nobility of his creation and the exalted nature
 wherewith God has endowed him, should be the disgrace of such
 unreasoning, brutish conduct on his part.
 
 13. What can be said for us? So complete is the perversion of all
 manly virtue and honor in our conduct in this respect that it cannot
 be surpassed by any other possible degradation of manhood. There
 remains to us but an atom of good reputation, and that is to be found
 among the women. The occasional instance of drunkenness among them but
 emphasizes our own disgrace. All countries look upon us with scorn and
 contempt, regarding us as shameful and sordid creatures, day and night
 bent upon making ourselves surfeited and stupid, possessing neither
 reason nor intelligence.
 
 The evil would be more tolerable, more excusable, if drinking and
 carousing had any limit, if intoxication were but an occasional
 thing--the case of a person inadvertently taking one drink too much,
 or of taking a stimulant when tired from excessive labor and worry. We
 excuse it in women who may chance to drink a little more at wedding
 parties than they are accustomed to at home. But this excessive
 guzzling kept up unceasingly day and night, emitting only to be filled
 again, is wholly inconsistent with the character of a prince, a
 nobleman, a citizen, yes, of a human being, not to mention the life of
 a Christian; it is really more in keeping with the nature and work of
 swine.
 
 14. Now, when God and all mankind permit you to eat and to drink, to
 enjoy good things, not merely what is necessary for actual
 subsistence, but in a measure calculated to afford gratification and
 pleasure, and you are yet not satisfied with that privilege--when such
 is the case, your sordid and gluttonous tendencies are worthy one born
 solely to consume beer and wine. But such are the excesses now to be
 seen in the courts of princes--the banqueting and the drinking--that
 one would think they meant to devour the resources of the country in a
 single hour. Lords, princes, noblemen--the entire country, in
 fact--are ruined, reduced to beggary, for the particular reason that
 God's gifts are so inhumanly wasted and destroyed.
 
 15. As I said before, the evil of drunkenness has, alas, gained such
 ascendency as to be past restraint unless the Word of God may exert
 some controlling influence among the few, the individuals who are
 still human and who would be Christians. The masses will remain as
 they are, particularly as the civil government makes no effort to
 restrain the evil. It is my opinion that if God does not sometime
 check the vice by a special judgment--and until he does it will never
 be punished and restrained--even women and children will become
 inebriate, and when the last day arrives no Christian will be found
 but all souls will descend drunken into the abyss of hell.
 
 16. Let all who desire to be Christians know that it is incumbent upon
 them to manifest the virtue of temperance; that drunken sots have no
 place among Christians, and cannot be saved until they amend their
 ways, until they reform from their evil habits. Concerning them Paul
 says plainly (Gal 5, 19-21): "Now the works of the flesh are manifest,
 which are these: fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, idolatry,
 sorcery, enmities, strife, jealousies, wraths, factions, divisions,
 parties, envyings, drunkenness, revellings, and such like; of which I
 forewarn you, even as I did forewarn you, that they who practice such
 things shall not inherit the kingdom of God."
 
 Here you see that he who lies day and night in drunkenness has no more
 inheritance in the kingdom of God than the whoremonger, adulterer, and
 such like. Know then, just as idolatry, adultery and so on, are sins
 excluding you from heaven, so too, drunkenness is a sin which bars you
 from the blessings of baptism, and from remission of sins, faith in
 Christ and your personal salvation. Hence, if you would be a Christian
 and saved, you must be careful to lead a sober and temperate life. But
 if you disregard this admonition and yet hope to be saved--well, then
 continue to be an infidel and a brute so long as God permits.
 
 17. Were you a Christian, even if you could permit yourself to be
 unmoved by the physical injury wherein, by drunkenness, you plunge
 yourself, not only wasting your money and property, but injuring your
 health and shortening your life; and if you could permit yourself to
 be unmoved by the stigma justly recognized by men and angels as
 attaching to you, a filthy sot--even then you ought to be moved by
 God's command, by the peril of incurring eternal damnation--of losing
 God's grace and eternal salvation--to refrain from such unchristian
 conduct. O God, how shameless and ungrateful we are, we so highly
 blessed of God in having his Word and in being liberated from the
 tyranny of the Pope, who desired our sweat and blood and tortured our
 consciences with his laws--how ungrateful we are in the face of these
 things not to amend our lives in some measure in honor to the Gospel,
 and in praise and gratitude to God!
 
 18. Where peradventure there are still pious parents or godfearing
 Christian rulers, they ought, for the sake of lessening the evil of
 intemperance, to restrain their children and domestics with serious
 chastisements. Pastors and preachers are under obligation to admonish
 the people frequently and faithfully, holding up to them God's
 displeasure and wrath and the injuries to soul, body and property
 resultant from this evil, to the intent that at least some might be
 moved and profited. And they who wantonly and openly persist in the
 vice, being not disposed to amend their conduct but at the same time
 boast of the Gospel, should not be allowed to participate in the
 sacrament of the Lord's Supper nor to act as sponsors at baptism.
 Preachers and pastors should hold such as openly antichristian, and
 should make a distinction against them the same as with manifest
 adulterers, extortioners and idolaters. Such is Paul's command (1 Cor
 5, 11): "I wrote unto you not to keep company, if any man that is
 named a brother be a fornicator, or covetous, or an idolater, or a
 reviler, or a drunkard, or an extortioner; with such a one no, not to
 eat."
 
 
 NECESSITY FOR PRAYER.
 
 19. But we will not now remark further upon this subject. To return to
 Peter: He admonishes us to be sober so that we may give ourselves to
 prayer, as becometh those who are Christians and have turned from the
 vile, heathenish conduct of the world. Just preceding our text, in
 verse 3, he says: "For the time past may suffice to have wrought the
 desire of the Gentiles, and to have walked in lasciviousness, lusts,
 winebibbings, revellings, carousings, and abominable idolatries." He
 admonishes us as being now called and ordained to contend against the
 devil by faith and prayer. Later on (ch. 5, 8) he brings in the same
 warning in clearer phrase, exhorting Christians to be sober and
 watchful. Do you ask, What is the great necessity therefor? he says:
 "Your adversary the devil, as a roaring lion [in the midst of a flock
 of sheep], walketh about, seeking whom he may devour."
 
 Peter's meaning is this: Since you are a people called to contend with
 this powerful spirit which is more intent on seizing your souls than
 is the wolf on seizing the sheep, it is essential you should take
 thought how to withstand him. Resistance is effected only through
 faith and prayer. But soberness and vigilance are necessary to enable
 one to pray. With gormandizers and drunkards, reason is dethroned and
 they are rendered incapable of respecting anything, or of performing
 any good work. Therefore, the ability to pray and call upon God has
 been taken from them and the devil overcomes and devours them at his
 will.
 
 20. The diligence in prayer which characterized Christians of the
 primitive Church, even while undergoing great persecution, is apparent
 to us. They were more than willing to assemble daily for prayer
 together, not only morning and evening, but also at certain other
 appointed hours; and frequently they watched and prayed entire nights.
 Some of them, according to St. Augustine, carried their vigils to such
 extent as at times to abstain from food for four days. True, this was
 going to somewhat of an extreme, particularly when later the practice
 came to be an example and a commandment. Yet their habit of perfect
 sobriety morning, evening and at all times is commendable. With the
 cessation of this practice in the congregations, there succeeded the
 wretched order of monks, who pretend to do the praying for others.
 They, it is true, observed the same appointed hours, the same seasons
 of prayer, in their matins, vespers, and so on, but they did not
 really pray; they merely kept up an incessant sound, muttering and
 howling.
 
 We still retain from the ancient custom the observance of morning and
 evening prayers in schools for children. But the same practice should
 obtain in every Christian family. Every father is under obligation to
 train up his children to pray at least at the beginning and the close
 of day, commending to God every exigency of this earthly life, that
 God's wrath may be averted, and deserved punishment withheld.
 
 21. Under such conditions, we would be properly instructed and not
 have to be subjected to intolerable oppression and to prohibitions
 relative to eating, drinking and dressing, being guided by nature's
 demands and our own honor and pleasure. Yet we would not be inordinate
 and brutish in these things nor shamefully dethrone reason.
 Drunkenness is a sin and a shame to any man, and would be even were
 there neither God nor commandment; much less can it be tolerated among
 Christians. There is more virtue in this respect among the very
 heathen and Turks. They put us to shame, while it is our place to set
 an example shaming them. Our characters ought to be so noble as to
 give no chance for offense at our conduct, that the name of God be not
 defamed but glorified, as Peter admonishes in the conclusion of this
 epistle lesson.
 
 
 TEMPERANCE IN ALL THINGS.
 
 22. What we have said in regard to sobriety, we must also say relative
 to that other virtue--temperance,[2] to which Peter gives first place.
 They are mutually related, but temperance respects not only eating and
 drinking, but is opposed to all immoderation in outward life--in
 clothing, ornament, and so on; to whatever is superfluous, or
 excessive; to any extravagant attempt to be greater and better than
 others. To such extent has immoderation gained the upper hand in the
 world, there is nowhere any limit to expense in the way of household
 demands, dress, wedding parties and banquets, in the way of
 architecture, and so on, whereby citizens, rulers and the country
 itself are impoverished, because no individual longer keeps within
 proper bounds. Almost invariably the farmer aspires to equal the
 nobleman, while the nobleman would excel the prince. As with sobriety,
 so with the virtue of temperance--there is scarce to be found an
 example of it in our midst, so completely has self-control, sincerity
 and discipline given way.
 
 [Footnote 2: The German text uses the two words "maszig" and
 "nichtern," which may be rendered "temperate" and "sober."]
 
 23. At the same time the apostle does not forbid appropriate and
 respectable recognition of the things of physical well-being, in
 keeping with each individual's station in life, even including things
 ministering pleasure and joy. For Peter would not have filthy, rusty,
 greasy monks nor sour-faced saints, with the hypocrisy and show of
 their simulated austere and peculiar lives, wherein they honor not
 their bodies, as Paul says (Col 2, 23), but are ever ready to judge
 and condemn other people--the maiden, for instance, who chances to
 join in a dance or wears a red dress. If you are a Christian in other
 respects, God will easily allow you to dress and to adorn yourself,
 and to live with comfort, even to enjoy honor and considerable
 pleasure, so long as you keep within proper bounds; you should,
 however, not go beyond the limits of temperance and moderation. In
 other words, do not overreach propriety and self-restraint, regardless
 of real pleasure, in the endeavor to show off in excessive and
 unprofitable squandering. Such conduct results in confusion and
 trouble--chastisement sent of God; in taxes, extortion, robbing and
 stealing, until finally lords and subjects are ruined together.
 
 "Above all things being fervent in your love [have fervent charity]
 among yourselves; for love [charity] covereth a multitude of sins."
 
 24. In the foregoing part of the text, Peter admonishes Christians
 concerning their obligations to themselves; here he tells what is to
 be their conduct toward others. He embraces all the good works named
 in the second table of the commandments as obligations we owe to our
 neighbor, in the little but forcible and comprehensive
 phrase--"fervent in your love." This virtue, too, is incumbent on the
 Christian who must contend against the devil and pray. For prayer is
 hindered where love and harmony are displaced by wrath and ill-will.
 The Lord's Prayer teaches: "Forgive us our debts as we forgive our
 debtors."
 
 How can they pray one for another who feel no interest in a neighbor's
 wants, who rather are enemies, entertaining no good will toward one
 another? Where hearts are inflamed with hatred toward men, prayer has
 ceased; it is extinguished. Hence, antichristians and all popedom,
 however holy their appearance, cannot pray while enemies to the Word
 of God and persecutors of Christians. He who repeats the Lord's Prayer
 while indulging wrath, envy and hatred, censures his own lips; he
 condemns his own prayer when he seeks forgiveness from God but does
 not think of forgiving his neighbor.
 
 25. With Christians there must be, not merely natural human affection
 such as exists even among heathen, but ardent, fervent love; not the
 mere appearance of love, the smoke--false, hypocritical love, as Paul
 calls it (Rom 12, 9)--but real fervor and fire, which consent not to
 be easily extinguished, but which endure like the love between husband
 and wife, or the love of parents for children. True conjugal and
 parental love is not easily quenched, even though the object of its
 affection be weak, diseased or dangerously ill. Rather the greater the
 need and the danger of one individual, the more is the heart of the
 other moved and the brighter does love burn.
 
 26. Such sincere love, as the apostle elsewhere styles it, must exist
 among Christians who are all children of one Father in heaven and
 brothers and sisters. Indeed, they are under obligation to love even
 their enemies--who are human beings of the same flesh and blood--and
 to wish no one evil but rather to serve all wherever possible. This
 love is the beautiful red robe for the adornment of Christians,
 supplementing the pure white garment of faith received in baptism. It
 is to be worn in obedience to the example of Christ, who for us, even
 while we were enemies, wore the same red garment of love when he was
 sprinkled with his own blood. It was then he burned with the intense
 fire of ineffable and most exalted love.
 
 27. The apostles were moved to admonitions of this character because
 they clearly perceived the great weakness and imperfection bound to
 exist among Christians even in their outward lives. They knew that no
 one could, in his everyday life among men, live so discreetly as not
 at some time or other, by word, gesture or act, to give offense to
 someone, moving him to anger. Such perfection of life is found in no
 family, not even with husband and wife. The case is the same as in the
 human body: one member frequently comes in conflict with another; a
 man may inadvertently bite his tongue or scratch his face. He who
 would be a saint so stern and selfish as to endure no evil words or
 acts, and to excuse no imperfections, is unfit to dwell among men. He
 knows nothing of Christian love, and can neither believe nor put into
 practice the article of the Creed concerning the forgiveness of sins.
 
 28. So the Christian's fire of love must be characterized, not by a
 dull, cold red, but by a warm scarlet--according to the Scriptures (Ex
 26, 1), "Coccum bis tinctam" (rose-red). This love retains its fire
 and is really true, having which the Christian is not easily
 disheartened and overcome by wrath, impatience and revenge, but to a
 certain extent is able to endure and tolerate attacks upon himself
 calculated to distress. It manifests itself more strongly in suffering
 and enduring than in action.
 
 29. Therefore, Peter extols such love, declaring it to be a virtue
 potent not only to bear but to cover "a multitude of sins." This
 statement he introduces from the Proverbs of Solomon (ch. 10, 12). The
 Papists, however, pervert its meaning, explaining it in a way at
 variance with the doctrine of faith; they make of love to one's
 neighbor a work or virtue having merit with God. It is their desire to
 draw the conclusion that for the sake of our love our sins are
 covered; that is, forgiven and exterminated. But we shall not notice
 the dolts. It is clear enough from the text that reference is to
 hatred and love received from men; our own sins are not intended here,
 but the transgressions of others. To cover our sins in the sight of
 God, yet other love is requisite--the love of the Son of God, who
 alone is the bearer of sins in God's sight, and who, as John the
 Baptist says, takes away, bearing them upon his own shoulders, the
 sins of the whole world, including our own. And the example of his
 love teaches that we, too, should in love cheerfully bear and freely
 forgive the sins of others against us.
 
 30. Solomon contrasts the two opposing principles of envious hatred
 and love, and shows the effect of each. "Hatred," he says, "stirreth
 up strifes; but love covereth all transgressions." Where hatred and
 enmity dwell in the heart, they must inevitably stir up strife and
 bring misfortune. Animosity cannot restrain itself. It either bursts
 out in pernicious language clandestinely uttered against the object of
 enmity, or it openly demeans itself in a manner indicating its ill
 will. Hence follow reveling, cursing, quarreling and fighting, and,
 when wholly unrestrained, cruelty and murder.
 
 These things are due to the fact that the eyes of Younker Hate are so
 blinded by scorn and venom that he can see only evil in every man with
 whom he comes in contact; and when he actually finds it he will not
 let it alone, but stirs it, roots and frets in it, as the hog roots
 with defiled snout in offensive filth. "You must have viewed your
 neighbor from behind," we say when one can speak and think only the
 worst of a neighbor though he may have many good traits. Hate really
 desires only that everyone be an enemy to his neighbor and speak the
 worst about him, and if he hears aught in his neighbor's favor, he
 puts upon it the very worst construction, with the result that the
 other party is embittered and in turn comes to hate, curse and revile.
 Thus the fire burns until only discord and mischief can obtain.
 
 31. But on the other hand, as Solomon tells us, Love is a virtue pure
 and precious. It neither utters nor thinks any evil of its neighbor.
 Rather, it covers sin; not one sin, nor two, but "a multitude of
 sins"--great masses of them, forests and seas of sin, as it were. That
 is, love has no desire to reflect itself in a neighbor's sins and
 maliciously rejoice in them. It conducts itself as having neither seen
 nor heard them. Or, if they cannot be overlooked, it readily forgives,
 and so far as possible mends matters. Where nothing else can be done,
 it endures the sins of a neighbor without stirring up strife and
 making a bad matter worse.
 
 32. The apostle, upon authority of observation and experience,
 acknowledges that where people dwell together there must be mutual
 transgressions; it cannot be otherwise. No one will always do what is
 pleasing to others, and each is liable to commit open wrong. Peter
 would teach that since men must live together in their respective
 stations in life--for the Scriptures make no recognition of singular
 and intolerant saints who would promptly run out of the world when
 some little thing takes place at variance with their opinions--he who
 would live peaceably must so control himself as to be able to bear
 with others, to overlook their imperfections, and to cover their
 transgressions and thus avert further resulting evil.
 
 Where no toleration is exercised, where no wrong is forgiven and
 forgotten, hate and envy must find place. The sole office of these is
 to stir up strife and contention. No peace and rest is to be had where
 they exist; wrangling and fighting, oppression and bitterness, must
 obtain. The unbounded ill-will, the innumerable strifes and wars,
 having place on earth, all result from the abominable evil of the lack
 of love among us and from the prevalence of pernicious hate, which
 leads to anger and revenge when opposition offers. Thus we become
 enemies to one another instead of to evil, when it is our duty to love
 our fellow-men.
 
 33. Now, if you would live as a Christian and enjoy peace in the
 world, you must make every effort to restrain your anger and not to
 give way to revenge as do others. Rather you must suppress these
 passions, subduing your hatred by love, and be able to overlook and
 bear, even though you have to suffer great pain and injustice. So
 doing you will develop a noble character fitted to accomplish much
 good through patience and humility, to allay and abolish enmity, and
 strife, and thereby to reform and convert others. If you are unwilling
 to be patient under injustice, then go on hating and envying,
 impatiently blustering about and seeking revenge. But from such a
 proceeding only strife and disquietude can be your portion, though
 your complaints be long and your lamentations loud. You may run hither
 and thither, and still you will not find the truth otherwise than as I
 have stated. This text would have to be done away with first, and the
 Scriptures falsified.
 
 34. Paul, having in mind Solomon's saying about love, in extolling the
 same virtue amplifies the latter's statement with various expressions,
 in the thirteenth of First Corinthians. Among other things he says
 there (verses 5-8): "Love seeketh not its own, is not provoked, taketh
 not account of evil; rejoiceth not in unrighteousness, but rejoiceth
 with the truth; beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all
 things, endureth all things. Love never faileth," etc. This, mark you,
 is "being fervent in love," as Peter calls it. Here is the heat, the
 fire, effective to consume all evil and to replace it with only good.
 This fire will not permit itself to be quenched; it surmounts all
 checking. Whatever of evil is heaped upon it, it remains in itself
 good, and works only good.
 
 35. The essential property, the "differentia essentialis," of genuine
 love, as its nature requires fervency, is the fact that it cannot be
 embittered. He who has it, will not cease to love, to do good and to
 endure evil. In a word love cannot hate; it cannot be at enmity with
 anyone. No evil can be wrought too great for love to endure. No one
 can commit against it more sins than it can cover. It cannot be
 enraged to the point of refusing to forgive. Its attitude is not
 unlike that of the mother toward her child. The child may be imperfect
 and impure, even filthy, but the mother notes it not, even if she sees
 it. Her love blinds her. The eyes wherewith she looks upon her child
 as the beautiful and God-given fruit of her own body are so pure that
 she overlooks all imperfections, regarding them as nothing. Indeed,
 she excuses, even glorifies, them. Although the child squints, it must
 not be called squint-eyed, but love-eyed, and even a wart must be
 thought to become it.
 
 36. Behold, this is covering sins with love--a virtue peculiar to
 Christians. The world does not possess that virtue. Such love is
 impossible to it, whatever its pretensions and ostentations in that
 respect. However precious the world's love may be, it is subject to
 delusion, vanity and hypocrisy; for the world is false in appearance
 and pretension. No worldling likes to be regarded hateful and envious
 toward his neighbor, but succeeds in conducting himself, so far as
 word and gesture are concerned, in an affable manner to all. This
 attitude he maintains so long as we show him favors and obey his
 pleasure. But when our love for him becomes a little disaffected and
 we happen to offer a word he regards insulting, he promptly withdraws
 his affections and begins to complain and to rage as if he had been
 done a great wrong. He makes out he is under no obligation to endure
 the injustice; and he boastingly plumes himself on having shown great
 faithfulness and love to the offender, such fidelity as would have led
 him readily to share with that one the very heart in his body, and now
 he is so ill repaid that henceforth he will leave such people to be
 served by the devil.
 
 Such is the world's love. The world loves not "in deed," but "in
 word," as John expresses it. 1 Jn 3, 18. It has no sincerity of heart.
 Its love is a mere ignis-fatuus, shining but having no fire; a love
 which endures not, but is blown out by a breath--extinguished with a
 word. The reason of it all is, the world seeks only its own. It would
 be served, would receive from others, and not make any return,
 particularly if response must entail any suffering and forbearance on
 its part.
 
 37. "But," you may say, "shall evil go unpunished? What would be the
 result were all evil to be tolerated and covered up? Would not that be
 giving the wicked opportunity to carry out their evil designs? Would
 it not encourage them in their wickedness until life would not be safe
 to anyone?" I reply: We have often stated what individuals properly
 merit our anger, and the extent and manner of punishment to be awarded
 them. It is truly the office of civil government and also of the
 father of every family to visit anger upon evil, and to punish and
 restrain it. Again, every pastor and preacher is commissioned--yes,
 every godly Christian--to admonish and censure when he sees a neighbor
 committing sin, just as one brother in a family admonishes another.
 But to be angry with evil and to inflict official
 punishment--punishment by virtue of office--is a different thing from
 being filled with hatred and revenge, or holding ill-will and being
 unforgiving.
 
 38. It is not inconsistent with the character of love to be angry and
 to reprove when a neighbor is observed to sin. But true love feels no
 inclination to behold the sin and disgrace of a neighbor; rather, much
 rather, it desires his improvement. Just as parents correct with a rod
 a disobedient and obstinate child but do not cast it out and become
 enemies to it because of that disobedience, their object being only to
 reform the child, while the rod is cast away after chastisement; so,
 too, according to Christ's words (Mt 18, 15-17), you may censure your
 brother when he sins, and manifest your displeasure and indignation,
 that he may perceive and confess his wrong-doing, and if he does not
 then amend his conduct, you may inform the congregation. At the same
 time, his obstinacy does not justify you in becoming his enemy, or in
 entertaining ill-will toward him. As said before, love to be true must
 not be dull and cold, too indifferent to perceive a neighbor's sins;
 it must endeavor to relieve him thereof. It must have the red fire of
 fervor. He who truly loves will be distressed that a beloved neighbor
 wickedly trespasses against God and himself. Again, true love does not
 pale with hatred and revenge. It continues to glow red when the
 possessor's heart is moved with sympathy, is filled with compassion,
 for its neighbor. True, when fervor and admonition fail to effect any
 reform, the sincere-hearted Christian must separate himself from his
 obstinate neighbor and regard him as a heathen; nevertheless, he must
 not become his neighbor's enemy nor wish him evil.
 
 39. Anger and censure prompted by sincere love are very different from
 the wrath, hatred and revengefulness of the world, which seeks only
 its own interests and is unwilling to tolerate any opposition to its
 pleasure. True love is moved to anger only when a neighbor's good
 demands. Though not insensible to evil and not approving evil, it is
 yet able to tolerate, to forgive and cover, all wrongs against itself,
 and it leaves untried no expedient that may make a neighbor better.
 Sincere love makes a clear distinction between the evil and the
 person; it is unfriendly to the former, but kind to the latter.
 
 "Using hospitality one to another without murmuring: according as each
 hath received a gift, ministering it among yourselves, as good
 stewards of the manifold grace of God."
 
 40. Having admonished all Christians to love one another generally,
 Peter mentions various instances where love should be externally
 manifested among Christians, and speaks particularly of those who have
 been favored above others with special gifts and special offices in
 the Church, whereby they are able to serve their fellows. Thus he
 teaches that the Christian's whole external conduct should be
 regulated by that love which seeks not its own advantage, which aims
 not at profiting itself, but lives to serve its neighbor.
 
 41. First, Peter says, "Using hospitality one to another." The
 reference is to works of love relative to the various physical needs
 of a neighbor. Christians are to serve one another by ministering
 temporal blessings. Especially are the poor and the wretched to be
 remembered, they who are strangers or pilgrims among us, or come to us
 houseless and homeless. These should receive the willing ministrations
 of Christians, and none be allowed to suffer want.
 
 42. In the apostles' time, the primitive days of the Church,
 Christians were everywhere persecuted, driven from their possessions
 and forced to wander hither and thither in poverty and exile. It was
 necessary then to admonish Christians in general, and particularly
 those who had something of their own, not to permit these destitute
 ones to suffer want, but to provide for them. So, too, is it today
 incumbent upon Christians to provide for the really poor--not lazy
 beggars, or vagabonds--the outdoor pensioners, so called; and to
 maintain those who, because of old age or other infirmity, are unable
 to support themselves. The churches should establish common treasuries
 for the purpose of providing alms for cases of this kind. It was so
 ordained of the apostles in Acts 6, 3. Paul, also, in many places
 admonishes to such works of love; for instance (Rom 12, 13):
 "Communicating to the necessities of the saints."
 
 43. Moreover, as Peter says, hospitality is to be extended "without
 murmuring"--not with reluctance and aversion, as the way of the world
 is. The world is particularly reluctant when called upon to give to
 Christ the Lord, in other words to his poor servants the pastors and
 preachers, or to their children, into whose mouths they must count
 every bit of bread. It regards oppressive and burdensome the
 contributing of even a dime for that purpose. At the same time, it
 lavishly bestows its gifts upon the devil; as, for instance, under
 popedom it gave liberally and willingly to indolent, useless monks and
 shameless, wicked knaves, impostors and seducers. Such is the
 inconsistence of the world; and it is a just punishment from God that
 it is made unworthy to contribute where it well might toward the
 preservation of God's Word and his poor Church; and that it must give
 to other and ungrateful purposes. Christian love must be sincere
 enough to do good "without murmuring." Paul says (Rom 12, 8) to "let
 him that showeth mercy do so with cheerfulness," or willingly, without
 restraint. Again (2 Cor 9, 7), "God loveth a cheerful giver," etc.
 
 
 STEWARDS OF GOD'S GIFTS.
 
 44. Peter speaks also of love's work in relation to the gifts of the
 Holy Spirit, which are bestowed for the good of the entire Church and
 particularly for its spiritual offices or government. He would have
 the Spirit's gifts used in the service of others, and admonishes
 Christians to consider all they have as given of God. The heathen have
 no such thought, but live as if life and all they possess were of
 their own attaining. But let Christians know they are under obligation
 to serve God with their gifts; and God is served when they employ them
 for the advantage and service of the people--reforming them, bringing
 them to a knowledge of God, and thus building up, strengthening and
 perpetuating the Church. Of such love the world knows nothing at all.
 
 45. So then, Peter says, we are to use the gifts called
 spiritual--gifts of the Holy Spirit--in the Christian Church "as good
 stewards of the manifold grace of God." He would have us know they are
 conferred upon us of grace. They are not given us to exalt ourselves
 therewith, but to make us stewards of the house of God--of his Church.
 They are manifold and variously distributed; for no one may possess
 all. Some may have certain gifts and offices, and other individuals
 certain others. But the mutual way in which these gifts are united and
 related makes one individual serve another.
 
 46. Peter would remind especially each individual to take heed to the
 duties of his particular office. In the pursuance of his own
 occupation, each is to attend faithfully to whatever is committed to
 his charge; to do whatever he is commanded to do. As the Scriptures
 teach in many places, there is no work nobler than being obedient to
 the particular calling and work assigned of God, and satisfied
 therein; faithfully serving one's neighbor and not gazing after what
 is committed to, or enjoined upon, another, nor presuming to transcend
 the limits of one's own commission. Many fickle, unstable spirits,
 however, especially the presumptuous, proud and self-sufficient,
 imagine themselves to have such measure of the Spirit and of skill
 that their own calling is not sufficient for them; they must control
 all things, must superintend and criticise the work of others. They
 are malignant souls, doing nothing but to stir up mischief, and having
 not the grace to perform any good work, even though they have noble
 gifts. For they do not make use of the gifts of their office to serve
 their neighbors; they only minister therewith to their own glory and
 advantage.
 
 47. The apostle goes on to show how God distributes his gifts in
 various ways; he speaks of "manifold gifts." Paul likewise (1 Cor 12,
 4-5) teaches that each one is given a special gift, and a particular
 office wherein he is to exercise his gift, continuing in his own
 sphere until called to another. Again, Paul says (Rom 12, 6-7):
 "Whether prophecy, let us prophesy ... or ministry, let us give
 ourselves to our ministry." It is not enough to have numerous special
 gifts; grace is also requisite--"manifold grace of God," Peter says.
 We must so use our gifts that God may be pleased to add his blessing,
 if we would successfully and profitably serve the Church and
 accomplish good. God's grace will not be given to those who do not, in
 faith and in obedience to his command, fulfill the obligations of
 their calling. Now Peter proceeds to illustrate, giving a rule of how
 we are to use our individual gifts. He says:
 
 "If any man speaketh, speaking as it were oracles of God; if any man
 ministereth, ministering as of the strength which God supplieth."
 
 48. It is highly essential that the Church observe this doctrine. Had
 it been regarded heretofore, the world would not have been filled with
 anti-christian errors and deceptions. For it fixes the bounds, it sets
 the mark, for all aspiring church members, however exalted their
 office and gifts; the limits of these they must not transcend.
 
 49. The apostle classifies Church government in two divisions:
 teaching, or "ministering" the Word; and holding office and fulfilling
 its duties in accordance with the teachings of the Word. In both
 cases, he tells us, we are to take heed that we are not actuated by
 our own ideas and pleasures; our teaching and ruling must ever be
 God's Word and work or office.
 
 50. The workings of the Christian Church are not the same as the
 processes of civil government. They are unlike the operations that
 have to do with outward things, with temporal possessions. In the
 latter case men are guided by their own understanding. At the dictates
 of their own reason do they rule, instituting laws and regulations,
 and prohibiting, receiving and distributing according to those
 regulations. In the Christian Church we have a spiritual government of
 the conscience, an effecting of obedience in God's sight. Whatever is
 spoken or taught, promised or done, we may be assured, will avail and
 stand before God; indeed, we may know it has origin with him, whereby
 we are justified in declaring: "God himself uttered the command or
 performed the work; for in us, his tabernacles where he lives and
 rules, essentially he, as rightful Master in the house, commands and
 performs all, though employing the instrumentality of men's lips and
 hands."
 
 
 ASSURANCE OF PURE DOCTRINE ESSENTIAL.
 
 51. In the first place, therefore, it is necessary that both preachers
 and hearers take heed to doctrine and have clear, unmistakable
 evidence that what they embrace is really the true Word of God
 revealed from heaven; the doctrine given to the holy and primitive
 fathers, prophets and apostles; the doctrine Christ himself confirmed
 and commanded to be taught. We are not permitted to employ the
 teaching dictated by any man's pleasure or fancy. We may not adapt the
 Word to mere human knowledge and reason. We are not to trifle with the
 Scriptures, to juggle with the Word of God, as if it would admit of
 being explained to suit the people; of being twisted, distended and
 patched to effect peace and agreement among men. Otherwise, there
 would be no sure, permanent foundation whereon the conscience might
 rely.
 
 52. Nor is it any more admissible for one who chances to have an
 office of greater influence than others, who is peculiarly holy, or
 who is of exalted spirit and intellect--even though he were an
 apostle--to presume upon his gifts and the office and take authority
 to teach according to his own inclinations, requiring his hearers to
 accept unquestioningly his word and rely upon it because what he
 teaches must be right. But thus the Pope in time past persuaded the
 world that because he occupied the seat of the apostles, the highest
 office, and assembled the councils, the latter could not err, and that
 therefore all men are obliged to believe and obey what they resolve
 and confirm.
 
 53. This theory is opposed by Peter's teaching, and all the Scriptures
 forbid men, at the peril of losing eternal salvation, to rely on or
 respect anyone or anyone's gifts, in the things pertaining to faith.
 The Scriptures teach rather that we are to prove and judge all
 doctrine by the clear and sure Word of God given us from heaven and
 supported by the reliable, concurrent testimony of the apostles and
 the Church from the beginning. Paul, by way of denouncing the false
 teachers who boasted of being disciples of eminent apostles and relied
 upon the latter and their reputation, pronounced this sentence (Gal 1,
 8): "Though we, or an angel from heaven, should preach unto you any
 gospel other than that which we preached unto you, let him be
 anathema."
 
 54. Similarly, in the offices or government of the Church, there must
 first be convincing evidence that command and office are instituted of
 God. No one may be permitted to institute, promise or do anything of
 his own power or pleasure and compel men to regard it as divine
 authority or as essential to salvation, simply because of his
 appointment to office. Nevertheless, the Pope, by virtue of his
 ecclesiastical office, undertook to domineer over all men, to issue
 commands and institute laws and religious services binding upon
 everyone.
 
 He who holds and would exercise office in the Church must first give
 clear Scripture proof of having derived his office from the authority
 of God. He must be able to say: "I did not institute such and such a
 proceeding; it is of God." Then they who comply may be assured they
 are obeying, not the individual, but God.
 
 55. For instance, if in obedience to Christ's command I, as a carer of
 souls, or servant of the Church, administer the holy sacrament or
 pronounce absolution; if I admonish, comfort, reprove; I can say:
 "That which I do, I do not; Christ performs it." For I act not of my
 own design, but in obedience to the command of Christ--to his
 injunction. The Pope and his adherents cannot make the above
 assertion. For they pervert the order and commandment of Christ the
 Lord when, in the sacrament, they withhold the cup from the laity, and
 when they change the use of the sacrament or mass, making it a
 sacrifice for the living and the dead. And thus they do also by
 innumerable other abominations in their false worship, things
 established without God's command, indeed contrary thereto; for
 instance, the invocation of dead saints, and similar idolatries,
 introduced by the Pope under cover of his office, as if he had the
 power from Christ to institute and command such things.
 
 
 ASSURANCE OF DIVINE EFFICIENCY ESSENTIAL.
 
 56. In the second place, it is not enough that office and commandment
 be God-appointed. We his ministers should be conscious--and the people
 should so be taught--that efficacy of office is not of human effort,
 but is God's power and work. In other words, that which the office was
 designed to accomplish is not effective by virtue of our speech or
 action, but by virtue of God's commandment and appointment. He it is
 who orders; and himself will effectively operate through that office
 which is obedient to God's command. For instance, in baptism, the
 Lord's Supper and absolution, we are not to be concerned about the
 person administering the sacraments or pronouncing absolution--who he
 is, how righteous, how holy, how worthy. Worthiness or unworthiness of
 either administering or receiving hand effects nothing; all the virtue
 lies in God's command and ordinance.
 
 57. This is the explanation of Peter's phrase, "the strength or
 ability which God supplieth." Effect is produced, not through man's
 power, not in obedience to man's will; but through the "strength" of
 God and because of his ordering. No man has a right presumptuously to
 boast his own power and ability effective, as the Pope does in his
 pretensions about keys and ecclesiastical power. Know that it is
 necessary to the efficacy of your office and the salutary character of
 your work or authority in the Church that God himself give and exert
 the influence. And that influence is exerted when, as before said,
 God's Word and testimony are present that the ministry in question is
 commanded, or authorized, of God.
 
 58. Therefore it is earnestly enjoined that in the Church no attempt
 should be made by any individual to institute any order or perform any
 work, much or little, great or small, merely at the prompting of his
 own inclinations or in obedience to the advice of any man. Let him who
 would teach and work be sure that his words and acts are really of
 God--commanded by him. Until he is certain in this respect, let him
 abandon his office--suspend his ministry; let him engage in something
 else for a time. Nor should we hear or believe anything presented to
 us that does not bear indisputable evidence of being the divine Word,
 or command. For God will not permit mockery of himself in the things
 of his own prerogative and on which depends the salvation of souls;
 for souls will be led to eternal ruin where this rule and command are
 disregarded.
 
 "That in all things God may be glorified through Jesus Christ."
 
 59. Here is named the motive for all effort in the Christian
 community. No one may seek for nor ascribe to himself power and honor
 because of his office and gifts. Power and glory belong only to God.
 He himself calls his Church, and rules, sanctifies and preserves it
 through his Word and his Spirit. To this end he bestows upon us his
 gifts. And all is done purely of grace, wholly for the sake of his
 beloved Son, Christ the Lord. Therefore, in return for the favor and
 ineffable goodness bestowed upon us regardless of our merits, we ought
 to thank and praise God, directing all our efforts to the recognition
 and glory of his name.
 
 
 
 
 _Pentecost_
 
 Text: Acts 2, 1-13.
 
 1 And when the day of Pentecost was now come, they were all together
 in one place. 2 And suddenly there came from heaven a sound as of the
 rushing of a mighty wind, and it filled all the house where they were
 sitting. 3 And there appeared unto them tongues parting asunder, like
 as of fire; and it sat upon each one of them. 4 And they were all
 filled with the Holy Spirit, and began to speak with other tongues, as
 the Spirit gave them utterance. 5 Now there were dwelling at Jerusalem
 Jews, devout men, from every nation under heaven. 6 And when this
 sound was heard, the multitude came together, and were confounded,
 because that every man heard them speaking in his own language. 7 And
 they were all amazed and marvelled, saying, Behold, are not all these
 that speak Galilaeans? 8 And how hear we, every man in our own
 language wherein we were born? 9 Parthians and Medes and Elamites, and
 the dwellers in Mesopotamia, in Judaea and Capadocia, in Pontus and
 Asia, 10 in Phrygia and Pamphylia, in Egypt and the parts of Libya
 about Cyrene, and sojourners from Rome, both Jews and proselytes, 11
 Cretans and Arabians, we hear them speaking in our tongues the mighty
 works of God. 12 And they were all amazed, and were perplexed, saying
 one to another. What meaneth this? 13 But others mocking said, They
 are filled with new wine.
 
 
 THE GIFT OF THE HOLY SPIRIT.
 
 1. The historical facts of this day, as well as the beautiful sermon
 the Holy Spirit delivered through the apostle Peter, which might
 appropriately be fully treated at this time, we shall leave for the
 special sermons on the various festivals of the year. For the present
 we will but briefly speak of the occasion of this festival, and of the
 office of the Holy Spirit.
 
 2. The festival we call "Pentecost" had origin as follows: When God
 was about to lead the children of Israel out of Egypt, he permitted
 them to celebrate the Feast of the Passover on the night of their
 departure; and commanded them on every annual recurrence of the season
 to observe the same feast in commemoration of their liberation from
 bondage and their departure from Egypt. Fifty days later, in their
 journey through the wilderness, they arrived at Mount Sinai. There God
 gave them the Law, through Moses; and there they were commanded to
 observe annually, in commemoration of that giving of the Law, the
 fiftieth day after the Feast of the Passover. Hence the name "Feast of
 Pentecost," the word "Pentecost" coming from the Greek "Pentecoste,"
 or "fiftieth day." Our Saxons, rather more in conformity to the Greek,
 use the word "Pfingsten." So we have it here of Luke: "When the day of
 Pentecost was now come," or "fully come"--when the Jews had properly
 commemorated the giving of the Law of God on Mount Sinai--the Holy
 Spirit came, in accordance with Christ's promise, and gave them a new
 law. We now celebrate this feast, not because of the old historical
 event, but because of the new one--the sending of the Holy Spirit. It
 is in order, then, to give a little instruction concerning the
 difference between our Pentecost and that of the Jews.
 
 
 LITERAL LAW AND SPIRITUAL LAW.
 
 3. The occasion of the Jews' observance was the giving of the literal
 law; but it is ours to celebrate the giving of the spiritual law. To
 present the point more clearly, we cite Paul's distinction of the two
 covenants. 2 Cor 3, 6. And these two covenants respectively relate to
 two kinds of people.
 
 4. First, there is the written law commanded of God and composed of
 written words. It is styled "written" or "literal" because it goes no
 farther and does not enter the heart, nor are there any resulting
 works other than hypocritical and extorted ones. Consisting only of
 letters--a written law--it is wholly dead. Its province being to kill,
 it ruled a dead people. With dead hearts men could not sincerely
 observe the commandments of God. Were every individual left to do as
 he pleased, being uninfluenced by fear, not one would be found
 choosing to be controlled by the Law.
 
 Unquestionably, human nature is conscious of the fact that while it
 prefers to follow its own inclinations it is impelled to do otherwise;
 for it reasons: "If I observe not God's commandments, he will punish
 me, casting me into hell." Thus our nature is conscious of obeying
 unwillingly and contrary to desire. Because of the punishment men
 fear, they soon become enemies to God; they feel themselves sinners,
 unable to stand before God, and consequently not acceptable to him.
 Indeed, they would rather there were no God. Such enmity to God
 remains persistently in the heart, however beautifully nature may
 adorn itself outwardly. We see, therefore, how the Law, so long as it
 consists merely of written words, can make no one righteous, can enter
 no heart. Upon this topic we have elsewhere preached and written at
 length.
 
 5. The other law is spiritual; not written with ink and pen, nor
 uttered by lips as Moses read from the tables of stone. We learn from
 the historical record of the event that the Holy Spirit descended from
 heaven and filled all the assembled multitude, and they appeared with
 parting, fiery tongues and preached so unlike they were wont to do
 that all men were filled with amazement. The Spirit came pouring into
 their hearts, making them different beings, making them creatures who
 loved and willingly obeyed God. This change was simply the
 manifestation of the Spirit himself, his work in the heart. He wrote
 in those hearts his pure and fiery flame restoring them to life and
 causing them to respond with fiery tongues and efficient hands. They
 became new creatures, aware of possessing altogether different minds
 and different tendencies. Then all was life and light; understanding,
 will and heart burned and delighted in whatever was acceptable to God.
 Such is the true distinction between the written law of God and the
 spiritual. Herein we perceive what is the work of the Holy Spirit.
 
 
 THE OFFICE OF THE HOLY SPIRIT.
 
 6. From this we should learn what is the office of the Holy Spirit in
 the Church, and how or by what means he is received in the heart and
 works there. In time past it was preached that he merely endorses what
 the councils conclude and the Pope establishes in the Spiritless papal
 Church. The fact is, however, the doings of Pope and councils are mere
 outward matters; they relate to external commands and government. The
 above theory is, therefore, wholly inconsistent and perverse. Of the
 work of the Holy Spirit, the Papists make a dead, written law, when it
 is really a living, spiritual law. Thus they render the Holy Spirit a
 Moses, and his words mere human prattle. It is all due to ignorance of
 the character of the Holy Spirit, of the purpose of his coming and the
 nature of his office. Therefore, let us learn and firmly grasp those
 things and be able rightly to distinguish the Spirit's office.
 
 7. Observe here, the Holy Spirit descends and fills the hearts of the
 disciples sitting in fear and sorrow. He renders their tongues fiery
 and cloven, and inflames them with love unto boldness in preaching
 Christ--unto free and fearless utterance. Plainly, then, it is not the
 office of the Spirit to write books or to institute laws. He writes in
 the hearts of men, creating a new heart, so that man may rejoice
 before God, filled with love for him and ready, in consequence, to
 serve his fellows gladly.
 
 8. What are the means and process the Spirit employs to change and
 renew the heart? It is through preaching Jesus Christ the Lord, as
 Christ himself says (Jn 15, 26): "When the Comforter is come, whom I
 will send unto you from the Father, even the Spirit of truth, which
 proceedeth from the Father, he shall bear witness of me." As we have
 often heard, the Gospel is the message God would have preached
 world-wide, declaring to every individual that since no man can
 through the Law be made righteous, but must rather become more
 unrighteous, God sent his own beloved Son to shed his blood and die
 for our sins, from which sins we could not be released by our own
 effort.
 
 9. It is not enough simply that Christ be preached; the Word must be
 believed. Therefore, God sends the Holy Spirit to impress the
 preaching upon the heart--to make it inhere and live therein.
 Unquestionably, Christ accomplished all--took away our sins and
 overcame every obstacle, enabling us to become, through him, lords
 over all things. But the treasure lies in a heap; it is not everywhere
 distributed and applied. Before we can enjoy it, the Holy Spirit come
 and communicate it to the heart, enabling us to believe and say, "I
 too, am one who shall have the blessing." To everyone who hears is
 grace offered through the Gospel; to grace is he called, as Christ
 says (Mt 11, 28), "Come unto me, all ye that labor and are heavy
 laden," etc.
 
 10. Now, with the belief that God has come to our rescue and given us
 this priceless blessing, inevitably the human heart must be filled
 with joy and with gratitude to God, and must exultingly cry: "Dear
 Father, since it is thy will to manifest toward me inexpressible love
 and fidelity, I will love thee sincerely, and willingly do what is
 pleasing to thee."
 
 The believing heart never sees God with jealous eye. It does not fear
 being cast into hell as it did before the Holy Spirit came, when it
 was conscious of no love, no goodness, no faithfulness, on God's part,
 but only wrath and displeasure. But once let the Holy Spirit impress
 the heart with the fact of God's good will and graciousness towards
 it, and the resulting joy and confidence will impel it to do and
 suffer for God's sake whatever necessity demands.
 
 11. Let us, then, learn to recognize the Holy Spirit--to know that his
 mission is to present to us the priceless Christ and all his
 blessings; to reveal them to us through the Gospel and apply them to
 the heart, making them ours. When our hearts are sensible of this work
 of the Spirit, naturally we are compelled to say: "If our works avail
 naught, and the Holy Spirit alone must accomplish our salvation, then
 why burden ourselves with works and laws?" By the doctrine of the
 Spirit, all human works and laws are excluded, even the laws of Moses.
 The Holy Spirit's instruction is superior to that of all books. The
 Spirit-taught individual understands the Scriptures better than does
 he who is occupied solely with the Law.
 
 12. Hence, our only use for books is to strengthen our faith and to
 show others written testimony to the Spirit's teaching. For we may not
 keep our faith to ourselves, but must let it shine out; and to
 establish it the Scriptures are necessary. Be careful, therefore, not
 to regard the Holy Spirit as a Law-maker, but as proclaiming to your
 heart the Gospel of Christ and setting you so free from the literal
 law that not a letter of it remains, except as a medium for preaching
 the Gospel.
 
 
 BELIEVERS MUST YET RESIST SIN.
 
 13. Here we should be intelligent and know that in one sense all is
 not accomplished when the Holy Spirit is received. The possessor of
 the Spirit is not at once entirely perfect, pure in all respects, no
 more sensible of the Law and of sin. We do not preach the doctrine
 that the Spirit's office is one of complete accomplishment, but rather
 that it is progressive; he operates continuously and increasingly.
 Hence, there is not to be found an individual perfect in righteousness
 and happiness, devoid of sin and sorrow, ever serving all men with
 pleasure.
 
 The Scriptures make plain the Holy Spirit's office--to liberate from
 sin and terror. But the work is not then complete. The Christian must,
 in some measure, still feel sin in his heart and experience the
 terrors of death; he is affected by whatever disturbs other sinners.
 While unbelievers are so deep in their sins as to be indifferent,
 believers are keenly conscious of theirs; but Christians are supported
 by the Holy Spirit, who consoles and strengthens till his work is
 fully accomplished. It is terminated when they no longer feel their
 sins.
 
 14. So I say we must be prudent; we must take heed we do not
 arrogantly and presumptuously boast possession of the Holy Spirit, as
 do certain proud fanatics. The danger is in becoming too secure, in
 imagining ourselves perfect in all respects. The pious Christian is
 still flesh and blood like other men; he but strives to resist evil
 lusts and other sins, and is unwillingly sensible of evil desires. But
 he who is not a Christian is carelessly secure, wholly unconcerned
 about his sins.
 
 15. It is of no significance that we feel evil lusts, provided we
 endeavor to resist them. One must not go by his feelings and consider
 himself lost if he have sinful desires. At the same time he must, so
 long as life lasts, contend with the sins he perceives in himself. He
 must unceasingly groan to be relieved of them, and must permit the
 Holy Spirit to operate in him. There is in believers continual
 groaning after holiness--groaning too deep for expression, as Paul
 says in Romans 8, 26. But Christians have a blessed listener--the Holy
 Spirit himself. He readily perceives sincere longing after purity, and
 sends the conscience divine comfort.
 
 There will ever be in us mingled purity and imperfection; we must be
 conscious both of the Holy Spirit's presence and of our own sins--our
 imperfections. We are like the sick man in the hands of the physician
 who is to restore him to health. Let no one think: "Here is a man who
 possesses the Holy Spirit; consequently he must be perfectly strong,
 having no imperfections and performing only worthy works." No, think
 not so; for so long as we live in the flesh here on earth, we cannot
 attain such a degree of perfection as to be wholly free from weakness
 and faults. The holy apostles themselves often lamented their
 temptations and sorrows. Their feelings concealed from them the Holy
 Spirit's presence, though they were aware of his strengthening and
 sustaining power in their temptations, a power conveyed through the
 Word and through faith.
 
 16. The Holy Spirit is given only to the anxious and distressed heart.
 Only therein can the Gospel profit us and produce fruit. The gift is
 too sublime and noble for God to cast it before dogs and swine, who,
 when by chance they hear the preached message, devour it without
 knowing to what they do violence. The heart must recognize and feel
 its wretchedness and its inability to extricate itself. Before the
 Holy Spirit can come to the rescue, there must be a struggle in the
 heart. Let no one imagine he will receive the Spirit in any other way.
 
 17. We see this truth illustrated in the narrative here. The beloved
 disciples were filled with fear and terror. They were disconsolate and
 discouraged, and sunk in unbelief and despair. Only with great
 difficulty and effort did Christ raise them again. Yet their only
 failing was their faintheartedness; they feared the heavens would fall
 upon them. Even the Lord himself could scarce comfort them until he
 said: "The Holy Spirit shall descend upon you from heaven, impressing
 myself upon your hearts until you shall know me and, through me, the
 Father. Then will your hearts be comforted, strengthened and filled
 with joy." And so was the promise fulfilled to them on this day of
 Pentecost.
 
 
 
 
 Luther's Church Postil contains no sermons on the epistle selections
 for Whit-Monday and Whit-Tuesday.
 
 
 
 
 _Pentecost Monday_
 
 Text: Acts 2, 14-28.
 
 
 Only the text, without a sermon, is printed in the edition of 1559 of
 Luther's works. This and the following epistle text are too long to
 consider here, as they contain so many beautiful quotations from the
 Old Testament, which should not be passed over too briefly. Hence
 their discussion is reserved for their proper place.
 
 
 
 
 _Pentecost Tuesday_
 
 Text: Acts 2, 29-36.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 Produced by Ron Swanson (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive/American
 Libraries)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 THE EPISTLES OF ST. PETER AND ST. JUDE PREACHED AND EXPLAINED
 
 BY
 
 MARTIN LUTHER.
 
 Wittemberg, 1523-4.
 
 
 TRANSLATED, WITH PREFACE AND NOTES,
 
 BY
 
 E. H. GILLETT.
 
 
 
 
 NEW YORK:
 ANSON D. F. RANDOLPH,
 No. 683 BROADWAY.
 1859.
 
 
 
 
 Entered according to Act of Congress, in the year 1859, by
 E. H. GILLETT,
 In the Clerk's Office of the District Court for the Southern District
 of New York.
 
 
 
 
 EDWARD O. JENKINS,
 Printer & Stereotyper,
 No. 26 FRANKFORT STREET.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE BY THE TRANSLATOR.
 
 
 Several years ago, among the dusty piles of old pamphlets stored away
 upon the upper shelves of the Union Theological Seminary library, I
 met with several works of Luther, in the original editions, as they
 were issued during his lifetime from his press at Wittemberg. Among
 them were his Commentaries, or rather Lectures, on the Epistles of
 Peter and Jude.[1] The forbidding aspect of the page, with the
 obsolete spelling of its words, and its somewhat coarse typography,
 was rather an incitement to master it; for here was Luther,
 presenting himself to the eye of the reader just as, more than three
 hundred years ago, he presented himself to the eyes of thousands of
 his countrymen. Upon a partial perusal of the Commentary, I became
 satisfied that it would repay a more attentive study; and finding,
 upon investigation, that it had never been translated into English, I
 set myself to the task which had been so long neglected. The pleasing
 labor was accomplished, and the manuscript laid aside for several
 years. The conviction, confirmed by a re-perusal of it, that others
 besides myself would be interested in the work, has led me to
 determine on its publication.
 
 [Footnote 1: Another copy of this same edition of Luther on Peter,
 belonging to a clergyman's library which was sold at auction in this
 city, four or five years since, brought an almost fabulous price.]
 
 Luther's Commentary on the Galatians, excellent as it is, is too
 voluminous and expensive to be very extensively circulated, while the
 phraseology of the early translation, which has not been modified,
 prevents its proper appreciation by modern readers. And yet any one
 that would truly know the man, and the secret of his power, must
 study these in his writings. The Commentary on the Epistles of Peter
 and Jude, presented in a literal but more modern style to the English
 reader, is not liable to these objections; and yet, in the variety of
 its themes, the clearness of its exposition, the stinging force of
 its rebukes, the simplicity and directness of its language, it is
 scarcely surpassed by any of Luther's other writings. On the great
 subject of justification by faith alone, he is here, as in his
 Commentary on the Epistle to the Galatians, full and emphatic. The
 relation of faith to works is clearly and carefully defined, while
 the subjects presented in the text afford full opportunity for
 discussing the great questions that concern the relative duties of
 civil and social life. The volume thus becomes at once a manual of
 doctrine and of duty. On the foundation of faith is reared the
 superstructure of a Christian life. Luther is seen to have fully
 apprehended the force of all the objections that could be urged
 against his teachings, and with convincing ability he vindicates them
 from every charge. Throughout the volume we have ever before us the
 earnest, devout spirit of the Reformer, for the most part unfolding
 in the simplest manner the great doctrines of the Gospel, but
 occasionally indulging in volcanic outbursts of indignation against
 the hierarchical corruptions of his day, and pouring out upon them
 the lava-tides of withering rebuke.
 
 It may seem strange that this work of Luther's has never before been
 translated. But, unlike his Commentary on the Epistle to the
 Galatians, which he himself translated into Latin, that it might have
 a wider circulation among the learned of Europe, this was published
 by him only in the German language, which was little known in
 England, and hence it was deprived of that notoriety which would have
 drawn special attention to it, as well as of that Latin dress which
 would have facilitated an English translation. It is well known,
 moreover, that Luther formed a most humble estimate of his own
 writings, and was uniformly reluctant to collect his works in
 volumes, or bestow upon them any editorial care. He seemed perfectly
 willing to have them sink to oblivion, and could not be persuaded by
 the most urgent representations to do anything which might rescue
 them from such a fate. Besides, it is to be noted that a perusal of
 this volume especially would soon satisfy the reader, that after the
 accession of Queen Elizabeth to the throne, it stood little chance of
 securing the necessary approval or _imprimatur_ of an English bishop.
 
 Yet the work is one of no little historical as well as antiquarian
 interest. It has done its part in one of the greatest intellectual
 and religious conflicts of the world. It is the sword that a giant
 wielded, and that has done execution on a broad field. In the great
 armory of the Reformation-writings, scarcely another deserves a more
 conspicuous place. It presents those views of the relative spheres of
 Divine and human authority which became prevalent wherever the cause
 of Reform advanced. It unmasked popular errors, rebuked
 ecclesiastical corruption, and vindicated most effectively the simple
 doctrines of faith. Here, moreover, we see Luther clad in the armor
 with which he boldly challenged the Papacy to a lifelong combat. The
 man is before us, girded for the battle, and we see the weapons upon
 which he relies. If one of those cannon balls with which English
 valor won the battle of Cressy,--the first in which the efficiency of
 the new invention was tested,--could be picked up there now, and it
 could be ascertained that it did service in that famous battle, it
 would be an object of no small interest, at least to the antiquary;
 but in regard to this treatise of Luther, we know full well that Rome
 felt its visitation as something more terrible than a bombshell
 exploding beneath the dome of St. Peter's. Under the authority of
 Peter himself it demolished the very foundations of the throne upon
 which his pretended successors were seated, and gave a most effective
 impulse to the onward movement of reform.
 
 Nor is this all. It is still capable of doing effective service.
 After all the rust and tarnish of three centuries, these words of
 Luther are remarkably fresh, and seem almost like a living utterance
 of to-day. Their critical value is not indeed great, although by no
 means contemptible, for the quick sagacity of the Reformer in
 detecting the meaning and the force of the Scriptural argument, is
 evident on every page, and is rarely at fault; but his clear views of
 the Gospel, his untrammeled freedom of thought, his strong good
 sense, and his most effective energy of application are everywhere
 conspicuous. His language is uniformly simple and direct. The
 exposition contained in this volume was first delivered from the
 pulpit. According to the title-page, it is Scripture "preached and
 explained," and in addressing it to the people, Luther did not fail
 to keep in view the object upon which he set so high an estimate,
 when he said, "I preach as simply as possible. I want the common
 people, and children, and servants, to understand me."
 
 The care with which he fortifies his positions with Scriptural
 citations is likewise obvious. He rarely presents views upon any
 theme from which one who acknowledges the authority of Scripture will
 feel forced to dissent, unless, with some, the subject of baptism
 should an exception. In regard to this, he speaks like one who as yet
 sees "men as trees walking."
 
 Considerable space is given up to an exposure of the errors and
 abuses of the Papacy, but the exposure is made uniformly by the light
 of Scripture. Vehement as are Luther's occasional bursts of
 indignation, he never wanders from the subject, and never ventures
 beyond where he is sustained by the clear warrant of the word of God.
 
 In the purpose of presenting this translation to English readers, I
 have been encouraged by the prospect of affording to others the same
 opportunity of acquaintance with Luther's modes of thought and
 feeling which I have myself enjoyed. I believe, moreover, that his
 exposition has a high value, apart from the interest which attaches
 to it as the production of the great hero of the Reformation.
 Occasionally, the views presented have seemed to be such as required
 some explanatory note or correction, and in a few instances this has
 been appended, but the necessity has rarely occurred, and Luther is
 left throughout to speak for himself. The translation is strictly
 literal, and almost the only variations from the original are so
 marked, by being inclosed in parentheses. These will readily be
 distinguished from the passages or words included in parentheses of
 the original text, by their explanatory character.
 
 It would have been a far easier task to have given a more liberal and
 polished rendering of Luther's language. But I think most readers
 would prefer to have me give them Luther, rather than--the
 translator. There are occasional roughnesses of expression, and some
 sentences which were evidently not very lucidly reported, but they
 are features of the book which presents Luther to us, and even the
 wart on the face must appear in the faithful portrait.
 
 For assistance in the labor of revising some of the more difficult
 passages, I am indebted to Prof. ROBINSON, of the Union Theological
 Seminary, and to Rev. M. BUSHE, pastor of a German church in this
 city. By their aid, which I take this occasion gratefully to
 acknowledge, I feel confident that nearly every passage, in which the
 text of the original is not in fault, has been correctly rendered.
 
 I had hoped, in this connection, to present an estimate of Luther's
 writings, from the pen of one of the most eminent German scholars
 which our country can boast. The permission to do so was kindly
 granted, but the limited space allowed for prefatory remark forbids
 it. I will only add the expression of my own conviction, that from
 the exceedingly voluminous works of Luther, other selections of high
 merit might be made, the translation and publication of which would
 be welcomed with grateful acknowledgment by a large class of American
 and English readers. I should be highly gratified if the
 encouragement afforded by my words or example should induce any one
 more competent than myself, or who can command more leisure for it,
 to prosecute the work which I have only just begun.
 
 E. H. GILLETT.
 HARLEM, March 8th, 1859.
 
 
 
 
 THE FIRST EPISTLE GENERAL OF ST. PETER
 
 
 
 
 INTRODUCTION.
 
 
 Before we enter upon this Epistle of St. Peter, it is necessary to
 present a brief Introduction,[1] that it may be understood how this
 Epistle is to be ranked, and in order that a right apprehension of it
 may be attained.
 
 [Footnote 1: Literally, _instruction_.]
 
 In the first place, it must be understood that all the Apostles
 present one and the same doctrine; and it is not correct to speak
 of[2] four Evangelists and four Gospels for all which the Apostles
 wrote is one Gospel. But _Gospel_ means nothing but a proclamation
 and heralding of the grace and mercy of God through Jesus Christ,
 merited and procured through his death. And it is not properly that
 which is contained in books, and is comprehended in the letter, but
 rather an oral proclamation and living word, and a voice which echoes
 through the whole world, and is publicly uttered that it may
 universally be heard. Neither is it a book of laws, containing in
 itself many excellent doctrines, as has hitherto been held. For it
 does not bid us do works whereby we may become righteous, but
 proclaims to us the grace of God, bestowed freely, and apart from any
 merit of our own; and it tells how Christ has taken our place, and
 rendered satisfaction for our sins, and canceled them, and by His own
 works justifies and saves us.
 
 [Footnote 2: Count.]
 
 Whoever sets forth this, by preaching or writing, _he_ teaches the
 true Gospel, as all the Apostles did, especially St. Paul and St.
 Peter, in their Epistles. So that all, whatever it be, that sets
 forth Christ, is one and the same Gospel, although one may use a
 different method, and speak of it in different language from another,
 for it may perhaps be a brief or extended address, or a brief or
 extended writing. But yet, if it tends to this point, that Christ is
 our Saviour, and we through faith on Him, apart from works of our
 own, are justified and saved, it is still the same Word, and but one
 Gospel, just as there is also but one faith and one baptism in the
 whole Christian world.
 
 So, also, one Apostle has written the same [Gospel] that is contained
 in another's writings; but they who insist most largely and
 emphatically on this, that faith on Christ alone justifies, are the
 best Evangelists. Therefore St. Paul's Epistles are more a Gospel
 than Matthew, Mark and Luke, for the latter give little more than the
 history of the works and miracles of Christ; but of the grace which
 we have through Christ, none write so emphatically as St. Paul,
 especially in his Epistle to the Romans. And yet, since more
 importance by far belongs to the word than to the works and deeds of
 Christ, and where we are to be deprived of one it were better that we
 should want the works and the history than the word and the doctrine;
 those books are to be most highly esteemed which most largely treat
 of the doctrine and words of the Lord Christ; for though the miracles
 of Christ had never been, and we had no knowledge of them, we should
 yet have had enough in the _word_, without which we could not have
 had life.
 
 Thus this Epistle of St. Peter is one of the noblest books in the New
 Testament, and contains indeed the pure Gospel; for he takes the same
 course as St. Paul and all the Evangelists, in inculcating the true
 doctrine of faith,--as that Christ has been given us, who takes away
 our sin and saves us, as we shall hear.
 
 Hence you may judge of all books and doctrines, what is Gospel or
 not; for what is not set forth or written of in this manner, you may
 safely decide to be false, however excellent in appearance. This
 power to decide is one that all Christians possess,--not the Pope or
 Councils, who boast that they only have the power to determine.--This
 is sufficient introduction and preface. Let us now listen to the
 Epistle.
 
 
 
 
 THE FIRST EPISTLE GENERAL OF ST. PETER.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 V. 1, 2. _Peter an Apostle of Jesus Christ, to the strangers
 scattered abroad in Pontus, Galatia, Capadocia, Asia and Bithynia,
 elect according to the foreknowledge of God the Father, through
 sanctification of the Spirit, unto obedience and sprinkling of the
 blood of Jesus Christ._
 
 
 That is the superscription and subscription. Here you quickly
 perceive that it is the Gospel. He calls himself an Apostle--that is,
 one sent to declare a message; therefore it is correctly rendered in
 Dutch, a messenger, or a twelfth-messenger,[1] because they were
 twelve. But since it is generally understood what Apostle (the Greek
 word) means, I have not rendered it in Dutch. But its peculiar
 meaning is, one who bears a message by word of mouth; not one who
 carries letters, but a capable man who presents a matter orally, and
 advocates it,--of the class that in the Latin are called _Oratores_.
 So he would now say, I am an Apostle of Jesus Christ,--that is, I
 have a command from Jesus Christ that I, from Christ, am to proclaim.
 
 [Footnote 1: _Tswolffbott_ in the original, for which we have no
 equivalent English word.]
 
 Observe, here, how promptly all those who teach human doctrine are
 excluded. For _he_ is a messenger of Jesus Christ who presents that
 which Christ has commanded; should he preach otherwise, he is not a
 messenger of Christ, and therefore should not be listened to. But if
 he does this, it is just as important as though you heard Christ
 himself present.
 
 
 _To the strangers scattered abroad._ This epistle was written to
 lands which were formerly Christian but are now subject to the Turk,
 yet it is possible some Christians might be found there even at this
 day. Pontus is a large, broad region, lying on the sea. Capadocia is
 in the same neighborhood, and borders on it. Galatia lies back of
 them. Asia and Bithynia border on the sea--extending eastward--and
 are extensive regions. Paul also preached in Galatia, and in Asia;
 whether in Bithynia also, I do not know. In the other two he did not
 preach. _Strangers_ are such as we call foreigners. He names them so
 because they were Gentiles; and it is a thing to surprise us, that
 St. Peter, inasmuch as he was an Apostle to the Jews, should still
 write to the Gentiles. The Jews called these (of whom we speak)
 Proselytes,--that is, associated Jews, such as adopted their law, but
 were not of a Jewish family or the blood of Abraham. Thus he writes
 to those who had previously been heathen (of the Gentiles), but were
 now converted to the faith, and had joined the believing Jews, and he
 calls them _elect strangers_, who certainly are Christians, to whom
 alone he writes. This is a point worthy of observation, as we shall
 hear.
 
 
 _According to the foreknowledge of God the Father._ They are elect,
 he says. How? Not of themselves, but according to God's purpose: for
 we should be unable to raise ourselves to heaven, or create faith
 within ourselves. God will not permit all men to enter heaven; those
 who are his own he will receive with all readiness. The human
 doctrine of free-will, and of our own ability, is futile. The matter
 does not lie in our wills, but in the will and election of God.
 
 
 _Through sanctification of the Spirit._ God has predestinated us that
 we should be holy, and, moreover, that we should be spiritually holy.
 Those precious words, Holy and Spiritual, have been perverted for us
 through the greed of the preachers, in that they have denominated the
 state of priests and monks holy and spiritual, and have thus
 scandalously robbed us of these noble, precious words, as also of the
 word Church, since with _them_ the Pope and Bishops are the Church,
 while they do according to their own pleasure whatever they choose,
 in virtue of the declaration, "The Church has forbidden it." Holiness
 is not that which consists in the estate of monks, priests and
 nuns,--the wearing of the tonsure and cowl; it is a spiritual word,
 meaning that there is an inward holiness in the spirit before God.
 And this is the reason specially why he said this, in order to show
 that there is nothing holy but that holiness which God produces
 within us.
 
 For although the Jews had much outward or ceremonial holiness, there
 was yet in this no genuine holiness. Peter would say here, God has
 predestinated you to this end, that ye should be truly holy; as Paul
 also says, in Eph. iv., "In righteousness and true holiness"--that
 is, in a genuine and well-founded holiness,--for outward holiness,
 such as the Jews had, is of no value before God.
 
 Thus the Scripture calls us holy, while we yet live on earth, if we
 believe. But the Papists have taken the name from us, and say, we are
 not to be holy; the saints in Heaven alone are holy. Thus we are
 compelled to reclaim the noble name. You must be holy, but you must
 also beware against imagining that you are holy through yourself or
 by your own merit, but only that you have God's word, that Heaven is
 yours, that you are truly pious and made holy by Christ.
 
 This you must confess if you would be a Christian. For it would be
 the greatest affront and reviling of the name of Christ, if we took
 from the honor due to Christ's blood, in that it is this that washes
 away our sins, or from the faith that this blood sanctifies us.
 
 Therefore, you must believe and confess if you would be holy; but by
 this blood, not by your own excellence must it be, insomuch that for
 it you would be willing to give up life and all that you possess, and
 endure whatever might come upon you.
 
 
 _To obedience and the sprinkling of the blood of Christ._ Hereby, he
 says, are we made holy, if we are obedient, and believe the word of
 Christ, and are sprinkled with his blood. And here St. Peter speaks
 in a somewhat different manner from St. Paul. But it is in substance
 the same as when Paul says that we are saved through faith in Christ;
 for faith makes us obedient and submissive to Christ and his word.
 For to obey the word of God and the word of Christ is the same thing,
 and to be sprinkled by his blood is the same as to believe. For it is
 difficult to nature, hostile to it, and exceedingly humbling, to
 submit to Christ, give up all its own possessions, and account them
 contemptible and sinful. But yet it must be brought into subjection.
 
 Of sprinkling, the Psalm _Miserere Domine_ (li.) also speaks:
 "Sprinkle me with hyssop, and I shall be clean." It refers to the law
 of Moses, from which St. Peter has derived it, and he discloses Moses
 to our view, while he brings in the Scripture. When Moses had built
 the tabernacle, he took the blood of bullocks and sprinkled it over
 all the people.
 
 But _this_ sprinkling sanctifies not in the spirit, but only
 outwardly. Therefore there must be a spiritual purification, since an
 outward holiness, and one that pertains to the flesh, is of no avail
 before God. And so God, by this sprinkling, has typified the
 spiritual sprinkling. As though Peter had said, the Jews who were in
 that holiness which was outward were held as righteous, and persons
 of a pure life. But you are reputed base, yet you have a better
 sprinkling; you are sprinkled in the Spirit, that you may be pure
 from within. The Jews were sprinkled outwardly with the blood of
 bullocks, but we are sprinkled inwardly in the conscience, so that
 the heart is made pure and joyful.
 
 Thus the Gentiles are Gentiles no longer. The righteous Jews, with
 their sprinkling, are no more righteous, but all is reversed. There
 must be a sprinkling which converts us and makes us spiritually
 minded.
 
 To preach sprinkling is to preach that Christ has shed his blood, and
 for us has ascended to his Father, and intercedes, saying, "Beloved
 Father! behold my blood which I have shed for these sinners." If you
 believe this, you are sprinkled. Thus you see the right method of
 preaching. If all the popes, monks and priests were to fuse all the
 matter of their preaching into one mass, they would not even then
 teach and present as much as St. Peter here does in these few words.
 
 Thus you have the subscription of the Epistle, wherein he manifests
 his office and what he preaches, as you have now heard. For this
 alone is the Gospel, and all else that does not accord with it is to
 be trodden under foot, and all other books are to be avoided in which
 you find some fine pretence of works and prayers and indulgence that
 does not teach similar doctrine, and is not confessedly grounded
 thereon. All Papal books have not a letter of this obedience, of this
 blood and sprinkling. Now follows the greeting to those to whom he
 writes.
 
 
 _Grace and peace be multiplied._ Here St. Peter adopts the Apostle
 Paul's mode of greeting, although not to the same extent, and it is
 as much as though he had said, ye have now peace and grace, but yet
 not in perfection; therefore must ye continue to increase in them
 till the old Adam die. Grace is God's favor, which now begins in us,
 but which must continue to advance and grow even till death. Whoever
 confesses and believes that he has a gracious God, possesses it,
 while his heart gains peace also, and he is afraid neither of the
 world nor of the devil; for he knows that God, who controls all
 things, is his friend, and will deliver him from death, hell and all
 evil,--therefore his conscience has peace and joy. Such is the desire
 of St. Peter for those that believed, and it is a true Christian
 greeting with which all Christians might well greet one another.
 
 Thus we have the superscription, with the greeting; now he begins the
 Epistle, and says:
 
 
 V. 3-9. _Blessed be God and the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, who,
 according to his abundant mercy, has begotten us again to a lively
 hope, through the resurrection of Jesus Christ from the dead, to an
 inheritance imperishable, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away,
 reserved in heaven for you, who are kept by the power of God through
 faith to salvation, ready to be revealed in the last time, wherein ye
 greatly rejoice, though now for a little time (if need be) ye are sad
 through manifold temptations; that the trial of your faith might be
 found more precious than the perishable gold (that is tried by fire),
 to praise, honor, and glory, when Jesus Christ shall be revealed,
 whom ye have not seen and yet love, in whom through ye believe and
 see him not, yet for your faith's sake ye rejoice with joy
 unspeakable and full of glory, receiving the end of your faith, even
 the salvation of your soul._
 
 
 In this preface you perceive a truly Apostolic address and
 introduction to the matters in hand, and as I have said already, this
 is the model of a noble Epistle. For he has already exhibited and
 made manifest what Christ is, and what we have attained through him,
 when he says, that God hath begotten us again to a lively hope
 through the resurrection of Christ.
 
 Thus all good things are bestowed upon us by the Father, not for any
 desert of ours, but of pure mercy. These are true Gospel words which
 are to be preached, but how little--God save us--of this kind of
 preaching is to be met with in all sorts of books, even those that
 must be considered the best; how little agreement is there, as St.
 Jerome and St. Augustine have written, in this position,--that Jesus
 Christ is to be preached, that he died and rose again, and that he
 died and rose again that through such preaching men might believe on
 him and be saved. That is preaching the true Gospel. Whatever is not
 preached in this wise is not the Gospel, do it who will.
 
 This is now the _summa summarum_ of these words. Christ, through his
 resurrection, has brought us to the Father; and so, too, St. Peter
 would bring us to the Father by the Lord Christ, and he sets him
 forth as Mediator between God and us. Hitherto we have been taught
 that we should call upon the saints; that they are our intercessors
 with God, while, moreover, we have had recourse to our dear Virgin,
 and have set her up as Mediatress, and have let Christ go as an angry
 judge. This the Scripture does not do; it goes further, and exalts
 Christ; teaching that he is our Mediator, by whom we come to the
 Father. Oh! it is a blessing infinitely vast that is bestowed upon us
 through Christ, that we may go into the presence of the Father and
 claim the inheritance of which St. Peter here speaks.
 
 These words also well exhibit the feelings which the Apostle had, as
 with the deepest reverence he begins to praise the Father, and would
 have us adore and bless Him for the sake of the infinite riches which
 He has bestowed upon us, in that He has begotten us again, and this,
 too, before we had desired or sought it; so that nothing is to be
 praised but pure mercy, in order that we may not make our boast of
 any works, but confess that we hold all that we have of God's
 compassion.
 
 There is no more the law and vengeance before us, as heretofore, when
 He affrighted the Jews so that they were forced to flee, but dared
 not go toward the mount. He vexes and chastises us no more, but shows
 us the greatest friendship, creates us anew, and appoints us, not to
 do some work or works, but produces within us an entirely new birth
 and new being, that we should be something different from what we
 were before, when we were Adam's children,--namely, such as are
 transplanted from Adam's heritage into the heritage of God; so that
 God is our Father, we are His children, and thus also heirs of all
 the good which He possesses. Observe with what emphasis the
 scriptures present this matter; it is all a living, not a vain,
 matter in which we are concerned. Since we are thus begotten again
 the children and heirs of God, we are equal in honor and dignity with
 St. Paul, St. Peter, our blessed Virgin, and all the Saints. For we
 have the treasure and all good things from God just as richly as
 they; for it is just as necessary for them to be begotten again as
 for us,--therefore they have nothing more than all other Christians.
 
 
 _To a living hope._ That we continue to live on earth is mainly to
 this end, that we should be of service to others. Otherwise, it were
 better that God should have taken away our breath and let us die as
 soon as we were baptized and had begun to believe. But He suffers us
 to live here in order that we may bring others also to believe, doing
 to them as He has done toward us. But while we remain on earth, we
 must live in hope; for although we are assured that through faith we
 have all the good things of God, (for faith brings along with it
 assuredly the new birth, the adoption, the inheritance, and makes
 them yours,) still you do not as yet behold them; but the matter
 exists in hope, while it is of but small importance that we may not
 see it with our eyes. This he calls _the hope of life_; that is, by a
 Hebrew phrase, as though for sinful man we should say, a man of sin.
 We call it a living hope; that is, one in which we certainly expect,
 and may be assured of, eternal life. But it is concealed, and a veil
 is drawn over it, that we see it not. It can only be apprehended in
 the heart and by faith, as St. John writes in his Epistle, 1 John v.:
 "We are now the children of God, and it doth not yet appear what we
 shall be; but we know that when it shall appear that we are like Him,
 we shall behold Him as He is." For _this_ life, and _that_, cannot be
 commingled, cannot consist with one another, so that we should eat,
 drink, sleep, watch, and do other works of the flesh which this life
 renders necessary, and at the same time have our full salvation.
 Therefore we can never arrive at eternal life unless we die, and this
 present life passes away. Thus, as long as we are here we must stand
 in hope, until it be God's pleasure that we should behold the
 blessings that are ours.
 
 But how do we attain to this living hope? By the resurrection of
 Christ from the dead, he says. I have often asserted that no one can
 believe on God except through a mediation, since we can none of us
 treat for ourselves before God, inasmuch as we are all children of
 wrath; but we must have another by whom we may come before God, who
 shall intercede for us and reconcile us to God. But there is no other
 mediator than the Lord Christ, who is the Son of God. Therefore that
 is not a true faith which is held by the Turks and Jews,--I believe
 that God has created heaven and earth. Just so does the devil, too,
 believe, but it does not help him. They venture to present themselves
 before God without having Christ as mediator. So St. Paul speaks in
 the fifth of Romans, "We have access to God by faith, not through
 ourselves, but through Christ." Therefore we must bring Christ with
 us, must come with Him, must satisfy God by Him, and do all that we
 have to transact with God through Him, and in His name. That is the
 thought implied here by St. Peter, and he would also say, we surely
 expect this life, although we are still on earth. But all comes in no
 other way than through the resurrection of Christ, since He has
 arisen and ascended to heaven, and is seated at the right hand of
 God. For on this account He ascended, in order to bestow upon us His
 Spirit, that we might be born again, and now through Him might come
 to the Father and say, "Behold, I come before thee and pray, not
 because I rely on my own request, but because my Lord Christ has gone
 before me and is become my intercessor." These are all glowing words
 wherever there is a heart that believes; where there is not, all is
 cold and unimpressive.
 
 Hence we may determine what genuine Christian doctrine or preaching
 is. If the Gospel is to be preached, it must concern the resurrection
 of Christ. Whoever does not preach this is no Apostle; for it is the
 head article of our faith. And those books are truly the noblest
 which teach and enforce such doctrine, as was said above. So that we
 may easily discover that the Epistle of James is no true Apostolic
 Epistle[2] for it contains scarcely a letter of these things in it,
 while the greatest importance belongs to this article of faith. For
 were there no such thing as the resurrection, we should have neither
 comfort nor hope, and all beside that Christ has endured or suffered
 would have been in vain.
 
 [Footnote 2: The well-known views of Luther in regard to the Epistle
 of James, and the grounds upon which he rejected it from the canon of
 the New Testament, are presented in this passage. He was too
 impatient of the _seeming_ contradiction between Paul and James upon
 the subject of faith, and too hastily concluded that they were
 irreconcilable. A careful consideration of the scope of the argument
 in the Epistle of James, removes the difficulty, as may be seen at
 large in later commentators. There is no historical reason for
 casting discredit upon the Epistle of James. The early Christian
 writers furnish very decided testimony in its favor. Clement of Rome
 has alluded to it twice. Hermas has not less than seven allusions to
 it, according to Lardner fully sufficient to prove its antiquity.
 Origen, Jerome, Athanasius, and most of the subsequent ecclesiastical
 writers quote from it, and it is found in all the catalogues of
 canonical books published by the general and provincial Councils. But
 an argument of still greater weight is, the fact that it is inserted
 in the Syriac version of the New Testament, executed at the close of
 the first, or early in the second century. None certainly would
 question that the Jewish believers to whom it was addressed would be
 the best judges of its genuineness and authenticity, and by them it
 was unhesitatingly accepted.]
 
 Therefore one should teach after this manner: You perceive that
 Christ has died for you, has taken upon Himself sin, death, and hell,
 and bowed Himself under them. But in no respect were they able to
 crush Him, for He was too strong for them; but He has risen up from
 beneath them, and has vanquished all, and brought them in subjection
 to Himself; and to this end, that you might be relieved from them,
 and made to triumph over them. If you believe, you possess this. All
 these things, by our own power, we could not effect; hence it was
 necessary that Christ should do it, otherwise He had never needed to
 come down from heaven. We can only conclude that if one preaches of
 our own works, _that_ preaching does not agree and cannot consist
 with this. Oh, so thoroughly as we Christians should know this! so
 clear should the Epistle be to us!
 
 
 V. 4. _To an imperishable and undefiled and unfading inheritance._
 That is, we hope not for a blessing or an inheritance that is far
 off. But we live in the hope of an inheritance that is just at hand,
 and that is imperishable as well as undefiled and unfading. This
 blessing is ours henceforth and forever, although we do not now
 behold it. These are powerful and excellent words; into whosesoever
 mind they enter, he will, I imagine, not be greatly anxious after
 worldly good and pleasure. How can it be possible that one who
 assuredly believes this, should yet cleave to perishable possessions
 and lusts?
 
 If worldly good is presented in contrast with this, it is at once
 seen how it all passes away and endures but for a time; but this
 alone lasts forever and will never consume away. Besides, _that_ is
 all impure, and defiles us, for there is no man so devoted that
 worldly prosperity will not soil his purity. But _this_ inheritance
 alone is pure; whoever has it is ever undefiled; it will not fade; it
 endures and does not corrupt. All that is on earth, however hard it
 be, is yet changeable and has no permanence. Man, as soon as he grows
 old, becomes deformed: but this does not change, but abides forever,
 fresh and green. On earth there is no pleasure that will not at
 length become irksome, as we see that men grow weary of all things;
 but with this blessing such is not the case. This do we possess only
 in Christ, through the mercy of God, if we believe, and it is freely
 bestowed upon us. For how is it possible that we poor wretches should
 be able to deserve such good through our own works as no human reason
 or sense can conceive?
 
 
 _That is reserved in heaven._ Certain it is that our inheritance is
 imperishable, undefiled and unfading. It is only for a little while
 concealed from us, until we close our eyes and are buried, when, if
 we believe, we shall surely find and behold it.
 
 
 V. 5. _Who are kept by the power of God through faith unto
 salvation._ We wait for this priceless inheritance, he says, in the
 hope to which we have attained through faith; for this is their order
 of succession: From the word follows faith, from faith is the new
 birth, from the new birth we pass to hope, so that we certainly
 expect and are assured of the blessing. So that Peter has here
 asserted, in a truly christian manner, that it must take place by
 faith, not by our own works.
 
 But St. Peter says here, more particularly, _ye are kept by the power
 of God--to salvation_. But there are many people who, if they hear
 the Gospel,--namely, that faith alone, irrespective of works,
 justifies,--break in at once and say, "Yes! I believe too!" To think
 their thoughts which they themselves conceive, is faith. Yet we have
 also been taught from Scripture that we cannot do the least work
 without God's Spirit; how then by our own power should we be able to
 do the highest work,--namely, believe? Wherefore such thoughts are
 nothing else but a dream and a fiction. God's power must be present
 and work within us, in order that we may believe; as Paul also says,
 Eph. i., "God grant you the spirit of wisdom that ye may know what is
 the exceeding greatness of His power toward us who have believed,
 according to the working of His mighty power," &c. Not only is it
 God's will, but a power of God that is far from unimportant. For if
 God produces faith in men, it is certainly as great a work as though
 He recreated heaven and earth.
 
 Therefore those fools know not what they say, who ask, How can faith
 alone answer, while many an one believes who yet performs no good
 work? For they imagine their own vain dream is faith, and that faith
 may exist without good works. But we say, just as Peter says, that
 faith is a divine power; when God produces faith, man must be born
 again and become a new creature; good works, flowing from a purified
 nature, must follow faith. So that we must not say to a Christian who
 has faith, Do this or that work,--for he performs of himself and
 unbidden, mere good works.
 
 But this must be said to him, that he is not to deceive himself with
 a false, imaginary faith. Wherefore let those rude babblers go, who
 can say a great deal on the subject that is nothing after all but
 mere scum and vain prating. Of whom Paul also speaks, 1 Cor. iv., "I
 will come to you and will seek out not the speech of those that are
 puffed up, but the power; for the kingdom of God does not stand in
 word, but in power." Wherever this power of God is wanting, there is
 neither genuine faith nor good works. So that they are mere liars,
 who pride themselves on their Christian name and faith and yet lead a
 wicked life. For if it were of God's power, they would certainly be
 otherwise.
 
 But what does St. Peter mean when he says, _ye are kept by the power
 of God to salvation_? This is his meaning: So tender and precious a
 matter is that which pertains to the faith which the power of God
 (that is with us and with which we are filled) produces in us, that
 He gives us a correct, clear understanding of all things that respect
 salvation, so that we may judge all that is on earth, and say, this
 doctrine is true, that is false; this conduct is right, that is not;
 this work is good and acceptable, that is evil. And whatever such a
 man determines is just and true, for he cannot be deceived; but he
 will be kept, and preserved, and remains, a judge of all doctrines.
 
 On the other hand, wherever faith and this power of God are wanting,
 there is nothing but error and blindness; there reason suffers itself
 to be led hither and thither, from one work to another, for it would
 gladly reach heaven by its own works, and is ever imagining after
 this sort, "Yes! this work will bring you to heaven: do it and you
 shall be saved." Hence there are so many chapters, cloisters, altars,
 popes, monks and nuns in the world. Into such blindness does God
 permit the unbelieving to fall. But he keeps us, who believe, in a
 just apprehension, so that we may not fall into condemnation, but
 attain to salvation.
 
 
 _Which is ready to be revealed in the last time._ That is, the
 inheritance that is appointed for them was long ago acquired, and
 prepared from the foundation of the world, but now is hidden, as yet
 covered up, reserved and sealed. But this is only for a little while,
 when in a moment it shall be opened and revealed, so that we shall
 behold it.
 
 
 V. 6. _In which ye rejoice greatly, though now for a season (if need
 be), ye are in heaviness through manifold temptation._ Are you a
 Christian, and do you look for this inheritance or this salvation?
 then must you cleave to this alone, and despise all that is upon
 earth, and confess that all worldly reason, wisdom and glory are
 nothing--a thing the world will not be able to bear; wherefore you
 are to expect that men shall condemn you and persecute you. Thus St.
 Peter joins faith, hope, and the holy cross together, for one follows
 upon the other.
 
 And here he gives us a source of consolation if we suffer and are
 persecuted. This sadness shall last a little while; afterward ye
 shall be exceeding glad, for this salvation is already prepared for
 you; wherefore be patient under your sufferings.
 
 This is moreover a truly christian consolation,--not such comfort as
 human doctrines give, which attempt nothing more than to find relief
 from outward ill. I speak not of bodily comfort (he seems to say); it
 is no real injury that ye have to endure outward ill, only go onward
 vigorously and be steadfast; inquire not how you may be free from the
 trouble, but think with yourself, My inheritance is prepared and held
 out to me; it is only a short time before my suffering must cease.
 Thus we should lay aside temporal consolations, and over against them
 place that eternal consolation which we have in God.
 
 Besides, it is here to be observed that the Apostle continues and
 tells us in what circumstances all this will be, as he will hereafter
 say in the third chapter, _if it be God's will_.
 
 There are many people who would storm heaven and enter it at once,
 wherefore they impose a cross upon themselves for their own fancied
 good; for reason will do nothing but propose for ever its own works,
 that God will reject. They should not be our own works which we
 select, but we should wait for whatever God imposes upon us and
 ordains for us, that we may go on and follow wherever He leads us; so
 that you are not to run after your own pleasure, in case it should be
 (that is, by God's appointment) that you are to suffer, but accept it
 and comfort yourself with the salvation which is not temporal but
 eternal.
 
 
 V. 7, 8. _That the trial of your faith (or that your tried faith) be
 found much more precious than the perishable gold, (that is tried in
 the fire), to praise, honor, and glory, when Jesus Christ shall be
 revealed, whom ye have not seen, yet love, in whom ye also believe
 though ye see him not._ This should be the end of the cross and all
 kinds of reverses,--to enable us to distinguish between false and
 real faith. God lays his hand upon us, therefore, to try our faith
 and reveal it to the world, so that others may be induced to believe,
 and we also be praised and honored. For just as we exalt God, so will
 He in return exalt, esteem and honor us, insomuch that the false
 hypocrites, who do not walk in the right way, shall be put to shame.
 
 Scripture throughout likens temptation to fire. Thus St. Peter here
 compares the gold that is tried by fire to the trial of faith by
 temptation and suffering. The fire does not take away from the gold,
 but it makes it pure and bright, so that all dross is removed. So God
 has imposed the cross upon all Christians, that they might thereby be
 purified. And it has been well said, let faith remain pure as the
 word is pure, so that we shall depend on the word alone, and trust to
 nothing else: for we need such fire and cross as this daily, because
 of the old corrupt Adam.
 
 Thus, it is characteristic of a christian life that it should
 continually grow and become more holy; for if we are led to faith
 through the preaching of the Gospel, then shall we be justified and
 grow in holiness; but while we remain in the flesh we can never be
 fully purified. Therefore God throws us into the midst of the
 fire,--that is, into suffering, shame and calamity,--so that we may
 become more and more purified, until we die--a point we can attain by
 no works of our own. For how can an outward work make the heart
 inwardly clean? Moreover, if faith is to be tried (purified), all
 that is additional and false must be separated and removed. Thence
 will result a noble reward,--praise and glory when Christ shall be
 revealed. On this it follows:
 
 
 V. 8, 9. _But because of your faith, rejoice with joy unspeakable and
 glorious, and attain also the end of your faith, even the salvation
 of your souls._ An unspeakably glorious joy shall that be, says St.
 Peter, whereof we have honor and praise. The world has such a joy
 that we receive nothing from it but shame, and of which we are
 compelled to be ashamed. Here St. Peter has evidently spoken of
 future joy,--and there is scarcely so clear a passage on the subject
 of the future joy as the one in this place,--and still he finds
 himself unable to express it.
 
 This is one point of the introduction, in which the Apostle has shown
 what faith in Christ is, and how we must be tried and purified by
 reverse and suffering when God appoints it for us.--Now follows
 further how this faith is in Scripture constituted and denominated.
 
 
 V. 10, 11, 12. _Of which salvation the prophets have inquired and
 searched diligently, who have prophesied of the grace that should
 come unto you; searching what or as to what time, the spirit of
 Christ which was in them, designated and testified beforehand the
 sufferings of Christ and the glory that should follow; to whom it was
 revealed, that not for their own sake, but for ours, did they
 minister that which is now preached to you, by those who have
 preached the Gospel, through the Holy Ghost sent down from heaven;
 into which also the angels desired to look._
 
 
 Here St. Peter directs us back to the Holy Scriptures, that we may
 therein see that God keeps whomsoever He has called of us, for no
 merit of ours, but of mere grace; for the whole of Scripture is
 directed to this end, that it may draw us away from our own works and
 bring us to faith. And it is necessary that we should study the
 Scriptures carefully that we may be well assured of our faith. Paul
 also teaches us the same thing in the Epistle to the Romans, chap.
 i., where he says that God promised the Gospel before by His prophets
 in the Holy Scriptures. So Rom. iii.: that the faith whereby we are
 justified, is testified of through the law and the prophets.
 
 So we read also in Acts xvii. how Paul preached faith to the
 Thessalonians, leading them to the Scripture and explaining it to
 them, and how day by day they had recourse to the Scripture, and
 examined whether those things which Paul had taught them were so. So
 likewise ought we to do, going back, and from the Old Testament
 learning on what to base the New. Besides, we shall there discover
 the promise of Christ, as Christ himself also says, John v.: "Search
 the Scriptures, for it is they that testify of me." And "if ye
 believe Moses, ye must also believe me, for he wrote of me."
 Therefore we should let vain babblers go who despise the Old
 Testament, and say it is of no further use,--since from thence alone
 must we derive the ground of our faith; for God sent the Prophets to
 the Jews to this end, that they should bear witness of the Christ
 that was to come. Therefore it is that the Apostles throughout
 convicted and convinced the Jews out of their own Scriptures that
 this was the Christ.
 
 Thus the books of Moses and the prophets are the Gospel, since they
 have first preached and written of Christ that which the Apostles
 afterward preached and wrote. Yet there is a distinction between
 them. For although both, as to the letter, have been written out on
 paper, yet the Gospel, or the New Testament, cannot be said so
 properly to be written, but to have consisted in the living voice
 which published it, and was heard generally throughout the world. But
 that it should also have been written, is an extraneous matter. But
 the Old Testament was composed only in writing, and is therefore
 called the letter; and the Apostles give Scripture this same name
 also, as it only pointed to the Christ that was to come. But the
 Gospel is a living proclamation of Christ who has already come.
 
 Besides, there is also a distinction among the books of the Old
 Testament. In the first place, there are the five books of Moses, the
 foundation of the Scriptures, and which are especially called the Old
 Testament. Then come both histories and books of narration, wherein
 examples of all kinds are recorded, whether of those who held or
 rejected the law of Moses. In the third place, there are the prophets
 that are based on Moses, and what he has written they have in clear
 language more fully explained and elucidated. But the bearing of all
 the prophets and of Moses is one and the same.
 
 But you ought to understand also about that which men say, that the
 Old Testament is given up and laid by. In the first place, there is
 that distinction between the Old and New Testament, as we have said
 above, that the Old prefigured Christ, but that the New gives us that
 which was promised first in the Old, and pointed out to us by types.
 But these types have now ceased, because the end which they were to
 subserve has been answered and attained, and that which was
 prefigured by them has been fulfilled. So that now there should be no
 further distinctions of food, clothing, place and time. All are alike
 in Christ, in whom all has been fulfilled. The Jews have not been
 saved by this, for it was not given them to this end that it should
 make them holy, but to foreshadow to them the Christ who was to come.
 
 Besides, in the Old Testament God introduced a twofold
 government,--an external and an internal. There He undertook to rule
 His people, both inwardly in the heart, and outwardly in person and
 in property. Therefore He gave them such a variety of laws,
 commingled one kind with the other. So it was under the government
 that pertained to the person, that a man might give his wife a bill
 of divorce and put her away.
 
 But to the spiritual government pertained the command, Thou shalt
 love thy neighbor as thyself. But now He rules in us only
 spiritually, by Christ; while the government that pertains to the
 body and the outward state, he exercises through the instrumentality
 of civil magistracy. So that when Christ came the external ceased,
 and God gives us direction no more as to the _outward_ person, time
 and place. But He rules us only spiritually through the word, so that
 we may direct as to all that is outward, and be bound in nothing that
 pertains to the body.
 
 But what pertains to His spiritual government has not been abandoned,
 but stands forever, now as then,--the law of love to God and our
 neighbor, contained in the books of Moses, which God will still have
 sustained, and by which He will condemn all the unbelieving.
 
 Besides, the figures, as to their _spiritual_ import, remain; that
 is, whatever is signified by the outward figures, although the
 outward part has been done away. Thus that a man should separate from
 his wife and send her away, because of adultery, is a figure and type
 which even now is spiritually fulfilled; for thus also has God
 rejected the Jews when they would not believe on Christ, and has
 chosen out the Gentiles. So, also, He does still; if any one will not
 walk in the faith, He suffers him to be excluded from the Christian
 Church, that he may be led to reform.
 
 Of a similar import also is this, that a woman after her husband's
 death must take her husband's brother, and bear him children, and he
 must suffer himself to be called by his name, and must enter on his
 possessions. This, although it has now ceased, or rather become
 invalid, so that it may be done or neglected without sin, is a figure
 which even now has a significance in respect to Christ. For He is our
 brother, for us has died and ascended to heaven, and has commanded us
 that we, through the Gospel, should plant the seed in our souls and
 make them fruitful, be named after him, and enter on his possessions.
 Therefore I must not boast that I convert men, but it must all be
 ascribed to the Lord Christ. It is the same also with all the other
 figures of the Old Testament, which it would be too tedious to
 specify.
 
 But all in the Old Testament which is not external, is still in
 force, as all those passages in the prophets concerning faith and
 love. Wherefore Christ also confirms it in Mat. vii.: "All things
 whatsoever ye would that men should do unto you, do ye even so to
 them; for this is the law and the prophets." Besides, Moses and the
 prophets testify of the Christ that was to come. As, when I preach of
 Christ that He is the only Saviour by whom all must be saved, I may
 quote to sustain me the passage in Gen. xxii.: "In thy seed shall all
 nations be blessed." Thence I draw a living voice and language.
 Through Christ, who is Abraham's seed, must all men be blessed. From
 that it follows, that we were all cursed and condemned in Adam;
 wherefore it is necessary that we should believe on the Seed, if we
 would escape condemnation. Out of such passages may we lay down the
 ground of our faith, and let it remain, that we may therein see how
 they bear witness of Christ, so that our faith may be strengthened
 thereby. That is what St. Peter intends now by these words, in which
 he says:
 
 
 V. 10. _Of which Salvation the Prophets have searched and inquired
 diligently, who have prophesied of the grace that should come to
 you._ In this same manner Paul also speaks, toward the close of the
 Epistle to the Romans, of the revelation of the mystery which was
 hidden from all ages of the world, but is now revealed and made known
 through the writings of the prophets. And so you find in the New
 Testament many passages quoted from the prophets, by which the
 Apostles show that all has been fulfilled just as the prophets
 foretold.
 
 This Christ Himself proves from the prophet Isaiah, Mat. xi.: "The
 blind see, the lame walk," &c. As though He had said, just as it was
 written there it is taking place now; so also we read in Acts ix., of
 Paul, and in the xviii., of Apollos, how they confounded the Jews,
 and convinced them out of Scripture that this was the Christ. For
 whatever the prophets had foretold, all had now come to pass in
 Christ. So (Acts xv.) the Apostles show how the Gospel must be
 preached to the heathen that they might believe. This has also come
 to pass, and been put in train, so that the Jews might be convinced
 and compelled to confess, that all had taken place just as Scripture
 had foretold.
 
 
 V. 11. _And have investigated what or at what time the Spirit of
 Christ which was in them;_ St. Peter would say, although the prophets
 have not particularly known of a set and definite time, yet have they
 in general testified to all the circumstances of time and place;--as,
 that Christ should suffer, and what death he should die, and that the
 Gentiles should believe on him: so that one might certainly know by
 these signs when the time had come. The prophet Daniel has approached
 still nearer, but yet speaks somewhat darkly thereof, as to when
 Christ should suffer and die--when that or this should take place.
 So, also, they had a sure prophecy that the kingdom of the Jews
 should cease before Christ came. But the day and exact time when this
 should come to pass was not fixed. For it was enough when this time
 came, that they should thereby know for a surety that Christ was not
 far off. The prophet Joel also prophesied of the time when the Holy
 Spirit should come, where he says, "I will in the last days pour out
 my spirit upon all flesh," &c., which passage St. Peter quotes in
 Acts ii., and shows that he speaks of that very time and of the
 particular persons.
 
 From all which you perceive how, with great diligence, the Apostles
 exhibit throughout the ground and confirmation of their preaching and
 doctrine. The Councils and the Popes now reverse this course, and
 would deal with us apart from Scripture, commanding us, by obedience
 to the church and the terrors of excommunication, that we should
 believe on them. The Apostles were filled with the Holy Spirit, and
 were certain that they were sent by Christ, and preached the true
 Gospel; yet they did not exalt themselves, and did not ask men to
 believe them, unless they conclusively proved from Scripture that it
 was just as they said, so that the mouth of the unbelieving was
 stopped, insomuch that they could object nothing further. And shall
 we believe those grossly unlearned heads who do not preach God's word
 at all, and can do nothing else but cry out continually, "Surely the
 fathers cannot have been in error, and this has been decided now for
 a long time, so that it must no more be a question?" But this we can
 clearly prove from the Scriptures, that no one can be saved but he
 who believes on Christ, so that against this they can say nothing.
 But on their side they will never be able to prove to us from
 Scripture that he is to be condemned who does not fast on this or
 that day. Therefore we ought not and shall not believe them.
 
 Now St. Peter says further:
 
 
 V. 11. _Which spirit testified beforehand the sufferings of Christ,
 and the glory that should thereafter be revealed._ This may be
 understood of both kinds of suffering,--that which Christ, and we
 also, suffer. St. Paul calls the sufferings of all Christians the
 suffering of Christ. For just as the faith, the name, the word and
 work of Christ are mine, inasmuch as I believe on Him, so His
 suffering is also mine, since I suffer also for His sake. Thus will
 the sufferings of Christ be daily fulfilled in Christians, until the
 end of the world.
 
 This is then our consolation in all the sufferings that we
 experience, that all that we suffer Christ shares with us, that He
 accounts it all as His own suffering. And of this we are assured,
 that speedily after suffering glory shall follow. But this we must
 also understand, that Christ was not glorified before He suffered, so
 that we are to bear our cross with Him first, that afterward we may
 share His joy.
 
 All that we now preach, he says, the prophets previously foretold and
 described in the most explicit manner, just as the Holy Spirit
 revealed it to them. That we so imperfectly understand the prophets
 is, because we do not understand their language, since they have
 spoken clearly enough. Therefore they that are acquainted with the
 language, and have the Spirit of God, which all believers have, to
 them it is not difficult of apprehension since they know the scope of
 all Scripture. But if any one does not understand their language, and
 has not the spirit, or a christian apprehension, it might seem to him
 as though the prophets were drunken and full of new wine; although
 where we must want one, the spirit without the language is better
 than the language without the spirit. The prophets have a peculiar
 phraseology, but the sentiment is the same which the Apostles preach,
 for both have spoken largely of the suffering and of the glory of
 Christ, as well as of those things that relate to faith. As when
 David speaks of Christ (Ps. xxi.), "I am a worm and no man," whereby
 he shows how deeply he is cast down and despondent in his suffering.
 Likewise, also, he writes of his people and of the affliction of
 Christians, in Psalm xlv.: "We are despised, and accounted as sheep
 for the slaughter."
 
 
 V. 12. _That not for their own sakes but for ours did they minister
 that which is now preached unto you, by those who have preached the
 Gospel to you, through the Holy Ghost sent down from heaven;_ that
 is, the prophets possessed enough thereof to know the fact. But that
 they should have left it behind them (on record) calls for our
 gratitude; they have become our servants, and have so ministered to
 us, that we, through them, might go to school and learn the same
 lesson. There we have an argument to show that our faith should grow
 stronger, and we be enabled to arm and sustain ourselves against all
 false doctrine.
 
 
 _Into which also the angels desired to look._ So great things have
 the Apostles declared to us, through the Holy Spirit, which descended
 upon them from heaven, as even the angels would gladly look into.
 When this Spirit opens our eyes and makes us see what the Gospel is,
 we shall have an appetite for it and a joy in it, although we cannot
 behold it with bodily eyes, but must believe that we are partakers
 and fellow-heirs of the righteousness, truth, salvation and all the
 blessings which God has to bestow. For since He has given us His only
 Son, that highest good, He will also, through Him, give us all good
 things, riches and treasures, whereof the angels in heaven have all
 their joy, and of which they are most desirous. All this is offered
 to us through the Gospel, and if we believe we shall also have a like
 desire for them. But our desire for them cannot be as perfect as that
 of the angels, so long as we live on earth; but it is a good
 beginning in us, if we experience, through faith, something of it.
 But in heaven it is so great that no human heart can conceive it; but
 if we reach that place we shall ourselves feel it.
 
 Thus you see how St. Peter teaches us to arm and equip ourselves with
 Scripture. For hitherto he has described what it is to preach the
 Gospel, and shown that as it heretofore has been preached by the
 prophets, so it should still be, and should be preached in like
 manner. Now he proceeds farther, and admonishes us in this chapter
 that we should cleave to the same preaching of the Gospel by faith,
 and follow after it by love, and therefore says,--
 
 
 V. 13-16. _Gird up therefore the loins of your mind; be sober, and
 fix your hope firmly on the grace which is offered you through the
 revelation of Jesus Christ, as obedient children, not conformable to
 the previous lusts of your ignorance; but as He who has called you is
 Holy, be ye also holy in all your conduct, as it is written, Be ye
 holy for I am Holy._
 
 
 This is an admonition to faith, and the sense is this: while such
 things are preached to you and bestowed upon you through the Gospel
 as the angels would rejoice and be desirous to behold, rely on them,
 and fix your confidence thereon with all firmness, so that it shall
 be a real faith, and not a painted or fictitious fancy or dream.
 
 
 _Gird up the loins of your mind._ Here Peter speaks of a spiritual
 girding of the mind, just as one girds his sword to the loins of his
 body. This girding has Christ also enforced, Luke xii., where he
 says, "Let your loins be girt about." In some places the Scriptures
 speak of the loins with reference to bodily lust; but here St. Peter
 speaks of the loins of the spirit. As to the body, Scripture speaks
 of the loins with reference to natural generation from the father; as
 we read, Genesis xlix., that from the loins of Judah Christ should
 come. Likewise the bodily girding of the loins is the same with
 chastity, as Isaiah says, chapter xi., "Righteousness shall be the
 girdle of his loins, and faith the girdle of his reins." That is,
 only by faith is wicked lust subdued and restrained.
 
 But this spiritual girding, whereof the Apostle speaks, means more.
 As a virgin is pure and inviolate in body, so is the soul spiritually
 inviolate through faith, by which it becomes Christ's bride. But if
 it falls from faith into false doctrine, it must be brought to shame.
 Hence Scripture uniformly calls impiety and unbelief, adultery and
 whoredom,--that is, when the soul relies on human doctrines, and thus
 lets go its hold on faith and Christ. This St. Peter here forbids,
 when he calls on us to gird up the loins of our mind; as though he
 would say, ye have now heard the Gospel and have come to believe,
 therefore see to it that ye abide therein, and do not suffer
 yourselves to be drawn away with false doctrine, so that ye shall not
 waver and run hither and thither with works.
 
 And here he adopts a peculiar mode of speech, not after the manner of
 St. Paul, where he speaks of "the loins of your mind." He calls
 _that_ mind here which we speak of as disposition; as when I say,
 "This seems to me right and as Paul speaks, so we understand it, so
 we are _disposed_." In this he refers especially to faith, and would
 say: ye have attained a correct apprehension that we must be
 justified through faith; abide in that mind; gird it up well, hold
 fast thereon, and suffer not yourselves to be torn from it; then
 shall ye stand well. For many false teachers shall come in and set up
 human doctrines that they may pervert your understanding and loose
 the girdle of your faith; wherefore be admonished, and bind it well
 to your mind.
 
 The hypocrites who rest on their own works, and hence pass a
 carefully abstemious life, are thus minded, that God must bring them
 to heaven for their works' sake; they are puffed up, become proud,
 abiding in their own opinion and blindness, like the Pharisees, Luke
 xviii. Of whom also Mary speaks, in the _Magnificat_, where she uses
 the same word that stands here in Peter, He hath scattered the proud
 in the disposition of their hearts,--that is, in their own minds.
 
 
 _Be sober._ To be sober is of service outwardly to the body, and is
 the chief work of faith. For though a man has been justified, he
 still is not secured from evil lusts; faith has indeed begun to
 subdue the flesh, but this is ever bestirring itself, and likewise
 running riot in all sorts of lusts, which would gladly break forth
 again and act after their own will. Therefore the spirit must daily
 work to restrain and subdue it, and must charge itself therewith,
 without intermission, and have a care of the flesh that it do not
 destroy faith. Therefore those persons deceive themselves, who indeed
 say they have faith, and imagining that this is enough, live
 thenceforth according to their own caprice. Where the faith is
 genuine it must control the body and hold it in check, so that it
 shall not do what it lusts after. Therefore St. Peter says that we
 should be sober.
 
 Yet he would not have us destroy the body or weaken it too much, as
 we find many do who have fasted and tortured themselves to death. St.
 Bernard, even, continued for a long time in this folly, although he
 was truly a holy man, for he mortified his body to such an extent
 that his breath was offensive and could not be endured. Yet he
 afterwards forsook it, and charged his brethren that they should not
 inflict injury upon the body; for he saw very well that he had
 rendered himself unfit to be of service to his brethren. Therefore
 St. Peter requires nothing more than that we should be sober,--that
 is, mortify the body to such an extent as to prevent its being in our
 apprehension too wanton; for he fixes no definite time how long we
 should fast, as the Pope has done, but leaves it to each,
 individually, to fast so that he remain sober and do not burden the
 body with gluttony, to the end that he remain in possession of reason
 and reflection, and consider how far it is necessary for him to hold
 the body in check. For it is utterly idle to impose one and the same
 command upon a whole congregation and church, since we are so unlike
 one to the other; one strong, another weak in body,--so that one must
 mortify it more, another less, provided the body is to remain sound
 and in the best state for exertion.
 
 But another multitude mistake here, determined that they will not
 fast, and that they may eat flesh, and herein are wrong. For these
 persons reject the Gospel also, and are unprofitable as well as the
 others; doing no more than contemn the Pope's command, unwilling to
 gird up their mind and spirit, as Peter says, leaving the body to its
 own caprice, that it may become corrupt and wanton. It is well to
 fast; but that only can be called true fasting, when we give the body
 no more food than is needful for it that it may retain its health and
 endure labor and watchfulness--that the old ass do not become too
 obstinate, and going on the ice to dance, break a bone; but go on
 subject to control, and following the spirit; not after the manner of
 those who, whenever they fast, fill themselves so full of fish and
 the best wine, that their bellies are puffed out. Thus St. Peter
 directs us to be sober, and now says further:
 
 
 _And fix your hope firmly (or with all deliberation) on the grace
 which is offered you._ The christian faith is of such a nature that
 it plants itself freely on the word of God with entire confidence,
 ventures freely thereupon, and goes joyfully onward. Therefore Peter
 would say: The loins of your mind are girt about, and your faith is
 genuine, when you venture it thus on that Word, let it cost what it
 will,--property, honor, limb, or life.
 
 Thus has he with these words in truth well described a genuine and
 unfeigned faith. It must not be a corrupt and sleepy faith, becoming
 thus only a dream, but a living and active reality, that we may with
 all deliberation devote ourselves to it and cleave to the Word, so
 that, let God permit it to go with us as it will, we will yet press
 onward through good and ill. Thus when I come to die I must venture
 promptly on Christ, lift my head boldly, and rely upon the word of
 God which cannot deceive me. Thus must faith go straight forward, in
 nothing permit itself to be led astray, and subject to scrutiny all
 that it sees, hears and feels. Such faith St. Peter requires as
 consists, not in thought or word, but in such power as this.
 
 Again, St. Peter says: Set your hope on the grace which is offered
 you. That is, ye have not deserved this great grace, but yet it is
 freely offered you; for the Gospel, which reveals this grace, is no
 invention or discovery of our own, but the Holy Spirit has sent it
 down from heaven into the world. But what is it that is offered to
 us? This, that we have already heard, that whosoever believes on
 Christ and cleaves to the Word possesses _Him_, with all the
 blessings He has to give, so that He is Lord over sin, death, the
 devil and hell, and is assured of eternal life. This treasure is
 brought to our doors and laid in our bosom without our help or
 desert, yes, beyond our expectation and without our knowledge or
 thought. Therefore the Apostle would have us venture thereon
 cheerfully, for God, who offers us such grace, will surely not
 deceive us.
 
 
 _Through the revelation of Jesus Christ._ God permits none to make
 the offer of His grace except through Christ. Therefore no man should
 attempt to approach Him apart from this Mediator, as we have already
 above heard sufficiently. For He will hear no one but him who brings
 His dear Son with him, whom He alone regards, and for His sake those
 that depend upon Him. Therefore He would have us confess the Son,
 that we are reconciled through His blood to the Father, so that we
 may approach before Him. For to this end did Christ come into the
 world, assume flesh and blood, and joined Himself to us, that He
 might obtain such grace for us with the Father. So, too, all the
 prophets and patriarchs have been kept and saved, through such faith
 on Christ. For they all have exercised faith in the promise which God
 made to Abraham, "Through thy seed shall all nations be blest."
 Therefore, as we have said, to the Jews and to the Turks, faith is of
 no avail, neither to any that rest upon their own works and would
 thereby reach heaven. So Peter says, this grace is offered you, but
 it is through the revelation of Jesus Christ (or to render it more
 clearly into our language), because that Jesus Christ has been
 revealed to you.
 
 Through the Gospel it is made known to us what Christ is, that we may
 learn of Him, moreover, that He is our Saviour. He rescues us from
 sin and death, and helps us out of every evil, reconciles us to the
 Father, and, apart from our own works, justifies and saves us.
 Whoever then does not thus confess Christ must be lost; for although
 you may know that He is the Son of God, that He died and has risen,
 and sits at the right hand of the Father,--still you have not yet
 truly known Christ, it is all of no avail to you; but you must know
 and believe that He has done it all for your sake, if your faith is
 to help you. Therefore that is a vain, senseless doctrine that has
 been hitherto preached and taught in the great schools, which have
 had no experience of this knowledge, and have only attained to
 imagine how the curse afflicted Christ our Lord, and how He sits
 above in heaven unemployed, and possesses a joy with Himself; and
 thus their hearts remain barren, so that faith cannot live in them.
 But Christ does not stand there for Himself, but He is to be preached
 that He is ours. For what necessity could there then have been that
 He should have come down to earth and have shed His blood? But since
 He has been sent into the world, as He says, John iii., "that the
 world through Him might be saved." He certainly must have fulfilled
 this mission, because He was sent from the Father. For this sending
 forth and proceeding from the Father is to be understood not only of
 the divine nature, but also of the human nature and of His ministry.
 As soon as He was baptized this began, and He has fulfilled it, for
 which end He was sent and came into the world, to wit, that He might
 preach the truth and obtain it for us, that all who believe on Him
 shall be saved. Thus has He revealed Himself, and presented Himself
 to our knowledge, and offered us grace.
 
 
 V. 14. _As obedient children._ That is, conduct yourselves as
 obedient children. Obedience in Scripture means faith. But the Pope,
 with his high schools and cloisters, has even wrested the word from
 us, and falsely rendered what is recorded in Scripture concerning
 this obedience, as the passage in I. Kings xv.: "Obedience is better
 than sacrifice." For while they perceive that obedience is highly
 praised in Scripture, they have usurped the claim of it to
 themselves, so that they might blind the people, and that men should
 think it was obedience to their stuff of which the Scripture speaks.
 Thus they would bring us away from God's word to their lies, and to
 the obedience of the devil. Whoever hears the word of God and
 believes thereon, is an obedient child of God. Therefore, whatever is
 not the word of God, tread it under your feet and pay no attention to
 it.
 
 
 _Not conformed to the former lusts of your ignorance._ That is, that
 you should not exhibit such ostentation and lead such a course of
 life as before, and that you be not found in the same condition in
 which you formerly were. Once you were godless, and lived in
 lewdness, gluttony, drunkenness, avarice, pride, anger, envy and
 hate, which was an evil, heathen-like state, and one of unbelief, and
 when you had gone into such a state like the blind, you have not
 known what you have done. Avoid now those same evil lusts. Here you
 perceive how he makes the charge against ignorance, that all evil
 proceeds therefrom. For where faith and the knowledge of Christ are
 wanting, there remains mere error and blindness, so that men are
 ignorant of what is right and wrong, insomuch that the people fall
 into every kind of vice.
 
 Thus has it been hitherto: where Christ has been kept out of sight
 and eclipsed, there error has begun to prevail; and throughout the
 world the question has torn its way, how man may be saved. This is at
 once a sign of blindness or ignorance, that the true apprehension of
 faith is lost, and no one knows anything more about it. Hence the
 world is so full of such various sects, and all are divided, for
 every one will devise for himself a way to heaven of his own. In our
 misfortune we must be continually falling deeper in our blindness,
 since we cannot help ourselves. Therefore St. Peter would say: Ye
 have already befooled yourselves enough; now desist therefrom, since
 ye have been instructed and have attained to a correct understanding.
 
 
 V. 15, 16. _But according as He that hath called you is holy, so be
 ye also holy in all your conduct, as it is written, Be ye holy for I
 am holy._ Here St. Peter quotes a passage from the Old Testament,
 Lev. xix., where God says: "Be ye holy for I am holy;" that is, since
 I am your Lord and God, and ye are my people, ye too must be as I am.
 For a faithful master secures that his people shall be like him, and
 walk in obedience, and be conformed to the master's will. As then God
 our Master is holy, so are His people holy also, and we are all holy
 if we walk in faith. Scripture says not much of the saints that have
 died, but of those who live on the earth. So David puts forth his
 claim in Ps. lxxxv.: "Lord, preserve my soul, for I am holy."
 
 But here our learned men have for once perverted the passage, and
 they say: the prophet had a particular revelation, in that he called
 himself holy; whereby they themselves confess that they do violence
 to faith, and have not the revelation of Jesus Christ, otherwise they
 would surely be sensible of it. For whoever is a Christian
 experiences within himself such a revelation; but they who do not
 experience it are not Christians. For whoever is a Christian enters
 into a participation with Christ our Lord, of all his good things.
 Since, then, Christ is holy, he must also be holy, or deny that
 Christ is holy. Hast thou been baptized? then thou hast put on the
 holy garment, which is Christ, as Paul says.
 
 The word Holy means that which is God's own, and which belongs to Him
 alone, or as we render it in Dutch (_geweiht_), consecrated. Thus,
 Peter here says: you are merely required to give God His own;
 therefore beware that ye do not suffer yourselves to be led back
 again to worldly lusts, but let God alone rule, live and work within
 you; then shall ye be holy, even as He is holy.
 
 Thus he has hitherto described the grace which is extended to us
 through the Gospel and the preaching of Jesus Christ, and has taught
 us how we should therefore conduct ourselves, namely: that we abide
 in a pure, inviolate mind of faith, since we know that no work that
 we can do or imagine, can at all help us: when such doctrine as this
 is preached, reason objects, and says, Ah! if that is true, I need
 not do any good work. And then the great heads fall foul of it, and
 from a christian condition, educe a freedom of the flesh, imagining
 they may do what they will. These St. Peter here meets, and
 anticipates them, and teaches how we are to use our christian freedom
 only towards God. For nothing more is needed but faith, to the end
 that I should give God the honor due Him, and embrace Him as my God,
 confessing that He is just, true and merciful; such faith sets us
 free from sin and all evil. If now I have made such a return to God,
 whatever time I yet live I am to live for my neighbor, so as to serve
 and help him. The greatest work that follows from faith is this: that
 with my mouth I should confess Christ, sealing that confession with
 my blood, and laying down my life for it, if so it be. Yet God does
 not need this work; only I am to perform it, that my faith may
 thereby be tried and known, so that others also may be brought to
 believe. Thereafter follow also other works, which must all be
 directed to this end, that I may thereby serve my neighbor,--all of
 which God must work in us; for it profits not that we should lead a
 carnal life and do whatever we please. Therefore St. Peter now says:
 
 
 V. 17-21. _And since ye call on the Father, who judgeth without
 respect of persons, according to every man's work, pass the time of
 your sojourning here in fear; and be aware that ye are not redeemed
 with corruptible silver or gold, from your vain conduct in the
 traditions of your fathers, but with the precious blood of Christ, as
 of an innocent and unspotted Lamb, who indeed was provided previously
 before the world began, but is revealed in these last times for you,
 who through Him believe on God, who raised Him from the dead, and
 hath given Him dominion, that your faith and hope might be in God._
 
 
 So says St. Peter: Ye have through faith hereunto attained, that ye
 are the children of God, and He is your Father. And ye have obtained
 an incorruptible inheritance in heaven, (as has been already said.)
 Thus nothing more now remains, except that the veil be taken away,
 and that be uncovered which is now concealed, for which ye are still
 to wait until ye shall behold it. Though ye are now arrived at that
 state in which ye may joyfully call God your Father, yet is He so
 righteous that he will reward every man according to his works, and
 respect not persons. Wherefore thou art not to imagine, although thou
 hast that great name so that thou art called a Christian or a child
 of God, that He will therefore continue thine if thou livest without
 fear, and thinkest that it is enough that thou dost glory in such a
 name. The world indeed judges by the person, since it does not punish
 all alike, and respects those who are friendly, rich, reputable,
 learned, wise, and powerful. But God regards nothing of this kind; it
 is all alike to him, be the person as great as he may. Thus in Egypt
 he struck the son of King Pharaoh dead, as well as the son of the
 poor miller.
 
 Therefore the Apostle would have us expect such judgment from God,
 and stand in fear, so that we do not glory in our title that we are
 Christian, and thereupon become negligent, as though he would for
 this reason pass us over more readily than others. For in this the
 Jews were formerly deceived, who boasted that they were Abraham's
 seed and God's people. Scripture makes no difference in respect to
 the flesh, but in respect to the spirit. It is true that Christ was
 to be born of Abraham's seed and that a holy people should spring
 from him, but it does not therefore follow that all who are born of
 Abraham are the children of God. He also promised that the Gentiles
 should be saved, but he has not said that he would save _all_ the
 Gentiles.
 
 But here now a question arises: When we say that God saves us alone
 by faith, without regard to works, why does St. Peter say that He
 judges not according to the person, but according to works? Answer.
 What we have taught as to faith alone justifying before God, is true
 beyond doubt, since it is so clear from Scripture that it cannot be
 denied. That which the Apostle here says, that God judges according
 to the works, is also true; but we must certainly hold, therefore,
 that where there is no faith, there can be no good work; and on the
 other hand, that there is no faith where there are no good works.
 Therefore join together faith and good works, since it is in both
 that the sum of the whole christian life consists. As you now live,
 so will it be with you, for thereafter God will judge you. Therefore,
 although God judges us according to our works, still it remains true
 that works are only the fruits of faith, by which we perceive when
 there is faith or unbelief; therefore God will sentence you from your
 works and convict you, either that you have or have not believed. So
 it is that no one can convict and judge a liar, except from his
 words. Yet it is evident that he is not made a liar by the word, but
 became a liar before he spoke the lie, for the lie must come from the
 heart into the mouth. Therefore, understand this passage thus, in the
 plainest way: that works are fruits and signs of faith, and that God
 judges men according to such fruits which must certainly follow it,
 so that it shall be openly seen whether there is faith or unbelief in
 the heart. God will not judge by this whether you are _called_ a
 Christian, or have been baptized, but will ask you, "_Art_ thou a
 Christian? then tell me where are the fruits by which you can
 evidence your faith."
 
 Therefore St. Peter goes on to say: Since ye have such a Father, who
 judges not after the person, pass the time of your pilgrimage in
 fear; that is, stand in fear before the Father, not of pain and
 punishment,--as the Christless, and even the devil, is afraid,--but
 lest He forsake you and withdraw His hand; just as a dutiful child is
 afraid lest he provoke his father, and do something that might not
 please him. Such a fear would God have within us, that we guard
 ourselves against sin, and serve our neighbor, while we live here
 upon the earth.
 
 A Christian, if he truly believes, possesses all the good things of
 God, and is God's child, as we have heard. But the time which he yet
 lives is only a pilgrimage: for the spirit is already in heaven by
 faith, through which he becomes Lord over all things. But to this end
 God permits him yet to live in the flesh, and his body to remain on
 earth, that he may help others and bring them also to heaven.
 Therefore we are to use all things on earth as a guest, who goes on
 wearily and arrives at an inn where he must tarry over night, and can
 receive nothing from it but food and lodging; yet does not say that
 the property of the inn is his. So must we also proceed in regard to
 our temporal possessions, as though they were not ours, and we
 enjoyed only so much of them as is needful to sustain the body, and
 with the rest we are to help our neighbor. Thus the christian life is
 only a night's sojourning; for we have here no abiding city, but must
 find it, where our Father is, in heaven. Therefore we should not here
 live in wantonness, but stand in fear, says St. Peter.
 
 
 V. 18. _And be aware that ye are not redeemed with corruptible silver
 or gold, from your vain conduct in the traditions of your Fathers,
 but with the precious blood of Christ._ This should draw you, he
 would say, to the fear of God, wherein ye should stand, that ye
 should remember how much it has cost that ye might be redeemed.
 Before, ye were citizens of the world, and were held in subjection to
 the devil, but now, God has rescued you from such a state, and set
 you firm in another, so that your citizenship is in heaven; but ye
 are strangers and guests upon earth. And see at how great a cost God
 has reclaimed you, and how great the treasure is, wherewith ye are
 purchased, and brought into this state, to become the children of
 God. Wherefore pass your sojourning in fear, and see to it that ye do
 not despise such redemption, and lose the noble, precious treasure.
 
 What now is the treasure wherewith ye are ransomed? Not corruptible
 gold or silver, but the precious blood of Christ the Son of God: the
 treasure is so costly and noble, that no human sense or reason can
 conceive it, insomuch that only one drop of this innocent blood were
 more than enough for the sin of all the world: yet has the Father
 been willing to dispense his grace so richly upon us, and denied
 Himself so much as to suffer Christ His Son to shed all His blood for
 us, and has bestowed upon us the whole treasure. Therefore He would
 not have us disregard such great grace, and count it as a small
 matter, but continue on our guard, so as to live in fear, that this
 treasure be not taken away from us.
 
 And here it is well to remark, that St. Peter says, ye are ransomed
 from your vain conversation in the traditions of your fathers; for he
 thereby strikes to the ground all the supports whereon we lean when
 we imagine our view must be right because it has thus been preserved
 from of old, and our forefathers all of them have so held it, among
 whom there were certainly wise and pious people. It is as much as to
 say, all which our fathers have ordained and done, was evil; what
 from them has been taught you of the worship of God, is also evil;
 for it has cost the Son of God His blood to redeem the people
 therefrom; whatever, therefore, has not been washed in this blood, is
 all poisoned and cursed by reason of the flesh. Thence it follows,
 the more a man undertakes to make himself righteous and has not
 Christ, the more only he confounds himself, and sinks deeper in
 blindness and wickedness, and condemns himself in respect to this
 precious blood.
 
 External matters, important in themselves, are even trifling in
 comparison with this, that a man should teach how we may be justified
 by works, and devise a worship of God according to our reason; for
 thereby the innocent blood is most deeply dishonored and reviled.
 
 The heathen have committed many great sins, in that they have prayed
 to the sun and moon, which they held for the true worship of God,
 though this was joined with other sins. But human justification
 (justification by human works) is mere reviling of God, and the
 greatest of all sins that a man commits. So, also, that mode of life
 wherewith the world is now busied and which it holds as the worship
 of God, and piety, is in God's sight more provoking than any other
 sin, as is the priestly and monkish order, and which while it appears
 fair before the world, is yet without faith. Therefore whoever will
 not obtain favor before God through this blood, it were better for
 him that he should never come into God's presence, for he thereby
 only the more and more dishonors His Majesty.
 
 
 V. 19. _As of an innocent and unspotted lamb._ But here St. Peter
 explains the Scripture,--for this though so short is an exceedingly
 rich Epistle,--since as soon as he had spoken of their vain course in
 the traditions of the fathers, he finds much instruction for us in
 the prophets--as in the prophet Jer. xvi.: "The heathen shall come to
 you from the end of the world, and say, our fathers have gone astray
 with lies," as though St. Peter had said, there the prophets foretold
 that ye should be redeemed from the tradition of your fathers.
 
 So when he says here, ye are redeemed by the blood of Christ, as of
 an innocent and unspotted lamb, he would again refer to the
 Scripture, and explain that which is contained in the prophets and
 Moses--as Is. liii.: "Like a lamb he is led to the slaughter." So as
 to the type, Ex. xii., of the Paschal Lamb, all this he here
 explains, and says, this lamb is Christ; and as the one of old was to
 be unspotted, so must this, also, whose blood is shed for us, be
 unspotted and innocent.
 
 
 V. 20. _Which indeed was provided previously, before the world began,
 but is revealed in these last times for you._ That is, we have not
 deserved nor even prayed this of God, that the precious blood of
 Christ should be shed for us, therefore we can glory in no respect;
 the glory belongs to none but God alone. God has promised and
 revealed or made known to us, not for any merit of ours, that which
 He from all eternity had provided and foreordained, before the world
 was made. In the prophets it is indeed promised, yet dimly and not
 openly; but now, since Christ's resurrection and the sending of the
 Holy Spirit, it is publicly preached and disseminated throughout the
 whole world.
 
 This is now the latter age (the last time), as St. Peter says,
 wherein we live--now--from the ascension of Christ until the last
 day. So the Apostles and prophets, and Christ Himself, also, call it
 the last hour; not that the last day was to come immediately after
 Christ's ascension, but because after this preaching of the Gospel of
 Christ no other should ever come; and there will be no further
 revelation or manifestation, except as this is explained and
 revealed. One revelation after another has indeed gone forth.
 Therefore God says, Ex. vi., "By my name Jehovah was I not known to
 them." For the patriarchs, although they knew God, yet at that time
 had not so clear a manifestation of Him as was afterwards put forth
 through Moses and the prophets; but now there has no more glorious or
 clear manifestation of Him come into the world than the Gospel.
 Therefore it is the last; all dispensations have run their course,
 but the present,--the last,--which is revealed to us.
 
 Besides, the time hereafter is not long to the end of the world, as
 St. Peter shows, II. Pet. iii., where he says: "One day is with the
 Lord as a thousand years, and a thousand years as one day." And so he
 would lead us by this reckoning of time, to conclude, after God's
 method, that it is the last time, and that the end approaches, but
 the time which still remains is nothing in the sight of God. The
 salvation is already revealed and completed: God permits the world to
 stand yet longer, merely that His name may be more widely honored and
 praised, although He for Himself is now fully revealed.
 
 
 V. 21. _For you, who through Him believe on God, who raised Him from
 the dead, and hath given Him dominion that your faith and hope might
 be in God._ For our sakes, he says, is the Gospel revealed. For God
 and the Lord Christ have not needed it, but have done it for our
 profit, that we might believe on them; and that, not through
 ourselves, but through Christ, who intercedes for us with the Father,
 whom He has raised from the dead, that He might be Lord over all
 things; so that whoever believes on Him possesses all His good
 things, and through Him has access to the Father. Thus we have faith
 in God, and a hope through the same faith. Faith alone must save us,
 but it must be a faith in God; for if God does not help us, then we
 are not holpen; so that it is not enough, although you had all men's
 friendship, but you must have the friendship of God, that you may
 boast that He is YOUR Father, and that you are His child, and confide
 in Him even more than in your beloved father and mother, that He will
 help you in all your troubles, and this only through the one Mediator
 and Saviour, the Lord Christ. Such faith comes not (he says) from
 human power, but God creates it in us, because Christ has merited it
 by His blood; to whom He has given glory, and whom He has seated at
 His right hand, that He, by God's power, should produce faith in us.
 
 Hitherto we have heard St. Peter admonishing us that we should gird
 up the loins of our mind, that we may remain undefiled and live in
 faith; then, also, that which meanwhile is so important, that we
 should walk in fear and never forget that we are called Christians,
 since God is a judge who respects none, but judges one like the
 other, without distinction of persons.
 
 
 V. 22-25. _And purify your souls, through obedience of the truth in
 the Spirit, to unfeigned love of the brethren, and have fervent love
 toward one another, out of pure hearts, as those who have been born
 again, not of corruptible seed but of incorruptible, namely, of the
 living word of God, which endures forever. For all flesh is as grass,
 and all the glory of man like the flower of grass. The grass
 withereth and the flower thereof falleth away, but the word of the
 Lord endureth forever; and this is the word which is preached unto
 you._
 
 
 Paul, in Gal. v., points out the fruits which follow faith. The
 fruits of the Spirit, he says, are joy, peace, long-suffering,
 kindness, goodness, faith, meekness, temperance. So St. Peter speaks
 here of the fruit of faith,--to wit, that we should purify our souls,
 through obedience to the truth in the Spirit. For where there is real
 faith it brings the body in subjection to itself, and controls the
 fleshly lust; and although it does not entirely destroy it, yet it
 makes it subject and obedient to the Spirit, and holds it in check.
 St. Paul implies the same thing when he speaks of the fruits of the
 Spirit. It is a great achievement that the Spirit should attain
 control over the flesh, and restrain the evil lust which descends to
 us from our parents: for it is not possible that we should succeed
 without grace in leading a chaste life in the married state, to say
 nothing of the unmarried.
 
 But why does he say then, purify your souls? He is well aware that
 the desires of the flesh remain with us after baptism, even to the
 grave. Therefore it is not enough that a person should refrain from
 works and remain pure outwardly, while he permits evil lusts to
 cleave to his heart, but must thereafter beware that the soul be
 pure, as well as whatever proceeds out of the heart, and that the
 soul be opposed to these wicked lusts and desires, and continually
 contend therewith, until it is free from their power.
 
 And here he adjoins an excellent provision: that we should purify our
 souls,[3] _through obedience to the truth in the Spirit_. Much has
 been preached on chastity, and many books have been composed on the
 subject. They have said, we should fast for so long a time, we should
 not eat flesh, we should not drink wine, etc., that we may be free
 from temptation. These things may perhaps have aided somewhat to that
 end, but it has not been enough, it has not subdued lust.
 
 [Footnote 3: Make them chaste.]
 
 So St. Jerome writes of himself, that he had mortified his body to
 such an extent that he had become like a Moor; still it had been of
 no avail, and he had dreamed of being at Rome at a revelry among
 harlots.
 
 St. Bernard also subjected himself to such austerities, and so
 mortified his body that it became offensive, as I said above. They
 endured severe temptation, and purposed thus to subdue it by external
 methods. But since it is external, it is only an outward plaster,
 with no inward application. So that it does not suffice to subdue
 lust.
 
 But here St. Peter has prescribed an appropriate remedy,--namely,
 obedience to truth in the Spirit, as Scripture also has done in other
 places,--as Isaiah xi.: "Faith shall be the girdle of his reins."
 This is the true plaster that girds the reins, for it must proceed
 from within outward, not from without inward. For it has penetrated
 into the flesh and blood, the marrow and other parts of the living
 system; it is not outward in the dress or clothing. Therefore it is
 not to be expected that we should subdue lust with outward things; we
 may weaken the body and destroy it with fastings and labors, but the
 evil lusts are not thereby banished; yet faith can subdue them, and
 guard them, that they shall be compelled to give the Spirit place.
 
 So likewise speaks the prophet Zachariah, ix., of the wine which
 Christ has, whereby the pure grow, and of which he gives them to
 drink. Other wine usually invites to wicked lust, but this
 wine,--that is, the Gospel,--subdues it, and makes the heart chaste.
 This is what St. Peter speaks of when any one heartily embraces the
 truth, and is obedient to it in spirit. This is the true help and the
 most powerful remedy for it, since you will find none which can still
 all evil thoughts like it; for if this enters our hearts, evil
 inclinations quickly leave; let whoever will try it, he shall find it
 true, and whoever has tried it, knows it well; but the devil lets no
 one easily attain it, and comprehend the word of God so as to delight
 in it; for he well knows how powerful it is to subdue evil lusts and
 thoughts.
 
 St. Peter, therefore, would here say, if you would remain chaste,
 then must you render obedience to the truth in the Spirit, that
 is,--we must not only read and hear the word of God, but apprehend it
 in our hearts. Therefore it is not enough that a man should preach or
 hear the Gospel once, but he must ever press after it and persevere;
 for such grace does the word possess, that the more we taste it the
 more delightful it is; although there is, throughout, one and the
 same doctrine of faith, yet it cannot be listened to too much where
 the heart is not wanton and untamed.
 
 
 _To unfeigned love of the brethren._ To what end, then, are we to
 live a chastely holy life? In order that we may be saved thereby? No!
 but in order that we may be useful to our neighbor. What am I to do
 that I may restrain my sin? I am to have obedience to the truth in
 the Spirit. But why am I to restrain it? In order that I may be of
 service to others, for I must first control my body and the flesh by
 the Spirit, and thus I can afterward be of service to others.--It
 follows further:
 
 
 _And have fervent love toward one another out of pure hearts._ The
 Apostles Peter and Paul distinguish brotherly love, and love in
 general, from one another. Brotherhood is, that Christians should
 dwell altogether as brethren, and make no distinctions between
 themselves. For since we all have a common Christ, one baptism, one
 faith, one treasure, I am no better than thou; that which thou hast,
 I have also, and I am just as rich as thou. The treasure is the same,
 except that I may have it in a better shape than thou, since I may
 have it lying in gold, but thou in a poor garment. Therefore as we
 have the grace of Christ and all spiritual blessings in common, so
 should we also hold body and life, property and honor, in common,
 that one should be of service to another in all things.
 
 Here he speaks plainly: _in unfeigned brotherly love_. The Apostles
 love to make use of the word, but have clearly perceived that were we
 called Christians and brethren universally one with another, it would
 be false, a feigned or imagined thing, and would be only hypocrisy.
 We have many brotherhoods set up in the world, but they are vain
 deceptions and corruptions, which the devil has devised and brought
 into the world, which are only antagonist to the true faith and to
 genuine brotherly love. Christ is mine as well as St. Bernard's;
 thine as well as St. Francis'; if one therefore should come to you
 and say, I shall go to heaven if I belong to this or that
 brotherhood, then tell him that he is deceived; for Christ cannot
 suffer, and will not allow any other than the common brotherhood,
 which we all have one with another; yet you come here, you fool, and
 will set up one of your own. This I will readily permit, that they be
 set up, not to help the soul, but as some one's endowment, and thus
 serve as a fund from which they who need shall be helped.
 
 Thus we all of us, as Christians, have attained a brotherhood in
 baptism, whereof no saint possesses more than I or you. For just as
 costly as that one was purchased, at the same price was I also
 purchased. God has devoted as much toward me as to the greatest
 saint, except that _he_ may have employed the treasure better, and
 may have a stronger faith than I.
 
 But love is greater than brotherhood, for it extends even to our
 enemies, and especially to those who are not worthy of love. For as
 faith performs its work where it sees nothing, so also should love
 see nothing, and there especially exercise its office where there
 appears nothing lovely, but only disaffection and hostility. Where
 there is nothing that pleases me I should the more seek to be
 pleased. And this spirit should go forth fervently, says St. Peter,
 from the whole heart, just as God loved us when we were not worthy of
 love.--Now follows further:
 
 
 _As those who have been born again._ Again we should do this, because
 we are not what we were before (he says), but have become new
 creatures. This has not come to pass through works, but is a
 consequence of the new birth. For thou canst not make the new man,
 but he must grow, or be born; as a husbandman cannot make a tree, but
 it must grow, itself, out of the earth, and as we certainly do not
 become the children of Adam, except as we are born and derive sin
 from our parents. So here it cannot come to pass through works that
 we should become the children of God, but we must also experience the
 new birth. This, therefore, is what the Apostle would say: since ye
 then have become new creatures, ye should conduct yourselves
 otherwise than ye did, and lead a new life. As ye before lived in
 hate, ye are now to walk in love--in all respects the reverse. But
 how has the new birth taken place? This, also, follows:
 
 
 V. 23. _Not of corruptible, but of incorruptible seed, even of the
 living word of God which endures for ever._ Through a seed are we
 born again, for nothing grows as we see otherwise than through seed.
 Did the old birth spring from a seed? then must the new birth also
 spring from a seed. But what is this seed? Not flesh and blood! What
 then? It is not corruptible, but an eternal word. It is, moreover,
 that whereon we live,--food and nourishment. But especially is it the
 seed whereby we are born again, as he here says.
 
 But how does this take place? After this manner: God lets the
 word--the Gospel--go forth, and the seed falls in the hearts of men,
 and wherever it fastens on the heart the Holy Spirit is present, and
 makes a new man; then the man becomes another, of other thoughts, of
 other words and works. Thus you are entirely changed. All that you
 before avoided you now seek out, and what you before sought after
 that you fly from. In respect to the birth of the body, it is the
 case that when conception takes place the seed is changed, so that it
 is seed no longer. But this is a seed which cannot be changed; it
 remains for ever; it changes me, so that I am transformed in it, and
 whatever is evil in me passes away from my nature. Therefore it is
 indeed a wonderful birth, and of extraordinary seed.--Now St. Peter
 says, further:
 
 
 V. 24, 25. _For all flesh is grass, and all the glory of man like the
 flower of grass; the grass withereth, and the flower thereof falleth
 away, but the word of the Lord endureth for ever._ This passage is
 taken from the prophet Isaiah, xl., where the prophet speaks in this
 manner: "Cry! what shall I cry? Cry thus: all flesh is grass, and all
 its glory like a flower of the field; the grass withereth and the
 flower falleth away, but the word of God endureth for ever." These
 words St. Peter introduces here; for this is, as I have said, a rich
 epistle, and well spiced with Scripture.
 
 Thus speaks the Scripture, then: _The word of God endures for ever._
 What is flesh and blood is corruptible, like the grass which is yet
 green, so that it blooms; so whatever is rich, strong, wise and fair,
 and thus is flourishing (which all belongs to the bloom), yet you
 observe its bloom wither; what was young and vigorous will become old
 and ugly; what is rich will become poor, and the like. And all must
 fall by the word of God. But this seed cannot perish.--Now Peter
 concludes:
 
 
 _This is the word which is preached unto you._ As though he would
 say, ye are not to look far in order to reach the word of God; ye
 have it before your eyes; the word is that which we preach; therewith
 may you subdue all evil lusts. You are not to seek it from afar; you
 have nothing more to do than fully to apprehend it when it is
 preached. For it is so near us that we may hear it, as Moses also
 says, in Deut. xxx.: "The word that I command you is not far from
 thee, that thou must go therefor far away; ascend into heaven or go
 beyond the sea, but it is near thee, even in thy mouth and in thy
 heart." It is indeed soon spoken and heard. But if it enters our
 hearts it cannot die or perish, and will not suffer you to perish; as
 long as you cleave to it, it will cleave to you.
 
 As when I hear that Jesus Christ died to take away my sins, and has
 purchased heaven for me, and bestows upon me all that He has, then I
 hear the Gospel; the word quickly is gone if some one preaches it,
 but if it falls into the heart and is apprehended by faith, it can
 never pass away. This truth no creature can overthrow; the clearest
 reasoning avails nothing against it; and if I too would strike the
 devil while I am in his jaws, and am able to lay hold on this, I must
 oppose him from this and abide fast by the word. Therefore he well
 says, ye must look for no other Gospel than that which we have
 preached to you.
 
 So St. Paul also says, in the first part of the Epistle to the
 Romans: "I am not ashamed of the Gospel, for it is the power of God
 which saves all that believe in it." The word is a divine and eternal
 power; for although the voice or speech is soon gone, yet the
 substance remains,--that is, the sense, the truth, which is conveyed
 by the voice. As when I put a cup to my mouth in which wine is
 contained, I swallow the wine, although I do not thrust the cup down
 my throat.
 
 So likewise is the word which the voice conveys; it falls into our
 hearts and lives, while the voice remains without and passes away.
 Therefore it is indeed a divine power; yea, it is God Himself. For
 thus He speaks to Moses, Exodus iv.: "I will be in thy mouth;" and
 Ps. lxxx.: "Open thy mouth wide, proclaim glad tidings; say thou art
 hungry, I will satisfy thee, I will presently speak to thee
 comfortable things."
 
 So, also, in John xiv., Christ says: "I am the way, the truth, and
 the life." Whoever confides in this is born of God; so that this seed
 of our Lord is itself divine. All this goes to teach us that we
 cannot be helped by works. Although the word is a small matter, and
 seems as nothing while it proceeds out of the mouth, yet is there
 such an immense power in it that it makes those who confide in it the
 children of God. John i. Thus does our salvation raise us to an
 exalted blessedness.
 
 
 This is the first chapter of this Epistle, wherein you perceive in
 what a masterly manner St. Peter preaches and treats of faith, whence
 we easily see that this Epistle is true Gospel. Now comes the second
 chapter, that will instruct us in matter of works, how we should
 conduct ourselves toward our neighbor.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 V. 1-5. _Wherefore lay aside all malice, and all guile, and
 hypocrisies, and hatred, and all evil speakings, and desire the
 sincere milk of the word, as new-born babes, that ye may grow
 thereby, if ye have besides tasted that the Lord is gracious, to whom
 ye are come as to a living stone, which indeed is rejected by men,
 but before God is elect and precious. And be ye also as living stones
 built up into a spiritual house, and a holy priesthood, to offer up
 spiritual sacrifices acceptable to God by Jesus Christ._
 
 
 Here he begins to show what the characteristic and fruit of a
 christian life should be. For we have said often enough that a
 christian life consists in two things,--faith toward God and love
 toward our neighbor. Besides, although christian faith has been given
 us, yet as long as we live many evil lusts remain in the flesh, since
 every saint must be in the flesh, but what is in the flesh cannot be
 entirely pure. Therefore St. Peter says, be ye armed, that ye may
 guard yourselves against the sins which still cleave to you, and
 strive continually against them. For the worst enemies that we have
 hide themselves in our bosoms, and in our very flesh and blood, wake,
 sleep, and live with us, like a wicked spirit which we have brought
 home with us and cannot send off. Wherefore, since through faith
 Jesus Christ is entirely yours, and ye have obtained salvation and
 all His blessings, let it be your aim henceforth to lay aside all
 wickedness, or all that is evil, and all guile, so that no one act
 toward another deceitfully or falsely; as with the world it has
 become a common expression to say, the world is full of falsehood,
 which is indeed so. But we Christians should not act with such
 deceit, but uprightly and with pure hearts, toward men as toward God,
 fairly and justly, so that none take the advantage of another in
 sale, purchase or promise, and the like.
 
 Likewise also St. Paul says to the Ephesians, ch. iv., "Lay aside
 lying, and speak truth every one with his neighbor." Truth is, that
 yea be yea, and nay, nay,--but hypocrisy, when any one represents
 himself by his outward mien as being what he is not in his thoughts.
 For solemn is the obligation that we should show ourselves to be what
 we are at heart. A Christian should so act that he could permit all
 men to see and know what he thinks in his heart. Let him, then, in
 all his walk and conduct, be anxious only to praise God, and serve
 his neighbor, and be afraid of no one; and let every one be in heart
 what he is in appearance, and not act a feigned part, whereby he
 shall make others gape with wonder.
 
 Furthermore, St. Peter says that we should lay aside hatred and evil
 speaking. Here he fitly takes up the common vices among men, in their
 intercourse with one another. This evil speaking is exceedingly
 common and injurious,--is soon done, insomuch that none of us is
 aware of it. Therefore he says, be on your guard, if ye already have
 a christian spirit, that ye may know what are the fruits of this
 spirit.
 
 
 V. 2. _And desire the sincere milk of the word, as new-born babes._
 Here he institutes a comparison, and would say,--ye are like those
 new-born babes who seek nothing but the milk: like them, striving for
 the breasts and milk, so be ye also eager for the word; endeavor for
 it, have an appetite for it, that ye may suck in the intelligible,
 sincere milk.
 
 These words are, indeed, figurative; for he did not mean literal
 milk, or literal sucking, as he does not speak of a literal birth.
 But he speaks of another milk which belongs to the mind, which is
 spiritual, which is procured by the soul, which the heart must draw
 in. It must be, moreover, sincere (or unfalsified), not as the custom
 is, to sell false wares; since there is truly strong obligation, and
 great necessity, that to the new-born and young Christian, the milk
 should be given pure, and not corrupted. But this milk is nothing but
 the Gospel, which is also the same with seed, whereby we are
 conceived and born, as we have heard above. Yet it is also the food
 which nourishes us when we arrive at maturity; it is also the harness
 wherewith we equip and clothe ourselves,--yea, it is all these in
 common. But whatever is appended to it is human doctrine, whereby the
 word of God is falsified; therefore the Holy Spirit would have it so
 that every Christian shall see to it, what he sucks for milk, and
 shall himself learn to decide in regard to all doctrines.
 
 But the breasts which yield this milk, and which the babes suck, are
 the preachers in the christian Church. As the bridegroom says to the
 bride, in Cant. iii., "Thou hast two breasts like two young roes;
 they are as though they were hung with a bundle of myrrh;" as the
 bride says, Cant. i., "My beloved is like a bundle of myrrh that lies
 continually between my breasts." That is, we should ever _preach_
 Christ. The bridegroom must resort to the breasts; so that it is
 unjust, and the milk will be corrupt, if we do not preach Christ
 alone.
 
 There is this, besides: when it is preached that Christ died for us,
 and rescued us from sin, death, and hell,--this is delightful and
 sweet, like milk; but after this, the cross also must be preached,
 that we are to suffer, as we have done; and this is a strong draught,
 it is strong wine. Therefore, Christians should have at first given
 them the weakest drink,--that is, milk. For it cannot be preached in
 its simplicity, except Christ be preached first of all; which is not
 bitter, but is mere sweet, rich grace, from which you receive yet no
 smart. This is the sincere milk of the word.
 
 But here St. Peter has supported himself by Scripture, as he is
 throughout rich from the Scriptures. In the Old Testament it is
 written, both in Exodus xxiii., and Deuteronomy xiv., "Thou shalt not
 seethe the kid in its mother's milk." For what reason did God permit
 that to be written? Of what concern to Him was it that no suckling
 should be killed while as yet it sucks milk? Because He would thereby
 give us to understand that which St. Peter here teaches; and it is as
 much as if he had said, preach gently to the young and weak
 Christians; let them be carefully fed, and thrive in the knowledge of
 Christ; burden them not with strong doctrine, for they are as yet too
 young, but after they have become strong, let them then be
 slaughtered and sacrificed on the cross.
 
 So, also, we read in Deut. xxiv., "If any one have recently taken a
 wife, then he need not go out to war for the first year, lest he
 should be slain,--but abide at home cheerfully with his wife." All
 goes to this point, that we should bear for a time with them that are
 young Christians, and proceed tenderly with them. But when they have
 grown, God brings them to the holy cross, lets them even die like
 other Christians, so that then the kid is slain.--Now follows
 further:
 
 
 V. 2, 3. _That ye may grow thereby, if ye have besides tasted that
 the Lord is gracious._ It is not enough that we should hear the
 Gospel once; we must ever be anxious for it, that we may grow. After
 faith has become strong, we may provide and eat each kind of food.
 But to those who have not heard the Gospel, this is not said; they
 know neither what is milk or what is wine. Therefore he adds, if ye
 have besides tasted that the Lord is gracious; as though he had said,
 whoever has not tasted it, to him it is not a thing of the heart, to
 him it is not sweet; but they who have tried it, who grow by the food
 and by the word, to them it tastes pleasant and is sweet.
 
 But it is said to be _tasted_, when I believe with my heart that
 Christ has given Himself for me, and has become my own, and my sin
 and misery are His, and His life also is mine. When this reaches my
 heart, then it _tastes_; for how can I but receive joy and gladness
 therefrom? I am heartily glad, as though some good friend should
 bestow on me a hundred florins. But as to him whose heart it does not
 reach, he cannot rejoice himself therewith. But they taste it best
 who lie in the straits of death, or whom an evil conscience
 oppresses; for in that case hunger is a good cook, as we say, that
 makes the food have a good relish. For the heart and conscience can
 hear nothing more soothing, when they feel their misery; after _this_
 they are anxious, they smell the provision afar off and cannot be
 satisfied. So also speaks Mary, in the _Magnificat_: "The hungry also
 has he filled with good things." But that hardened class who live in
 their own holiness, build on their own works, and feel not their sin
 and misery, they taste this not. Whoever sits at table and is hungry,
 he relishes all, readily; but to him who is previously full, nothing
 relishes, but he can only murmur at the most excellent food.
 Therefore the Apostle says, if ye have besides tasted that the Lord
 is gracious. But it is as though he had said, If ye have not tasted
 it, then I preach to you in vain.--He further says:
 
 
 V. 4. _To whom ye art come as to a living stone._ Here he falls back
 again upon the Scripture, and quotes the prophet Isaiah, chap.
 xxviii., where he also says: "Hear now what God says to you,
 scorners: ye say, we have made a league with death and with hell, and
 have made lies our trust. Therefore thus saith the Lord, I lay in the
 foundation of Zion an elect, precious corner stone, a sure
 foundation," etc.
 
 This passage Paul has also quoted, and it is an important passage of
 Scripture, for Christ is the precious head-stone which God has laid,
 on which we must be built.
 
 And observe how St. Peter quotes the expression, and shows the stone
 to signify Christ. Just as Isaiah had spoken of setting confidence
 upon Him, St. Peter likewise says, it is as much as trusting in Him;
 thus is Scripture truly explained. The builders lay the foundation
 stone where it may stand sure and firm, that it may bear up the whole
 building. So Christ, the living stone, bears up the whole building;
 and it is called the building, in order that we, bound one to
 another, may set our confidence and security on Him.
 
 
 V. 4. _Which indeed is rejected of men, but before God is elect and
 precious._ Here he brings forward a passage of the prophet David, in
 Ps. cxvii.: "The stone which the builders rejected has become the
 corner stone, and it is wonderful in our eyes." Which passage Christ
 also refers to in Mat. xxi. So Peter, in Acts iv., where he says:
 "This is the stone which ye builders rejected." Ye are builders, he
 says: for they taught the people, went about with great speeches,
 laid down many laws, but made mere work-saints and hypocrites. Then
 Christ comes and tells them, ye are hypocrites and broods of vipers;
 pronounces upon them many terrible judgments; judges them as sinners,
 and not as great saints, so that they could not endure it; they even
 reject Him--say to Him, "You are a heretic; do you caution that a man
 should not do good works? Ay! you must die." Therefore Peter says,
 here, this is the corner stone which indeed was rejected of men,
 whereon ye must be built by faith. This is now wonderful in our eyes,
 as the prophet says; it seems strange to us, and where the Spirit
 does not teach it, it is utterly incomprehensible. Therefore he says,
 in God's eyes the stone is elect, and an extremely precious stone; it
 is of great importance also that it takes away death, satisfies for
 sin, and rescues from hell, besides that it freely bestows heaven.
 
 
 V. 5. _And be ye also as living stones, built up into a spiritual
 house._ How can we build ourselves up? By the Gospel and that which
 is preached. The builders are the preachers; the Christians who hear
 the Gospel are they who are built, and the stones which are to be
 fitted on this corner stone; so that we are to repose our confidence
 on Him, and let our hearts stand and rest upon Him. I must therefore
 take heed to myself that I have the form which this stone has, for if
 I am laid upon Him by faith, then I must also bear such marks and
 fashioning as He had, and every one else with me. It is the fruit of
 faith and a mark of love, that we all be fitted one to another, and
 all thus become one building. To the same end, also, St. Paul speaks
 on this subject, although in a different manner, I. Cor. iii.: "Ye
 are the temple of God." The house of stone or wood is not His house:
 He will have a spiritual house,--that is, the christian congregation,
 wherein we are all alike, in one faith, one like the other, and all
 laid and fitted one to the other, and locked into one another by
 love, without any wickedness, deceit, hypocrisy, hatred and slanders,
 as He has said.
 
 
 _And a holy priesthood._ There he casts down the outward and bodily
 priesthood, which had existed before under the old dispensation, as
 also the outward Church, which he takes entirely away, as though he
 had said, "That outward institution with the priesthood has all
 ceased, wherefore another priesthood now begins, and another
 sacrifice is offered, even one that is entirely spiritual." We have
 had much disputing on this point, maintaining that those who are now
 called the clergy are not priests in the sight of God; and this is
 confirmed out of this passage of St. Peter. Therefore apprehend it
 well, and if one should meet you with the objection, and attempt to
 show, as some have done, that He speaks of a twofold priesthood,--of
 outward and spiritual priests,--then bid him lay aside his vain
 speeches that he may see clearly, and take nieswort[1] that he may
 clear his brains. St. Peter says, also, Ye are to build yourselves up
 into a spiritual or holy priesthood. Ask now those priests whether
 they are holy: their life clearly shows, as we see, that this
 wretched set is plunged into avarice, fornication, and all manner of
 vice. Whoever has this priesthood must certainly be holy. Whoever is
 not holy, he does not possess it. Therefore St. Peter speaks here
 only of one kind of priesthood.
 
 [Footnote 1: Aromatic snuff.]
 
 We ask further, whether he makes a distinction between spiritual and
 worldly, since the clergy are now called spiritual, and other
 Christians worldly?
 
 Yet they must confess, no thanks to them, that St. Peter here speaks
 to all those that are Christians, even to those who lay aside all
 wickedness, deceit, hypocrisy and malice, etc., and are like new-born
 children, and drink the pure milk: so that their lie must bite itself
 in their mouth, since it stands forth a thing not to be gainsaid,
 that St. Peter speaks to all that are Christians; whence it is clear
 that they lie, and that St. Peter says nothing of their priesthood,
 which they have fancied and arrogate to themselves alone; wherefore
 our bishops are nothing but Nicholas-bishops, and as is their
 priesthood so are also their laws, sacrifices and works. It might be
 an excellent play to act out in the deep night, except that under the
 mask the divine name is reviled.
 
 Therefore those alone are the holy and spiritual priesthood, who are
 true Christians and built upon this stone.
 
 For since Christ is the bridegroom, and we all of us are the bride,
 so then the bride has all which the bridegroom has, even His own
 body; for if He gives Himself to the bride, He gives Himself for what
 He is, and on the other hand the bride gives herself to Him. Now
 Christ has been anointed the high and most exalted priest by God
 Himself; has also sacrificed His own body for us, which is the office
 of the high priest; besides, He prayed on the cross for us. Again, He
 has also preached the Gospel, and taught all men to know God and
 Himself.
 
 These three offices has He also given to all of us: therefore, since
 He is a priest and we are his brethren, so all Christians have it in
 their power and charge, and an obligation rests upon them, to preach
 and to come before God, and that one should entreat for another and
 offer himself up to God; and provided that any one begin to preach
 the word of God or address it to others, he is then a priest.
 
 
 _To offer up spiritual sacrifices acceptable to God through Jesus
 Christ._ As to spiritual offerings, it is not necessary that we
 should present them to the Pope; neither is sacrifice such as it was
 in the Old Testament, when men were required to sacrifice the tenth
 of all they had. Such outward sacrifices and priesthood have all now
 ceased, and all has become new and spiritual. The priest is Christ;
 and we all, since He has sacrificed His own body, must offer up
 ourselves. Here is now fulfilled all that was typified by outward
 sacrifices in the Old Testament, since they have all passed away, and
 all of them may be said compendiously to preach the Gospel. Whoever
 preaches this exercises and carries out all that former--strikes the
 calf dead,--that is, kills the carnal mind and the old Adam. For this
 stubborn nature in flesh and blood must be slain by the Gospel; thus
 do we permit ourselves to be offered upon the cross and to die.
 Herein is exercised the true priest's office, in that we sacrifice to
 God that wicked rogue, the corrupt old dolt (of our nature); if the
 world does it not, we must do it ourselves; but it must in the end be
 all removed, whatever we have of the old Adam, as we heard above in
 the first chapter. This is the only sacrifice that pleases and is
 acceptable to God. From this you may perceive whereto our foolish and
 blind leaders have brought us, and how this text has been kept under
 the bench. Now you may say, If that is true, that we are all priests
 and ought to preach, what sort of an institution is there? must there
 then be no distinction among the people, and are the women, also, to
 be priests? Answer. In the Old Testament it is permitted to no priest
 to wear the tonsure. Not that it is wrong in itself; a person might
 very well suffer himself to be shorn if he chose, but it is reason
 that none make a distinction between himself and common
 Christians,--a thing which faith will not permit. So that they who
 are now called priests are all laymen like the others, and only some,
 for the office' sake, are selected out of the Church to preach. Thus
 there is only an outward distinction for the office' sake, inasmuch
 as one is called of the Church; but before God there is no
 difference, and some individuals are selected from the multitude, in
 order that they may bear and exercise the office which they all have;
 not that one is more elect than another. Therefore, no one should
 rise up of himself and preach in the Church, but one is to be
 selected and instituted out of the congregation, who may be removed
 when it is desirable.
 
 Yet have these men assumed a position of their own; as though
 directed by God, they have arrogated to themselves such license, that
 almost in the heart of christendom there is a greater distinction
 than that which exists between us and the Turks. When you look upon
 Christians you must observe no distinction, and you are not to say,
 this is a man or a woman, a servant or a master, old or young; as
 Paul tells us, Gal. iii.: They are all one and a purely spiritual
 people. So that all alike are priests, all alike may proclaim God's
 word, except that a woman is not to speak in the Church; but let the
 men preach, because of the command that they are to be subject to
 their husbands--as St. Paul teaches us, I. Cor. xiv.: Such order God
 permits to remain, but makes no distinction of the election. But
 where there are no men, but women only, as in the Nun's Cloisters,
 there a woman may be selected to preach.
 
 This is now the true priesthood, which consists in those three points
 as we have heard,--namely, that we sacrifice spiritually; that we
 pray for the Church; that we preach. Whoever will do this, he is a
 priest, as all are bound to be, inasmuch as they should preach the
 word, pray for the Church, and offer themselves up before God. Let
 those fools then go who call the institution of the priests
 spiritual, who yet bear no other office but just to wear the tonsure
 and to be anointed. If the being shorn and anointed makes a priest,
 then might I easily shear an ass and anoint him, so that he should be
 a priest also.
 
 Finally, St. Peter says, that we are to offer up spiritual
 sacrifices, acceptable to God through Jesus Christ. Since Christ is
 the corner stone whereon we are laid, it must be only through him
 that we are to treat with God, as we have heard sufficiently above;
 for God does not look upon my cross even though I torture myself to
 death, but he looks upon Christ through whom my works are acceptable
 before God, which otherwise would not be worth an alms of a straw's
 value. Therefore Scripture calls Christ properly a precious corner
 stone which imparts its virtue to all who through faith are built
 upon it. So, also, St. Peter teaches us in this passage how Christ is
 the living stone--what Christ is; and the figure is a fine one, since
 it is easy to understand by it how we are to believe on Christ.--It
 follows, now, further:
 
 
 V. 6-10. _Therefore it is contained in Scripture, Behold I lay in
 Zion an elect precious corner stone, and whoever believeth on Him
 shall not be put to shame. To you therefore who believe, He is
 precious, but to the unbelieving, the stone which the builders
 rejected is made a corner stone, and a stone of stumbling and a rock
 of offence, even to those that stumble at the word and believe not
 thereon, whereunto they were appointed. But ye are the chosen
 generation, the royal priesthood, the holy nation, the peculiar
 people, that ye should show forth the praise of him who has called
 you out of darkness into his wonderful light: who once were not a
 people, but are now the people of God, to whom God did not show
 mercy, but (now have obtained mercy) to whom He is now merciful._
 
 
 I have before said, that St. Peter has enriched and fortified his
 Epistle well with Scripture, just as all preachers should do, in
 order that their foundation may rest entirely on the word of God.
 Here also he introduces four or five texts, one upon another. The
 first he has taken from the prophet Isaiah, word for word, that
 Christ is a precious corner stone or foundation, and is the very
 passage which we have just treated of and somewhat explained. It is
 truly an eminent proof text of the doctrine of faith, which is to be
 laid down as a foundation when we are to preach in a place where
 Christ has not been preached before. For it must be confessed that
 Christ is the stone on which faith should be built and should stand.
 
 But that the prophet does not speak in this place of a material stone
 is evident from this, that it afterward follows, "whoever believes on
 Him shall not be made ashamed." If I am to _believe_ on Him, it must
 be a stone in a spiritual sense. For how am I to believe on stone and
 wood? Besides, He must be truly God, since, in the first commandment,
 God has forbidden that we should believe on anything else, but on Him
 only. Since then this stone is laid as a foundation on which we are
 to trust, it must be God Himself. On the other hand, He cannot be God
 alone, but must also therewith be like man, because He must be a part
 of the building, and not merely a part, but the head. If a man then
 erects a building, one stone must be like the other, that each have
 the complexion, nature, and form of the other: therefore, since we
 are built on Christ, he also must be like us, and of the same nature
 with the other stones that rest upon Him, even a real humanity as we
 all have. Thus does the Scripture, by simple and few words, express
 so great a matter, even the entire _summa_ of our faith, and in such
 brief words comprises more than any man can express.
 
 Now what this that builds us up is, I have already said--namely,
 faith, whereby we are laid on Christ, and repose our trust upon this
 stone, and thus become like Him; and then this also must follow, that
 the building must be fitted one part to the other, for the other
 stones must all be laid and placed upon this stone. That is, of
 course, that love is a fruit of faith.
 
 But why does the prophet call Him a foundation stone? For this
 reason: that no man can build a house except he lay one stone first
 as a foundation, for the other stones in the building cannot stand
 except on the foundation stone.
 
 So we must all of us rest on Christ, and confess Him for a foundation
 stone. Therefore we are not to pride ourselves that the stone must
 receive something from us, but we must receive blessing from it
 alone; for we do not bear it up, but it bears us up, and upon Him
 lies sin, death, hell, and all that we have to bear. So that all
 this--and whatever jars against us--cannot injure us if we have been
 placed on this foundation.
 
 For if we remain resting on him, and leave ourselves upon Him, we
 must then remain where He is; just as natural stones must be left on
 their foundation stone.
 
 Besides, the prophet calls Him a corner stone. The Holy Spirit has a
 way of His own of saying much in few words. Christ is a corner stone
 because he has brought Gentiles and Jews together who were at dead
 enmity one with another, and thus the Christian Church has been
 gathered of both classes, whereof the Apostle Paul writes largely.
 The Jews gloried in the law of God, and that they were God's people,
 and so despised the heathen. But now Christ has come, has taken away
 their boasting from the Jews, and called us who were Gentiles; and
 thus he has made us both one, by one faith, and He has so dealt with
 us that we both must confess that we have nothing of ourselves, but
 are all sinners, and only must expect righteousness and heaven from
 Him, and that we Gentiles may as justly claim that Christ has come to
 help us, as the Jews; wherefore He is the corner stone that joins
 both together in one, so that it becomes one building and one house.
 
 This, now, is the conclusion to which the prophet comes: Whoever
 believes on Him shall not be put to shame. When the Holy Spirit says,
 that they shall not be ashamed who believe on Christ, he gives us to
 understand what he has in view,--to wit, that he has already
 published and confirmed the sentence, that the whole world must be
 confounded and put to shame. Yet he would draw forth some out of the
 multitude, so that no one may escape the shame but he who believes on
 Christ. So Christ explains Himself in the last of Mark: "Whoever
 believes and is baptised shall be saved; but he who believes not
 shall be damned;" in which words, moreover, He accords with the
 prophets. So that Peter said well in the first chapter, that the
 prophets sought out the time, and diligently inquired after the
 salvation and concerning the future grace that was previously
 promised. So now Christ is to be preached, that He it is who has
 rescued us from this shame into which we were all plunged.
 
 Now let any one come forward who chooses, and exalt free-will, and
 defend human ability. Though you should commingle together all human
 works and doctrines, and whatever springs from man, you have enough
 in this single passage to overthrow it all, so that it must all fall
 like dry leaves from the tree.
 
 For it is doomed that whatever does not rest upon this stone, _that_
 is already lost. He does not suffer that you should attain anything
 by works. With such simplicity speaks forth the Spirit and the Divine
 Majesty, that it despises no one, yet with such authority that it
 overcomes all things. Who, then, will set himself against it, or who
 will not be terrified by it? Therefore God would have us entirely
 despair as it regards ourselves, and appropriate to ourselves only
 the blessings which _He_ has, and build on that foundation which no
 creature can overthrow; so that no one should trust in his own
 righteousness, but on Christ's righteousness, and on all that Christ
 has. But what is it to rest upon His righteousness? Nothing else but
 that I should despond in regard to myself, and think with myself,--my
 righteousness, my truth, must go to pieces, and what is built
 thereon; while His righteousness, His truth, His life, and all the
 blessings which He has, are eternal. There lies the foundation on
 which I stand; whatever stands not on this foundation, will all
 necessarily fall. But he who lets himself fall back on this, he alone
 shall not be put to shame, and shall rest safe, so that no violence
 shall ever injure him at all. Therefore Christ must be not only a
 stone, but God will lay Him also as a foundation on which we should
 confide. God has said this, who cannot lie.
 
 Now this stone is not subservient to itself, but suffers itself to be
 trodden on, and buried in the earth so that it cannot be seen, and
 the other stones lie upon it and can be seen. Wherefore, it is given
 to us that we should partake of Him, and rest upon Him, and believe
 that what He has shall all be ours, as what He has procured; that He
 has done it for us; so that I may say,--this is my own property and
 treasure, over which my conscience can exult.--But St. Peter says
 further:
 
 
 V. 7, 8. _To you, therefore, who believe, He is precious; but to the
 unbelieving, the stone which the builders rejected has become a
 corner stone, and a stone of stumbling and a rock of offence._ This
 exceedingly precious stone, says Peter, is indeed, to some, precious
 and honorable. But on the other hand, it is also to many not
 precious, but despised, and a stone of stumbling. How is this? The
 Scripture ascribes to it a twofold aspect, inasmuch as there are some
 that believe thereon, and, on the other hand, many who do not believe
 thereon. To them who believe, is He precious; so that my heart must
 be glad if I repose my confidence and trust upon Him. Therefore he
 says,--to you that believe, He is precious; that is, ye are greatly
 dependent on Him; for although He in Himself is precious and
 excellent, yet this may be of no service or help to me. Therefore He
 must be precious to us for this reason, because He gives us so many
 precious blessings; as an excellently precious stone, which does not
 retain its virtue in itself, but breaks forth and imparts all its
 powers, so that I have all that _it_ is.
 
 But the unbelieving hold Him not as such a precious stone, but reject
 Him, and stumble upon Him, because He is not pleasing to them, but
 obnoxious and hateful; although He is yet delightful in Himself.
 These are not only the great, openly avowed sinners, but much more
 those great saints who rest on their free-will, on their own works
 and righteousness, who must stumble on this stone and run upon it.
 Now God pronounces the sentence, that they who rest thereon, without
 works, come to be justified through faith alone; but these do not
 attain thereto, for they would be justified by their own
 righteousness, as St. Paul says, Rom. x.
 
 Therefore this has become the stone, says St. Peter, which the
 builders rejected. And here he dovetails the Scriptures into one
 another, but explains the passage which he quoted above from the
 cxvii. Psalm, "The stone which the builders rejected, has become the
 corner stone." Who the builders are, I have sufficiently shown: even
 those who taught, preached the law, and would justify men by works;
 who agree with Christians, as summer and winter with each other;
 therefore those preachers who preach of works, reject this stone.
 
 Besides this, he quotes another passage still, from the prophet
 Isaiah, chap. viii. The prophet has there described that which was to
 take place, as St. Peter here does, and speaks thus: "The Lord shall
 be your fear, who shall be to you for holiness; but for a stone of
 stumbling and a rock of offence shall He be, to both houses of
 Israel." This is the sense of the prophet: The Lord shall be to you
 for holiness,--that is, He shall be hallowed in your hearts; ye are
 to have no other sanctification, neither this nor that, except as ye
 believe. To the others, He shall be a stone whereon they shall
 stumble and be offended.
 
 But what, now, is this offence and perplexity, or stumbling? This is
 it: when we preach Christ, and say, See why this stone is laid for a
 foundation, that you, wholly desponding and despairing in yourself,
 might hold your works and your own righteousness as a merely
 condemned thing, and might place your confidence upon Him alone, and
 believe, that Christ's righteousness may become your righteousness;
 when those men hear this, they revolt at it, stumble and vex
 themselves, and say, "How? do you mean to say that virginity, and
 masses, and the like good works, amount to nothing? It is the devil
 that bids you say that!" For they cannot understand, in this matter,
 that their claims are not good; they think they have done well in the
 sight of God; quote passages to prove it from the Scriptures, and
 say, God has commanded that we should perform good works. If we
 dispute this, they begin and cry out, "Heretic! Heretic!" "Fire!
 Fire!" So that they cannot endure this stone, and they stumble
 against it. So inconsistent are they one with another, that upon this
 stone they must stumble; as Christ says, Matt. xxi., "Have ye not
 read in Scripture,--the stone which the builders rejected is become
 the corner stone? (and it follows) and whosoever shall fall upon this
 stone shall be dashed in pieces, and on whom it shall fall, it shall
 grind him to powder." Therefore, do as ye will, ye cannot dishonor
 the stone; it is laid, and it will continue to lie. Whoever, then,
 will run upon it and dash himself thereon, must necessarily be
 broken.
 
 That is the stumbling and the vexation whereof Scripture has much to
 say. Thus the Jews stumble to this day against this stone,--and this
 will not cease until the last day shall come; then shall this stone
 fall upon all the unbelieving and grind them to powder. Wherefore,
 although Christ is such an elect, precious stone, He must yet be
 called a stone of offence and stumbling, by no fault of His. And just
 as the Jews did, we continue to do at the present day; for as they
 gloried in the name of God, that they were God's people, so it is the
 case now, that men, under the name of Christ and the christian
 church, deny Christ, and reject the precious stone. He has come that
 they might reject their works; but this is a thing they cannot
 suffer, and they reject Him. Therefore it follows:
 
 
 _Who stumble at the word and believe not thereon, whereunto they were
 appointed._ If they are told that their works are not good and are of
 no avail before God, they cannot and will not hear it. Now God has
 laid down Christ as a foundation, whereon they should have been
 placed, and through Him have obtained complete salvation; and He has
 caused Him to be preached throughout the whole world, that they,
 through the proclamation of the Gospel, might be grounded on Him. Yet
 would they not receive Him, but rejected Him, and remain in their own
 nature and works; for if they suffered themselves to rest upon Him,
 then would their own honor, riches, and power fall, insomuch that
 they would never rise again.--St. Peter says further:
 
 
 V. 9. _But ye are the chosen generation, the royal priesthood, the
 holy nation, the peculiar people._ There he gives Christians a true
 title, and has quoted this passage from Moses, Deut. vii., where he
 says to the Jews, "Ye are a holy people to the Lord your God, and the
 Lord your God has chosen you as his peculiar people out of all the
 nations that are on the earth." So, Ex. xix., he says: "Ye shall be
 my possession before all peoples, and shall be to me a kingdom of
 priests and a holy people." There you see where Peter's words are
 from. As I have said before, so I say again, that it should be
 understood how Scripture is wont to speak of priests. Let no one be
 troubled as to those whom the people _call_ priests; let every one
 call them as he pleases, but abide thou by the pure word of God, and
 what _this_ calls priests do thou call priests also. We could well
 endure it that those should call themselves priests whom the bishops
 and the Pope consecrate, and let them call themselves as they will,
 only see to it that they do not call themselves priests of God, for
 they cannot quote a word from Scripture in proof of it.
 
 But should they claim that in this passage he speaks of them, answer
 them as I have instructed you above, and ask them to whom St. Peter
 is here speaking,--so shall they of necessity be made ashamed; for it
 is certainly clear and plain enough that he speaks to the whole
 congregation, to all Christians, in that he says, ye are the chosen
 generation and the holy people, since he has hitherto spoken of none
 but of those who are built upon this stone and believe. Therefore it
 must follow, that whoever does not believe is no priest. If they say,
 then, "Ah! we must explain the passage just as the holy fathers have
 interpreted it;" then do you say, Let the fathers and teachers,
 whoever they may be, explain as they will, yet St. Peter, who has
 received greater testimony from God than they, besides being more
 ancient, tells me so and so, therefore I will hold with him. The
 passage, moreover, needs no gloss, for he speaks in express words of
 those that believe. Now those are not the only believers who are
 anointed and wear the tonsure; therefore we will readily grant them
 that they call themselves by this name, for the question is not what
 they permit themselves to do; but the dispute is here,--whether they
 are styled priests in Scripture, and whether God calls them by this
 name. There may be some selected out of the Church, who are its
 officers and ministers, and appointed to this end, that they should
 preach in the Church and administer the sacraments; but we are all
 priests before God if we are Christians. For since we are built upon
 this stone, which is our high priest before God, we must also possess
 all that He has.
 
 Therefore I would be glad to find this word priests becoming as
 common as it is for us to be called Christians. For it is all the
 same,--priest, baptized, Christian. As little as I would suffer that
 those who are anointed and shorn should call Christians un-baptized,
 so little would I endure that they only should be regarded as
 priests. Yet have they arrogated it entirely to themselves. So too
 they have named _that_ the church which the Pope and his cardinals
 rule over, but Scripture refutes this. Therefore mark this well, that
 you may know how to establish the distinction as to how God names us
 priests, and how men call themselves such.
 
 For we must yet again state that this word _priest_ should become as
 common as the word Christian. For to be a priest belongs not to an
 office that is external, it is only such a service as has to do with
 God's presence.
 
 So we conclude that we are all kings. Priests and kings are all
 spiritual names, as Christians, saints, the Church. And just as you
 are not called a Christian because you have much gold or wealth, but
 because you are built upon this stone and believe on Christ, so you
 are not called a priest because you wear a tonsure or long robe, but
 for this reason, that you come into God's presence. Likewise you are
 not a king because you wear a gold crown, and have many lands and
 people subject to you, but because you are lord over all things,
 death, sin, and hell. For you are as really a king as Christ is a
 king, if you believe on Him. Still He is not a king as the kings of
 this world are, wears no crown of gold, rides forth with no great
 splendor and large equipage. But He is a king over all kings,--one
 who has authority over all things, and at whose feet all must lie. As
 He is a lord, so also am I a lord; for what He possesses that have I
 also.
 
 But perhaps some one may object. St. Peter says here, also, that
 Christians are kings, while we have it before our eyes that they are
 not all kings, so that this passage is not to be understood as though
 He spoke of all in the Church. For whoever may be a Christian, he
 certainly is not a king in France or a priest at Rome. But when I ask
 whether the King of France is also a king in the sight of God, this
 he passes over, for God will not judge by the crown. On earth,
 indeed, and before the world, he is indeed a king, but when death
 comes then his kingdom is gone, for then he must lie at the feet of
 those that believe. We are speaking of an eternal kingdom and
 priesthood, inasmuch as every one who believes is in truth a king
 before God; but who does not know that we are not all shorn and
 anointed priests? But because those men have been anointed, they are
 not therefore priests in the sight of God, just as they are not kings
 before God because they have been crowned. Crowned kings and anointed
 priests are of the world, and are made by men; the Pope may make as
 many such priests as he chooses, but far be it that he should make
 one a priest before God, for these God himself will make.
 
 Therefore, when St. Peter says here, "ye are the royal priesthood,"
 it is as much as though he had said, "ye are Christians." Would you
 now know what sort of a title, and authority, and glory, Christians
 have: you learn it here, that they are kings and priests, and a
 chosen people.--But what this priest's office is, follows after:
 
 
 _That ye should show forth the praises[2] of Him that hath called you
 out of darkness into His wonderful light._ This belongs to the office
 of a priest, that he be a messenger of God, and receive from God
 himself the command to preach His word. The praises, (says St.
 Peter,) that is, the wonderful work that God has performed in you, in
 that he brought you out of darkness into light, you are to
 proclaim,--which is the office of the High Priest. And this is the
 way in which your preaching is to be discharged, that one brother
 proclaim to another the powerful work of God: how ye have been
 ransomed from sin, death, hell, and all evil, by Him, and have been
 called to eternal life. Thus shall you also instruct others how they
 may come also to the same light. For your whole duty is discharged in
 this, that you confess what God has done for you; and then let this
 be your chief aim, that you may make this known openly, and call
 every one to the light, whereto ye have been called. Where you see
 people who are ignorant, you are to direct and teach them as you have
 learned, namely, how a man may be saved through the virtue and power
 of God, and pass from darkness to light.
 
 [Footnote 2: In the German, _tugend_ or virtue.]
 
 And here you observe that St. Peter plainly says, that there is only
 one single light, and concludes that all our reason, however
 sharp-sighted it is, is mere darkness; for although reason may count
 one, two, three, and also discern what is black or white, great or
 small, and judge outwardly of other matters, still it cannot
 understand what faith is. Herein it is stark blind, and if all men
 should put their shrewdness together, they could not understand a
 letter of this divine wisdom. Therefore St. Peter speaks here of
 another light, that is truly wonderful; and tells us earnestly, all
 alike, that we are all in darkness and blindness if God hath not
 called us to his true light.
 
 Experience teaches us this, also. For when it is preached that we
 cannot come before God by our works, but must have a mediator, who
 may come into God's presence and may reconcile us to him, reason must
 confess that she never could have known such a thing; so that if she
 would understand it she must have another light and knowledge.
 Therefore all that is not of God's word and faith is darkness. For
 here reason gropes like a blind man,--is ever changing from this to
 that, and knows not what it does. But if we speak in this manner to
 the worldly, learned, or wise, they begin to cry out and bluster
 against it. Therefore St. Peter is a bold Apostle indeed, in that he
 dares make that darkness that all the world calls light.
 
 So we see that the first and most eminent office which we as
 Christians are to discharge is, that we should make known the praise
 of God. What then are the praiseworthy things and the noble deeds
 which God has put forth? They are, as we have often said, that
 Christ, through the power of God, has wounded death, chained hell,
 subdued sin and brought us to eternal life: these are praises so
 great that by no man are they possibly to be conceived; we can only
 be silent. Therefore it is of no avail that to us Christians human
 doctrines should be preached, but we should be taught of such a power
 as subdues the devil, sin and death. And here St. Peter has once more
 brought together many proof-texts, and it is throughout common with
 him thus to heap passage on passage, for all the prophets speak of
 this, that God's name and honor, and his arm or power should be
 honored and extolled, and that he would perform such a work that the
 whole world would sing and speak of it. Of this are the prophets in
 all places full. On this same St. Peter here expatiates. Besides,
 they have spoken much of light and darkness, that we must be
 enlightened with God's light, thereby showing that all human reason
 is darkness.--St. Peter says, further:
 
 
 V. 10. _Ye who once were not a people, but are now a people of God,
 to whom God did not show mercy, but to whom he is now merciful._ This
 passage is found written in the prophet Hosea, chap. ii., and St.
 Paul has also quoted it in Rom. ix.: "I will make those to be called
 my people, who were not my people." The import of all is this:
 Almighty God chose his people Israel as a peculiar people, and
 manifested his great power in their behalf, and gave them many
 prophets, and performed many wonderful works toward them, that He
 from that people might permit Christ to become man; and for the
 children's sake has it all taken place. Therefore they are called in
 Scripture the people of God. But the prophets have extended this
 further, and said that this election should be more comprehensive,
 and should even include the Gentiles. Therefore St. Peter says here,
 ye are now the people of God, who once were not the people of God.
 Hence it is evident that he wrote the epistle to the Gentiles and not
 to the Jews. Thereby he shows that the passage out of the prophet has
 been now fulfilled--that they are now a holy people--they have the
 property, priesthood, kingdom, and all which Christ has, if they
 believe.--It follows further, in Peter:
 
 
 V. 11-12. _Dearly beloved, I admonish you as strangers and pilgrims,
 abstain from fleshly lusts which war against the soul, and lead an
 honest life among the Gentiles, so that they, if they slander you as
 evildoers, may see your good works, and praise God when it shall come
 to that day._
 
 
 St. Peter here uses a somewhat different mode of speech from St.
 Paul, who would not speak in the same manner, as we shall hear: for
 every Apostle has his own way of speaking, just as each prophet has
 also. He has hitherto been firmly laying down his foundation of the
 christian faith, which may serve as his text. Now he proceeds and
 teaches how we should conduct ourselves toward all men. This is the
 true method of preaching, that faith should be first set forth,--what
 it does, and what its power and nature are, even that it gives fully
 to us everything that is necessary to holiness and salvation,--that
 we can do nothing except by faith, and through this we have all which
 God has. God has thus proceeded with us and given to us all that is
 His, and has Himself become our own, so that we have, through faith,
 all things that are good and needful for us. What then are we to do?
 Are we to live in indolence? It were far better that we should die,
 though we had all. But while we live here we should act in our
 neighbor's behalf, and give ourselves to him for his own, as God hath
 given Himself to us. Thus faith saves us, but love leads us to give
 to our neighbor whenever we have enough to give. That is, faith
 receives from God; love gives to our neighbor. This matter is spoken
 of in few words, yet much may easily be preached thereon, and it may
 be further extended than it has here been by St. Peter.
 
 This is now the sense of the Apostle, when he says, Dear brethren, I
 admonish you as strangers and as pilgrims. Since, then, you are one
 with Christ, form one household, and His goods are yours, your injury
 is His injury, and He takes as His own all that you possess;
 therefore you are to follow after Him, and conduct yourselves as
 those who are no more citizens of the world. For your possessions lie
 not upon the earth, but in heaven; and though you have already lost
 all temporal good, you still have Christ, who is more than all else.
 The devil is the prince of this world and rules it; his citizens are
 the people of this world; therefore, since you are not of the world,
 act as a stranger in an inn, who has not his possessions with him,
 but procures food, and gives his gold for it. For here it is only a
 sojourning, where we cannot tarry, but must travel further. Therefore
 we should use worldly blessings no more than is needful for health
 and appetite, and therewith leave and go to another land. We are
 citizens in heaven; on earth we are pilgrims and guests.
 
 
 _Abstain from fleshly lusts that war against the soul._ I will not
 determine, here, whether St. Peter speaks of outward impurity,--or as
 St. Paul's language is, all that is called carnal,--whatever man does
 without faith, while he is in the body and a carnal life. I hold,
 indeed, that St. Peter had a somewhat different mode of speech, yet
 do not think that he uses the word soul, as St. Paul does, for
 spirit; but St. Peter has given in more to the common Greek word,
 than St. Paul. Yet much stress is not to be laid upon this: let it be
 understood of all kinds of lusts, or all kinds of carnal desire or
 impurity. But this at least he would teach us, that no saint on earth
 can be fully perfect and holy. Yet the high schools have even trodden
 the passage under their feet, nor do they understand it; they think
 it is said only of sinners, as though the saints had no more wicked
 lusts remaining. But whoever will study carefully into the
 Scriptures, must note a distinction, because the prophets sometimes
 speak of the saints in an obvious way, as though they were perfectly
 holy in every respect; while on the other hand they speak also of
 them as having evil lusts and being troubled with sins.
 
 In regard to those two positions, those persons cannot see their way.
 Understand, then, that Christians are divided into two parts,--into
 an inward nature which is faith, and an outward which is the flesh.
 If we look upon a Christian as it respects faith, then he is pure and
 entirely holy; for the word of God has nothing impure in it, and
 wherever it enters the heart that depends upon it, it will make that
 also pure. Because, in respect to faith all things are perfect:
 according to that, we are kings and priests and the people of God, as
 was said above. But since faith exists in the flesh, and while we yet
 live on earth we feel at times evil dispositions, as impatience and
 fear of death, &c.
 
 These are all the fault of the old man, for faith is not yet mature,
 has not attained full control over the flesh.
 
 This you may understand from the parable in the Gospel, Luke x., of
 the man who went down from Jerusalem to Jericho and fell among
 thieves, who beat him and left him lying half dead, whom the
 Samaritan afterward took up, and bound up his wounds, and took care
 of him, and saw to it that he should be nursed. There you perceive
 that this man, since he is to be attended upon, is not sick unto
 death,--his life is safe; all that is wanting is, that he should be
 restored to health. Life is there, but he is not completely restored,
 for he lies yet in the hands of the physicians and must yet give
 himself up to be healed. So it is with us as respects the Lord Jesus
 Christ; we are assured of Eternal life, yet we have not complete
 health; something of the old Adam still remains in the flesh.
 
 Similar also is the parable in the xiii. of Matthew, where Christ
 says, the kingdom of heaven is like leaven which a woman takes and
 mingles in the meal until it is leavened throughout. When the meal is
 made into dough, the leaven is all in it, but it has not penetrated
 and worked through it, but the meal lies working, until it is
 leavened throughout, and no more leaven need be added. Thus though
 you have what you should have, through faith, whereby you apprehend
 the word of God, yet it has not penetrated throughout, wherefore it
 must continue to work till you are entirely renewed. In this way you
 are to discriminate in regard to the Scriptures, and not mangle them
 as the Papists do.
 
 Therefore I say, when you read in Scripture of the Saints, that they
 were perfect, understand it thus: that they as to faith were entirely
 pure and without sin, but the flesh still remained, that could not
 have been entirely holy. Therefore Christians desire and pray that
 the body or the flesh be mortified, that it may be entirely pure.
 This those who teach otherwise have neither experienced nor relished,
 which leads them to speak just as they imagine and conceive by
 reason; wherefore they must err. In regard to this, those great
 saints who have written and taught much, have greatly stumbled.
 Origen has not a word of it in his books. Jerome never understood it.
 Augustine, had he not been driven to contend with the Pelagians,
 would have understood it as little. When they speak of the saints,
 they extol them as highly as if they were something different from,
 and better than, other Christians: certainly as though they had not
 felt the power of the flesh and complained thereof as well as we.
 
 Therefore St. Peter says here, as ye would be pure and have complete
 sanctification, continue to contend with your evil lusts. So also
 Christ says in the Gospel of John xiii.: "Whoever is washed, must
 also wash his feet;" it is not enough that his head and hands be
 clean, therefore he would yet have them wash their feet.
 
 But what does St. Peter mean, in that he says, refrain from the lusts
 that war against the soul? This is what he would say: You are not to
 imagine that you can succeed by sports and sleep. Sin is indeed taken
 away by faith, but you have still the flesh which is impulsive and
 inconsiderate; therefore take good care, that ye overcome it. By
 strong effort must it be; you are to constrain and subdue lust, and
 the greater your faith is, the greater will the conflict be.
 Therefore you should be prepared and armed, and should contend
 therewith without intermission. For they will assault you in
 multitudes, and would take you captive.
 
 Hence St. Paul says, also, Rom. vii.: "I have a desire toward the law
 of God after the inward man; but I find another law in my members,
 which opposes itself to the law in my spirit, and takes me captive,
 that I cannot do as I would,"--as though he had said, I fight indeed
 against it, but it will not finally yield. Therefore I would gladly
 be free, but in spite of my wishing it, it may not come to pass. What
 then am I to do? "Wretched man that I am, (says he,) who shall
 deliver me from the body of this death." In this same manner, also,
 all the saints cry out. But those people who are without faith, the
 devil leads in such a way that he permits them only to enter on
 sinful courses, to follow him and make no opposition. But as to the
 others, he thinks, I have already taken them captive by unbelief. I
 will permit them then to go so far only, as to do no great sin and
 have no great assault and be kept from swearing and knavery.
 
 But believers have always opposition enough,--they must ever stand in
 the (attitude of) struggle. Those who are without faith and have not
 the Spirit, do not feel this, nor do they have such an experience;
 they break away and follow their wicked lusts; but as soon as the
 Spirit and faith enter our hearts, we become so weak that we think we
 cannot beat down the least imaginations and sparks (of temptation),
 and see nothing but sin in ourselves, from the crown of the head,
 even to the foot. For before we believed, we walked according to our
 own lusts, but now the Spirit has come and would purify us, and there
 arises a conflict. Here the devil, the flesh, and the world, oppose
 themselves to faith; whereof the prophets complain, here and there,
 in the Scriptures.
 
 Wherefore St. Peter here means, that the strife does not take place
 in sinners, but in believers, and gives us an encouragement, inasmuch
 as when we are on our guard against wicked lusts, we are repelling
 them. If thou, then, hast wicked thoughts, thou shouldest not on this
 account despair; only be on thy guard, that thou be not taken
 prisoner of them. Our teachers have proposed to relieve the matter in
 this way (by directing,) that men should torture themselves until
 they had no more evil thoughts, that they might be at last bold and
 free. But you are to understand, if you are a Christian, that you
 must experience all kinds of opposition and wicked dispositions in
 the flesh. For wherever there is faith, there come a hundred evil
 thoughts, a hundred strugglings more than before; only see to it that
 you act the man, and not suffer yourself to be taken captive; and
 continue to resist, and say, I will not, I will not. For we must here
 confess, that the case is much like that of an ill-matched couple,
 who are continually complaining of one another, and what one will do
 the other will not.
 
 That may yet be called a truly christian life that is never at
 perfect rest, and has not so far attained as to feel no sin, provided
 that sin be felt, indeed, but not favored. Thus we are to fast, pray,
 labor, to subdue and suppress lust. So that you are not to imagine
 that you are to become such a saint as these fools speak of. While
 flesh and blood continue, so long sin remains; wherefore it is ever
 to be struggled against. Whoever has not learned this by his own
 experience, must not boast that he is a Christian.
 
 Hitherto we have been taught, that when we made confession, or joined
 ourselves to some spiritual institution, we were at once pure and
 needed no longer to contend with sin. They have said, moreover, that
 baptism purifies and makes holy, so that nothing evil remains in the
 person. Then they have thought, "now will I have a pleasing rest,"
 but the devil has come and assaulted them worse than before.
 Therefore understand the thing well, though you confess and permit
 yourselves to receive absolution, you must do even as the soldier,
 who in battle runs upon the points (of the javelins); whenever the
 critical moment approaches, and the conflict rages, compelling him to
 strike right bravely, as if to repel outrage, then he must draw out
 his sword and lay about him; but while the strife threatens only, so
 long must there be untiring vigilance. So, although you have been
 baptized, be on your guard, inasmuch as you are not safe for an hour
 from the devil and from sin, even though you think you will have no
 more assaults.
 
 Therefore a christian life is nothing else but a conflict and
 encampment, as the Scripture says; and therefore the Lord our God is
 called the Lord of Sabaoth,--that is, a Lord over the hosts. So also,
 _Dominus potens in praelio_--the Lord mighty in battle.
 
 And thereby He shows how powerful He is, that He permits His people
 to be exposed in the conflict and rush upon the points (of the
 javelins). Yet so that while the trumpets are ever sounding He is
 ever observant, (saying) beware here, beware there; thrust here,
 strike there. Besides, it is a lasting conflict, in which you are to
 do all that you can, so that you may strike down the devil by the
 word of God. We must therefore ever make resistance, and call on God
 for help, and despond of all human powers.--Now follows further:
 
 
 V. 12. _And lead an honest life, that those who have slandered you,
 as evil-doers, may see your good works and praise God._ Mark now what
 an excellent order St. Peter has observed. He has already taught us
 what we should do in order to subdue the flesh with all its lusts.
 Now he teaches us again why this should be. Why should I subdue my
 flesh? that I may be saved? No, but that I may lead an honest life
 before the world. For this honest life does not justify us, but we
 must first be justified and believe before we attempt to lead an
 honest (pious) life. But as to outward conduct, this I am not to
 direct to my own profit, but that the unbelieving may thereby be
 reformed and attracted, that they through us may come to Christ;
 which is a true mark of love, though they slander and asperse us, and
 hold us as the worst wretches. Therefore we should exhibit such an
 excellent course of action, that men shall be compelled to say,
 Certainly they cannot be blamed.
 
 We read that when the emperors reigned, and persecuted the
 Christians, no fault could be found with the latter, except that they
 called on Christ and considered Him as God. So Pliny writes in his
 letter to Trajan, the Emperor, that he knew of no wrong that the
 Christians did, except that they came together every morning, early,
 and sang songs of praise in order that they might honor their Christ
 and receive the sacrament; besides this, none could bring any charge
 against them. Therefore St. Peter says: Ye must endure to have men
 asperse you as evil-doers, and for this reason you are to lead such a
 life that you shall do no man injury, and in this manner you shall
 bring about their reformation. _Till that day arrive;_ that is, ye
 must endure it as long as men reproach you, till all shall be set
 forth and revealed, so that it shall be seen how unjust they have
 been toward you, and that they must glorify God on your account. So
 St. Peter continues:
 
 
 V. 13-17. _Submit yourself to every ordinance of man for the Lord's
 sake, whether to the king as supreme, or to governors, as those that
 are sent by Him for the punishment of evil-doers and to the praise of
 those that do well. For this is the will of God, that by well-doing
 ye may silence the ignorance of foolish men. As free, and not as
 though ye had your freedom as a cover of wickedness, but as the
 servants of God. Be respectful toward every man. Love the
 brotherhood; fear God; honor the king._
 
 
 In such a beautiful order does St. Peter proceed, and teaches us how
 we should conduct ourselves in all things. Hitherto he has spoken in
 a general manner of the conduct that belongs to every condition. Now
 he begins to teach how we should act toward civil magistracy. For
 since he had said enough as to the first matter, of our duty to God
 and ourselves, he now adds how we are to conduct toward all men.
 
 And now he would say, in the first place, and before all else, since
 ye have done all that was necessary that ye might attain to a true
 faith and hold your body in subjection, let this now be your first
 business, to obey the magistracy.
 
 This, which I have here rendered in the Dutch, every _ordinance_ of
 man, is in the Greek [Greek: ktiois], and in Latin _creatura_. This
 thing has not been understood by our learned men. The Dutch language
 well expresses what the word means, where it is said, we are to obey
 what the ruler enacts (creates). So he uses the word here as though
 he said, what the magistracy enacts (creates) yield obedience to. For
 to enact (create) is to lay down a command and ordinance; it is a
 human creation. But they have hence inferred that _creatura_ means an
 ox or an ass, as the Pope also speaks of it. If this were Peter's
 meaning, then we should need to become subject even to a slave. But
 he here means a human ordinance, law or command,--and what they enact
 we are to do.
 
 What God makes, authorizes, and requires,--that is His ordinance, as
 that we should believe. So, also, that is a human and secular
 creation which is constituted by commands, as external government
 must be. To this we are to be subject. Therefore understand the
 expression as meaning, _creatura humana, quod creat et condit homo_
 (what man makes and constructs).
 
 
 _For the Lord's sake._ We are not bound to obedience to the sovereign
 power for its own sake, he says, but for God's sake, whose children
 we are; and we should be drawn to this, not that we may thereby
 acquire a merit,--for what I do for God's sake, I must freely do as
 an act of service: moreover, I would do from mere cheerfulness, what
 His heart desires. But why should we be obedient to the magistracy
 for God's sake? Because it is God's will that evil-doers should be
 punished, and those that do well should be protected, that there may
 be concord in the world. So we should demand that there be civil
 peace, which God requires; but the majority are unbelieving, so that
 He has enacted and ordained, in order that the world might not go to
 anarchy, that the magistracy should bear the sword and restrain the
 wicked, in order that if they are not disposed to be at peace, they
 may be compelled to it. This He executes through the magistracy, so
 that the world may be ruled to the good of all. Whence you see that
 if there were none wicked, there would be no need of magistracy;
 wherefore he says, _to the punishment of evil-doers, and to the
 praise of those that do well_. The just should have the honor of it
 when they do right, since they exalt and crown worldly magistracy,
 insomuch that others may take example from them,--not that any one
 may thereby merit any thing before God. Such is Paul's language,
 also, in Rom. xiii.: "The power is not established to the fear of
 those that do well, but for the evil; therefore, if thou wouldst not
 be afraid of the power, do well."
 
 
 V. 15. _For this is the will of God, that by well-doing ye should
 silence the ignorance of foolish men._ In these words St. Peter
 silences those vain babblers who glory in their christian name, and
 prevents them from coming forward and saying, Since faith is
 sufficient for a Christian, and works do not justify, what is then
 the necessity of being subject to the civil power, and paying tribute
 and taxes? And he tells them thus, that although we have no need of
 it, we ought readily to do it to please God, so that the mouth of
 those enemies of God who asperse us may be stopped, and they be able
 to bring up nothing against us, and be compelled to say that we are
 honest, obedient people. So we read of many saints, that they were
 summoned to war, under heathen rulers, and slew the enemy, yet were
 subject and obedient (to those that summoned them), as we Christians
 are bound to be to the magistracies, although it is now maintained
 that we could not be Christians if we lived among the Turks.
 
 Now you may perhaps say here, But still Christ has commanded that we
 should not resist evil, but if any one strike us on one cheek we are
 to turn the other also; how, then, can we strike and execute others?
 Answer: the heathen formerly objected in like manner to the
 Christians, and said, if such and such should come to pass, your
 government must be suppressed. But we reply, it is true that
 Christians for themselves should not resist the evil, neither should
 they revenge themselves when they are injured, but endure injustice
 and violence, so that they cannot be severe even toward those who do
 not believe. But the magistracy of the sword is not thereby
 forbidden; for although honest Christians have no need of the sword
 and law (since they live so that none can complain of them, do no man
 wrong, but treat every one kindly and cheerfully, endure all that is
 done to them), yet the sword must be borne on account of the
 unchristian, that these, when they injure others, may be punished, so
 that the general peace shall be preserved and the just be protected.
 Thus God has provided another rule, that they who would not of
 themselves be restrained from evil, might be so compelled by the
 power that they should do no injury. Therefore God has established
 magistracy for the sake of the unbelieving, insomuch that even
 christian men might exercise the power of the sword, and come under
 obligation thereby to serve their neighbor and restrain the bad, so
 that the good might remain in peace among them. And still the command
 of Christ abides in force, that we are not to resist evil. So that a
 Christian, although he bears the sword, does not use it for his own
 sake nor to revenge himself, but only for others; and, moreover, this
 is a mark of christian love, that with the sword we support and
 defend the whole Church, and not suffer it to be injured. Christ
 teaches those only who, while they believe and love, obey also. But
 the greater multitude in the world, as it does not believe, obeys not
 the command. Therefore they must be ruled as unchristian, and their
 caprice be put under restraint; for if their power was suffered to
 obtain the upper hand, no one could stand before them.
 
 Thus there are two kinds of government in the world, as there are
 also two kinds of people,--namely, believers and unbelievers.
 Christians yield themselves to the control of God's word; they have
 no need of civil government for their own sake. But the unchristian
 portion require another government, even the civil sword, since they
 will not be controlled by the word of God. Yet if all were Christians
 and followed the Gospel, there would be no more necessity or use for
 the civil sword and the exercising of authority; for if there were no
 evil-doers there certainly could be no punishment. But since it is
 not to be expected that all of us should be righteous, Christ has
 ordained magistracy for the wicked, that they may rule as they must
 be ruled. But the righteous He keeps for Himself, and rules them by
 His mere word.
 
 Therefore christian government is not opposed to the civil, nor is
 civil magistracy opposed to Christ. Civil government does not cease
 by Christ's ministry; but it is an outward thing, like all other
 offices and institutions. And as these exist distinct from Christ's
 office, so that an unbeliever may exercise them just as well as a
 Christian, so it is also with the exercise of the civil sword, since
 it neither makes men Christian or unchristian. But of this I have
 spoken often enough elsewhere.--It follows, further:
 
 
 V. 16. _As free, and not as though ye had your freedom as a cover for
 wickedness, but as the servants of God._ This is said especially for
 us, who have heard of christian freedom, that we may not go on and
 abuse this freedom; that is to say, under the name and show of
 christian freedom do all that we lust after, so that from this
 freedom shall spring up a shamelessness and carnal recklessness, as
 we see even now takes place, and had begun even in the Apostle's
 times, as is easily discovered from the epistles of St. Peter and St.
 Paul, when men did what the great multitude do now. We have now,
 again, through the grace of God, come to the knowledge of the truth,
 and we know that that is mere deception which popes, bishops, priests
 and monks have hitherto taught, laid down and enforced; and our
 conscience is enlightened and has become free from human ordinances
 and from all the control which they have had over us, so that we are
 no longer obliged to do what they have commanded under peril of our
 salvation. To this freedom we must now hold fast, and never suffer
 ourselves to be robbed of it; but for this very reason we should be
 carefully on our guard not to make this freedom a cloak of our shame.
 
 The Pope has here proceeded unrighteously in aiming to force and
 oppress men by his laws. For among a christian people there should
 and can be no compulsion, and if the attempt is made to bind the
 conscience by outward laws, faith and the christian life are soon
 suppressed; for Christ's are only to be led and ruled in the spirit,
 since they know that they, through faith, already have all whereby
 they are to be saved, and stand in need of nothing more to this end,
 and henceforth are under obligation to do nothing more than good to
 their neighbor, helping him with all they have, as Christ has helped
 them, and moreover that all the works which they do should be done
 freely and without constraint, and flow forth from willing and happy
 hearts; this is grateful to God, exalts and praises Him for the
 blessings that have been received. So St. Paul writes (I. Tim. i.),
 That for the righteous no law is made, for they do freely of
 themselves, and unsummoned, all that God requires.
 
 Since now such enforcement of human doctrines is rejected and
 christian freedom is preached, the reckless spirits that are without
 faith coincide with it, and thereby would become good Christians,
 inasmuch as they keep not the law of the Pope, claiming this freedom
 which relieves them from obligation to it; and yet they observe not
 that which true christian freedom requires,--namely, to do good to
 their neighbor with cheerfulness, and irrespective of its being
 commanded, as real Christians do. Thus they make christian freedom
 just a cloak, under which they work only their shame, and disgrace
 the noble name and title of that freedom which Christians have.
 
 This St. Peter here forbids, for this is what he would say: although
 ye are free in all external matters (if ye are Christians), and
 should not be forced by laws to subject yourselves to the control of
 worldly rule, since for the righteous no law is given (as we have
 said), yet ye should do it of yourselves, voluntarily and without
 compulsion,--not that ye must be held in obedience by necessity, but
 in order to please God, and for the advantage of your neighbor. This
 also Christ did Himself, as we read in Matt. xvii., that he paid
 tribute when he need not have done it, but was free, and Lord over
 all things. So likewise he subjected Himself to Pilate and permitted
 Himself to be judged, while as yet He said to him, "You could have
 had no power or authority over me except it had been given you from
 above," in which words He gave confirmation to the authority to which
 He meanwhile subjected Himself, that He might please His Father.
 
 Whence you see that that multitude has no claim to christian freedom
 who will do nothing, neither what the world nor what God requires,
 but abide in their insubordinate disposition, although they make
 their boast of the Gospel.
 
 Though we be free from all laws, we must yet have respect to weak and
 ignorant Christians, since this is a work of love. Hence Paul says,
 Rom. xiii.: "Owe no man anything, but to love one another." Therefore
 let him who would glory in his freedom, do first what a Christian
 should do: let him first do good to his neighbor, and thereafter make
 use of his freedom in such a way as this. When the Pope, or even any
 one, imposes his authority upon him, and would force him to obey it,
 let him say, "My good fellow, Pope, I will not do it, for this
 reason, because you choose to make a command of it, and invade my
 freedom."[3] For we are to live in freedom as the servants of God,
 (so St. Peter here says,) not as servants of man. Yet in case any one
 desires that of me in which I can be of service to him, I will
 cheerfully do it out of good will, not scrupulous whether it have
 been commanded or not, but for the sake of brotherly love, and
 because God also requires that I should do good to my neighbor. Thus
 I will not be forced to become subject to worldly princes and lords,
 but what I do I will do of my own self,--not because they command me,
 but for service to my neighbor. Of this kind should all our works be,
 springing forth from affection and love, and all having respect to
 our neighbor, since we have no need on our own account to do good
 works. It further follows:
 
 [Footnote 3: In the views presented by Luther, in this connection, we
 have a distinct enunciation of the noble principles of the
 Non-conformists of England--principles which were familiar to the
 great Reformers and to the early Puritans. They could not admit any
 human authority to invade the domain of divine legislation. To a
 conformity in externals which did not require them to admit the right
 of the civil magistracy to enact laws for the church, they were
 willing to yield as far as was necessary to edification. But when the
 command issued from the ruling power, in usurpation of the
 prerogative of the great and only head of the church, and obedience
 was to be construed as acquiescence in such usurpation, their reply
 was kindred in tone and spirit to that which Luther here puts into
 the lips of a christian man in answer to Papal arrogance.]
 
 
 V. 17. _Be respectful toward every man._ This is not a command, but a
 faithful admonition. We are each of us assuredly under obligation,
 although we are free; for this freedom does not extend to evil-doing,
 but merely to well-doing. Now we have repeatedly said, that every
 Christian, through faith, attains to all that Christ has Himself, and
 is, moreover, His brother. Therefore, as I give all honor to the Lord
 Christ, so also should I do toward my neighbor. This consists, not
 merely in outward behavior, that I should bow to him, and things of
 that sort, but much more: that inwardly in my heart I should highly
 regard him, as I also highly regard Christ. We are the temple of God;
 as St. Paul says, I. Cor. iii., for the spirit of God dwelleth in us.
 If now we bend the knee before a place of worship, or a picture of
 the holy cross, should we not do it far more before a living temple
 of God?[4]
 
 [Footnote 4: One is reminded here of the noble reply of that English
 martyr, John Bradford, when he was required to bow down to a wooden
 cross. Stretching out his arms, as he stood before his tyrannical
 judges, he exclaimed, "Why, here is a living cross, and God made it;
 yet would I not worship even that."]
 
 So St. Paul teaches us, also, in Romans xii., that each should esteem
 the other better than himself, so that each should place himself
 below the other, and give him the preference. The gifts of God are
 manifold and various, so that one is in a more exalted position than
 another; but no one knows who is most exalted in the sight of God,
 for he may easily raise hereafter to the highest place one who here
 occupies the meanest position. Therefore should every one, however
 high he be exalted, humble himself and honor his neighbor.
 
 
 V. 17. _Love the brotherhood._ I have spoken above of the distinction
 which the Apostles make between love in general, and brotherly love.
 We are required even to love our enemies: this is common christian
 love. But brotherly love is, that we Christians should love one
 another as brethren, and communicate one to another, since we all
 alike have our blessings from God. This is the love which St. Peter
 here particularly requires.
 
 
 _Fear God; honor the King._ He says not that we are to have great
 regard of lords and kings, but still that we are to honor them,
 although they are heathen, as Christ also did, and those prophets who
 fell at the feet of the King of Babylon. But here perhaps you will
 say, "hence, you perceive, that we are to be obedient to the Pope and
 are to fall at his feet." Answer: Certainly, if the Pope attains to
 temporal power and conducts himself like another sovereign, we are to
 be obedient even to him, as when he speaks after this manner: "I
 forbid you wearing the cowl or tonsure; besides, on this day you are
 to fast, not that it is of any avail before God, nor is necessary to
 salvation, but because I, as a temporal ruler, require it." But in
 case he goes further, and says, "This, in God's place, I forbid your
 doing--this you are also to receive as though it came from God
 Himself, and are to observe it under pain of excommunication and
 deadly sin," then you are to say, "Pardon, my master, I will not do
 it."
 
 To the power we are to be subject, and are to do what it bids, while
 it does not bind the conscience and only forbids in respect to
 outward things, even though it should proceed tyrannically towards
 us; for "if any one will take away thy coat, let him take thy cloak
 also." But if it invade the spiritual domain and constrain the
 conscience, over which God only must preside and rule, we certainly
 should not obey it, but rather even slip our neck out from under it.
 
 Temporal authority and government extend no further than to matters
 which are external and respect the body. But the Pope not only
 arrogates this to himself, but would seize upon the spiritual also;
 and yet he has nothing of it, for his commands have respect to
 nothing but clothing, food, canonries and prebends--a matter which
 belongs neither to civil nor spiritual control. For how is the world
 benefitted by these things? Besides, it is impious to make sins and
 good works to consist in such matters, where they do not belong;
 wherefore Christ cannot suffer it. But civil government he can well
 tolerate, since it does not encumber itself with the matters of sins
 and good works, and spiritual concerns, but has to do with other
 things,--as protecting and fortifying cities, building bridges,
 imposing taxes, gathering tribute, extending protection, guarding the
 land and the people, and punishing the evil-doers. Therefore, to such
 a prince, while he imposes no ordinance upon the conscience, a
 Christian may readily render obedience, and he does it
 unconstrainedly, since he is free of all things.
 
 Therefore, whenever an emperor or a prince asks me what my faith is,
 I shall tell him, not because he commands it, but because I am under
 obligation to confess my faith publicly before every man. But in case
 he should go further, and command me that I should believe thus or
 so, then I shall tell him: "My good sir, do you attend to your civil
 government; you have no authority to intrude on God's domain,
 wherefore I certainly shall not obey you. You cannot yourself
 tolerate invasion into your sovereignty: if any one against your will
 passes the limits, you shoot him down with musketry. Do you imagine
 then that God will tolerate it, that you should thrust Him from His
 throne and seat yourself in His place?" St. Peter calls civil
 magistracy only a human ordinance. So that they (the magistracy) have
 no power to step into God's ordinances and to make laws against
 faith. But of this we have said enough. It follows now, further, in
 the Epistle:
 
 
 V. 18-20. _Servants, be subject to your masters with all fear, not
 only to the good and gentle, but also to the froward. For this is
 thankworthy, when any one, for conscience toward God, endures grief,
 suffering wrongfully. For what praise is it, if ye endure buffeting
 for your faults? But if ye for well-doing suffer and endure, this is
 well-pleasing with God._
 
 
 St. Peter has thus far taught us how we should be subject to the
 civil power, and give it honor. Wherefore we have stated how far its
 authority extends, that it may not arrogate to itself in matters
 which pertain to faith. This is said of magistracy in general, and is
 a doctrine for every one (to receive). But now he proceeds, and
 speaks of such power as does not extend itself over a community, but
 only over individuals. Here he first teaches how domestic servants
 should conduct themselves toward their masters, and this is the
 substance of it:
 
 Household servants are just as really Christians as any other class,
 if, like others, they have the word, faith, baptism, and all such
 blessings; so that, before God, they are just as great and high as
 others. But, as to their outward state and before the world, there is
 a difference, since they occupy a lower station, and must serve
 others. Wherefore, since they are called into this state by God, they
 should let it be their business to be subject to their masters, and
 have respect and esteem for them. Of this the prophet David gives a
 fine illustration, and shows how they are to serve, Ps. cxxiii.: "As
 the eyes of the servant to the hand of his master, and as the maiden
 looks to the hand of her mistress, so are our eyes directed to
 Thee."--That is, servants and maidens should perform with humility
 and care what the master or the mistress requires. This is the will
 of God, and therefore it should cheerfully be done. Of this you may
 be certain and assured, that it pleases God and is acceptable to Him,
 when you do this in faith. Wherefore, since these are the best works
 which you can do, you are not to run far after others. What your
 master or mistress commands you, that God Himself has commanded you.
 It is not a human command, although it is made by man. So that you
 are not to scruple as to the master you have, be he good or bad,
 kind, or irritable and froward; but think thus, let the master be as
 he will, I will serve him, and do it to honor God, since He requires
 it of me, and since my Master, Christ, became a servant for my sake.
 
 This is the true doctrine which is ever to be urged, which now, alas!
 is buried in silence and is lost. But no one regards it except those
 who are Christians, for the Gospel preaches only to those who receive
 it. Wherefore, if you will be a child of God, purpose in your heart
 to render such service as Christ Himself bids you. As also St. Paul
 teaches, in Eph. vi., "Ye servants, be obedient to your masters that
 are upon earth, as to the Lord Christ; not with eye-service only, as
 men-pleasers, but as servants of Christ; that ye obey from the heart,
 for God's sake, with cheerfulness." Consider that ye serve the Lord,
 and not man. So, also, he says, in Col. iii., "For ye serve the Lord
 Christ." Ah! if the popes, monks and nuns were in such a state as
 this, how would they thank God and rejoice! For none of them can say,
 God has commanded me to celebrate mass, sing matins, pray the seven
 times, and the like,--for Scripture does not contain a word on the
 subject; so that if they are asked whether they are confident and
 assured that their state pleases God, then they say, No! But if you
 ask a little maid-servant why she scours the key or milks the cow,
 she can say, I know that the thing I do pleases God, for I have God's
 word and commandment. This is a great blessing, and a precious
 treasure of which no one is worthy. A prince should thank God for it,
 if he might do the same. It is true, he can do in his state what God
 requires,--namely, punish the wicked. But when, and how rarely, does
 it happen that he can discharge such a duty aright! But in this state
 it is all so ordered, that you may know that when you do what you are
 bidden, it pleases God.
 
 God does not look to the work, how small it is; but to the heart that
 serves him in such little things. But in this it happens as in other
 matters: what God has commanded, no one performs; what men enact and
 God does not ordain, every one complies with.
 
 But, say you, "Ah! how is this? What if I have such a strange and
 irritable master as no one can thankfully serve, for many such may be
 found?" To this St. Peter answers, "Are you a Christian and desirous
 to please God, you are not to inquire as to that matter how strange
 and froward your master is, but ever direct your eyes to this, and
 observe what God bids you." So that you are to reason after this
 manner: "I will in this way serve my Master, Christ, who requires it
 of me that I be subject to this froward master." If God should
 command you to wash the devil's feet, or those of the merest wretch,
 you are to do it; and this work would be just as much a good work as
 the highest of all, when God calls you to it. Therefore you are to
 have no regard to the person, but only to what God requires; and in
 this case the least work is more to be preferred in God's sight, when
 rightly performed, than all the popes' and monks' works in one heap.
 But whomsoever this does not incite, that it is God's will, and is
 acceptable to Him, the work will be of no avail to him. Better than
 it is you cannot make it, worse than it is you cannot leave it. And
 therefore this is to be done _with all fear_, (as St. Peter says,)
 that it may be rightly proceeded with, since it is not the command of
 men, but of God.
 
 And here St. Peter speaks particularly of servants according to the
 circumstances of those times, when they were held as property, such
 as are to be found still in some places, and are exchanged like
 cattle, who are ill-treated and beaten of their masters; and the
 masters had such license that they were not punished although they
 put their servants to death. Wherefore it became necessary that the
 Apostles should carefully admonish and comfort such servants, that
 they might serve their hard masters, and endure it, though suffering
 and injustice were imposed upon them. Whoever is a Christian must
 also bear a cross; and the more you suffer wrongfully, the better it
 is for you; wherefore you should receive such a cross from God
 cheerfully, and thank Him for it. This is the right kind of
 suffering, that is well-pleasing to God. For what a thing would it
 be, that you should be cruelly beaten and had well deserved it, yet
 would glory in your cross? Therefore St. Peter says: When ye suffer
 and are patient for well-doing, this is well-pleasing with God,--that
 is to say, acceptable and exceedingly grateful in the sight of God,
 and a real service of God. Observe, here are those truly precious
 good works described, which we are to do; and we like fools have
 trodden this doctrine under foot, and have invented and devised other
 works; so that we should lift up our hands, thank God, and rejoice
 that we at length have such knowledge.--Now it follows, further:
 
 
 V. 21-25. _For thereunto are ye called, since Christ also hath
 suffered for us, and left us an example, that ye should follow in His
 steps; who did no sin, and in His mouth was found no guile; who, when
 He was reviled reviled not again, when He suffered He threatened not,
 but committed it to Him that judgeth righteously; who Himself hath
 borne our sins in His own body on the tree, that we might be without
 sin and live to righteousness; by whose stripes ye are healed. For ye
 were as sheep going astray, but ye are now returned to the Shepherd
 and Bishop of your souls._
 
 
 Thus it is, as we have said, that the servant should resolve in his
 heart and be induced cheerfully to do and suffer what is required of
 him, since his Master, Christ, has done so much for him. Hence they
 are to reason thus: since my Master has thus become my servant,--a
 thing to which He was not obliged,--and has given up body and life
 for me, why should not I serve Him in return? He was perfectly holy
 and without sin, yet has He so greatly humbled Himself, and has shed
 His blood for me, and has died that He might take away my sin. How
 then shall not I also endure somewhat if it pleases Him? Whoever
 reflects on this must be a stone if it does not move him; for when
 the Master goes forward and steps in the mire, the servant should
 cheerfully follow Him.
 
 Therefore St. Peter says, _Hereunto are ye called._ Whereto? That ye
 should suffer wrongfully like Christ. As though he would say, If you
 will follow after Christ you must not dispute and complain greatly,
 though you are unjustly treated, but endure the same and count it for
 the best, since Christ has suffered all without guilt of His own. He
 did not even defend His integrity when He stood before the judges. So
 that you are to neglect this right, and only say, _Deo gratias_, for
 this am I called that I should endure injustice; for what should I
 complain of when my master did not complain?
 
 And here St. Peter has quoted some words from the prophet
 Isaiah,--namely, these, Chap. liii.: "Who did no sin, neither was
 deceit found in His mouth," also, "by whose stripes ye are healed."
 Christ was so pure that not an evil word was ever on His tongue. He
 deserved that all should fall at His feet, and bear Him in their
 hands. Although He had power and the right to avenge Himself, he yet
 permitted Himself to be derided, insulted, reviled, and besides all,
 put to death, and never opened His mouth. Why then should you not
 endure it also, when you are nothing but sin? You ought to praise and
 thank God that you are counted worthy of this,--that you should be
 like Christ; and not murmur nor be impatient though you be made to
 suffer, since the Master did not revile nor threaten in return, but
 even prayed for his enemies.
 
 But perhaps you say, "How? Am I then to give that which is due to
 those who treat me unjustly, and say of them, they have done well?"
 Answer. No! but this is what you are to say: I will from my heart
 cheerfully suffer it, although I have not deserved it, and you do me
 injustice for my Master's sake, who also has endured injustice for
 me. You are to commit it to God, who is a righteous judge, and will
 richly reward it, just as Christ committed it to His Heavenly Father.
 _He who has borne our sins in His own body_ (says St. Peter); that
 is, he has not suffered for himself, but for our welfare. We who have
 crucified him by our sins, are far from that condition ourselves.
 Wherefore, if you are a pious Christian, you are to follow after your
 Master, and mourn for those who make you suffer, and even pray for
 them, that God will not punish them; for they do far more injury to
 their own souls than to your body. If you lay this to heart, you
 shall easily forget your suffering, and suffer cheerfully. For we are
 to consider that we were once in such a Christless state as those,
 but have now, through Christ, been converted, as St. Peter concludes
 and says:
 
 
 V. 25. _Ye were like sheep going astray, but ye are now returned to
 the Shepherd and Bishop of your Souls._ This, however, is a passage
 from the prophet Isaiah, who speaks after this manner: "We have all
 gone astray like sheep, and every one has gone in his own way." But
 now have we obtained a Shepherd, says St. Peter. The Son of God has
 come for our sake, that He might be our Shepherd and Bishop; He gives
 us His Spirit, feeds us, and leads us by His word, so that we now
 know how we are helped. Therefore, when you confess that through Him
 your sins have been taken away, then you become His sheep, and He
 becomes your herdsman. Just as He is thy Bishop, so art thou His
 Soul. This is, then, the comfort which all Christians have. Thus we
 have two chapters in this Epistle, wherein St. Peter has in the first
 place taught the true faith, then the true works of love, and has
 spoken of two kinds of works. First, what we all generally should
 practice toward civil government, then how domestics should conduct
 themselves toward their masters. And what St. Peter says here of
 servants, extends, also, to some other persons,--namely, artizans,
 day-laborers, and all kinds of hired servants. Now he goes on to
 teach us further, how husband and wife should conduct themselves
 toward one another in a christian manner.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 V. 1-6. _Likewise ye wives be in subjection to your own husbands, so
 that they who do not obey the word may be won without the word,
 through the conduct of their wives, when they see your chaste
 conversation coupled with fear. Whose adorning is not outward, in the
 braiding of the hair, and the wearing of gold, or the putting on of
 apparel, but the hidden man of the heart, in that which is
 incorruptible, a meek and quiet spirit, which is, in the sight of
 God, of great price. For thus also did the holy women of old adorn
 themselves, who hoped in God and were subject to their husbands. As
 Sarah was obedient to Abraham and called him master, whose daughters
 ye are, if ye do well, and fear not of any terror._
 
 
 Here St. Peter speaks especially of wives, who at that time had
 heathen and unbelieving husbands. And on the other hand, he speaks of
 believing husbands who had heathen wives; for it often occurred while
 the Apostles preached the Gospel among the heathen, that one was a
 Christian and the other not. If it _then_ was commanded that the wife
 should be subject to the husband, how much more must it be so ordered
 now. Therefore it is the woman's duty, St. Peter would say, to be
 subject to her husband, although he is a heathen and unbeliever; and
 he gives the reason why this should be so.
 
 
 V. 1, 2. _So that even they who believe not on the word, may be won
 without the word, through their wives' conduct, when they see your
 chaste conversation coupled with fear._ That is, when a man sees that
 his wife proceeds and conducts herself with such propriety, then he
 is drawn toward obedience, and holds the state of a Christian to be
 one that is truly blessed. And although it is not directed to women
 to preach, yet should they so conduct themselves in their demeanor
 and conversation that they may thereby attract their husbands toward
 obedience:--as we read of the mother of St. Augustine, who converted
 her husband, who had been a heathen, before his death, and so
 afterward her son Augustine. Still it is an external thing, which, as
 it is not to be performed in order to our justification for
 obedience, does not save you, for you may perhaps find an obedient
 wife who is yet unbelieving, but you should do it for this reason,
 that you may thereby benefit your husband. For thus has God ordained
 (Gen. iii.) when He says to the woman, "thou shalt submit thyself to
 thy husband, and he shall be thy master," which is also the
 punishment which he has imposed on the woman. But such is (I say) the
 outward conduct--that which belongs to the body, not to the spirit.
 
 But this is a great thing, to know what works we should do to please
 God. By this rule are we to run, just as we see that the world runs,
 by the rule that it has falsely devised. It is a high, noble blessing
 which a wife may have when she so conducts herself as to be subject
 to her husband, inasmuch as she is saved, and her works please God;
 what can be a happier experience? Therefore whoever wishes to be a
 christian wife is to reason after this manner: I will not pay regard
 as to what sort of a husband I have, whether he be a heathen or a
 Jew, righteous or wicked; but to this I will pay regard, to the fact
 that God has placed me in the marriage state, and I will be subject
 and obedient to my husband. Then all her works are precious if she
 stands in such obedience.
 
 But where the influence of attraction is not employed, nothing else
 will avail:--for you never will succeed by blows in making a wife
 pious and submissive. If you strike one devil out you will strike two
 devils in, as they say. Oh! if people who are in the marriage state
 knew this, how uprightly would they walk; but no one does cheerfully
 what God has commanded, but all run after that which men have
 invented. This command God has wished to be so carefully observed,
 that he authorized husbands to make void the vows which their wives
 made if they were displeasing to them, as we read in Num. xxx., so
 that all might go on peacefully and quietly at home. This is one
 point. Now the Apostle directs further how a woman should conduct
 herself toward other people.
 
 
 V. 3, 4. _Whose adorning, let it not be outward, in braiding of the
 hair, and wearing of gold, and putting on of apparel, but of the
 hidden man of the heart, in that which is incorruptible, a meek and
 quiet spirit, which in God's sight is precious._ This treasure, which
 is internal, should be possessed not only by the wife, but by the
 husband. But here possibly some one might ask whether that which St.
 Peter here says of ornament is commanded or not. We read of Esther,
 that she wore a golden crown and precious ornaments, decking herself
 as a queen. So also of Judith. But near by it is recorded, that she
 despised the ornament and wore it from necessity. So that we say this
 much, that a woman should be so disposed as not to care for this
 adorning; yet, inasmuch as people convinced on the subject of
 ornament, cease not from the use of it, such is their habit and
 nature,--a christian wife should despise it. But if the husband
 requires it, or there is a reasonable cause for her adorning herself,
 it may well be done. But in such a way should she be adorned, as St.
 Peter here says, as to be inwardly attired in a meek and quiet
 spirit. You are vainly enough adorned when you are adorned for your
 husband; Christ will not suffer it that you should be adorned to
 please others, and that you should be called a vain harlot. Therefore
 you are to see to it, that you wear about in your heart the hidden
 treasure and precious adorning, in that which is incorruptible, as
 St. Peter says, and lead a pure, merciful, temperate life.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: "Here the Apostle pulls off from christian women their
 vain outside ornaments; but is not this a wrong to spoil all their
 dressing and fineness? No; he doth this only to send them to a better
 wardrobe: there is much profit in the change."--_Leighton on I.
 Peter._]
 
 It is good evidence that there is not much of the spirit there, where
 so much is expended on ornaments, but this will be trodden under foot
 where faith and the spirit are present, and these will say, like
 Queen Esther, "Lord, thou knowest that I regard with aversion the
 crown which I wear on my head, and that I am compelled thus to adorn
 myself. If this was not required to be done of me out of love to my
 king, I would much rather trample it under foot." Where the wife is
 of such a disposition, she will so much the more please her husband.
 Therefore they are to take this into consideration (says St. Peter),
 that they adorn the inward man, where there is to be a quiet spirit,
 one that cannot be ruffled; not only that they do not run into
 excess, so that they may be kept from confusion and shame, but, his
 meaning is, that they should beware that the soul remain unruffled,
 and in the true faith, and that this be not forsaken. Thus is derived
 a heart such as does not break forth and busy itself as to how it
 shall appear before the world. Such a heart is a precious thing in
 the sight of God. If a woman were to adorn herself with pure gold,
 precious stones and pearls, even to her feet, it would be exceedingly
 splendid. But you cannot attach so much to a woman that it shall be
 preferable to that superior ornament of the soul which is precious in
 God's sight. Gold and fine stones are precious in the world's esteem,
 but before God they are an ill-savor. But she is truly and nobly
 adorned in the sight of God, who goes forth with a meek and quiet
 spirit; and since God himself accounts it precious, it must be a
 noble thing. A christian soul has all that Christ has, for faith, as
 we have said, brings us all the blessings of Christ in common. This
 is a great and precious treasure, and such an ornament as none can
 sufficiently prize. God himself makes much account of it. Thus the
 husband should withdraw and dissuade the wife from ornament, so long
 as she is inclined to it. When a christian wife gives ear and
 reflects, and determines thus, "I will not care for ornament, since
 God does not regard it,--but if I must wear it, I will do it to
 please my husband," then is she truly adorned and attired in spirit.
 Hereupon St. Peter now gives us an example of holy women, that he may
 draw wives to a christian conduct, and says:
 
 
 V. 5. _For after this manner did holy women of old time adorn
 themselves, who set their hope on God and were subject to their
 husbands, as Sarah obeyed Abraham and called him lord._ As these
 women adorned themselves, he would say, so do ye also, as Sarah was
 obedient to her husband Abraham, and called him her lord. So
 Scripture speaks, Gen. xviii., where the Angel came to Abraham and
 said, Within a year shall Sarah have a son; then she laughed and
 spoke thus: "Now that I am old, and my Lord is old also, shall I yet
 have pleasure?" This passage St. Peter has justly noticed and adduced
 in this place; for she would not have called Abraham thus her lord if
 she had not been subject to him and had him before her eyes.
 Therefore, he says, further:
 
 
 V. 6. _Whose daughters ye are, if ye do well and stand in fear of no
 terror._ What does he mean by that? This is what he means. It is
 usually the nature of women to be troubled and frightened about
 everything, since they are so much occupied with charms and
 superstition, while one teaches the other, that it is not to be told
 what illusions they have. This should not be the case with a
 christian woman, but she should go forward securely, yet not be so
 superstitious, and run about here and there--pronounce here a
 blessing, there a blessing--inasmuch as it concerns her to let God
 direct; and she is to remember it cannot go ill with her, for as long
 as she knows her condition, that her state is pleasing to God, what
 will she then have to fear? Though your child die, though you are
 sick, it is well if it pleases God; if you are in a state which
 pleases God, what better can you desire? This, then, is what is
 preached to wives. Now follows the duty of husbands:
 
 
 V. 7. _Likewise, ye husbands, dwell with them according to reason,
 giving honor to the wife as to the weaker vessel, and as being heirs
 together of the grace of life, that your prayers be not hindered._
 
 
 The woman is also God's instrument or vessel, he says, for God uses
 her to this end, that she may bear children, give them birth and
 nourishment, and watch over them, and rule the household. Such work
 is the wife to do. So that she is God's instrument and vessel, which
 He has created and instructed to this end. For this reason is the
 husband to respect his wife. Therefore, St. Peter says, Ye husbands,
 dwell with your wives according to reason, not that ye are to rule
 over them with a headstrong will. They are, indeed, to obey the law
 of the husband; what he bids and commands, that is to be done; but he
 is also to see to it that he walks soberly and according to reason
 with his wife, so as to give her that respect and honor which belongs
 to her as God's weaker vessel.
 
 The husband is also God's instrument, but he is stronger, while the
 wife is weaker bodily, as well as timid and more easily dispirited;
 therefore, you are so to conduct and walk in respect to her, that she
 may be able to bear it. You must proceed in this case just as with
 other instruments wherewith you labor; just as when you would have a
 good sickle, you must not hack upon the stone with it. On this
 subject no rule can be laid down. God leaves the matter to each
 individually, that he shall treat his wife in accordance with reason,
 according to the circumstances of each woman: for you are not to use
 the authority which you have, according to your own will, for you are
 her husband for this very purpose, that you may help to guide and
 support her,--not that you should destroy her. Hence none can lay you
 down a rule with exact limitations; you must understand yourself how
 you are to proceed in accordance with reason.
 
 Thus we have now heard in regard to husbands, also, what good works
 those who please God are to perform,--namely, that they dwell with
 their wives, endear themselves to them, and walk soberly with them.
 Things cannot always go on as you would be glad to have them.
 Therefore do you see to it that you act like a husband, and have so
 much the more discretion, when it is lacking in the wife, while you
 are to connive at some matters, tolerate and pardon some things,[2]
 and give to the wife, also, her honor.
 
 [Footnote 2: "Not disclosing the weaknesses of the wife to others,
 nor observing them too narrowly himself, but hiding them both from
 others, and his own eyes, by love: not seeing them further than love
 itself requires."--_Leighton_.]
 
 This _honor_ has been explained, I hardly know how. Some have
 interpreted it thus: that the husband should procure food, drink, and
 clothing for the wife, and should nourish her. Some have referred it
 to marriage duties. I hold this to be the meaning, as I have said,
 that the husband should treat the wife as consists with her being a
 Christian, and a vessel or instrument of God. And thus they are both
 to conduct: the wife is to hold the husband in honor, and on the
 other hand also the husband is to give to the wife her honor. If
 matters were thus directed, they would go on harmoniously, in peace
 and love. Yet where this course is wanting, there will be more
 disgust in the marriage state. Hence it comes to pass, when man and
 wife take one another from nothing but lust, and imagine they will
 have happiness and the gratification of appetite, that they
 experience mere heart-anguish. But if you have a regard to God's work
 and will, then may you live christianly in marriage,--not like the
 heathen, who know not what God requires.
 
 
 _As heirs together of the grace of life._ The husband is not to dwell
 on this, that the wife is weak and fragile, but on this, that she
 also is baptized, and has the same that he has,--all blessings in
 Christ. For inwardly we are all alike, and there is no difference
 between man and woman, but as to the outward condition, it is God's
 pleasure that the husband rule, and the wife be subject to him.
 
 
 _That your prayers be not hindered._ What does St. Peter mean by
 that? This is his meaning; if you do not act in accordance with
 reason, but will find fault, and murmur, and proceed arbitrarily, and
 in this give occasion for error, so that neither can overlook
 another's fault, and take all for the best, then will you be unable
 to pray, and say, "Father, forgive us our sins as we forgive." By
 prayer we are to strive against the devil, therefore we must be
 subject one to another. These are the truly precious good works which
 we are to do. If this is preached and understood, we shall all have
 our homes full of good deeds.--Thus we have heard how a Christian
 should conduct himself in all varieties of condition, but especially
 in his relations to others. It follows now, further, how we all, in
 common one with another, should lead, as to our outward condition, a
 christian life.
 
 
 V. 8-12. _Finally, be ye all like-minded, have compassion one of
 another, be compassionate, affectionate as brethren, heartily kind,
 courteous. Render not evil for evil, or railing for railing, but on
 the contrary, blessing; and know, that ye are hereunto called, that
 ye should inherit the blessing. For whoso loveth life and would see
 prosperity, let him refrain his tongue, that it speak not evil, and
 his lips that they bear no guile. Turn thyself from evil and do good,
 seek out peace and pursue it. For the eyes of the Lord behold the
 righteous, and His ears are open to their prayer, but the face of the
 Lord is against them that do evil._
 
 
 All this is said only to this end, that we should have mutual love
 one to another. For here that which the Scripture sometimes expresses
 in few words, is much enlarged upon. St. Peter would say, the _summa
 summarum_ as to how you are to treat one another in your outward
 conduct is, that ye be like-minded. This matter the Apostles Peter
 and Paul often bring forward, and this much is said, that we all
 should have one mind, one spirit, one thought; what seems to one
 right and good, let this also seem to another right and good. It is
 an important, note-worthy matter, that should be well understood; St.
 Paul has spoken much particularly upon it.
 
 We cannot all of us do the same kind of work, but every one must
 labor each for himself,--a husband in a different sphere from the
 wife, a servant in a different sphere from the master, and so
 throughout. And it is a foolish thing to preach that we should all do
 one work, as those senseless preachers have done who preach the
 legends of the saints,--that _these_ saints have done _that_ work,
 _those_, another, and then insist and say we should do the same.
 
 It is doubtless true that Abraham did a good work, highly to be
 esteemed, when he offered up his son, since this was particularly
 commanded him of God. When the heathen did the same and would
 sacrifice their children likewise, this was an act of cruelty in the
 sight of God. So, also, King Solomon did well in building the temple,
 and God justly rewarded him for it. And our blind fools, now, would
 also do the same,[3] and preach that we must build churches and
 temples for God, while God has given us no command on the subject. So
 it now comes to pass, that men busy themselves with a single kind of
 employment, and have many views in it directly in opposition to the
 Gospel.
 
 [Footnote 3: Luther here doubtless refers to what he regarded as the
 foolish project of the Pope in attempting to build the church of St.
 Peter, at Rome,--the project which sent Tetzel into Germany, and made
 the sale of indulgences so common and obnoxious.--[_Trans._]]
 
 But this is what should be taught, that there should be a single aim
 and many employments, one heart and many hands: all should not follow
 one business, but every one should attend to his own; otherwise there
 will not remain unity of aim and heart. As to what is external, it
 must be permitted to remain of a manifold character, so that every
 one abide in that which has been committed to him, and the work that
 he has in hand. This is a true doctrine, and it is exceedingly
 necessary that it should be well understood; for the devil expends
 his care particularly on this, and has brought things into such a
 state, that judgment is passed on the employment, and every one
 thinks that his own should be counted better than another's; hence it
 has come to pass, that men are so disunited one with another, monks
 against priests, one Order against another, for every one has wished
 to do the best work: thus they must satisfy themselves, and they have
 given themselves up to the Order, and think this Order is better than
 that. There is that of the Augustines against that of the Preaching
 Monks, that of the Carthusians against the Barefooted Friars, and
 nowhere is there greater want of unanimity than among the Orders.
 
 But if it has been taught that, in the sight of God, no employment is
 better than another, but that through faith all are alike,--then will
 all hearts remain united, and we are all alike mutually disposed, and
 shall also say,--the Order, or the mode of life which the bishop
 leads, is in God's sight no more accounted of than that which a poor
 man leads; the mode of life which the nun leads is no better than
 that which a married woman leads; and the same in respect to all
 varieties of condition.
 
 But this they will not hear to, but every one maintains his own for
 the best, and says, Ah! how much better and more important is my
 state, in the Order, than the state of a common man.
 
 Thus to have one aim is, that every one should regard his own
 employment like the others, and that the condition of the married
 woman is just as good as that of the virgin, as all are indeed alike
 in the sight of God, who judges according to the heart and faith, not
 by the person or according to the works; so that we, also, are to
 judge as God judges, and then are we of one mind, and unanimity
 remains in the world, and hearts remain unestranged, so that there is
 no deriding on account of the external condition; all this I hold to
 be excellent, and am well satisfied with every man's employment,
 whatever it be, if it only be not sinful in itself.
 
 Of this St. Paul also speaks, 2 Cor. xi., "I fear lest as the serpent
 beguiled Eve, so your minds should be corrupted from the simplicity
 that is in Christ Jesus,"--that is, lest the devil so beguile you,
 and pervert and divide that simplicity of aim which you have. So,
 Phil. iv., "The peace of God, which passeth all understanding, keep
 your hearts and minds through Jesus Christ." Why does the Apostle lay
 so much stress on the aim of the mind? Because it all consists in
 this, that when I am brought to cherish a false aim, everything is
 already lost; as in case I am a monk, and have adopted such a view as
 that my works are of more worth in the sight of God than others, and
 say, "God be thanked that I have become a monk; my state is now far
 preferable to the common one of marriage:" in which case, from such a
 view there must spring a proud spirit, and it cannot fail that I
 should count myself more righteous than another, and should despise
 other people while I deceive myself. For a married woman, if she
 abides in faith, is better in the sight of God than I am with the
 Order I belong to. So that when this is understood, that faith brings
 with it all that a Christian ought to have, we all of us have one aim
 and view, and there is no difference among works.
 
 Wherefore we are thus to understand this passage of St. Peter, that
 he means the aim of the soul,--not that which refers to outward
 matters,--and an internal view or plan which aspires to those things
 that are esteemed with God; so that both the doctrine and the life be
 one, and I hold that for excellent which you hold as excellent,--and
 again, that is well-pleasing to you which is well-pleasing to me, as
 I have said. This sense of things is possessed by Christians, and to
 this view we should hold fast, that it may not be perverted, as St.
 Paul says; for when the devil has corrupted it, he has forced the
 castle of true purity, and all then is lost.
 
 
 V. 8. _Be ye compassionate, affectionate as brethren, heartily kind,
 courteous._ To be compassionate is, that one should make himself a
 sharer with another, and have a heart to feel his neighbor's
 necessity. When misfortune overtakes him you are not to think,--Ah!
 it is right, it is no more than he should have, he has well deserved
 it. Where there is love, it identifies itself with its neighbor; and
 when it goes ill with him, the heart feels it as though it were its
 own experience. But to be brotherly (affectionate as brethren) is
 this much, that one should regard another as his own brother. This
 certainly may be easily understood, for nature itself teaches it; by
 which you see what those that are truly brothers are, that they are
 united more heartily together than any friends even. So ought we, as
 Christians, to act; for we are all brethren by baptism,--so that
 after baptism even father and mother are brother and sister, for I
 have the same blessing and inheritance that they have from Christ,
 through faith.
 
 
 _Heartily kind,--Viscerosi._ This word I cannot explain except by
 giving an illustration. Observe how a mother or a father act toward
 their child,--as when a mother sees her child enduring anguish, her
 whole inward being is moved, and her heart within her body; whence is
 derived that mode of speech that occurs in many places in Scripture.
 Of this we have an example in I. Kings iii., where two women
 contended before King Solomon for a child, and each claimed the
 child. And when the king would discover which was the real mother of
 the child, he must appeal to nature, whereby he detects it; and he
 said to the two women, You say that the child is yours, while you say
 also that it is yours: well, then, bring hither a sword and divide
 the child into two parts, and give one part to this woman, and
 another to that. Thus he attained knowledge as to which was the real
 mother; and the text tells us that she was inwardly affected with
 anxiety for the child, and said, No! no! rather give the child whole
 to this woman, and let it live. Then the king pronounced his decision
 and said, That is the true mother; take the child and give it to her.
 Hence you may understand what this word _heartily_ means.
 
 This is what St. Peter would say: that we should conduct ourselves
 toward one another like those that are truly friends by blood, as
 with them the whole heart is moved, the life, the pulse, and all the
 powers; so here, also, the course should be heartily kind, and
 motherly, and the heart should be thoroughly penetrated. Such a
 disposition should one christian man bear towards another. But the
 standard is indeed set high; few will be found who bear such a hearty
 love to their neighbor,--as when it is seen that a necessity is
 imposed that they should have an affection like that which a mother
 has for a child,--such that it presses through the heart and through
 every vein. Hence you see what the monks' and nuns' state of life is;
 how far it is removed from such hearty love: if all they have were to
 be smelted together in one man, not one drop of such christian love
 as this would be found in it. Wherefore let us look to ourselves and
 be jealous over ourselves, whether we can find in ourselves such a
 kind of love. This is a short lesson and quick spoken, but it goes
 deep and spreads itself wide.
 
 _Courteous_, is, that we lead outwardly a gentle, pleasing, lovely
 behaviour,--not merely that we should sympathize one with another, as
 a father and mother for their child, but also that we should walk in
 love and gentleness one with another.[4] There are some men rough and
 knotty, like a tree full of knots,--so uncivil, that no one will
 readily have anything to do with them. Hence it happens that they are
 usually full of suspicion, and become soon angry; with whom none of
 their own choice are familiar. But there are gentle people, who
 interpret all for the best, and are not suspicious; do not permit
 themselves to be soon irritated; can at least understand something as
 well meant; such persons as are called _Candidos_. This virtue St.
 Paul names [Greek: chrestotes], as it is often praised by him.
 
 [Footnote 4: "The least difficulties and scruples in a tender
 conscience should not be roughly encountered; they are as a knot in a
 silken thread, and require a gentle and wary hand to loose
 them."--_Leighton_.]
 
 Now consider the Gospel, which portrays the Lord Christ so
 distinctly, that we may trace this virtue especially in Him: now the
 Pharisees assault Him, and now again, others, that they might take
 Him,--yet He does not suffer Himself to become enraged. And although
 the Apostles often stumble, and act a foolish part here and there, He
 nowhere assails them with angry words, but is ever courteous, and
 attracts them toward Himself, so that they remained with Him
 cheerfully and heartily, and walked with Him. This likewise we see
 among kind friends and societies on earth, wherever there are two or
 three good friends, who have a good understanding one with another:
 though one acts a foolish part, the other can readily pardon him.
 There is represented in some measure that which St. Peter here
 intends, although it is not perfectly set forth, for this
 courteousness is to be considered obligatory upon every one
 individually. Hence you see the true nature of love, and how
 excellent a people Christians should be. The angels in heaven live
 with one another thus, and so should it also, in justice, be on
 earth; but rarely does it take place.
 
 As St. Peter has already said, that the man servant and the maid
 servant, the husband and wife, should so conduct themselves that each
 should attend to that business of his own which he is to discharge,
 so would He have us all do generally, one with another. Therefore, if
 you would be certain and assured that you are doing an excellent
 deed, that is pleasing to God, set yourself in God's name in
 opposition to whatever has been preached in the devil's name, whereby
 the world walks and seeks to merit heaven. For how can you be better
 assured that you are acceptable with God, than when you observe, as
 he here says, the works which a man should do, the conduct which
 every one should lead, that he be compassionate, brotherly
 affectionate, heartily kind, courteous? In this he says nothing of
 those fool-works whereof we have been taught; says not, "build
 churches, found masses, be a priest, wear a cowl, vow chastity, &c.;"
 but this is his language: See to it that you be courteous. These are
 truly precious, golden deeds, precious stones and pearls, which are
 well pleasing to God.
 
 But with this the devil cannot rest content, for he knows that
 thereby his interests are thrown to the ground; therefore he devises
 what he can to suppress such doctrine, incites monks and priests to
 cry out, "Do you say that our matters are nothing at all? that is for
 you to talk like the devil." But reply to them then, Do you not know
 that there must be good works, whereof St. Peter here speaks,--to
 wit, that we be brotherly affectionate, heartily kind, and courteous?
 if these are the best, as must be confessed, you must be false in
 regard to your works, if you think they are better. I am really
 astonished that such blindness could come upon us; for Thomas, the
 preaching monk, has written, and says, shamelessly, that monks and
 priests are in a better state than ordinary Christians. This the high
 schools have confirmed, and men have been Doctorated for it. After
 them the Pope and his multitude have gone, and have exalted those to
 be saints, who teach such doctrine.
 
 Therefore understand this, as I have said,--for Christ Himself and
 all His Apostles have so taught,--if you would do the most excellent
 good works, and be in the best condition of life, you will find them
 nowhere else but in faith and love; that is the highest state of all.
 So that it must be an error, when they choose to say, their state is
 better than faith and love; for if it be better than faith, it is
 better than God's word, but if it be better than God's word, it is
 better than God Himself. Therefore Paul has truly said, that
 Anti-Christ should exalt himself before God. Be informed in this way
 so as to judge of these things; where love and friendship are
 wanting, there, certainly, all works are condemned and trodden under
 foot. Thus we see why St. Peter has so confidently expatiated on the
 external character of a truly christian life, as he taught us above,
 in a masterly manner, how the inward (spiritual) life should be
 ordered toward God. Wherefore this epistle is to be regarded as a
 truly golden epistle. Whereupon it follows, further:
 
 
 V. 9. _Render not evil for evil, nor railing for railing, but on the
 other hand blessing, and know that ye are called thereunto, that ye
 should inherit the blessing._ But this is a still further
 illustration of love, showing how we should act toward those that
 injure and persecute us. If any one does you evil--this is his
 meaning--do him good; if any one rails at and curses you, then you
 are to bless and wish him well; for this is an important part of
 love. O Lord God! what a rarity such Christians are! But why should
 we return good for evil? Because, says he, ye are called thereunto
 that ye should inherit the blessing, so that ye should suffer
 yourselves to be attracted towards it.
 
 In the Scriptures we Christians are called a people of blessing, or a
 blessed people. For thus said God to Abraham, Gen. xii.: "In thy seed
 shall all nations of the earth be blessed." Since God has so richly
 shed down this blessing upon us, in that He takes away from us all
 the malediction and the curse which we have derived to ourselves from
 our first parents, as well as that which Moses suffered to go forth
 upon the disobedient, so that we are now filled with blessing, we
 ought so to conduct ourselves that it shall be said of us, That is a
 blessed people. So that this is what the Apostle here means: See, God
 has shown you His favor, and has taken away from you the curse, and
 the reviling wherewith you have dishonored Him; He neither imputes
 nor punishes, but has bestowed upon you such rich grace and blessing,
 while ye were only worthy of all malediction, inasmuch as ye reviled
 God without intermission (for where there is unbelief the heart must
 ever curse God): do ye also as has been done toward you; curse not,
 rail not, do well, speak well, even though you are treated ill, and
 endure it where you are unrighteously used. Hereupon he quotes a
 passage out of the xxxiii. Ps., where the prophet David speaks thus:
 
 
 V. 10. _Whoso will love life and see good days, let him keep his
 tongue from evil, and his lips that they do not deceive._ That is,
 whoever would have a pleasure and a joy in life, and would not die
 the death, but see good days, so that it shall go well with him, let
 him keep his tongue that it speak not evil, not only in respect to
 his friends, for that is a small virtue and a thing which even the
 wickedest of all may do, even snakes and vipers,--but also, he says,
 maintain a kind spirit, and keep your tongue silent even against your
 enemies, though you are even incited thereto--though you have cause
 to rail and speak evil.
 
 Besides, keep your lips, he says, that they do not deceive. There are
 probably many who give good words, and say _good morning_ to their
 neighbor, but they think in their heart, The devil take you. These
 are people who have not inherited the blessing; they are the evil
 fruit of an evil tree. Therefore St. Peter has introduced a passage
 which refers to works, even to their root,--that is, what springs
 from within out of the heart.[5] Furthermore, the passage in the
 prophet says:
 
 [Footnote 5: "A guileful heart makes guileful tongue and lips. It is
 the workhouse where is the forge of deceits and slanders, and other
 evil speakings; and the tongue is only the outer shop where they are
 vended, and the lips the door of it. So then such ware as is made
 within, such and no other can be set out. That which the heart is
 full of, runs over by the tongue."--_Leighton_.]
 
 
 V. 11. _Let him turn away from evil and do good, let him seek peace
 and pursue after it, for the eyes of the Lord behold the righteous._
 The world considers this as satisfaction when one man does injustice
 to another, that his head should be cut off. But this brings one none
 the nearer to peace. For no king, even, ever attained to be in peace
 before his enemies. The Roman empire was so powerful that it struck
 down all that set itself against it; still for all this it could not
 be preserved. Therefore this method is of no avail toward reaching
 peace, for though a man should prostrate and silence his foe, ten and
 twenty rise up again after it, till at length he is compelled to
 yield. But he who seeks after the true peace, and moreover would find
 it, let him restrain his tongue; let him turn away from evil and do
 good: this is a course different from that which the world pursues.
 To turn from evil and to do good is, that when a man hears evil
 words, he be able to overlook the wickedness and injustice. Seek thus
 after peace, so shall you find it; when your enemy has wasted his
 breath and done all that he can, if you hear him, but rail and rant
 not back, he must subdue himself by his own violence. For thus Christ
 also on the cross subdued his enemies, not by the sword or by
 violence. Therefore is it a saying, which should be written with
 gold, where it says, "Striking back again makes hatred, and whoever
 strikes back again is unjust." Thence it must follow that not to
 strike back again makes peace. But how can this be? Is it then a
 thing not human? Certainly it does not accord with human nature; but
 if you in this manner suffer unjustly and do not strike back again,
 but let the matter go, it shall come to pass as hereafter follows:
 
 
 V. 12. _The eyes of the Lord are over the righteous, and his ears are
 open to their cry, but the face of the Lord is against those that do
 evil._ If you do not revenge yourself and do not repay evil with
 evil, there is the Lord in heaven above who cannot tolerate wrong,
 wherefore he that does not strike back must have his right. These He
 beholds; their prayer reaches His ear; He is our protector and will
 not forget us, while if we cannot escape from His eyes, we should
 comfort ourselves with the thought:--that is, this should induce a
 christian man to endure all injustice with patience, and not return
 evil. If I properly reflect, I see that the soul which does me wrong
 must burn forever in hell-fire. Therefore a christian heart should
 speak on this wise: Dear Father, since this man falls so sadly under
 Thy wrath and so miserably throws himself into hell-fire, I pray that
 Thou wouldest forgive him, and do to him even as Thou hast done
 toward me since Thou hast rescued me from condemnation. But how comes
 this? Thus: while He graciously looks down upon the righteous, He
 also looks angrily at the wicked, wrinkles His brow and turns it in
 indignation upon them; when we know then that He looks upon us
 graciously and upon them with disfavor, we ought to suffer ourselves
 to pity and mourn for them, and pray for them. Furthermore, St. Peter
 says:
 
 
 V. 13-16. _And who is he that will harm you, if ye follow after that
 which is good. Blessed are ye if ye suffer for righteousness' sake,
 and be not afraid for their terror, neither be troubled, but sanctify
 the Lord God in your hearts. But be ready always to give an answer to
 every man who asks the reason of the hope that is in you, with
 meekness and fear, and have a good conscience, so that they who speak
 of you as evil-doers may be put to shame, that they have falsely
 accused your good conduct in Christ._
 
 
 If we follow after that which is good,--that is, do not reward evil
 with evil, but are heartily kind and courteous, etc., then there is
 none that can injure us. For though our honor, life and property
 should be taken away, we are still uninjured. Hence we have a
 blessing that is incomparable,--one that none can take from us. Those
 who persecute us have nothing but prosperity on earth, but
 thereafter, eternal condemnation, while we have an eternal,
 incorruptible good, although we lose a small temporal blessing.
 
 
 V. 14. _Blessed are ye if ye suffer for righteousness' sake._ Not
 only, he says, can no one injure you if ye suffer for God's sake, but
 blessed are ye also, and ye should rejoice that ye are to suffer, as
 Christ also says in the sixth of Matthew: "Happy are ye when men
 deride and persecute you for my sake, and speak every kind of evil
 against you, falsely; rejoice, and be exceeding glad." Whoever then
 apprehends this, that it is the Lord speaks such things, and so
 tenderly speaks comfort to his heart, he stands well; but to whom
 this does not bring strength, it makes him sad and complaining,--he
 may well remain unstrengthened.
 
 
 _But be not afraid of their terror, neither be troubled, but sanctify
 God in your hearts._ Here St. Peter quotes a passage from Isaiah
 viii., where he says: "Be not afraid of their terror, nor be
 frightened, but sanctify the Lord in your hearts, and let Him be your
 fear and your dread." There we have a great support and reliance,
 whereon we may trust, assured that no one can injure us. Let the
 world terrify, defy and threaten as long as it will, it must have an
 end, but our confidence and joy shall have no end; thus we shall have
 no fear on account of the world, but shall be courageous, while
 before God we shall humble ourselves and be afraid.
 
 But how does St. Peter mean that we should sanctify God; how can we
 sanctify Him; must He not sanctify us? Answer. So it is that we pray,
 even in the _Our Father, hallowed be Thy name_, that we may sanctify
 His name, as He Himself also sanctifies His name. Therefore it comes
 to this: _in your hearts_, says St. Peter, ye are to sanctify Him;
 that is, if the Lord our God appoints anything for us, be it good or
 evil, bring it weal or woe, be it shame or honor, prosperity or
 adversity, I am not only to consider it as good, but even as holy,
 and say, this is nothing but a precious blessing that I am unworthy
 of, that comes to me. So the prophet says, Ps. cxliv., "The Lord is
 righteous in all His ways, and holy in all His works." If I give God
 praise in regard to such matters, and consider such doings good,
 holy, and excellent, then I sanctify Him in my heart. But they who
 scruple accounts, and complain that they are treated unjustly, and
 say God sleeps, and will not help the just and restrain the unjust,
 these dishonor Him, and account Him neither just nor holy. But
 whoever is a Christian, should attribute righteousness to God and
 unrighteousness to himself--should account God holy and himself
 unholy, and say that He in all His deeds and works is holy and just;
 this is what he requires. So also speaks the prophet Daniel, iii.: "O
 Lord, in all that Thou hast done towards us, hast Thou done in
 accordance with right and true judgment. For we have sinned;
 therefore be the shame ours, but the honor and the praise Thine." If
 we sing, _Deo gratias_, and _Te Deum laudamus_, and say, God be
 praised and blessed, when misfortune overtakes us, that is called by
 Peter and Isaiah a true hallowing of the Lord. But He does not by
 this require that you should say that he has done right and well who
 has injured you, for it is an entirely different judgment between God
 and me, and between me and thee. I may have within me anger, hatred,
 and wicked lusts, whereby I intend your damage, while you are yet
 still uninjured, and have nothing against me; but in God's sight I am
 unjust,--therefore He does right if He punishes me; I have well
 deserved it. If he does not punish me in that case, He shows me
 favor, and thus is right in every way. But it does not therefore
 follow, that he does right who persecutes me, for I have not done
 injustice to him as I have done in the sight of God. If God sends the
 devil or wicked people upon you to punish you, He uses them to this
 end, that they may execute His righteousness; so wicked wretches and
 injustice itself become a blessing.
 
 So we read in Ezekiel, xxix., of King Nebuchadnezzar, where God says
 by the prophet, "Knowest thou not that he is My servant, and has
 served Me?" Now, says he, "I must give him his hire, I have not paid
 him as yet; well, then, I will give him Egypt, and that shall be his
 hire." The king had no right to the land, but God had a right to it,
 so that He might punish it through him; for, in order that even
 wicked wretches might serve Him, and eat not their bread in vain, He
 gives them enough, lets them serve Him even to this end, that they
 persecute His saints. Here reason is at fault, and thinks He does
 well and right when He remunerates them only here; gives them much
 land, and does it simply for this, to make them His executioners, and
 persecutors of pious Christians.
 
 But when you endure and sanctify God, and say, _Just Lord_, then you
 do well, while He casts them into hell and punishes them because they
 have done wickedly, but takes you into His favor and gives
 you--Eternal Salvation. Therefore let Him manage them; He will give a
 just reward.
 
 Of this we have an example in holy Job, when all his cattle and all
 his sons were slain, and his property was taken away; when he said,
 "The Lord gave and the Lord hath taken away; as it was well pleasing
 to God, so has it been ordered, therefore praised be His name." And
 when his wife came, deriding him, and railed at him, and said: "See!
 what hast thou now, abiding in thine integrity? Curse God and die:"
 then he answered her--"Thou hast spoken like a foolish woman: are we
 to receive good at God's hands,--why should we not also receive evil
 from Him, for He hath done as it hath pleased Him? God hath given,
 and God hath taken away," he says; not God has given it, the devil
 hath taken it away, while yet it was the devil that did it. This man
 truly sanctified the Lord; therefore is he so highly praised and
 exalted of God. It follows, further:
 
 
 V. 15. _But be always ready to give an answer to every man that
 asketh you, the reason of the hope that is in you._ We must here
 acknowledge that St. Peter addressed these words to all Christians,
 clergy and laity, male and female, young and old, of whatever state
 or condition they may be. From thence it will follow that every
 Christian should know the ground and reason of his faith, and be able
 to maintain and defend it where it is necessary. But up to this time,
 the idea that the laity should read the Scriptures has been treated
 with derision. For in this matter the devil has hit on a fine
 measure, in tearing the Bible out of the hands of the laity,--and
 this is what he has thought: "If I can keep the laity from reading
 the Scripture, I will then bring the priests over from the Bible to
 Aristotle, so that gossip they what they will, the laity must hear
 just what they set forth; while if the laity should read the
 Scripture, the priests must study it too, in order that they may not
 be detected and overcome." But look you now at what St. Peter tells
 us all, that we should give answer and show reason for our faith.
 When you come to die I shall not be with you, neither will the Pope;
 and if you know but this one reason of your hope, and say, "I will
 believe as the Councils, the Pope and the Fathers believed," then the
 devil will answer, "Yes! but how if they were in error?" Then will he
 have won, and will drag you down to hell. Therefore must we know what
 we believed,--namely, what God's word is, not what the Pope and holy
 Fathers believe or say. For you must not put your faith at all in
 persons--but on the word of God.
 
 So when any one assaults you, and like a heretic asks why you believe
 that you shall be saved through faith--here is your answer: "Because
 I have God's word and the clear declarations of Scripture." As St.
 Paul says, "The just shall live by faith," and St. Peter, where he
 speaks of Christ, the living stone, quoting from the prophet Isaiah,
 "Whosoever believeth on him shall not be confounded; thereon do I
 build, and know that the word will not deceive me." But if you will
 speak like other fools, "Yes, we will hear how the council decides,
 and with that we will abide," then are you lost. Wherefore you should
 say, "Why do I then ask what this one or that believes or decides; if
 they speak not the word of God, I will hear nothing of it."
 
 Do you say, then, it is so confusedly difficult a thing, that no one
 knows what he should believe, and so one must wait till it is
 determined what one shall hold? Answer. Then will you go to the devil
 the while; for if it comes to the pinch, and you should die and not
 know what you should believe, neither I nor any one else could help
 you. Therefore you must know for yourself, and turn to no one else,
 and cling fast to the word of God, if you would escape hell. And for
 such as cannot read, it is necessary that they should learn and
 retain some clear texts out of the Scriptures--one or two at least,
 and on this ground abide firmly. As for instance that of Gen. xii.,
 where God says to Abraham, "In thy seed shall all the nations of the
 earth be blessed." If you have learned that, you may stand thereon
 and say, "Though Pope, bishop, and all the councils stood yonder and
 said otherwise, yet do I declare this is God's word, that I can rely
 on, and that does not deceive me." Whoever will be blessed, must be
 blessed through "the seed," and whoever is blessed is ransomed from
 the curse--that is, from sin, death and hell. Therefore it follows,
 from the text--whoever will not be blessed through "the seed," he
 must be lost. So that my works or good deeds can help nothing to my
 salvation.
 
 To the same end also is the passage out of Peter,--"Whoever believeth
 on this stone shall not be ashamed." If any one now come upon you and
 demand a reason of your faith, reply--"There stands the foundation
 which cannot fail me, and so I ask nothing beside, what Pope or
 bishop teach or decide." Were they true bishops, then would they
 teach the ground of faith that they knew was common to all
 Christians. Yet they rush on and cry out, "The laity must not be
 suffered to read the Scriptures."
 
 So if any one asks you whether you will have the Pope for a head, say
 at once, "I will hold him for a head--a head of wickedness and
 profligacy." And for this I have a passage of St. Paul, I. Tim. iv.:
 "There shall come the devil's teachers forbidding to marry, and
 commanding to abstain from meats which God has created." That too has
 the Pope forbidden, as is the case now. Therefore is he Antichrist.
 For what Christ commands and teaches, that _he_ transgresses. What
 Christ makes free, that the Pope binds--Christ says, it is not sin,
 while the Pope rejoins, it is sin.
 
 Thus should one now learn to give a reason and answer for his faith.
 For though not now, yet at death will it come to pass, that the devil
 will come forward and say, "Why have you charged the Pope as
 Antichrist?" If you are not prepared and ready to show reason, then
 has he won. It is as much as though St. Peter had said, If ye will
 now be faithful, ye must henceforth endure much persecution. But in
 this persecution must you have a hope, and must look for Eternal
 life. If one asks you why you hope for it, then you must have the
 word of God, on which you can build.
 
 But the sophists also have perverted the text, as though one was to
 convince heretics with reason, and out of the natural light of
 Aristotle; therefore (say they) it is here rendered in the Latin,
 _Rationem reddere_, as if St. Peter had thought it should be done
 with human reason. Because, say they, the Scriptures are far too
 inconclusive that from them we should silence heretics. The method by
 which (according to them) it must be shown that the faith is a right
 one, must agree with reason, and come forth from the brain; whereas,
 our faith is above reason, and subject to God alone. Therefore, if
 the people will not believe, then should you be silent; for you are
 not responsible for compelling them to hold the Scriptures as the
 word or book of God. It is enough that you give your reason
 therefrom. But if they take exceptions, and say, "You preach that one
 should not hold to man's doctrine, while Peter and Paul, and Christ
 even, were men:" when you hear people of this stamp, who are so blind
 and obtuse that they deny that this is God's word, or doubt of it,
 then be silent--speak no more with them, and let them go--only say,
 "I will give you my reasons out of Scripture. If you will believe
 that, it is well; if not, I will give you no others." But do you say,
 "Must God's word be treated with such shame?" Leave that to God. So
 you see that this matter should be well apprehended, and we should
 know how to meet those who now rise up and present such
 objections.--It follows:
 
 
 _With meekness and fear._ That is, if you are examined and questioned
 of your faith, you should not answer with haughty words, and proceed
 in the matter with contempt and violence, as if you would tear up a
 tree by the roots, but with such fear and humility as if you stood
 before God's tribunal, and were there to give answer; for if it were
 now to happen that you should be examined before king and princes,
 and had well prepared yourself a long time therefor with replies, and
 thus thinking with yourself, "Deliberate, I will answer him
 correctly," then shall it be a happy experience for you,--though the
 devil take the sword out of your hands, and give you a blow, so that
 you stand in shame, and have put on your armor in vain, and he can
 fairly take out of your hands the reply you have carefully composed,
 so that it fails you even though you have it fairly in your mind,
 because he has beforehand tracked out your thoughts. Even this God
 suffers to take place, that he may subdue your pride and make you
 humble.
 
 So, if you would avoid such an experience, you must stand in fear,
 and not rely on your own strength, but on the word and promise of
 Christ, Matt. x. 19--"But when they deliver you up, take no thought
 how or what ye shall speak, for it shall be given you in that same
 hour what ye shall speak; for it is not ye that speak, but the Spirit
 of your Father which speaketh in you." It is right, when you are to
 answer, that you should prepare yourself well with passages out of
 Scripture; but beware that you do not insist thereon with a proud
 spirit, since God will even take the most forcible reply out of your
 mouth and memory, though you were previously prepared with all your
 replies. Therefore, fear is proper. And so, if you are summoned, then
 may you answer for yourself before princes and lords, and even the
 devil himself. Only beware that it be not the vanity of men, but the
 word of God.
 
 
 V. 16. _Having a good conscience, that whereas they speak evil of you
 as of evil-doers, they may be ashamed that falsely accuse your good
 conversation in Christ._ Of this St. Paul has already spoken above.
 We cannot disregard it. If we will follow the Gospel, then must we be
 despised and condemned by the world, so that men shall hold us as
 contemptible rabble. But let the devil and all the world rave and
 rage--let them abuse as they will, yet they shall at last be made to
 understand, with shame, that they have injured and defamed us, when
 _that day_ shall arrive,--as St. Peter has said above,--in which we
 shall be secure, and stand up with a good conscience. These are, in
 every respect, suitable and forcible replies, which can comfort us
 and make us courageous, and yet go on circumspectly, with fear.
 
 
 V. 17, 18. _For it is better, if the will of God be so, that ye
 suffer for well-doing than for evil-doing. For Christ also hath once
 suffered for our sins, the just for the unjust, that he might bring
 us to God, being put to death in the flesh, but quickened by the
 Spirit._
 
 
 It will not, then, be the case that they who shall reach heaven shall
 have prosperity on earth, while even those who do not arrive at
 heaven may not have prosperity. For that which God said to Adam is
 imposed on all men--"In the sweat of thy brow shalt thou eat thy
 bread;" and to the woman: "In sorrow shalt thou bring forth
 children." Since, now, adversity is imposed in common upon us all,
 how much more must _we_ bear the cross if we would attain to eternal
 life. Therefore, he says, since God will have it so, it is better
 that ye suffer for well-doing. They who suffer for evil-doing have an
 evil conscience, and have double punishment. But Christians have only
 the half of it. Outwardly, they have suffering; but inwardly,
 comfort.
 
 Yet has he here set a limit,--as he also has said above,--if a case
 should occur of such severity as the Donatists experienced, of whom
 Augustine writes, who took such a resolution that, stung by their
 sufferings, they committed suicide, and threw themselves into the
 sea.
 
 It is not the will of God that we seek out, and even invite,
 calamity. Go thou on in faith and love. If the cross comes, take it
 up; if it comes not, seek not for it.
 
 Therefore these modern spirits commit sin, in that they lash and beat
 themselves, or subject themselves to torture, and so would storm
 heaven.
 
 This has Paul also forbidden, in Col. iii., where he speaks of such
 saints as walk in a self-chosen spirituality and humility, and spare
 not their body. We should also restrain the body that it do not
 become too wanton, yet not so as to destroy it; and we should submit
 to suffer if another sends suffering upon us, but not of our own
 choice fall therein. That will be the question: if it is God's
 will--if he has appointed it--for then it is better; while you are
 also more happy and fortunate that you suffer for well-doing.
 
 
 V. 18. _Since also Christ has once suffered for us--the just for the
 unjust._ There St. Peter presents us, once for all, the example of
 our Lord, and points us evermore to Christ's sufferings, that we all
 of us alike should follow his example, so that he need not present a
 particular exemplar for the estate of every individual. For just as
 Christ is held forth as an example to all in the whole Church, so it
 is the duty of every individual in the Church,--each for himself, of
 whatever state he is,--to copy thereafter, in his whole life, as it
 is set before him; and he will speak after this manner: "Christ was
 righteous; yet, for well-doing, has suffered on our account, who were
 unjust; yet he sought not the cross, but waited till it was God's
 will that he should drink the cup; and it is He that is our pattern,
 whom we are to imitate." Thus St. Peter here adduces this one
 example, to this end especially, that he may thus designate that by
 which every estate is to be instructed; and now he goes on to declare
 more fully the suffering of Christ.
 
 But, more particularly, he says here, Christ has suffered _once_ for
 us; that is, Christ has borne many sins upon himself, but he has not
 done it in such a way as to die for every individual sin; but at
 once, for all together, has done enough to remove the sins of all who
 come to Him and believe on Him--who are now freed from death, even as
 He is free.
 
 
 _The righteous for the unrighteous_, he says. As though he had said,
 much rather should we suffer, since we die for the righteous who had
 no sin. But He has died for the unrighteous, and for the sake of our
 sins.
 
 
 _That He might present us to God._ This is all said to teach the
 peculiar end of Christ's sufferings; namely, that He died,--not for
 His own sake,--but that He might present us to God. How is that
 consistent: has He not offered up Himself? Answer: It is true that He
 has offered up Himself upon the Cross for us all who believe on Him,
 but at the same time He offers up us with Himself, since all they who
 believe on Him must suffer also with Him, and be put to death after
 the flesh as He was. Yet God has taught us, that they are alive in
 the spirit and yet dead in the flesh, as He afterwards says. But are
 we a sacrifice with Him? Then, as He dies, so we are to die according
 to the flesh; as He lives spiritually, so do we also live in the
 spirit.
 
 
 _Being put to death in the flesh, but quickened by the spirit._ The
 word _flesh_ is common in Scripture, as is also the word spirit, and
 the Apostles usually present the two in contrast. The sense is this:
 that Christ, through His sufferings, is taken out of this life that
 consists in flesh and blood, as a man on earth who lives by flesh and
 blood,--walks and stands, eats, drinks, sleeps, wakes, sees, hears,
 grasps, and feels,--and, in brief, whatever the body does while it is
 sensible; to all this Christ has died. This is what St. Paul calls a
 natural body,--that is, the animal life. _In the flesh_, not _after_
 the flesh,--that is, in the natural functions which the body
 exercises, to such life is He dead: so that this life has now ceased
 with Him, and He is now removed to another life and quickened after
 the spirit, passed into a spiritual and supernatural life, that
 comprises in itself the whole life that Christ now has in soul and
 body. So that he has no more a fleshy body, but a spiritual body.
 
 Thus shall it be with us at the last day, when spiritual life shall
 succeed to flesh and blood; for my body and yours will live without
 food and drink,--will not procreate, nor digest, nor grow wanton, and
 the like, but we shall inwardly live after the spirit,--and the body
 shall be purified even as the sun, and yet far brighter, while there
 probably will be no natural flesh and blood, no natural or corporeal
 labor.
 
 This is the language of St. Paul thereon, I. Cor. xv.: "The first man
 Adam was made in natural life, and the last in spiritual life." And
 it follows, "As we have the image of the natural man, so shall we
 also bear the image of the spiritual man." From Adam we derive all
 our natural functions, so far as concerns our unreasoning animal
 nature as to the fine senses. But Christ is spiritual,--flesh and
 blood not according to the outward sense; He neither sleeps nor
 wakes, and yet knows all things, and is present in the ends of the
 earth. Like Him shall we be also, for He is the first fruits, the
 earnest and first born (as Paul says) of the spiritual life; that is,
 He is the first who has risen again and entered upon a spiritual
 life. Thus Christ lives now after the spirit; that is, He is really
 man, but has a spiritual body. Therefore we should not here question
 how we may distinguish flesh and spirit from one another, but
 understand that the body and flesh are spiritual, and the spirit is
 in the body and with the body. For St. Peter does not say here that
 the Holy Spirit has raised Christ up, but he speaks more generally;
 as when I say the spirit, the flesh, I do not mean the Holy Spirit,
 but that which is within us, that which the spirit impels, and that
 which proceeds from the spirit. It follows, now:
 
 
 V. 19-21. _By which same He also went and preached to the spirits in
 prison, who aforetime were disobedient, when the long-suffering of
 God waited in the days of Noah, while the ark was preparing, in which
 a few, that is, eight souls, were saved by water. Which now also
 saves you through baptism, which is typical by it; not the putting
 away of the filth of the flesh, but the union of a good conscience
 with God, through the resurrection of Jesus Christ, who has ascended
 to heaven, and is seated at the right hand of God,--and angels, and
 principalities, and powers, are subject to Him._
 
 
 This is a strange text, and a more obscure passage, perhaps, than any
 other in the New Testament, for I do not certainly know what St.
 Peter means. At first sight, the words import as though Christ had
 preached to the spirits,--that is, the souls which were formerly
 unbelieving at the time Noah was building the ark; but that I cannot
 understand, I cannot even explain it. There has been no one hitherto
 who has explained it. Yet if any one is disposed to maintain that
 Christ, after that He had suffered on the Cross, descended to these
 souls and preached to them, I will not dispute it. It might bear such
 a rendering. But I am not confident that St. Peter would say this.
 Yet the words may well be understood in this sense,--that our Lord,
 after His ascension into heaven, came and preached in spirit, yet so
 that His preaching was not in the body. For He speaks not with bodily
 voice; He does no more what pertains to the natural functions of the
 body. Whence it must also follow, as it seems, that inasmuch as He
 preached to the spirits in that same spiritual body, such preaching
 must also be a spiritual preaching, so that He did not go there in
 body and with oral preaching. The text does not require us to
 understand that He went down to the spirits and preached to them at
 the time of His death. For this is his language, _by which same_,--
 namely, when He had been put to death in the flesh and made alive
 after the spirit,--that is, when He had unclothed Himself of His
 fleshly existence and had passed into a spiritual being and life,
 just as He now is in heaven,--_thus_ He went and preached. Now He
 certainly could not have gone to hell, after He had taken to Himself
 such a new existence; wherefore we must understand that He has done
 it after His resurrection.
 
 While the words only require that he be considered as speaking here
 of spiritual preaching, we may rest in this view, that St. Peter
 speaks of the office that Christ performs by means of external
 preaching. For He commanded the Apostles personally to preach the
 Gospel. But with the word preached He comes Himself, and is
 spiritually present there, and speaks and preaches to the people in
 their hearts; just as the Apostles speak the word orally and in body
 to the ears, so He preaches to the spirits that lie captive in the
 prison-house of the devil. So that this also should be understood
 spiritually, like the preaching.
 
 But here the expression follows, _to the spirits which aforetime were
 unbelieving_, &c. We should observe, in accordance with the divine
 account, that in that state of existence in which Christ is at
 present, those who have lived aforetime and those that are living
 now, are alike to Him, for His control extends itself alike over dead
 and living: and in that life, the beginning, middle and end of the
 world are all in one. But here on earth it has properly a measure, so
 that one age passes on after another, the son succeeds the father,
 and so it continues. But to give an illustration: If a high wood lies
 before you, or you look upon it as it stretches along in length
 before you, you cannot well overlook it; but if it lies near before
 you, and you stand above it and can look down directly upon it, then
 you have it in full view. So it is, that here on earth we can form no
 conception of this life (I speak of), for it passes on (piecemeal as
 it were) foot by foot, to the last day. But as to God, it all stands
 in a moment. For with Him a thousand years are as one day, as St.
 Peter says, in the next Epistle. Thus the first man is just as near
 to Him as the last that shall be born, and He sees all at once, just
 as the human eye can bring together two things widely separated at a
 single glance. So the sense here is this, that Christ preaches no
 more in person, but is present with the word and preaches to spirits,
 spiritually, in the heart. Yet you are not to understand that He
 preaches in this manner to all spirits.
 
 But to what spirits has he preached? To those who aforetime were
 unbelieving. This is the figure of speech which is called Synecdoche.
 That is, "from a part the whole" (_ex parte totum_),--that is to say,
 not to these very spirits, but to those who are like them, and are
 just as unbelieving as they. Thus must we look away from this
 outward, to that inward life.
 
 That is the best rendering, as I think, of those words of St.
 Peter;[6] still I will not too strenuously insist upon it. This at
 least I can scarcely believe, that Christ descended to those souls
 and preached to them; while the Scripture is against it, and declares
 that every one, when he arrives there, must receive according as he
 has believed and lived. Besides, while it is uncertain what is the
 state of the dead, we cannot easily explain this passage as one that
 refers to it. But this is certain, that Christ is present and
 preaches in the heart, wherever a preacher of God's word speaks to
 the ear. Therefore may we safely draw to this conclusion: let him to
 whom a better understanding is manifest, follow the same.
 
 [Footnote 6: The view generally taken by Protestant expositors of
 this passage is, that the preaching here referred to took place in
 the days of Noah, by means of himself or others who were inspired by
 God to teach and warn. Their interpretation would be in effect,--"For
 Christ also suffered for our sins, the just for the unjust (that he
 might bring us to God), being put to death in the flesh, but
 quickened by the Spirit (of God). By which Spirit also he went
 (formerly) and preached to the spirits (now) in prison; which were
 disobedient, when once the long-suffering of God waited, in the days
 of Noah, (120 years,) while the ark was preparing, wherein few,--that
 is, eight souls,--were saved _by_ or _through_ water."]
 
 This is the summary of the sense which I have exhibited: Christ has
 ascended to heaven and preached to the spirits,--that is, to human
 souls; among which human souls have been the unbelieving, as in the
 times of Noah.
 
 
 V. 20. It continues,--_when once the long-suffering of God waited in
 the days of Noah, while the ark was preparing, wherein few, that is,
 eight souls, were saved by water._ Thus does St. Peter bring us into
 the Scriptures, that we may study therein; and gives us an
 illustration out of them, from the ark of Noah, and interprets this
 same figure. For it is pleasant to have one bring forward
 illustrations from such figures, as St. Paul also does when he is
 speaking, Gal. iv., of the two sons of Abraham, and the two women;
 and Christ, in John v., of the serpent which Moses had erected in the
 wilderness. Such comparisons, when well drawn, are delightful;
 wherefore St. Peter introduces this here, that we may be able to
 comprehend faith under a pleasing image.
 
 But he would also tell us, that as it happened when Noah was
 preparing the ark, so it takes place now. As he took refuge in the
 ark which swam upon the waters, so, it is to be observed, must you
 also be saved in baptism. Just as that water swallowed up all that
 was then living, of man and beast,--so baptism also swallows up all
 that is of the flesh and corrupt nature, and makes spiritual men. But
 we rest in the ark, which means the Lord Christ, or the christian
 Church, or the Gospel that Christ preached, or the body of Christ, on
 which we rest by faith, and are saved as Noah in the ark. You also
 perceive how the image comprises in brief what belongs to faith and
 to the cross, to life and death. Where there are only those that
 follow Christ, there is surely a christian Church, where all that
 springs from Adam, and whatever is evil, is removed.
 
 
 V. 21. _The like figure whereunto, even baptism, doth now save us;
 not the putting away of the filth of the flesh, but the answer of a
 good conscience toward God._ But you are not kept and saved by merely
 washing away the filth of the flesh, that the body be clean, as was
 the practice of the Jews; such purification has no further value. But
 the answer of a good conscience toward God,--that is, that you feel
 your conscience to be rightfully at peace within you, that it stands
 in harmony with God, and can say, "He has promised to me that which
 He will fulfil, for He cannot lie." If you shall rely upon and cleave
 to His word, then shall you be preserved. Faith, alone, is the band
 whereby we shall be held; no outward work which you can do will
 suffice.
 
 
 _Through the resurrection of Christ Jesus._ This St. Peter adjoins,
 in order to explain that faith which rests on the fact that Christ
 died, descended to hell, and has risen again from the dead. Had He
 continued subject to death, it would not have advantaged us; but
 since He has risen and sits at the right hand of God, and suffers
 this to be proclaimed to us so that we may believe on Him, we have a
 union with God, and a sure promise, whereby we shall be saved as Noah
 in the ark. Thus has St. Peter given to the ark a spiritual
 significance throughout, within which is not flesh and blood, but a
 good conscience toward God,--and that is faith.
 
 
 V. 22. _Who is gone into heaven, and is on the right hand of God;
 angels, and authorities, and powers, being made subject unto Him._
 This he says for the enlightening and strengthening of our faith. For
 it was necessary that Christ should ascend to heaven and become Lord
 over all creatures and powers universally, that He may bring us
 thither, and make us conquerors. This is said for our consolation,
 that we may know that all powers, whether they be in heaven or earth,
 must serve and aid us, even death and the devil,--since all must
 become subservient, and lie at the feet of the Lord Christ. This
 closes the third chapter. The fourth follows.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER IV.
 
 
 V. 1. _Forasmuch, then, as Christ hath suffered for us in the flesh,
 arm yourselves likewise with the same mind; for he that hath suffered
 in the flesh hath ceased from sin._
 
 
 St. Peter continues still in the same strain. Just as he hitherto has
 admonished us generally that we should suffer, if it be the will of
 God, and has set Christ before us as an example,--so he now confirms
 it more broadly, and repeats it again, saying, While Christ, who is
 our captain and head, has suffered in the flesh and presented us an
 example, (besides that He has ransomed us from our sins,) we also
 should imitate Him, and prepare ourselves, and put on the same armor.
 For in the Scriptures the life of the Lord Christ, and especially his
 suffering, is presented before us in a twofold manner.
 
 Sometimes as a gift, as St. Peter has already exhibited it in the
 third chapter; and to those first, who are built up and instructed in
 the faith that we are ransomed, and our sins taken away by the blood
 of Christ; and so he is a gift and bestowment upon us, which none can
 receive except by faith. Whereof he speaks where he says, "Christ has
 once suffered for our sins." That is certainly the grand doctrine,
 and the most precious one of the Gospel.
 
 Again, Christ is set before us and offered to us as an example and
 pattern for us to follow. For if we only receive Christ, through
 faith, as a free gift, we shall go farther and do ourselves as He has
 done for us, and imitate Him in His whole life and sufferings. In
 this manner St. Peter presents it here. But he does not speak here
 particularly of those marks of the love which leads us to befriend
 our neighbor, and do good, which are called, specifically, good works
 (for he had said enough of this above), but of such evidences as
 concern our personal experience, and are of service in strengthening
 our faith, that sin may be put to death in the flesh, and we thereby
 become of so much better service to our neighbor. For if I control my
 body so that it be not lustful, then can I leave my neighbor, his
 wife or child, at peace; while if I subdue hate and envy, I shall
 become so much better prepared to be kind and friendly toward my
 neighbor.
 
 We have repeated often enough already that we are justified through
 faith, and thus have the Lord Christ as ours; still we must also do
 good works and show kindness to our neighbor. For we are never
 entirely purified while we live on earth, and every one still finds
 in his body evil lusts. The believer indeed prays for the death of
 sin and the gift of heaven, but is not yet become entirely and
 completely strong; but as Christ described the Samaritan, who was not
 yet healed, but was laid under restrictions and directions that he
 might become sound, so it is also with us. If we believe, then is our
 sin restrained,--that is, the disease which we have derived from
 Adam, and we begin to recover. But it is the case, in one more, in
 another less, that in proportion as one mortifies and subdues the
 flesh, so much does his faith increase. So that if we have these two
 things, faith and love, our future experience will be, that we shall
 continue to drive sin before us till we die.
 
 Therefore St. Peter says, _arm yourselves with the same mind_; that
 is, take up a firm purpose, and strengthen yourselves with the mind
 which you receive from Christ; for, if we are Christians, then must
 we also say, My Master has suffered and spilt His blood for me, and
 has died for my sake. Should I then be so base as not to love Him?
 While the Master runs upon the spears' points in the conflict, how
 much more should the servant advance with joy? Thus do we awaken a
 courage such that we press onward, and arm ourselves in our own minds
 so as joyfully to persevere.
 
 The word _flesh_ refers in Scripture not only outwardly to the body,
 but includes all that is derived from Adam. As when God says, in Gen.
 vi.: "My Spirit shall not always strive with men, for they also are
 flesh;" and Isaiah, chap. xl., "All flesh shall see the Salvation of
 God,"--that is, it shall be revealed for all men. So we also make
 confession in our own form of faith, "I believe in the resurrection
 of the flesh," that is, that men shall rise again. So man uniformly
 throughout is called flesh, as he lives here in this state of being.
 
 The marks of the flesh are carefully recounted, one after another, in
 Paul's Epistle to the Galatians v., not only the gross carnal works,
 as lasciviousness, but also the highest and most reckless
 blasphemies, as idolatry and heresy, which belong not only to the
 flesh, but to the reason. We must understand, therefore, that man,
 with his intellectual nature,--and with respect both to that which is
 inward and that which is outward--that is, the body and spirit,--has
 the appellation of flesh; and this, because with all his faculties,
 internal and external, he seeks only that which is carnal, and can
 serve to gratify the flesh. St. Peter says here, too, that Christ
 suffered in the _flesh_, while it is certain that His suffering
 extended further than to the body merely, for His soul suffered the
 greatest anguish, as is said by the prophet Isaiah.
 
 In the same way, also, you are to understand that which follows, in
 the passage before us: "_Whoever hath suffered in the flesh hath
 ceased from sin._" For this implies not only such things as the death
 and the torture of the body, but whatever can work misery to
 man--whatever he endures through calamity and necessity. For there
 are many people who are sound in body, and yet inwardly experience
 much heart-sorrow and anguish. If it comes upon us for Christ's sake,
 it is serviceable and profitable. For whoever suffers in the flesh
 (says he) ceases from sin, and therefore the Holy Cross is
 profitable, that sin may thereby be subdued; since it requires you to
 mortify lust, envy and hate, and other wickedness. Therefore God has
 imposed the Holy Cross upon us that He might urge and constrain us to
 believe, and extend the hand of kindness one to the other. Hereupon
 it follows:
 
 
 V. 2. _That he henceforth, in the time that still remains for him in
 the flesh, should live not according to the lusts of men, but the
 will of God._
 
 
 We should henceforth, as long as we live, hold the flesh captive
 through the Cross, and by mortifications, so as to do that which
 pleases God, and not with the idea that we should or can deserve
 anything by it. _Not according to the lusts of men_ (says he),--that
 is, that we should not do that to which we might yet be tempted by
 others; for we are not to be conformed to this world, as Paul says,
 Rom. xii. What the world demands of us we must refuse.
 
 
 V. 3. _For the time past of our life is enough to have wrought the
 will of the Gentiles, when we walked in lasciviousness, lusts, excess
 of wine, revellings, banquetings and abominable idolatries._
 
 
 We have already gone altogether too far, that before our believing we
 have so shamefully spent our life in accordance with the will of the
 Gentiles, which is the same with lusts of men. Therefore as long as
 life continues we should see to it that we do that which is
 well-pleasing to God; for we have our enemy in our flesh, the one
 that is the real knave--not gross matter merely, but more
 particularly blindness of mind, which Paul calls carnal wisdom,--that
 is, the policy of the flesh. If we have subdued this depravity, that
 other is carefully to be constrained, which does our neighbor injury
 in so secret a manner as not to be observed.
 
 St. Peter calls that lasciviousness that is accompanied with outward
 gestures or words by which evil intentions are expressed, though the
 deed itself be not performed, and it is that which is unchaste to the
 sight and hearing, upon which afterward the lust and the act also
 follow. Thereupon there succeeds such idolatry as is abominable. And
 we may easily bring all this upon us, for when we have lost faith we
 have certainly lost God, also, and may fall into more abominable
 idolatries than the heathen, if we view the matter aright.
 
 
 V. 4-5. _And it surprises them that ye run not with them to the same
 excess of disorderly life, and they calumniate you, who must give
 account to Him that is ready to judge the living and the dead._
 
 
 That is, ye have hitherto lived after the manner of the heathen, but
 since you have now forsaken it, it appears strange to men, and seems
 shameful and foolish, and they say, "What great fools they are to
 withdraw themselves from all worldly good and gratification." But let
 it seem strange to them; let them libel you; they shall yet be
 compelled to give in their account; wherefore leave it to Him that
 will judge righteously.
 
 
 V. 6. _For to this end also was the Gospel preached to the dead, that
 they should be judged according to men in the flesh, but live to God
 in the spirit._
 
 
 Here we have, however, a strange and remarkable text. The words
 clearly declare that the Gospel is preached not only to the living,
 but also to the dead, and adds besides, "in order that they may be
 judged according to men in the flesh." Now they certainly have not
 flesh, which can be understood only of the living. It is a wonderful
 passage, however understood: whether it should be made to refer to
 us, or to concern something foreign, I do not know, yet this is my
 understanding of it. We are not to be anxious how God will condemn
 the heathen who died many centuries ago, but only how He will judge
 those that are now living; so that the passage should be considered
 as spoken of men on earth.
 
 But as to the word _flesh_, you are to understand, as I said above,
 that the entire man is called flesh, according as he lives, just as
 he also is called in respect to his whole nature, spiritual, while he
 follows after that which is spiritual. Still there is also a
 commingling of the two things with one another, just as I say of a
 man who is wounded, that he is whole and yet is wounded; and so, too,
 though the sound part is greater than the wounded part, still he is
 spoken of only with reference to the injured part as wounded; and
 such, too, is the method of the Spirit here: therefore he says, that
 they as to their outward being are condemned, but inwardly, as
 respects the spirit, are preserved in life.
 
 But how does that, where He says that they live, agree with that
 which he subjoins, that they are dead? I will explain it according to
 my understanding, yet not so as to limit the Holy Ghost in that he
 calls the unbelieving dead. For I cannot accept the sense that to
 those that are dead and perished, the Gospel has been preached. This,
 then, would be what St. Peter means, that the Gospel has been freely
 published and universally spread abroad, concealed neither from dead
 nor living--neither from angels nor yet from devils, and preached not
 secretly in a corner, but so publicly that all creatures might hear
 it that have ears to hear, as Christ gave command in the last of
 Mark: "Go ye forth and preach the Gospel to all creatures." If,
 therefore, it is preached in such a manner, there will those be found
 who are condemned after the flesh, but live after the spirit.
 
 
 V. 7. _But the end of all things is at hand._ This is also a
 remarkable passage, for already nearly 1500 years are passed since
 then. St. Peter preached that the time is neither near nor brief, yet
 he says, _that the end of all things is at hand_; as John also
 declares in his first epistle, chap, ii., "It is the last hour." If
 it were not the Apostle's language, we might say it was
 contradictory: but by this we must firmly abide, that the Apostle has
 truth with him. Yet what he means here he shall explain himself in
 the second epistle, where he tells us why the time is said to be
 near, and says: "One day is with the Lord as a thousand years, and a
 thousand years as one day;" of which I have spoken above. So that we
 must explain it in this manner, that it shall not be as long
 hereafter to the end of the world as it has been from the beginning
 to the present time. And it is not to be expected that one should
 live two or three thousand years after the birth of Christ, so that
 the end shall come before we look for it. Wherefore he further adds:
 
 
 V. 7, 8. _Be ye therefore sober, and watch unto prayer. And above all
 things have fervent charity among yourselves: for charity shall cover
 the multitude of sins._
 
 
 Here you perceive the reason why we are to watch and be sober;
 namely, that we may be prepared to pray for ourselves and our
 neighbors. Since charity cannot be fervent unless you keep the body
 in subjection, that charity may have place within you. Here St. Peter
 has quoted a passage from the book of Proverbs, ch. x. 12. _Hate
 stirreth up strife, but love covereth the multitude of sins._ And
 this is what St. Peter means: Subdue your flesh and lusts: unless you
 do it, you will easily offend one another, and yet not easily be able
 to forgive one another. Take care, therefore, that you subdue the
 wicked lusts, so you shall be able to show charity one to another,
 and to forgive, for charity covereth sins.
 
 This passage has been explained to the prejudice of faith, inasmuch
 as they tell us: "You say that faith alone makes us righteous, and
 that no one through works may be free from sin. Why then do Solomon
 and Peter, as in this passage, say, _love covers sins_?" Answer.
 Whoever has hatred toward another, says Solomon, ceases not to stir
 up strife and bitterness. But where there is love, it covers sins and
 cheerfully forgives. Where there is wrath, or in other words, where
 there is an intractable man, reconciliation is not permitted; he
 remains full of wrath and hate. On the other hand, a man who is full
 of love is he whom one cannot enrage, however much injury may be done
 him; he perceives it all, but does as though he saw it not. So that
 the _covering_ is spoken of as regards our neighbor, and not as it
 respects God. Nothing shall cover up sin before God for you, except
 faith. But my love covers the sin of my neighbor; and just as God
 with His love covers my sins, if I believe, so too should I cover my
 neighbor's sins. Therefore He says, Ye should have charity one to
 another, that one may cover the other's sins. And love covers not
 only one, two, or three sins, but the multitude of sins; cannot
 suffer and do too much; covers up all. So St. Paul also speaks and
 teaches in accordance with this passage, I. Cor. xiii. 7. _Charity
 beareth all things, believeth all things, hopeth all things, endureth
 all things._ It has respect to the best good of all, can suffer all,
 and take for the best whatever shall be imposed upon it. There
 follows, further:
 
 
 V. 9. _Be hospitable one to another without grudging, and minister
 one to another, as every one has received the gift._ He is said to be
 hospitable who cheerfully acts the host. When the Apostles went
 abroad one with another and preached, and sent their younger brethren
 here and there, it was necessary that one should lodge the other. How
 well would it be, even now, that men should preach from one place to
 another, from city to city, from house to house,--and without
 remaining too long in one place, might see to it that where one was
 weak he should be helped, and where one had fallen down he should be
 lifted up, and things of that sort. St. Peter directs that this
 should take place without murmuring; that no one should suffer it to
 seem too much for him. This is also a work of love, as it follows
 immediately afterward, that we should minister to one another!
 Wherewith? With the gifts of God which every one has received. The
 gospel directs that every one be the servant of the other, and
 beside, see to it that he abide in the gift which he has received,
 which God has bestowed upon him; that is, the state, whatever it be,
 whereunto he has been called.
 
 God's will is not that a lord should serve his servant, that the maid
 be as the mistress, and a prince serve the beggar;--for he will not
 break down magistracy. But his meaning is, that men should serve one
 another spiritually, with their hearts: although you are a high and
 great lord, yet should you employ your power to this end, that you
 may therewith serve your neighbor. Thus should every one hold himself
 for a servant; the lord may still remain a lord, and yet hold
 himself, in his own esteem, no better than the servant: so that he
 even cheerfully would become a servant if it were God's ordering; and
 the same is applicable to other conditions.
 
 
 V. 10. _As good stewards of the manifold grace of God._ God has not
 bestowed upon us all like grace; therefore should every one inquire
 to what he has been appointed, and what kind of gift has been
 bestowed upon him. When he discovers this, let him use it for the
 service of his neighbor, as St. Peter further explains, and says:
 
 
 V. 11. _If any man speak, let him speak as the word of God._ That is,
 if any one has the grace that enables him to preach and teach, let
 him teach and preach. As St. Paul says, also, Rom. xii. 3: "That no
 one think more of himself than he ought to think, but every man
 according as God has dealt to him the measure of faith. For as we
 have many members in one body and all members have not the same
 office, so we, being many, are one body in Christ, and every one
 members one of another; and have many gifts, differing according to
 the grace that has been given unto us." And then follows, "Has any
 one a prophecy, let it be in accordance with faith; Has any one a
 ministry, let him wait on his ministering: Does any one teach, let
 him wait on his teaching." He teaches the same doctrine also
 elsewhere, in his Epistles to the Corinthians and Ephesians.
 
 For this reason has God distributed various gifts among men which
 should be employed to this intent alone, that one should minister
 therewith to another, especially those who are in authority, be it in
 preaching, or some other ministry.
 
 Now St. Peter says, here, _If any one speak, let him speak as the
 word of God._ This point is worthy of special remark, that no one is
 to preach anything but what he is sure is the word of God. There St.
 Peter has shut up the Pope's mouth, and lo! he will be St. Peter's
 successor, so cunningly has he managed it. Further:
 
 
 V. 11. _If any one ministers, let him do it as of the ability which
 God giveth._ That is, whoever rules in the christian church and has
 an office or ministry for the care of souls, he is not to proceed as
 he may choose, and say, "I am sovereign lord, I must be obeyed; what
 I do shall remain established." God requires that we should do no
 otherwise than as he directs. So that since it is God's work and
 ordinance, let a bishop do nothing except he be sure that God
 sanctions it, that it is either God's word or work.
 
 And besides, inasmuch as God will not permit that we should regard as
 a matter of sport what we do with the christian church, we must stand
 in such an assurance as this, that God speaks and works through us,
 and that our faith may also say, "That which I have spoken and done,
 God also has spoken and done; on this I will even die."
 
 And yet if I am not certain of the matter, then my faith will rest
 upon the sand when the devil assaults me. Thus here it is
 emphatically forbidden us to receive the command of any bishop,
 unless it is also the case, that he is certain that he does what God
 does, and can say, "I have God's word and command for it." Where that
 is wanting, we must hold him for a liar.
 
 For God has prescribed that our conscience must rest on the bare
 rock. This is said also of government in general, that no one might
 follow his own darkness, and that nothing might be done of which he
 was not sure that God would sanction it. Whence you perceive how St.
 Peter so long ago thrust down to the ground the government of Popes
 and bishops, as we have it at the present day. Now follows:
 
 
 V. 11. _That God in all things may be glorified through our Lord
 Jesus Christ, to whom be praise and dominion for ever and ever;
 Amen._ For this reason it is, you are to be so confident, (he means),
 that God speaks and does all that you speak and do. For if you
 perform a work of which you are not sure that God has done it, you
 cannot praise and give thanks. But where a man is certain of it, in
 that case he may praise and thank Him for His word and works' sake,
 though he should be belied and held up for derision. Therefore it is
 a shameful and ruinous thing that in Christendom any one should
 govern in opposition to the word and works of God. Therefore, from
 necessity, has St. Peter subjoined that in which he instructs how
 government should be ordered among christian people. Then follows,
 further:
 
 
 V. 12. _Beloved, be not surprised at the fiery trial which is to try
 you, as though some strange thing happened unto you._ That is a mode
 of speech not common in our language. But St. Peter uses this very
 phraseology, in order to remind us of that concerning which the Holy
 Scripture speaks. For the Scripture is accustomed to speak of
 suffering as though it were a furnace full of fire and heat. St.
 Peter has spoken in the same manner, above, in the first chapter:
 "That the trial of your faith be found far more precious than the
 perishing gold that is tried by fire." We may also read in the
 prophet Isaiah, chap. xlviii., God says: "I have tried thee in the
 furnace of affliction;" and Ps. xvi., "With fire hast thou tried me;"
 and Ps. xxv., "Lord, thou wilt consume and destroy my nerves and my
 heart;" also, Ps. lxv., "We have passed through fire and water." Thus
 the Scriptures are accustomed to illustrate what we call suffering,
 by burning or trial by fire. This is St. Peter's conclusion, that we
 should not suffer ourselves to be surprised, or to think it strange
 and wonderful that the heat or fire should meet us, whereby we are
 tried, just as gold is when it is melted in the fire.
 
 When faith begins, God does not neglect it; He lays the cross upon
 our back in order to strengthen us and make our faith mighty. The
 Gospel is a powerful word, but it cannot enter upon its work without
 opposition, and no one can be sure that it possesses such power, but
 he who has experienced it. Where there is suffering and the cross,
 there its power may be shown and exercised. It is a _living_ word,
 and therefore it must exercise all its energy upon the dead. But if
 there is no such thing as death and corruption, there is nothing for
 it to do, and none can be certain that it possesses such virtue, and
 is stronger than sin and death. Therefore, he says, _are you tried_;
 that is, God appoints for you no flame or heat (in other words, cross
 and suffering, which make you glow as in a furnace), except to try
 you, whether you rely upon His word. Thus it is written, Wisdom x.,
 of Jacob, "God appointed for him a severe conflict, that he might
 learn by experience that divine wisdom is the strongest of all
 things." That is the reason why God imposes the cross on all
 believers, that they may taste and prove the power of God which
 through faith they have possessed.
 
 
 V. 13. _But be ye partakers of the sufferings of Christ._ St. Peter
 does not say that we should feel the sufferings of Christ, that
 thereby we should be partakers with Him through faith, but would say
 this: just as Christ has suffered, so are you to expect to suffer and
 be tried. If you do thus suffer, then do you therein have fellowship
 with the Lord Christ. If we would live with Him, we must also die
 with Him. If I wish to sit with Him in His kingdom, I must also
 suffer with Him, as Paul also says, repeatedly.
 
 
 V. 13. _Rejoice, that in the time of the revelation of His glory, ye
 may be glad with exceeding joy._ Though you should be brought to
 torture and the flames, you would still be happy. For though there be
 pain as to the body, there shall yet be a spiritual joy, inasmuch as
 you are to be happy forever. For this joy springs here from
 suffering, and is everlasting. Yet whoever cannot bear his sufferings
 cheerfully, and is dissatisfied, and chooses to contend with God, he
 shall endure, both here and hereafter, eternal torment and suffering.
 Thus we read of holy martyrs, that they have submitted cheerfully to
 torture, thus opening the way to eternal enjoyment; as for instance,
 of St. Agatha, that she went as joyfully to prison as though it had
 been to a dance. And the Apostles went also with joy, and thanked God
 "that they were counted worthy to suffer for Christ's sake."
 
 
 _In the time of the revelation of His glory._ Christ does not permit
 Himself as yet to be seen as a Lord, but is still a sharer with us in
 our labors. So far as He is Himself concerned, He is truly such, but
 we who are His members, are not Lords as yet. Still we shall yet be
 Lords, when His glory at the last day shall be revealed before all
 men, brighter than the sun.
 
 
 V. 14. _If ye be reproached for the name of Christ, happy are you._
 Christ is a hateful name with the world; whoever preaches of Him must
 endure to have the most esteemed on earth slander and revile his
 name. But this in our times is more strange and unseemly, that they
 who persecute us bear also the name of Christ; they say they are
 Christians and baptized, yet in fact renounce and persecute Christ.
 This is indeed a sad strife. They hold the same name as tenaciously
 as we do, against us. For this reason we greatly need
 consolation,--although the most discreet and pious follow after
 us,--that we may abide firmly and remain cheerful. But how?
 
 
 V. 14. _For the Spirit of glory and of God resteth upon you. On their
 part He is evil spoken of, but on your part He is glorified._ Ye (he
 says) have within you a Spirit, that is, the Spirit of God and of
 glory, such as makes you glorious. But this does not take place on
 earth, but it shall take place when the glory of Christ shall be
 revealed at the last day. Besides, He is not only a Spirit that makes
 us glorious, but one which we also regard as glorious in Himself. For
 it belongs peculiarly to the Holy Spirit to purify and glorify, even
 as He has made Christ pure and glorious. Now the same Spirit (he
 says) rests upon you; and forasmuch as ye bear the name of Christ, it
 is slandered by them. For He must endure to be reviled and slandered,
 to the highest degree. Therefore it is not you who receive the
 reviling; it belongs to the Spirit, which is a Spirit of glory: be
 not anxious; He will regard it and raise you to honor. This is the
 consolation which we as Christians have, that we may say, That word
 is not mine, this faith is not mine, they are all the work of God:
 whoever reviles me reviles God, as Christ says in Matthew x.,
 "Whoever receiveth you receiveth me;" and on the other hand, "Whoever
 reviles you reviles me." St. Peter, therefore, would say, Know that
 the Spirit which you have is strong enough easily to punish His
 enemies; as God says also in Ex. xxiii., If thou wilt hearken to my
 commandments, I will be the enemy of thine enemies. And the Scripture
 often repeats it, that the enemies of the saints are the enemies of
 God. If we only have experience that we are Christians, and believe,
 we shall not be ashamed, but the reviling is directed more especially
 against God Himself. Therefore, he says, be ye cheerful and happy,
 for that opposition is to the Spirit, which is not yours, but God's.
 Now he adds an admonition:
 
 
 V. 15, 16. _But let no one suffer as a murderer, or a thief, or an
 evil-doer, or a busy-body in other men's matters; but if any man
 suffer as a Christian, let him not be ashamed, but let him glorify
 God on this behalf._ He would say, now, You have heard how you are to
 suffer, and conduct yourselves under it, but beware that it do not
 come upon you because you have deserved it on account of your evil
 deeds, but for Christ's sake. Yet this is not now the case with us,
 for we must suffer, notwithstanding the fact that those who persecute
 us bear also the name of Christ, so that no one can die because he is
 a Christian, but only as an enemy of Christ, and even they who
 persecute him say they are real Christians, and say, too, that he is
 blessed who dies for Christ's sake. Here the Spirit alone must
 determine, since you must know that you are a Christian in the sight
 of God. God's tribunal is a secret one, and when He has uncovered the
 matter, He will judge no more according to the name, since at that
 time the name of the most exalted must vanish away.
 
 Now, St. Peter says, If ye suffer in this manner, _be ye not ashamed,
 but glorify God._ Here he makes the suffering and anguish the more
 welcome, because it is great, insomuch that we praise God through it,
 and because we are not worthy of it. Yet now all will shrink
 therefrom. Of what advantage is it to embrace the cross in
 monasteries? The cross of Christ does not save me. I must, indeed,
 believe in His cross, but I must myself bear my own cross. His
 suffering must I experience inwardly, if I would possess the true
 treasure. Let St. Peter's bones be holy, yet how does it help you?
 You and your bones should be holy, too, which can take place only
 when you suffer for Christ's sake.
 
 
 V. 17. _For the time is come that judgment must begin at the house of
 God; and if it first begin at us, what shall the end be of them that
 obey not the Gospel of God?_ He here brings two passages from the
 prophets together in one. As to the first, Jeremiah says, xxv.:
 "Behold, I send my judgments upon the city which is called by my
 name; and if first of all I afflict my dearly beloved children who
 believe on me, who first of all must suffer and past through the
 fire, do ye who are my enemies, ye who do not believe, suppose that
 ye shall escape punishment?" So in chap. xlix. he says: "They whose
 judgment was not to drink the cup, have assuredly drunken, and
 thinkest thou that thou art he that shall not drink?" That is, I
 strike my beloved, that you may see how I shall treat my enemies.
 Observe here the force of the words: if God holds his saints in such
 esteem, yet has been willing to have them judged and exposed with
 such severity, what will then be done with the others?
 
 So also Ezekiel, chap. ix., saw armed men with their swords, who were
 to slay all, to whom God said, begin at my sanctuary. That is what
 St. Peter means in this place. Therefore he says, the time is come,
 as the prophets have foretold, when judgment must begin with us. When
 the Gospel is preached, God arrests and punishes sin, since it is He
 that kills and makes alive. The pious he gently strokes, and first of
 all is the rod of kind correction: but what then will be done with
 those that do not believe? As though he had said, if He proceeds with
 such severity toward His own children, you may infer what must be the
 punishment of those who do not believe.
 
 
 V. 18. _And if the righteous scarcely be saved, where shall the
 ungodly and the sinner appear?_ This passage is also taken from the
 book of Proverbs, chap. ii. 31.: "If the righteous be recompensed in
 the earth, where shall the godless abide?" The same thing also is
 said here by St. Peter. The righteous can hardly be saved and only
 just escapes. The righteous is he who believes, yet in his faith,
 even, _he_ has trouble and labor in order to persevere and be saved,
 for he must pass through the fire. Where then will _he_ be found who
 has not faith? If God gives thus to faith a shock that makes it
 tremble, how can _he_ abide steadfast who is without faith? whence he
 concludes:
 
 
 V. 19. _Wherefore let them that suffer according to the will of God,
 commit their souls to Him as a faithful creator, in well-doing._ That
 is, they to whom God appoints suffering, that they have not
 themselves sought out and invited, should commit their souls to his
 charge. These are they that do good, abide in good works, fall not
 away because of suffering, commit themselves to their Creator, who is
 faithful. This is to us a great consolation. God created thy soul
 without thy care or cooperation, while as yet thou wast not; so is he
 also able to preserve it. Therefore commit thyself to Him, yet in
 such a way that it be joined with good works. Not that you are to
 think,--now I will not be afraid to die; you must see to it that you
 are a true Christian and prove your faith by your works. But if you
 go on so venturously, it will be wise to examine how it will go with
 you. This is the last admonition which St. Peter gives to those that
 suffer for Christ's sake. We pass now to
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER V.
 
 
 V. 1-4. _The elders which are among you I exhort, who am also an
 elder, and a witness of the sufferings of Christ, and partaker of the
 glory which shall be revealed. Feed the flock of Christ which is
 among you, and take the oversight of it, not by constraint, but
 willingly, not for the love of vile gain, but of a ready mind, not as
 Lords over the heritage, but be ye examples for the flock. Thus when
 the Chief Shepherd shall appear, ye shall receive the enduring
 crown._
 
 
 There St. Peter gives a direction for the behaviour of such as are to
 preside over the people in the spiritual government. He has already
 said in the last chapter, that no one should teach or preach
 anything, unless he be sure that it is the word of God, so that our
 conscience may stand on the firm rock. For this is imperative on us
 as Christians, that we must be assured what is well-pleasing to God,
 or not. Where this is wanting none can be a Christian. Afterward he
 taught us, that whatever work or office any one might have, he should
 discharge it as though God wrought in it. But the present passage
 refers particularly to the bishops or pastors as to what their
 fitness and conduct should be. But here you must pause and learn the
 meaning of the words. The expression presbyter or priest is a Greek
 word, rendered in Dutch an elder, just as in Latin these were called
 senators; that is, a number of aged, careful men of much experience.
 So Christ also has called his officers and his council, who bear
 spiritual rule; that is, who are to preach and provide for some
 christian church. Therefore you must not mistake, though they are
 called at the present day by a different title, priests. For of those
 who are now called priests, Scripture knows nothing. Put the real
 state of things as it now comes to pass out of sight, and apprehend
 the matter thus: that St. Peter and the other Apostles, when they
 arrived at a city where there were faithful people or Christians,
 have selected there some few aged men of honorable standing, having
 wife and children, and being well-grounded in the Scriptures. These
 were called presbyters. After this Peter and Paul call them
 _Episcopos_, that is, bishop. So that priest and bishop are one and
 the same thing. Of this we have a fine example in the legend of St.
 Martyn, where an individual, with several companions, arrives in
 Africa at a certain place, and perceives a man lying there in a
 hovel, whom they took for a husbandman, though they knew not who he
 was. Afterwards, when the people had come together at that place,
 this very man arose and preached, when they perceived that it was
 their pastor or bishop; for at that time they were not distinguished
 from other people by their peculiar kind of clothing and attendance.
 
 Those elders, says St. Peter, who are to care for and to oversee the
 people, do I admonish, who am also one. Hence you clearly perceive
 that they whom he calls _elders_, have been in the ministry and have
 preached, since he speaks of himself also as an elder. And here St.
 Peter humbles himself--does not say that he was a Lord, although he
 might have had authority for it since he was an Apostle of Christ,
 and speaks of himself not only as a fellow-elder, but also as a
 witness of the sufferings that were in Christ. As though he had said,
 I do not merely preach, but am a partaker with Christians, even
 suffering Christians. Thereby he shows that wherever Christians are
 they must suffer and be persecuted. Such is a genuine Apostle. If
 such a Pope or a bishop were to be found among these men that bear
 the title at the present day, we would gladly kiss his feet.
 
 
 _And partaker of the glory which shall be revealed._ This is
 something still more exalted, and evidently a bishop must not lightly
 say it. For here St. Peter claims to be a saint. He was certain that
 he should be saved, for he had strong assurance, as when Christ said,
 "I have chosen you"--yet it had cost much pains ere the Apostles
 attained it. They must first be humbled and wickedly derided. Now,
 although he knew that he was a partaker of salvation, still he is not
 proud, neither does he exalt himself, although he is a saint. But
 what were the elders therefore to do? It follows:
 
 
 V. 2. _Feed the flock of Christ which is among you._ Christ is the
 chief Shepherd, and has many shepherds under Him,--as also many herds
 of sheep which He has committed to His shepherds, here and there, as
 St. Peter writes in this place, in many lands. What are these
 shepherds to do? They are to feed the flock of Christ. This the Pope
 has arrogated to himself, and thus claims that he is sovereign lord,
 and will dispose of the sheep as he chooses. We know very well what
 feeding is,--namely, that the shepherd should distribute provision
 and set food before the sheep, that they may thrive. Besides, they
 are to guard lest the wolves come and rend the sheep,--that is, that
 they may not assault and worry them.
 
 Now St. Peter says, particularly, the _flock of Christ_, as though he
 should say: Do not imagine that the flock is yours, ye are only
 servants. But our bishops speak with all confidence the reverse of
 this. They say, you are _my_ sheep. But we are Christ's sheep; for so
 he said above, "Ye are now returned to the Shepherd and Bishop of
 your souls." The bishops are Christ's servants, and their business is
 to guard Christ's sheep, and feed them. Therefore to feed them is
 nothing else but to preach the Gospel, whereby souls are nourished,
 made fat and fruitful,--since the sheep thrive upon the Gospel and
 the word of God. This is alone the office of a bishop. So Christ says
 also to Peter, "Feed my sheep,"--that is, the sheep which you are to
 feed, are not yours, but mine. Yet from this they have inferred the
 doctrine that the Pope has external power over all Christendom, and
 yet none of them preaches to you one word out of the Gospel; and I
 fear that since St. Peter's times there has been no Pope that has
 preached the Gospel. There has certainly been none who has written
 and left anything behind him in which the Gospel was contained. Saint
 Gregory, the Pope, was certainly a holy man, but his sermons are not
 worth a farthing; so that it would seem that the See of Rome has been
 under the special curse of God. It is very possible that some Popes
 may have endured martyrdom for the Gospel's sake; but nothing has
 been written of them to show that it was the Gospel. And yet they go
 on and preach that they must feed the flock; and yet they do nothing
 but bind and destroy the conscience, by laws of their own, while they
 preach not a word of Christ.
 
 It is probable, indeed, that among all Christians many might be
 found, both men and women, as able to preach as those who are thus
 employed. But certainly among all these multitudes there are many
 people who have not this ability. And therefore some one must be
 selected to strengthen them, so that the wolves shall not come and
 tear the sheep. For a preacher must not only feed the sheep, so as to
 instruct them how they are to be good Christians, but, besides this,
 must guard against the wolves, lest they attack the sheep and lead
 them astray with false doctrine, and introduce error such as the
 devil would not find fault with. But there are many people to be
 found at the present day, quite ready to tolerate our preaching of
 the Gospel, if we would not cry out against the wolves and preach
 against the prelates.
 
 But though I were to preach the simple truth, and feed the sheep and
 give them good instruction, still it is not enough unless the sheep
 be guarded and protected, so that the wolves do not come and carry
 them off. For what is it that is built, if I throw out one stone and
 see another thrown into its place? The wolf can very readily endure
 to have the sheep well fed; he had rather have it so, that they may
 be fat. But this he cannot endure, the hostile bark of the dogs.
 Therefore is it a most important matter, if well considered, that we
 should truly feed the flock, as God has commanded it.
 
 
 _The flock_, he says, _which is among you_,--that is, which is with
 you, not that they are to lie at your feet. And _oversee them not by
 constraint, but willingly, not out of love for vile gain._ There he
 has expressed, in a single word, what the prophet Ezekiel writes,
 chap. xxxiv., of shepherds or bishops. And this is the meaning: you
 are not only to feed them, but also pay attention and be carefully
 faithful where it is called for and there is need. And here he uses a
 Greek word, _Episcopountes_,--that is, _being bishops_, and it comes
 from the word _Episcopos_,--that is, rendered in Dutch, _an
 overseer_, _a guardian_, who is on the watch or look-out, and takes
 notice of what every one around him wants. Observe, then, how a
 bishop and an elder are one and the same thing. So that _that_ is
 false which they now say, that the bishop's office is a dignity, and
 that _he_ is a bishop who wears a pointed hat on his head. It is not
 a dignity, but a ministry; so that he who has it should oversee and
 provide for us, and be our guardian, so as to know what is generally
 needed; that when one is weak and has a troubled conscience, he
 should then give help and comfort; when one falls, that he should
 raise him up, and things of this sort; so that the people of Christ
 may sufficiently be cared for, both in soul and body. For this
 reason, I have often said, that if a proper form of government was to
 be now established, there must in such a case be in one city as many
 as three or four bishops, who should have the oversight and care of
 the Church, providing for the general wants.
 
 And here St. Peter touches on two points which might well appall any
 one from taking the charge over a people. In the first place, there
 are some to be found who are truly devoted, yet yield reluctantly to
 becoming preachers; for it is a wearisome office for any one to have
 the general oversight,--how the sheep live, so as to direct and help
 them,--since there must be oversight and watchfulness night and day,
 that the wolf do not break in; so that body and life must be devoted
 to it. Therefore he says, _you are not to do it of constraint_. True
 it is, that no one should force himself uncalled into the ministry;
 but if he is called and required for it, he should enter it
 willingly, and discharge what his office demands. For they who do it
 from constraint, and who have no appetite and love for it, will not
 properly discharge it.
 
 But there are others, worse than these, who stand up before the
 people and thereby seek their own gain, so as to feed their own
 belly. These men are anxious for the wool and milk of the sheep; they
 ask no questions about the food,--just the course of our bishops
 now,--a thing that has become almost everywhere a scandal and a
 shame, for in a bishop it is especially scandalous. For this reason
 both the apostles Peter and Paul, as well as the prophets also, have
 repeatedly spoken of it. So Moses says, "You know that I have coveted
 no man's cattle." The prophet Samuel, also, "You know that I have
 taken of you no man's ass or ox." For if he whose duty it is to feed
 the flock is anxious merely for wealth and gain, he will in a short
 time become a wolf himself.
 
 
 V. 2. _But of a ready mind._ That is, that a bishop have an appetite
 and inclination thereto. This is the character of those who willingly
 minister, and do not seek the wool of the sheep. Thus we have two
 kinds of false shepherds: the one, those who serve unwillingly; the
 other, those who do it gladly, but for the sake of avarice.--Further,
 he says:
 
 
 V. 3. _Not as lords over the heritage._ This is the character of
 those who rule willingly enough for honor's sake, in order that they
 may rise high, and become powerful tyrants. Therefore he admonishes
 them that they should not act as though the people was subject to
 them, so that they might be gentlemen, and might do as they chose.
 For we have a Master, who is Christ, who rules over our spirits. The
 bishops are to do no more than feed the sheep. Here St. Peter has
 broken down and condemned all that rule which the Pope now maintains,
 and clearly determines that they have not power to give one word of
 additional command, but that they are to be only servants, and say,
 "Thus saith Christ thy Master, therefore you are to do it." So Christ
 also speaks: "The kings of this world have dominion, and men call
 them who are in authority their gracious lords; but you are not to be
 like them." Now the Pope speaks the reverse,--"Ye shall rule and have
 authority."
 
 
 V. 3-4. _But be ye an example for the flock; so shall ye, when the
 Chief Shepherd shall appear, receive the enduring crown._ That is,
 see to it that you go before them at their head, and exhibit such a
 conduct that your life may be an example to the people, and they may
 follow after you. But our bishops say to the people, "Go there and do
 so and so;" and they sit on cushions and play the gentleman, imposing
 burdens on us which they will not bear themselves, while they will
 not preach a word, and call others to account if they have not done
 it for them. But if it should be required of them, they would soon be
 weary of their dignity.
 
 Therefore St. Peter does not appoint any temporal reward for bishops.
 As though he would say, "Your office is so great that it never can be
 rewarded here, but ye shall receive an eternal crown, which shall
 follow it, if ye truly feed the sheep of Christ." This is the
 admonition which St. Peter gives to those who are to care for souls,
 from whence you may confidently infer and clearly prove, that the
 Pope, along with his bishops, is Antichrist, or an enemy of Christ,
 since he does nothing of that which St. Peter here requires, and
 neither teaches nor practices it himself, but even acts the
 counterpart, and will not only not feed the sheep or let them be fed,
 but is himself a wolf and tears them, and yet makes it his boast that
 he is the vicar of the Lord Christ. He certainly is that, for since
 Christ is not there, he, like the devil, sits and rules in Christ's
 place.
 
 Whence it is necessary carefully to remember these plain texts and
 others like them, and to hold them up against the Pope's government,
 so that when any one asks or questions you, you may be able to answer
 and say, "Christ said and practised so and so; the Pope teaches and
 practices directly the opposite. Since they are opposed to one
 another one of them must be false; but certainly Christ is not.
 Whence I conclude that the Pope is a liar and the real Antichrist."
 
 In this way must you be prepared with Scripture, so that you can not
 only challenge the Pope as Antichrist, but know how to prove it
 clearly, so that you could die secure of it, and withstand the devil
 even in death.--It follows, further:
 
 
 V. 5. _Likewise, ye younger, submit yourselves unto the elders._ We
 have now the last admonition in this chapter. St. Peter would have
 such order in the christian church, that the young should follow the
 old, so that all may go on harmoniously; those beneath submissive to
 those above them. If this were now to be enforced, we should not need
 many laws. He would strictly have it so that the younger shall be
 directed according to the understanding of the older, as these shall
 best judge that it shall be for the praise of God. But St. Peter
 presumes that such elders are to be instructed and established in the
 Holy Ghost. For should it happen that they are themselves fools, and
 without understanding, no good government could originate with them;
 but if they are persons of good understanding, then it is well that
 they should rule the youth. But St. Peter is not speaking here of
 civil, but of church government, that the elders should rule those
 that are spiritually younger, whether they be priests or even old
 men.
 
 
 _Be ye all of you subject one to another, and therein manifest
 humility._ Here he turns and modifies his command, directing each to
 be subject one to another. But how is that consistent, that the
 elders should rule, and yet all should be subject one to the other?
 Are we then to overturn what has been said? Some one perhaps would
 give such a gloss as this, that St. Peter spoke above of the
 elders,--here he speaks of the younger. But we shall let the words
 stand, granting that they are spoken generally; as Paul also says in
 Rom. xii., "That each in honor prefer one another." The younger
 should be subject to the old, yet in such a manner that the latter
 shall not regard themselves as masters, but even should submit and
 follow, where a younger is more judicious and learned; just as God in
 the Old Testament often selected young men, provided they were more
 wise than the old.
 
 So Christ also teaches, in Luke xiv.: "When thou art bidden, sit not
 down in the highest place, lest a more honorable than thou be bidden,
 and then he that bade thee and him come and say to thee, give this
 man place; and thou begin with shame to take the lower place; but
 when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest place, that when
 he that bade thee cometh, he may say unto thee: Friend, go up
 higher;" and then he introduces the passage as it is found in many
 places: "He who exalteth himself shall be humbled, and he that
 humbleth himself shall be exalted."
 
 Therefore should the younger be subject to the elder, and yet the
 elder on the other hand should be so disposed that each one in his
 heart shall hold himself as the least. Were this done we should have
 delightful peace, and all would go well on earth. This, therefore,
 says he, should we do, _exhibit humility_.
 
 
 _For God resisteth the proud but giveth grace to the humble._ That
 is, those who will not give place God casts down; and on the other
 hand, he exalts those who humble themselves. It is a common
 expression--would to God he lived like common folks.
 
 
 V. 6. _Humble yourselves therefore under the mighty hand of God._
 Since God requires that each should be subject to the other; if it is
 done willingly and cheerfully, he will exalt you. But if you will not
 do it willingly, you shall do it from constraint. He will cast you
 down.
 
 
 _That He may exalt you in his own time._ It seems, when God suffers
 his own children to be cast down, as though he would at length desert
 them. Therefore he says: Do not mistake on this account, and suffer
 yourself to be blinded, but be confident, since you have a sure
 promise that it is God's hand and will. Therefore should you not
 regard the time, however long it be, that you are brought low; for
 though He has cast you down, He will yet lift you up. Hence it
 follows:
 
 
 V. 7. _Cast all your cares upon Him, for He careth for you._ You have
 such a promise as this, whereby you may rest secure that God doth not
 forsake you, _but careth for you_. Therefore let all your cares go,
 and cast your burden on Him. These words are exceedingly precious;
 how could He have made them more sweet or tender? Why does He employ
 so great allurement? It is in order that no one might easily despond
 and give up his purpose. Therefore He gives us such consolation as
 this: that God not only looks upon us, but cares also for us, and has
 a heartfelt regard for our lot. He further says:
 
 
 V. 8. _Be sober, be vigilant, for your adversary the devil goeth
 about as a roaring lion, seeking whom he may devour._ Here he gives
 us a warning, and would open our eyes, and it would be well worthy
 that the text should be written in golden letters. Here you perceive
 what this life is, and how it is described, so that we might well be
 ever wishing that we were dead. We are here in the devil's kingdom,
 just as in case a pilgrim should arrive at an inn, where he knew that
 all in the house were robbers; if he must enter there he will yet arm
 himself in the best way he can devise, and will sleep but little: so
 are we now on earth, where the prince is an evil spirit, and has the
 hearts of men in his power, doing by them as he will. It is a fearful
 thought if we properly regard it. Therefore St. Peter would warn us
 to take heed to ourselves, and act the part of a faithful servant,
 who knows the state of things here. For this reason he says: be
 sober, for they who indulge themselves here in eating and drinking,
 and are like fat swine, are such as can be fitted for nothing useful.
 Therefore must we have ever by us such a talisman as this.
 
 And be vigilant (he says), not only as to the spirit but also as to
 the body. For a vitiated body, prone to sleep when it eats and drinks
 itself full, will give the devil no opposition, though it belong even
 to those swine who have a faith and spirit.
 
 Wherefore should we then be sober and vigilant? _Because your enemy
 the devil goeth about as a roaring lion, seeking whom he may devour._
 The evil spirit, sleeps not--is cunning and wicked. He has purposed
 with himself that he will assault us, and he knows the right trick
 therefor; goes about like a lion that is hungry, and roars as though
 he would gladly devour all. Here St. Peter gives us an important
 admonition, and forewarns us of our enemy, that we may protect
 ourselves against him; as Paul also says, "we are not ignorant of the
 devices of the wicked spirit." That "going about" tends to make us
 heedless, and thereupon follow wrath, hatred, pride, lust, contempt
 of God.
 
 And here observe especially, that he says _the devil goeth about_. He
 does not pass before your eyes, when you are armed against him, but
 looks out before and behind you, within and without, where he may
 attack you. If he now meets you here, he will quickly return there,
 and attack you in another place; he changes from one side to the
 other, and employs every kind of cunning and art that he may bring
 you to fall; and if you are well prepared in one place, he will
 quickly fall in upon another; and if he cannot overthrow you there,
 then he assaults you somewhere else, and so never gives it up, but
 goes round and round, and leaves no rest to any one. If we then are
 fools and do not regard it, but go on and take no heed, then has he
 as good as seized upon us.
 
 Let every one now look to this; surely each shall trace something of
 this in his own experience. He that has examined knows it well.
 Therefore it is so sad for us that we go about so heedlessly. If we
 rightly regard it, we should cry out, _death rather than life_. Job
 has spoken thus: "Man's life on earth is nothing but an encampment, a
 mere conflict and strife." Why then does God thus leave us in life
 and misery? In order that faith may be exercised and grow, and that
 hastening out of this life, we may have a desire of death, and an
 anxiety to depart.
 
 
 V. 9. _Whom withstand, firm in the faith._ Sober you should be, and
 vigilant, but to this end,--the body must be in a proper frame. Yet
 with all this, the devil is not routed; this only suffices to afford
 the body less occasion for sin. The true sword is this, that ye be
 strong and firm in the faith. If you in heart grasp hold of the word
 of God and maintain your hold by faith, then the devil cannot gain
 the advantage, but will be compelled to fly. If you can say, "This
 has my God said--on this I stand," then shall ye see that he will
 quickly depart, and ill-humor, evil lusts, wrath, avarice, melancholy
 and doubt, will all vanish. But the devil is artful, and does not
 readily permit you to come to this, and so assaults you in order to
 take the sword out of your hand; if he can make you full, so that
 your body is unguarded and inclined to wantonness, then will he
 quickly wrench the sword from your grasp. Thus He served Eve: she had
 God's word; if she had continued to depend on it she would not have
 fallen, but when the devil saw that she held the word so loosely, he
 tore it from her heart, so that she let it go and he triumphed.
 
 Thus St. Peter has sufficiently instructed us how to contend with the
 devil. It requires not much running hither and thither; is besides a
 work that you can do, yet no longer than you depend through faith on
 the word of God. If he comes and would drive you into despondency
 because of sin, only seize hold of the word of God that speaks of the
 forgiveness of sin, and venture yourself thereon; then will he be
 compelled quickly to let you alone. St. Peter says, moreover:
 
 
 _Knowing that the same afflictions are accomplished in your brethren
 that are in the world._ That is, be not surprised that you must meet
 opposition from the devil; but comfort yourselves, inasmuch as ye are
 not alone, but there are others besides you who must endure such
 suffering, and reflect that you have your brethren to share with you
 in the strife.
 
 There now you have the Epistle in which you have sufficiently heard a
 truly christian doctrine; in what a masterly manner he has described
 faith, love, and the Holy Cross; and how he instructs and warns us as
 to how we should contend with the devil. Whoever comprehends this
 Epistle, has doubtless enough, so that he needs nothing more but that
 God teach him richly from that which likewise overflows in the other
 books. But that is besides nothing different from this; for here the
 Apostle has forgotten nothing which it is necessary for a Christian
 to know.
 
 Finally, he does what every faithful preacher should do, in that he
 not only takes care to feed the sheep, but also cares and prays for
 them; and concludes with a prayer that God may give them grace and
 strength, that they may understand and retain the word.
 
 
 V. 10. _But the God of all grace who hath called us unto His Eternal
 glory by Christ Jesus, after that ye have suffered a while, make you
 perfect, establish, strengthen, settle you._ That is the wish
 wherewith he commits them to God--God, who alone bestows grace, and
 not a single grace, but all grace richly in one, who has called you
 through Christ that ye might have Eternal glory, not through any
 desert of your own, but for Christ's sake; if ye have Him, ye have
 through faith, without merit of yours, Eternal glory and salvation,
 which will prepare you, that you may be strong, grow, and stand, and
 that ye may be able to accomplish much; and to this end He will
 strengthen and establish you, that ye may be able to bear and suffer
 all.
 
 
 V. 11. _To him be praise and power for ever and ever, Amen._ Praise
 is the sacrifice that we as Christians should offer up to God. He
 only adds, in conclusion:
 
 
 V. 12. _By your faithful brother Silvanus, (as I suppose), have I
 written briefly, to admonish and manifest that this is the true grace
 of God wherein ye stand._ Although I well know (he would say) that
 you have heard this before and know it well, so that you do not need
 that I should teach it unto you, yet have I written this to you (as
 those that are truly Apostles should do), that I might also admonish
 you that you abide therein, since you are tried and exercised; and
 you are not to imagine that I preach any otherwise than as you have
 already heard.
 
 
 V. 13. _The Church that is at Babylon greets you._ Such was the
 practice of writing in the Epistles the farewell. _The Church at
 Babylon_, says he, _greets you_. I suppose, but am not fully
 confident, that he here meant Rome, for it has been generally
 supposed that the Epistle was written from Rome. Still, there were
 two Babylons,--one in Chaldea, the other in Egypt, which is now Al
 Cair. But Rome is not called Babylon, except figuratively, in the
 sense, as was said above, of thronging corruption. Thus, Babel means,
 in the Hebrew, a confusion. So, perhaps, he has called Rome a
 confusion, or Babel, since _there_ was also such disorderly conduct,
 and a confused multitude of all kinds of shameful practices and
 vices; and whatever in the whole world was scandalous had flown
 together there. In this same, he says, is a church gathered of such
 as are Christians, who greet you. But I will readily leave every one
 to hold it as he will, for no importance attaches to it.
 
 
 _My son, Marcus, also._ Some say that he here means Mark, the
 Evangelist, and calls him his son, not literally, but
 spiritually,--as Paul calls Timothy and Titus his sons, and says to
 the Corinthians that he has begotten them in Christ.
 
 
 V. 14. _Greet ye one another with a kiss of charity._ This custom has
 now passed away. In the Gospel we read distinctly that Christ
 received his disciples with a kiss, and such was then a practice in
 those lands. Of this kiss, St. Paul often speaks, also.
 
 
 _Peace be with you all that are in Christ Jesus. Amen._ That is, who
 believe in Christ. This is the adieu wherewith he commits them to
 God.--Thus we have concluded this first Epistle. God grant His grace,
 that we may hold and keep it. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 THE SECOND EPISTLE GENERAL OF ST. PETER.
 
 
 
 
 PREFACE.
 
 
 St. Peter wrote this Epistle because he saw how the true, pure
 doctrine of faith had become falsified, darkened and suppressed. And
 he has wished to meet a two-fold error, springing from a wrong
 understanding of the doctrine of faith, and guard against it in both
 directions; namely, that we should not ascribe to works the power of
 making us righteous and acceptable before God, though these works
 belong to faith; and, on the other hand, that no one should think
 that there may be faith without good works. For if any one preaches
 concerning faith, that it justifies us without any addition of works,
 the people say, "One need do no works," as we see it in our daily
 experience; and, on the other hand, when they fall on works and exalt
 them, faith must be prostrated, so that the middle way is one to be
 retained with difficulty, where there are not preachers of the right
 kind.
 
 Now, we have ever taught this doctrine, that to faith we are to
 ascribe all things, one as well as another; that it alone makes us
 just and holy in the sight of God. Moreover, that if faith is
 present, out of it good works must and should proceed, since it is
 even impossible that we should pass this our life quite indolent, and
 do no works. Thus St. Peter in this Epistle would also teach us, and
 thus meet those who perhaps out of the former Epistle might have
 received the wrong apprehension that it sufficed for faith, though we
 should at the same time do no work. And against this the first
 chapter especially aims, wherein he teaches that believers should try
 themselves by good works, and become assured of their faith.
 
 The second chapter is against those who exalt works merely, and
 depreciate faith. Therefore he admonishes them against the false
 teachers who should come, who, through the teachings of men, should
 destroy faith entirely. For he clearly saw what a cruel trial there
 would yet be in the world, as had even then already begun; as St.
 Paul says, II. Thes. ii., "The mystery of iniquity already works."
 
 Thus is this Epistle written as a warning for us, that we prove our
 faith by our good works, and yet that we trust not to our works.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER I.
 
 
 V. 1. _Simon Peter, a servant and Apostle of Jesus Christ, to those
 who have attained like faith with us, in the righteousness which our
 God gives, and our Saviour, Jesus Christ._ Such is the subscription
 and the superscription of this Epistle, that we may know who writes
 it, and to whom he writes it, even to those who have heard the word
 of God and abide in the faith. But what sort of a faith is this? In
 the righteousness (says he) which God gives. Thus he grants
 justification to faith alone,--as St. Paul, also, in Rom. i. In the
 Gospel is that righteousness revealed which avails with God, which
 comes from faith; as it stands written: "The just shall live by
 faith." Thus St. Peter would admonish them that they should be armed,
 and not let the doctrine of faith be torn away, which they have now
 apprehended and thoroughly known.
 
 And to this end he adjoins, _in the righteousness which God gives_,
 that he may separate from it all human righteousness. For by faith
 alone are we righteous before God; wherefore faith is called a
 righteousness of God, for with the world it is of no account; yea, it
 is even condemned.
 
 
 V. 2. _Grace and peace be multiplied among you, through the knowledge
 of God and Jesus Christ our Lord._ This is the greeting usually
 prefixed to the Epistles; and it amounts to this: I wish you, in
 place of my service for you, to increase in grace and peace, and grow
 ever richer and richer in the grace which comes from the knowledge of
 God and the Lord Christ,--that is, which none can have but he who has
 the knowledge of God and Jesus Christ.
 
 The Apostles, and the prophets also, in the Scripture, are ever
 setting forth the knowledge of God. As Isaiah, xi: "They shall not
 injure or destroy in my whole mountain, for the land is filled with
 the knowledge of God, as the land is covered with the water." That
 is, so overflowingly shall the knowledge of God break forth, as when
 a mass of water gushes up and rushes forth and swallows up a whole
 land.
 
 Thence shall such peace then follow, that no one shall wrong another,
 or make him suffer.
 
 But this is not to know God, that you should believe as the Turks,
 Jews, and devils believe, that God has created all things, or even
 that Christ was born of a virgin, suffered, died, and rose again; but
 this is the true knowledge, whereby you hold and know that God is thy
 God and Christ is thy Christ, which the devil and the false
 christians could not believe. So that this knowledge is nothing else
 but a true christian faith; for if you thus know God and Christ, you
 will then confide in them with your whole heart, and trust them in
 good and ill, in life and death. Such trust evil consciences cannot
 possess. For they know no more of God, except that He is a God of St.
 Peter and all the saints in heaven. But as their own God they know
 Him not, but hold Him as their task-master and angry judge. To have
 God, is to have all grace, all mercy, and all that man can well
 receive; to have Christ, is to have the Saviour and Mediator, who has
 brought us to say that God is ours, and has obtained all grace for us
 with Him. This also must be implied, that Christ is yours and you are
 His, then have you a true knowledge. A woman that lives unmarried can
 well say that a man is a husband, but this can she not say, that he
 is her husband. So may we all well say, this is _a_ God, but this we
 cannot say all of us, that He is _our_ God, for we cannot all trust
 upon Him nor comfort ourselves as His. To this knowledge belongs also
 that which the Scripture calls _faciem et vultum domini_, the face of
 the Lord, whereof the prophets speak much; who ever sees not the face
 of the Lord knows Him not, but sees only His back,--that is, an angry
 and ungracious God.
 
 And here you perceive, that St. Peter does not set himself
 particularly to write of faith, since he had already done that
 sufficiently in the First Epistle, but would admonish believers that
 they should prove their faith by good works; for he would not have a
 faith without good works, nor works without faith, but faith first
 and good works on and from faith. Therefore, he says, now, also:
 
 
 V. 3. _According as His divine power (whatever serves for life and
 godliness) is abundantly given us._ This is the first point, where
 Peter essays to describe what sort of blessings we have received
 through faith from God, even that to us (since we have known God by
 faith) there is given every kind of divine power. But what sort of
 power is it? It is such power as serves us toward life and godliness;
 that is, when we believe, then we attain this much, that God gives us
 the fullness of His power, which is so with and in us, that what we
 speak and work, it is not we that do it, but God Himself does it. He
 is strong, powerful, and almighty in us, though we even suffer and
 die, and are weak in the eyes of the world. So that there is no power
 nor ability in us if we have not this power of God.
 
 But this power of God which is in us, St. Peter would not have so
 explained, as that we might make heaven and earth, and should work
 such miracles as God does; for how would we be advantaged by it? But
 we have the power of God within us so far as it is useful and
 necessary to us. Therefore, the Apostle adjoins, and says, _whatever
 serves for life and godliness_; that is, we have such power of God
 that by it we are eminently favored with grace to do good and to live
 forever.
 
 
 _Through the knowledge of Him who hath called us._ Such power of God,
 and such rich grace, come from no other source but from this
 knowledge of God; for if you count Him for a God, He will deal also
 with you in all things as a God. So Paul also says, I. Cor. i., "Ye
 are in all points enriched in every kind of word and knowledge, even
 as the preaching of Christ is made powerful in you, so that ye have
 henceforth no want." This is now the greatest thing of all, the
 noblest and most needful that God can give us,--so that we are not to
 receive all that is in heaven and on earth; for what would it help
 you, though you were able to go through fire and water, and do all
 kinds of wonderful works, and had not this? Many people who perform
 such miracles shall be condemned. But this is wonderful above all
 things else, that God gives us such power, that thereby all our sins
 are forgiven and blotted out, death, the devil and hell, subdued and
 vanquished; so that we have an unharassed conscience and a happy
 heart, and fear for nothing.
 
 
 _Through His glory and virtue._ How does that call come, whereby we
 are called of God? Thus: God has permitted the holy Gospel to go
 forth into the world and be made known, though no man had ever before
 striven for it, or sought or prayed for it, of Him. But ere man had
 ever thought of it, He has offered, bestowed, and beyond all measure
 richly shed forth such grace, so that He alone has the glory and the
 praise; and we ascribe to Him alone the virtue and the power, for it
 is not our work, but His only. Wherefore, since the calling is not of
 us, we should not exalt ourselves as though we had done it, but
 render to Him praise and thanksgiving, because He has given us the
 Gospel, and thereby granted us power and might against the devil,
 death, and all evil.
 
 
 V. 4. _Whereby are given unto us exceeding precious and great
 promises._ St. Peter adjoins this, that he may explain the nature and
 method of faith. If we know Him as God, then do we have through faith
 that eternal life and divine power wherewith we subdue death and the
 devil. Though we see and grasp it not, yet is it promised to us. We
 really have it all, though it does not yet appear, but at the last
 day we shall see it present before us. Here it begins in faith;
 though we have it not in its fullness, we have yet the assurance that
 we live here in the power of God, and shall afterward be saved
 forever.
 
 Whoever has this faith has the promise; whoever does not believe
 possesses it not, and must be lost forever. How great and precious a
 thing this is, Peter explains further, and says:
 
 
 _So that ye by the same might become partakers of the divine nature,
 while ye flee from the corrupting lusts of the world._ This we have,
 he says, through the power of faith, that we should be partakers and
 have association or communion with the divine nature. This is such a
 passage that the like of it does not stand in the New or Old
 Testament, although it is a small matter with the unbelieving that we
 should have communion with the divine nature itself. But what is the
 divine nature? It is eternal truth, righteousness, wisdom; eternal
 life, peace, joy, happiness, and whatever good one can name. Whoever
 then becomes partaker of the divine nature, attains all this,--that
 he is to live forever, and have eternal peace, delight and joy, and
 is to be perfectly pure, just, and triumphant over the devil, sin and
 death. Therefore St. Peter would say this much: As little as any one
 can take away from God, that He should not be eternal life and
 eternal truth, just as little shall any one take it away from you.
 Whatever one does to you he must do to Him, for whoever would crush a
 Christian must crush God.
 
 All this, that word, the divine nature, implies, and he also used it
 to this end, that he might include it all; and it is truly a great
 thing where it is believed. But, as I said above, this is merely
 instruction, in which he does not lay down a ground of faith, but
 sets forth what great, rich blessings we receive through faith;
 wherefore he says, that ye shall have all if ye so live as to prove
 your faith, whereby ye flee worldly lusts. So he speaks, now,
 further:
 
 
 V. 5. _Give then all your diligence, and add to your faith, virtue._
 Here St. Peter takes up the admonition, that they should prove their
 faith by good works. Since such great blessing is bestowed upon you
 through faith (he would say), that ye really have all that God is, do
 this besides: be diligent, and not sluggish; add to your faith,
 virtue; that is, let your faith break out before the world, so as to
 be zealous, busy, powerful, and active, and to do many works; let it
 not remain idle and unfruitful. Ye have a good inheritance and a good
 field, but see to it that ye do not let thistles and weeds grow upon
 it.
 
 
 _And to virtue, discrimination._ Discrimination or knowledge is, in
 the first place, that one should manifest an outward conduct, and the
 virtue of faith, in accordance with reason. For we should so far
 bridle and check the body, that we may be sober, vigorous, and fitted
 for good works; not that we should torture and mortify ourselves as
 some famous saints have done. For though God is likewise opposed to
 the sins that remain in the flesh, yet does He not require that for
 this reason you should destroy the body. Its viciousness and caprice
 you should guard against, but yet you are not to ruin or injure it,
 but give it its food and refreshment that it may remain sound and in
 living vigor.
 
 In the second place, discrimination means that one should lead a life
 carefully exact, and act with discretion in regard to outward things,
 as food and things of that sort,--that one should not act in these
 things unreasonably, and that he should give his neighbor no
 provocation.
 
 
 V. 6. _And to discrimination, temperance._ Temperance is not only in
 eating and drinking, but it is regularity in the whole life and
 conduct, words, works, manners; that we should not live too
 expensively, and should avoid excess in ornament and clothing; that
 none come out too proudly, and make too lofty a show. But in regard
 to this St. Peter will not fix any rule, measure, or limit, as the
 Orders have prescribed for themselves, who have wished to do all by
 rule, and have framed statutes which must be exactly observed. It is
 a thing not to be tolerated in Christendom, that men should require
 by laws that there be a common rule on _temperance_; for people are
 unlike one to another; one is of a strong, another is of a weaker
 nature; and no one in all things is at all times situated as another.
 Therefore every one should see to himself how he is situated, and
 what he can bear.
 
 
 _And to temperance, patience._ Thus would St. Peter say: though ye
 lead a temperate and discreet life, ye are not to think that ye shall
 live without conflict and persecution. For if ye believe, and lead a
 fair christian life, the world will not let it alone; it must
 persecute and hate you, in which you must show patience, which is a
 fruit of faith.
 
 
 _And to patience, godliness._ That is, that we in all our outward
 life, whatever we do or suffer, should so conduct ourselves that we
 may serve God therein, not seeking our own honor and gain, but that
 God alone may be glorified thereby; and that we should so demean
 ourselves that men may take knowledge that we do all for God's sake.
 
 
 V. 7. _And to godliness, brotherly love._ In this St. Peter obliges
 us all to extend a helping hand one to another, like brethren, so
 that one should protect another, and none hate nor despise nor injure
 another. This is also an evident proof of faith, whereby we show that
 we have the godliness of which he has spoken.
 
 
 _And to brotherly love (charity), common love._ Common love extends
 to both friend and enemy, even to those who do not show themselves
 friendly and brotherly towards us. Thus St. Peter has here
 comprehended in few words whatever pertains to the christian life,
 and whatever are the works and fruits of faith, discretion,
 temperance, patience, a God-fearing life, brotherly love, and
 kindness to every one.
 
 
 V. 8. _For if such dwell richly in you, it will not permit you to be
 idle or unfruitful in the knowledge of our Lord Jesus Christ._ That
 is, if ye do such works, then are ye on the right path, then do ye
 have a real faith, and the knowledge of Christ becomes active and
 fruitful in you. Therefore see to it that ye be not such as beat the
 air. Restrain your body, and act toward your neighbor even in such a
 manner as ye know that Christ has done toward you.
 
 
 V. 9. _But to whomsoever such is wanting, he is blind, gropes with
 the hand, and has forgotten the purifying of his former sins._
 Whoever has not such a preparation of the fruits of faith, gropes
 like a blind man here and there, rests in such a life that he knows
 not what his state is, has not real faith, and has of the knowledge
 of Christ nothing more than that he can say he has heard it.
 Therefore he goes along and gropes like a blind man on the way, in an
 unconscious life, and has forgotten that he was baptized and his sins
 were forgiven him, and is unthankful, and is an idle, negligent man,
 who suffers nothing to go to his heart, and neither feels nor tastes
 such great grace and blessing.
 
 This is the admonition which St. Peter gives to us who believe, to
 urge and enforce those works by which we shall evidence that the true
 faith is in us. And, besides, this ever remains true, that faith
 alone justifies; where this then is present, there works must
 follow.--What follows further, now, is meant to strengthen us.
 
 
 V. 10. _Wherefore, dear brethren, give so much the more diligence to
 make your calling and election sure._ The election and eternal
 foreknowledge of God is indeed in itself sure enough, so that man
 does not need to make that sure. The calling is also effectual and
 sure. For whoever hears the Gospel, and believes thereon, and is
 baptized, he is called and saved. Since we then are also thereunto
 called, we should apply so much diligence (says Peter), that our
 calling and election may be assured with us also, and not only with
 God. This is now such a mode of scriptural expression as St. Paul
 uses, Eph. ii., "Ye were strangers to the covenant of promise, so
 that ye had no hope and were without God in the world." For although
 there is no man, neither bad nor good, over whom God does not reign,
 since all creatures are His, yet Paul says he has no God who does not
 know, love, and trust Him, although he had his being in God Himself.
 So here, also; although the calling and election are effectual enough
 in themselves, yet with you it is not yet effectual and assured,
 since you are not yet certain that it includes you. Therefore St.
 Peter would have us make such calling and election sure, by good
 works.
 
 Thus you see what this Apostle attributes to the fruits of faith.
 Although they are due to our neighbor, that he may be benefited by
 them, still the fruit is not to be wanting, that faith may thereby
 become stronger, and do more and more of good works. Besides, this is
 quite another kind of power from that of the body, for that grows
 weary and wastes away if it is used and urged somewhat too far: but
 as to this spiritual power, the more it is used and urged, the
 stronger it becomes; and it suffers injury if it is not exercised.
 For this reason did God introduce Christianity at the first in such a
 manner as He did, driven and tried by the wrestling of faith, in
 shame, death, and bloodshed, that it might become truly strong and
 mighty, and that the more it was oppressed the more it might rise
 above it. This is St. Peter's meaning in this place, that we should
 not let faith rust and lie still, since it is so ordained that it is
 ever made more and more strong by trial and exercise, until it is
 assured of its calling and election, and cannot fail.
 
 And here is also a bound set as to how we should proceed with
 reference to election. There are many light-minded persons who have
 not felt much of the power of faith, who fall in this matter,
 stumbling upon it; and they trouble themselves at first with it, and
 by reason would satisfy themselves whether they are elected, so that
 they may be assured whereon they stand. But desist from this, at
 once; it is a thing that cannot be apprehended (grasped). But if you
 will be assured, you must reach it by the way which St. Peter here
 strikes out for you. If you choose another for yourself, you have
 failed already, and your own experience must teach you so. If faith
 is properly exercised and tried, then are you at last assured of the
 fact that you cannot fail, as now further follows:
 
 
 _For if ye do these things ye shall never fall._ That is, ye are to
 stand fast, not stumble nor sin, but go onward thoroughly upright and
 active, and all shall go well with you. But if you would set it right
 by your reasonings, the devil will soon throw you into despair and
 hatred of God.
 
 
 V. 11. _And so shall an entrance be ministered unto you abundantly,
 into the everlasting kingdom of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ._
 This is the way by which we enter the kingdom of heaven. Therefore,
 no one should propose, by such dreams and reasonings concerning faith
 as he has invented in his heart, to enter therein. There must be a
 living, active, tried faith. God help us! How have our deceivers
 written, taught and spoken against this text, yet whoever has even
 the least measure and only a spark of faith, shall be saved when he
 comes to die.
 
 If you would pry into this matter, and in this way attain such faith
 quickly and suddenly, you will then have waited too long. Yet you are
 to understand well, that they who are strong have enough to do,
 although we are not to despair even of such as are weak, for it may
 indeed well happen that they shall endure, though it will be sorely
 and hardly, and will cost much striving; but whoever carefully sees
 to it in his life, that faith is invigorated and made strong by good
 works, he shall have an abundant entrance, and with calm spirit and
 confidence go into that life to come, so that he shall die
 comfortably, and despise this life, and even triumphantly go on, and
 with gladness hasten to that. But those, who would come in otherwise,
 shall not enter thus with joy; the door shall not stand open to them
 so wide; they shall, moreover, not have such an abundant entrance,
 but it shall be, narrow and a hard one, so that they tremble, and
 would rather their life-day should be in weakness, than that they
 should die.
 
 
 V. 12. _Wherefore I will not be negligent to remind you always of
 such things, although ye know them, and are established in this
 present truth._ That is the same that we also have often said,
 although God has now let such a great light go forth through the
 revelation of the Gospel, so that we know what true christian life
 and doctrine is, and see how all Scripture insists upon it, yet this
 (light) we are not to neglect but use daily, not for doctrine, but
 for the sake of remembrance. For there is a twofold office in the
 christian church, as St. Paul says, Rom. xii.: "If any one teaches,
 let him wait on teaching; if any one admonishes, let him wait on
 admonition." To teach, is when any one lays down the ground of faith,
 and sets it forth to those who have no knowledge of it. But to
 admonish, or as Peter here says, _to remind_, is to preach to those
 who know and have heard the matter already, so that they are seized
 hold of and awakened, in order that they should not be heedless, but
 go onward and prosper. We are all beladen with the old sluggard load,
 with our flesh and blood, that chooses for ever the byroad, and keeps
 us ever subject to its load, so that the soul easily falls asleep.
 Therefore we are ever to urge and shake it, as a master urges his
 servants, lest they become sluggish, although they know very well
 what they should do; for while we must pursue this course for our
 temporal support, far more must we do it in this case in spiritual
 matters.
 
 
 V. 13. _For I count it proper, so long as I am in this tabernacle, to
 awaken and remind you._ Here St. Peter calls his body a tabernacle
 wherein the soul dwells; and it is a phrase like that where in the
 first Epistle he speaks of the body as a vessel or an instrument. So
 St. Paul also speaks, II. Cor. v.: "We know that if our earthly house
 of this tabernacle were broken down, that we have a house built by
 God, a house not made with hands, eternal in heaven, and for the same
 we long earnestly, for our dwelling which is from heaven. For as long
 as we are in this tabernacle we earnestly long," &c. Also, "but yet
 we are consoled and know that while we are at home in the body we are
 absent from the Lord, but we have far greater desire to be out of the
 body and to be at home with the Lord." There the Apostle Paul speaks
 also of the body as a house, and makes two homes, and two
 sojournings. So Peter speaks here of the body as a tabernacle wherein
 the soul rests, and he makes it mean enough; he will not call it a
 house, but a hut or pent-house, such as shepherds have. Great is the
 treasure, but small is the house in which it lies and dwells.
 
 
 V. 14, 15. _For I know that I must soon lay off my tabernacle, even
 as the Lord Christ hath showed me. But I will take care that ye by
 all means, after my departure, may keep such things in your
 remembrance._ Here Peter testifies of himself that he has become
 assured of eternal life, and to him God had shown beforehand when he
 should die; but this took place for our and our faith's sake, for
 there must have been some such persons as knew assuredly that they
 were elected, who should lay down and settle faith, that we might
 know that they preached not the doctrine of men, but the word of God.
 But ere they have come to such an assurance, God has thoroughly
 proved them first, and purified them. Thus Peter now says, I will not
 only remind you with the living voice, but set such things also in
 writing, and charge you, through others, that ye ever hold them in
 remembrance, through my life and after my death, and not let them go.
 There see how great anxiety the Apostle had for souls; yet, alas! it
 has helped nothing.
 
 
 V. 16-18. _For we have not followed cunningly devised fables, when we
 have made known unto you the power and coming of our Lord Jesus
 Christ, for we have been witnesses of His majesty, when He received
 from God the Father honor and praise, by a voice which came to Him
 from the excellent glory, this is my well-beloved Son, in whom I am
 well pleased; and this voice, which came from heaven, we heard, when
 we were with Him on the holy mount._ There St. Peter touches upon the
 history written in the Gospel, Matt. xvii., how Jesus took to Himself
 three of his disciples, Peter, James and John, and led them aside up
 a high mountain, and was glorified before them, and His face shone
 like the sun, and His clothing was white as the light, and there
 appeared to Him Moses and Elias, who spoke with Him, while a light
 cloud overshadowed them, and a voice out of the cloud said, This is
 my beloved Son, in whom I am well pleased; hear ye Him. When the
 disciples heard that, they fell on their faces, and were very much
 afraid. But Jesus went to them, roused them up, and said, stand up,
 be not afraid; then they lifted up their eyes, and saw no one but
 Jesus only, and when they went down from the mountain He charged them
 that they should tell no one of this sight till He arose from the
 dead.
 
 So St. Peter would now say, that which I preach to you of Christ and
 of His coming, this Gospel that we preach, we have not devised or yet
 imagined, nor taken it from cunning fabulists who know how to speak
 brilliantly of all things (such as at that very time the Greeks
 were), for it is mere fable, and fancy, and idle babbling that they
 cunningly give forth, and wherein they would be wise,--such we have
 not listened to, nor have we followed them; that is, we preach not
 what is from the hands of men, but are sure that it is of God, and
 have become so through our eyes and ears;--that is to say, When we
 were with Christ upon the mountain, and saw and heard His glory; for
 His glory was this, that His face shone like the sun, and His
 clothing was as white as snow; besides, we heard a voice from the
 highest Majesty, "This is my beloved Son; hear ye Him."
 
 So confident should every preacher be, and not be in doubt thereon,
 that he has God's word, that he could even die for it, since it is
 worth our life. Now there is no man so holy that he must needs die
 for the doctrine which he has taught of himself; wherefore it is
 inferred here that the Apostles have had assurance from God that
 their Gospel was God's word. And here it is also shown that the
 Gospel is nothing else than the preaching of Christ. Therefore we
 should hear no other preaching, for the Father will have no other.
 "That is my dear Son," He says; "hear Him." He is your Teacher--as
 though He had said, "When ye hear Him, then ye have heard me."
 Wherefore Peter now says, we have preached Christ and made Him known
 to you, that He is Lord, and rules over all things, and all power is
 His; and that whosoever believes on Him has likewise such power. Such
 things we have not ourselves devised, but have seen and heard them
 through God's revelation, by which He has charged us that we should
 hear Christ.
 
 But why does Paul separate from one another the power and the coming
 of Christ? The power consists, as we have heard above, in that He is
 mighty over all things; that all must lie at His feet; and this shall
 continue as long as the world stands. While we are flesh and blood,
 and live upon the earth, so long shall Christ's kingdom flourish,
 even to the last day. Then shall come another period, when He shall
 give up the kingdom to God the Father, whereof St. Paul speaks, I.
 Cor. xv.: "Christ the first fruits; afterwards those that belong to
 Christ, who are His at His coming. Afterward is the end, when He
 shall answer for the kingdom to God and the Father." Also: "But when
 all shall be subject to Him, then shall the Son also be subject to
 Him who subdued all for Him."
 
 How? Is then the kingdom not God the Father's now? Is not all subject
 to Him? Answer:--St. Paul explains himself in the same place, and
 says: "So that God may be all in all;" that is, whatsoever any one
 shall need or should have, that God will be; as St. Peter has told us
 above, that we should be partakers of the Divine nature. Wherefore we
 shall also have all that God has, and all that is needful for us we
 shall have in Him,--wisdom, righteousness, strength and life,--a
 truth which we now believe, hearing it merely, and having it in the
 word of God. But then shall the word cease, when our souls shall be
 enlarged and see and feel it all as a present thing. This is what St.
 Paul means, and St. Peter also: that the power of Christ's kingdom
 now proceeds; now He gives the word, and thereby, through His
 humanity, reigns over the devil, sin, death, and all things. But at
 the last day this shall be made clear. Therefore, although God ever
 rules, still it is not yet manifest to us. He clearly beholds us, but
 we behold Him not. Therefore must Christ surrender up to Him the
 kingdom, so that we also shall see it, while we then shall be
 Christ's brethren and God's children. Thus Christ received from God
 honor and glory (St. Peter here says) when the Father made all things
 subject to Him, and made Him Lord, and glorified Him by this voice,
 in which He says, "This is my well-beloved Son, in whom I am well
 pleased."
 
 By this St. Peter would confirm his doctrine and preaching, that it
 might be known whence it came. But this experience was no more than
 that he had heard this, and was able to preach of it. But the Holy
 Spirit must also come and strengthen him, that he may believe in it,
 and preach and confess it cheerfully. The former thing belongs only
 to the office of the preacher, not to the soul; but this belongs to
 the Spirit.
 
 
 V. 19. _We have also a sure word of Prophecy, and ye do well in that
 ye give heed to it, as to a light that shines in a dark place, till
 the day break and the morning star rise in your hearts._ There St.
 Peter grasps right hold upon the matter, and would say this much: all
 that I preach is to subserve this end, that your conscience may be
 assured, and your heart may stand firm on this, and not let itself be
 torn therefrom, and that thus both I and you may be certain that we
 have God's word. For it is an important matter as respects the Gospel
 that we should receive and hold it clean and pure, without addition
 and false doctrine. Therefore Peter begins henceforth to write
 against human doctrines.
 
 But why does he say we have a sure word of prophecy? Answer: I hold,
 indeed, that we shall have no more prophets, such as the Jews had in
 former times in the Old Testament. But a prophet eminently should he
 be who preaches of Jesus Christ. Therefore, although many prophets in
 the Old Testament have foretold concerning things to come, yet they
 came and were sent by God, for this reason especially, that they
 should foretell Christ. Those, then, who believe on Christ are all
 prophets, for they have the true head-article that the prophets
 should have, although they have not the gift of making known things
 to come; for as we, through the faith of our Master, are Christ's
 brethren, are kings and priests, so are we prophets also, all of us
 through Christ. For we can all say what belongs to salvation and
 God's honor and a christian life, besides of future things, so much
 as this is necessarily known to us, viz., that the Last Day shall
 come, and that we shall rise from the dead; besides, we understand
 the whole substance of Scripture. Whereof Paul also says, I. Cor.
 xiv.: "Ye can all prophecy, one after another."
 
 This now, is, what Peter says: we have such a word of prophecy as is
 sure in itself; see to it only that it be sure to you; and ye do well
 in paying heed to it:--as though he should say: It will be a thing of
 necessity to you to hold firmly by it; for it is in regard to the
 Gospel as though one were imprisoned in the house, in the midst of
 the night, when it was stock dark. Then it were a matter of necessity
 that one should kindle a light, till the day came when he could see.
 Eminently such is the Gospel in the midst of the night and darkness,
 for all human reason is mere error and blindness, while the world is
 even nothing else but a kingdom of darkness. In this darkness has God
 now kindled a light, even the Gospel, whereby we may see and walk,
 while we are on the earth, till the morning dawn comes and the day
 breaks.
 
 Thus this text is also strongly against all human doctrine; for since
 the word of God is the light in a dark and gloomy place, it follows
 that all besides is darkness. For if there were another light besides
 the word, St. Peter would not have spoken as he has. Therefore look
 not to this, how gifted those men are with reason who teach any other
 doctrine, however grandly they put it forth; if you cannot trace
 God's word in it, then be in no doubt as to its being mere darkness.
 And let it not disturb you at all that they say they have the Holy
 Spirit. How can they have God's Spirit if they do not have His word?
 Wherefore they do nothing else but call darkness light and make the
 light darkness, as Isaiah says, chap. v.
 
 This is God's word--even the Gospel--that we are ransomed by Christ
 from death, sin and hell: whoever hears that, he has this light and
 has kindled this lamp in his heart, even that by which we may see the
 one that enlightens us, and teaches us whatever we should know. But
 where this is not, there we rush on, and by matters and works of our
 own device would find out the way to heaven. Whereof, by your light,
 you can judge and see that it is darkness. Wherefore since they have
 not the light, neither would receive it, they must remain in darkness
 and blindness. For the light teaches us all that which we ought to
 know and what is necessary to salvation--a thing which the world by
 wisdom and reason knows not. And this light we must still have and
 depend upon, even to the last day. Then shall we have no more need of
 the word, just as we put out the lamp when the day breaks.
 
 
 V. 20, 21. _And this ye should know first of all, that no prophecy of
 the Scripture is of any private interpretation; for prophecy came not
 aforetime by the will of man, but holy men of God spake as they were
 moved by the Holy Spirit._ Here Peter falls upon the matter of false
 doctrine: since ye know this, he says, that we have the word of God,
 abide thereon, and suffer yourselves not to be drawn from it by
 others that teach falsely, though they come and give forth that they
 have the Holy Spirit. For this ye should know first of all (the
 second matter he would speak of afterward), that no prophecy of the
 Scripture is of any private interpretation; by this be directed, and
 do not think that ye shall explain the Scripture by your own reason
 and wisdom.
 
 In this the private interpretation of Scripture by all the fathers is
 thrown down and rejected, and it is forbidden to build on such
 interpretation. Though Jerome, or Augustine, or any one of the
 fathers have explained it of himself, yet would not we have it from
 him. Peter has forbidden you to explain it of yourself at all. The
 Holy Spirit will explain it Himself, or it shall remain unexplained.
 If now any one of the holy fathers can prove that he has his
 explanation from the Scriptures, which give assurance that it should
 be so explained, then it is right; where this is not the case, I for
 one shall not believe him. Thus Peter lays hold on the boldest and
 best teachers; wherefore we should rest assured that none is to be
 believed who sets the Scripture forth where he of himself opens and
 explains it. For there can be no true sense obtained by private
 interpretation. Here have all the teachers and fathers who have
 explained the Scripture stumbled, so far as they are extant to us. As
 when they refer the passage of Christ, Matt. xvi.: _Thou art Peter,
 and on this rock will I build my church_, to the Pope. That is a
 human, self-invented explanation; therefore, no one is to believe
 them, for they cannot prove out of the Scripture that Peter is ever
 spoken of as Pope. But this we can prove, that the rock is Christ and
 faith, as Paul says. This explanation is the right one; for of this
 we are sure, it has not been invented by men, but drawn from God's
 word. Now what is found written and foretold in the prophets, says
 Peter, that men have not searched out nor invented; but holy and
 pious men have spoken it from the Holy Spirit.
 
 Thus this is the first chapter, wherein St. Peter has first of all
 taught us what those really good works are whereby we must give proof
 of our faith. In the second place, that no man in Christendom should
 preach anything but God's word alone. The reason why it should be so
 is no other, as we have said, except that men should preach that word
 which shall remain forever, whereby souls may be won, and eternal
 life. Now there follows a just admonition, which Christ and Paul and
 all the Apostles have also given, that each should look out for
 himself and guard against false teachers.
 
 It is especially necessary for us to observe it carefully, so that we
 shall not suffer that right and authority which all Christians have,
 to be torn from us, to judge and decide on all doctrines; and shall
 not let it come to this, that we first wait till the Councils
 determine what we are to believe, and then follow that. This we are
 now to look at.
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER II.
 
 
 V. 1. _But there were false teachers also among the people, as also
 among you there shall be false teachers._ This is what St. Peter
 would say: All prophecy must proceed from the Holy Spirit, even to
 the end of the world, just as it has gone forth from the beginning of
 the world, so that nothing shall be preached but what is God's word.
 Yet it has ever so happened, that close upon the true prophets and
 word of God, there have been false teachers, and so also it shall
 continue. Therefore, since ye have God's word, ye should take heed to
 yourselves that ye do not have false teachers besides. This is a
 sufficient admonition, and it cannot fail where the true word of God
 is preached; that close upon it false teachers also should rise up.
 The reason is this,--not every one lays hold on the word, and
 believes thereon, although it is preached to all. They who believe
 thereon, follow it, and hold it fast; but the greater part, they who
 do not believe, receive a false sense therefrom, whence they become
 false teachers. This matter we have not seriously considered, nor
 have we attended to this warning; but we have gone astray, and
 whatever has been preached that we have done. Thereon we have
 stumbled and fallen, and been led away by delusion, as though the
 Pope, with his priests and monks, could not err. Thus those that
 should have been on their guard against such things, have been the
 first that have urged them upon us. So that we are not free from
 blame, though we have a wrong belief, and follow after false
 teachers: it shall be of no help to us, that we have not known, since
 we were warned beforehand. Besides, God has bidden us that we should
 each determine what this or that one preaches, and give account
 thereof; if we do not, then are we lost; wherefore it concerns every
 one's own soul's salvation to know what God's word is, and what false
 doctrines are.
 
 Such warnings against false teachers are, besides, very frequent,
 here and there, throughout the Scripture. St. Paul, Acts xx., gives
 just such an admonition in his preaching, when he blesses those of
 Ephesus and gives them his farewell; and he speaks in this manner: "I
 know that after my departure there shall come in among you grievous
 wolves, who shall not spare the flock; yea, there shall even of your
 own selves arise men who shall teach corrupt doctrine, who shall draw
 disciples after them." Christ proclaims it also in Matt. xx.: "If
 anyone shall say to you (he says), lo! here is Christ, or lo! there,
 then are ye not to believe it; for there shall arise false Christs
 and false prophets, and great signs and wonders shall they do, that
 shall lead into error, if it were possible, even the elect." And
 again, Paul, I. Tim., iv.: "The Spirit speaks expressly that in the
 last times some shall depart from the faith, and cleave to erring
 spirits and doctrines of the devil by which they speak lies in
 hypocrisy." As forcefully as such admonition has gone forth, so
 careful should we have been; yet it has been of no avail. The
 admonition has been kept silent, and thus we have still wandered, and
 suffered ourselves to be led astray.
 
 Now let us see who those false teachers may be, of whom Peter here
 speaks. I think that God has ordained by special counsel that our
 teachers should have been called doctors, that it might be seen whom
 Peter means. For he as much as uses the word here; false
 doctors,--that is, false teachers, he says,--not false prophets or
 false apostles. In this he fairly hits the high schools, where such a
 class of men is made, and whence all the preachers have come forth
 into the world; so that there is not even a city under the Popedom,
 which does not have such teachers made in the high schools. For all
 the world thinks that they are the fountain, the streams of which are
 to teach the people. This is a desperate error, since no more cruel
 thing has ever come upon the earth than has come forth from the high
 schools. Therefore Peter says, that such vain, false teachers are to
 be; but what shall they do? This follows further:
 
 
 _Who shall privily introduce damnable heresies._ He calls them
 damnable heresies (sects), or states and orders, because whosoever is
 persuaded into them is already lost. These shall they secretly bring
 in, he says, not that they shall preach that the Gospel and the Holy
 Scriptures are false, for that would have worked quite against
 them,--but these names, God, Christ, faith, church, baptism,
 sacrament, they shall still hold, and suffer to continue. But under
 these names they bring forward and set up something of another sort.
 For there is a great difference, whether I say this man preaches
 against this doctrine or in accordance with it. When I preach thus,
 that Christ is the Son of God and truly man, and whoever believes on
 Him shall be saved,--that is right preaching and the true Gospel. But
 if one preaches that Christ is not the Son of God, nor truly man,
 moreover that faith does not save, it is said in plain contradiction
 to it. Whence St. Peter speaks not (for this is what our high
 schools, priests and monks do not attempt), except of those associate
 doctrines which they introduce through the true doctrine. As when
 they speak after this manner,--it is true that Christ was God, and is
 man; that He died for our sins, and no one can be saved who does not
 believe upon Him. But that belongs only to the common estate (of
 Christians); but we will set up a more complete one, in which men
 shall vow chastity, poverty, and obedience, as well as fast, endow
 institutions, &c. Whoever does this shall go full tide up to heaven.
 Where now men preach and hear such things as that there is nothing
 better and more saving than virginity and obedience, and that the
 monk and the priest are in a higher and more perfect estate than
 mankind in general, there is nothing said against the pure christian
 doctrine directly, nor are faith and baptism denied, nor that Christ
 is the Saviour. But yet there is such doctrine brought in with them,
 leading men away from the right path, that they build upon their own
 life and works, and hold nothing more in regard to Christ, but just
 these words: we believe that Christ is the Son of God, and man; that
 He died and rose again; that He is the Saviour of the world, &c. But
 they repose no faith in Him, for if they did that, they would not
 rest an hour upon their life.
 
 Thus they have also preached and said among the people: "Ye are
 Christians already, but that is not enough; ye must also do such and
 such works, build churches and cloisters, found masses and vigils,"
 &c.
 
 The great multitude has tumbled into this notion, and thought it was
 right. Hereby Christendom is divided and separated into as many
 sects, almost, as there are states and people.
 
 But this is what men should have preached and taught: Ye are
 Christians indeed, and, just as well as those a hundred miles away,
 ye have all of you one Christ, one baptism, one faith, one spirit,
 one word, one God; so that no work that man can do helps to make a
 Christian. Thus, were men included in a common faith, there would be
 no difference before God, but one would be as another. This unity
 have they rent asunder, in that they say, "You are a Christian, but
 you must do works in order that you may be saved;" and thus they lead
 us away from faith to works. Therefore St. Peter says, if we will
 explain it right, nothing but this: there shall come high schools,
 doctors, priests and monks, and all classes of men, who shall bring
 in ruinous sects and orders, and shall lead the world astray by false
 doctrines. Such are those whom he means here, for they all hold to
 the notion that their state and Order saves them, and they cause men
 to build and trust thereon; for where men do not hold to this view,
 they carefully keep clear of entering them.
 
 
 _And shall deny the Lord who bought them._ "Oh," say they, "we do not
 deny the Lord at all!" But if any one says, "Since you are ransomed
 by Christ, and His blood blots out your sin, what will you blot out
 by your mode of life?" Then they say, "Ah! faith does not do it
 alone, works must also aid towards it." Thus they confess the Lord
 Christ indeed with their mouth, but with their hearts they quite deny
 him. See how admirably St. Peter expresses it. They deny the Master,
 he says, who has bought them: they should be under Him as under a
 master whose own they were. But now, though they believe indeed that
 He is their master and has purchased the whole world by His blood,
 yet they do not believe that they are bought, and that He is their
 master; and they say "He has indeed bought and ransomed them, but
 then this is not enough,--we must first by our works expiate the sin
 and make satisfaction for it." But we say, if you yourself take away
 and blot out your sin, what has Christ then done? You certainly
 cannot make two Christs who take away sin. He should and must be the
 only one that puts away sin. If that be true, then I cannot
 understand how I am myself to cancel my own sin. If I do it, I can
 neither say nor believe that He takes it away. And it is the same
 thing with denying Christ; for although they hold Christ to be their
 master, they deny that He has bought them. They believe, indeed, that
 He sits above in heaven and is Lord; but that which is His peculiar
 office, to take away sin, this they take from Him, and ascribe it to
 their own works. Thus they leave to Him nothing more than the name
 and title; but His work, His power, and His office, they will have
 themselves. So that Christ has truly said, "Many shall come in my
 name, and say, I am Christ, and shall seduce many." For they are this
 preeminently, not who say, "I am called Christ," but "I am He;" for
 they seize to themselves the office that belongs to Christ, thrust
 Him from His throne, and seat themselves thereon. This we see before
 our eyes, insomuch that no one can deny it. Therefore St. Peter calls
 them damnable or ruinous heresies, for they run all of them straight
 to hell; so that I suppose that among a thousand, hardly one is
 saved. For whoever shall be saved therein must say this much: "My
 obedience, my chastity, &c., do not save me; my works do not take
 away any sin from me." But how many there are who have these views,
 and remain in such a damnable state!
 
 
 _And shall bring upon themselves quick damnation._ That is, their
 condemnation shall quickly overtake them; although it is plain that
 God forbears long, yet He will come soon enough. But it is not a
 thing that respects the body, that we should be able to see it with
 our eyes, but just as the fifty-fourth Psalm says, "They shall not
 live out half their day;" that is, death shall seize upon them ere
 they themselves suspect, so that they shall say, like Hezekiah, Is.
 xxxviii., "I have said in the midst of my life, I must go down into
 the grave;" as though they should say, "O Lord God, is death already
 here?" For those men who do not live by faith, who are never more and
 more weary of life, the longer they live the longer they would live,
 and the holier they seem the more terrible will death be to them,
 especially to those who have scrupulous consciences and cruelly urge
 and vex themselves by works, for it is not possible to vanquish death
 by human powers. Where faith is wanting, the conscience must tremble
 and despair. Where faith is strong, death comes too slow; while, on
 the other hand, he comes to the unbelieving always too soon, for
 there is no end to the thirst and love of life.
 
 This is what Peter means here: these people who set up such sects,
 and so deny Christ, must come to die with the greatest unwillingness,
 trembling and desponding; for they can have no other thought but
 this, "Who knows whether God will be gracious to me and will forgive
 my sins?" and they remain forever in such doubt, "who knows it,--who
 knows it?" and their conscience is never at peace. The longer they
 thus continue, the more terrible is death to them; for death cannot
 first be subdued, till sin and an evil conscience have been taken
 away. So will their condemnation come upon them hastily, so that they
 must abide in eternal death.
 
 
 V. 2. _And many shall follow their destruction._ It may be seen
 before our eyes, that it has come to pass just as St. Peter first
 declared. There has been not a father or mother who has not wished to
 have a priest, monk, or nun, from among their children. Thus one fool
 has made another; for when people have seen the misfortune and misery
 that are found in the marriage state, and have not known that it is a
 safe estate, they have wished to do the best for their children, to
 help them to a happy life and freedom from wretchedness. So that St.
 Peter has foretold here nothing else but just that the world should
 become full of priests, monks, and nuns. Thus youth, and the best
 that are in the world, have run with the multitude to the devil. St.
 Peter says it, alas! only too truly, that many should follow them to
 this destruction.
 
 
 _By whom the way of truth shall be blasphemed._ This, too, is a thing
 that may be seen before our eyes. To blaspheme is to libel, damn, and
 curse; as when one condemns the christian estate as error and heresy.
 If one now should preach and say that their course is against the
 Gospel, because they lead men away from faith to works, then they go
 about and cry, "Thou art cursed, thou leadest the world astray." And
 they blaspheme even yet more, in perverting what Christ has said, and
 saying no! to it. As when they, out of that which Christ has bidden,
 make nothing but a story, so that they forbid what Christ would have
 left free, and make that sin which He makes none, besides condemning
 and burning whoever preaches against it. The way of truth is a
 well-ordered life and walk, in which there is no fraud nor hypocrisy,
 such as that faith is in which all Christians walk. This they cannot
 bear; they blaspheme and condemn it, so as to praise and sustain
 their Order and sect.
 
 
 V. 3. _And through avarice, with feigned words shall they make
 merchandise of you._ This is specially the way of all false teachers,
 that they preach from avarice, that they may fill their belly, just
 as we see that not one of them has held a mass or vigil _gratis_. So,
 too, there is never a cloister or monastery built, whereto there must
 not fall a full measure of tribute. So, too, there is not a cloister
 in the world that serves the world for God's sake. It is all of it
 done merely for gold. But if any one really preaches faith, _that_
 does not bring in much gold; for then, all pilgrimages, indulgences,
 cloisters, and monasteries, to which more than half the wealth of the
 world has been devoted and given, must cease; whereof none has any
 use but the priests and monks only.
 
 But how do they act to get the gold into their own hands? _With
 feigned words_, says Peter, _shall they make merchandise of you_. For
 they have selected the word by which they make money of the people,
 for this very purpose, as when they say, "If you give the dear
 Virgin, or this or that saint so many hundred florins, you do a most
 excellent good work, and merit so much indulgence and forgiving of
 sin, and ransom as many souls from purgatory."
 
 This and the like are just carefully feigned words, to the end that
 they may shave us of our gold; for in all this there is really no
 desert, nor grace, nor blotting out of sin. Still they explain the
 noble words of Scripture all of them in such a way, that they may
 traffic with them for gold. So, also, there has come of the holy,
 gracious Sacrament, nothing else but a traffic, for they do nothing
 with it but smear the people's mouth, and scrape their gold from
 them. Observe, then, whether St. Peter has not drawn and painted our
 clergy to the life.
 
 
 _Whose judgment now of a long time lingereth not, and their damnation
 slumbereth not._ They shall not drive this on at length, nor carry it
 out, (he would say); for when they urge it most strongly, their
 sentence and condemnation shall fall upon them. Even now it goes
 forth; they shall not escape it,--as St. Paul also says, II. Tim.
 iii.: "Their folly shall be revealed to all, so that they shall be
 put to shame;" God grant that they may be converted and come out from
 their dangerous state, when they hear and understand it, for though
 there are some who have not been seduced into this state, yet is it
 in itself nothing but a mere pernicious sect.
 
 Thus St. Peter has attempted to describe the shameful, godless life
 that should succeed to the genuine doctrines of the Gospel, which the
 Apostles preached. Now he goes further, and sets before us three
 terrible examples--of the angels, of the whole world, and of Sodom,
 how God condemned them,--and speaks thus:
 
 
 V. 4. _For if God spared not the angels that sinned, but has thrust
 them down to hell in chains of darkness, and given them over to be
 reserved for judgment._ By these words St. Peter terrifies those who
 live so gay and secure as we see those do who cleave to that which
 the Pope has enacted, in that they are so confident and shameless
 that they would tread every one under foot. Therefore he would say
 this much: Is it not great presumption on their part that they go on
 so eagerly, and would bring every thing to pass by their own head, as
 though God should yield to them, and spare them, who yet spared not
 the angels? As though he had said, these examples should justly
 terrify even the saints, when they see such a severe sentence in that
 God has not spared those high spirits and noble beings who are far
 more learned and wise than we, but has thrust them into chains of
 darkness;--such is the severe sentence and condemnation whereto He
 has ordained them, in which they are held bound and imprisoned, so
 that they cannot flee away out of the hands of God, since they have
 been cast into outer darkness, as Christ says in the Gospel.
 
 And here St. Peter shows that the devils have not yet their final
 punishment, but still go about in a hardened, desperate state, and
 look every moment for their judgment, just as a man that is condemned
 to death is perfectly desperate, hardened, and more and more wicked.
 But their punishment has not yet overtaken them, but they are now
 only bound and reserved for it. This is the first example.--Now
 follows the second:
 
 
 V. 5. _And spared not the old world, but saved Noah, the eighth
 person, a preacher of righteousness, and brought the flood upon the
 world of the ungodly._ This is, moreover, a fearful example, such
 indeed that there is not a more bitter one in the Scripture. One
 might almost despair in view of it, who was even strong in faith. For
 when such language and such a sentence go to a man's heart, and he
 thinks of it, that so he too ought to die, he must tremble and
 despond, if he is not well prepared, since among so many in the whole
 world, no one but these eight only were saved. But how have they
 deserved it, that God by such a severe sentence should have drowned
 all, one with another, in one mass, husband and wife, master and
 servant, young and old, beast and bird? Because they led such a
 wicked life. Noah was a pious man and a preacher of righteousness,
 and had already lived five hundred years, before the flood, when God
 commanded him to build an ark,--on which he wrought a hundred years
 thereafter; and he led throughout a uniformly godly life. Whence you
 may judge what a cross he had to bear, and in what care and anxiety
 the pious man stood, when he must needs show, by words and works,
 that he was a Christian. For it cannot be allowed that faith should
 conceal itself, and not break out before men by words and well-doing.
 So this man, alone, perhaps, long before God bade him build the ark,
 exercised the preacher's office, and spread the word of God not in
 one place, but, beyond doubt, through many lands. So that he must
 thus have suffered much and great persecution even, inasmuch as he is
 specially (as Peter says) sustained and kept by God, or he would soon
 have been overwhelmed and slain; for he must thus needs bear upon
 himself much envy and hate, and make even many high, wise and holy
 people his enemies. Had the matter not been helped, then the world
 would have despised the word of God, and been ever growing more
 wicked. When they had now driven on their wickedness to great length,
 God said, "My Spirit shall not always strive with men, since they are
 flesh; yet will I give them the term of an hundred and twenty years."
 Besides, "I will destroy from the earth the men whom I have created,
 from man even to the reptile, (I will destroy them)." These words he
 preached and enforced daily, and began to build the ark as had been
 commanded him; and he labors on it a hundred years. But the people
 laughed at him, and were only so much the more obstinate and foolish.
 But what the sin was for which God destroyed the world, the text of
 Gen. vi. tells us, that the children of God,--that is, those who came
 of holy parents, and were instructed and brought up in the faith and
 in the knowledge of God, sought after the daughters of men, since
 they were fair, and took for their wives whom they would. Thereafter
 they came from this to be powerful tyrants, who did everything that
 they chose after their own caprice; wherefore God punished the world
 and destroyed it by the flood.
 
 
 V. 6. _And reduced the cities of Sodom and Gomorrah to ashes,
 overthrowing and condemning them._ This is the third example drawn
 from the destruction of those five cities, Gen. xix. Whereof also the
 prophet Ezekiel speaks, in chap. xvi., addressing the city of
 Jerusalem: "this was the sin of Sodom thy sister,--pride, fullness of
 bread, luxury and idleness, and that to the poor they did not reach
 out the hand, and have lifted themselves up, and have wrought such
 shameful cruelty before me that I have even destroyed them." For
 Sodom was a land, like the garden of the Lord, as Moses says, and a
 rich mine of costly oil and wine and all things, so that every one
 would think, here dwells God. For this they were secure, and led such
 a shameful life as Moses has written of. Such sin breaks out only
 where there is an assurance that they have enough to eat and drink
 and to spare, and idleness is joined therewith; just as we still see,
 the richer cities are the more shamefully do men live in them; but
 where there is hunger and cumber there the sins are so much the
 fewer. Therefore God permits, in regard to those that are His, that
 their education should be severe, that they may remain pure.
 
 These are the three fearful examples whereby St. Peter threatens
 those that are godless. And as he insists upon it so, we must hold
 that this is its import. And it is spoken especially of the spiritual
 order--pope, cardinals, bishops, priests, monks and nuns, and all who
 hang upon them. These are, as it were, angels in the Apostles' stead,
 appointed to this very end, that they should preach and make known
 God's word; for an angel is a messenger, or one sent, who discharges
 his message by word of mouth, for which reason preachers are called
 in Scripture angels,--that is, messengers of God. Such angels should
 our clergy be. But as these angels of old fell off from God, and set
 themselves above God, and wished to be their own masters, so these do
 also, and have nothing but just the name of messengers, as those have
 the name alone of angels. So these also, as they have gone off from
 God, shall be held in chains of darkness and reserved to
 condemnation; as he has said above, that their sentence does not
 linger, nor their damnation slumber, although punishment has not as
 yet overtaken them.
 
 Beside, they are like that former world, who, although they heard the
 prophets and the word of God, yet blasphemed and reviled them; and as
 Moses writes, took to themselves wives according to their pleasure,
 whomsoever they would, and became great and powerful tyrants.
 Observe, then, whether all that which Moses wrote of those is not now
 taking place. These are the great scamps that live in revelry,
 oppress the world by their tyranny, and no one must ask of them why
 they play the fool. Whomsoever they will they take for wife or
 daughter, in spite of any one's complaining; for if any one finds
 fault with it they are themselves judges, and there is no one who can
 win their cause of them. Therefore whatever they can devise to bring
 into their hands by oppression or fines, that also they execute. And
 if any one should seize upon it, they then say, "it is the spiritual
 possession of the churches; it is exempt, and no one must lay hands
 on it." And as to those who preach God's word, they punish them to
 the taking away their life, and declare God's sentence on those that
 laugh at them; they will not hear the word, and they persecute the
 very preachers of righteousness, and, remaining great and mighty
 lords, would retain their title, so that they may be called
 spiritual, like those that are God's children, yet rule with full
 power in all obstinacy; but they must at last be subdued and
 destroyed. But the others who preach God's word shall be kept and
 sustained.
 
 Thirdly: as the land where the cities of Sodom and Gomorrah were was
 a mine of fat, and all had enough of what the earth could bear,
 thereby the people became indolent, glutted themselves with food and
 drink, and to none of the poor did they reach out the hand. Such is
 the case also with our Spiritual Estate, who possess generally the
 best land, the best castles and cities, and the greatest rents and
 tribute, while they have enough also to eat and drink. Besides, there
 is not a more indolent class of people on earth, that lives without
 anything of care or labor, and is fed by the sweat of the poor. But
 what indolence brings along we may see before our eyes. The Pope
 forbids them to take a married wife, so that if they then keep their
 concubines and have children they must give gold to the bishop for
 every child, whereby they will smooth the thing over and cancel the
 sin. I will not here speak of other secret sins which one dare not
 lightly stir up.
 
 Finally, you here see that St. Peter accounts of the Spiritual Estate
 no otherwise than as of Sodom and Gomorrah, for they are all such
 people as no one can be benefited by who lend none a helping hand,
 but seize to themselves all they can, under the pretence, which they
 put forth, that what is given to them is given to God, and they let
 no one be helped though he suffer want. Wherefore just as those were
 overthrown and turned to ashes, so shall these also be destroyed at
 the last day.
 
 
 V. 7. _And rescued righteous Lot who was troubled greatly by the
 libertine course of the wicked._ Was it not a great aggravation that
 they not only rushed publicly and shamelessly into whoredom and
 adultery, but into such sins as may not be mentioned,--insomuch that
 they did not even spare the angels who came to Lot, and they rushed
 on thus in their course, both young and old, in all the corners of
 the city! Against this, righteous Lot had daily preached and warned
 them, but all in vain, except that he is vexed by them, since he must
 stand still yet cannot smooth over the evil, just as is the case with
 us now, for there is no more hope to reform or help this grievous
 course of life that the world leads.
 
 
 V. 8. _For while that righteous man dwelt among them, since he must
 see and hear it all, they vexed his righteous soul from day to day,
 by their ungodly deeds._ Here Peter describes the cross which this
 holy man must have borne, while he preached to the people and brought
 up his daughters in faith; and so it is accounted toward him by God.
 Now St. Peter decides how the godless shall be kept for punishment at
 the last day.
 
 
 V. 9, 10. _The Lord knoweth how to deliver the godly out of
 temptation, but to reserve the unjust to the day of judgment to be
 punished, but especially those that walk after the flesh in the lust
 of uncleanness._ This is certainly deep passion and earnestness in
 the Apostle. If God spared not (says he) the young new world, how
 much more severely and fearfully will he now punish those to whom the
 Gospel has been revealed and preached, and before which no such great
 light has arisen; as Christ also declares, Matt. xi., "Woe to thee,
 Capernaum, who art exalted even to heaven! thou shalt be thrust down
 to hell; for if the deeds that have been done in thee had been done
 in Sodom, it had been standing at this day; for I say unto you, it
 shall be more tolerable for Sodom in that day than for you." But such
 threatening is in vain. The godless do not turn themselves for it.
 
 To live in the lust of uncleanness is to live just like an
 unreasoning beast--according to mere sense and every kind of lust. So
 everything is ordered by the Pope, ordered as it has pleased him, and
 all must subserve their wilfulness and tyranny; and they have warped
 and explained all just as it has pleased them, and thereupon said,
 "the holy See at Rome cannot err," while there is not one who has
 preached anything of faith or love; but they have taught nothing
 except what they have themselves imagined.
 
 
 V. 10, 11. _And those who despise governments, presumptuous,
 self-conceited, tremble not to revile dignities, whereas the angels,
 who are greater in power and might, bring not a railing accusation
 against them before the Lord._ He calls kings, princes and lords, and
 all civil magistracy, governments; and not the Pope and bishops, for
 these are not to be lords at all; since Christ, in the New Testament,
 is represented only as a servant--so that one Christian is to serve
 another, and hold him in honor. Wherefore _this_ is St. Peter's
 meaning: that they should be subject and obedient to civil
 magistracy; as the sword is introduced by God's ordinance, stand thou
 in fear. Yet they do the very reverse of this. They have excepted
 themselves, and say they are not subject to the civil magistracy;
 yea, they have not only excepted themselves, but have even subjected
 those to themselves, and trampled on them with their feet, and permit
 themselves shamelessly to be called lords, even by kings and princes,
 just as the Pope writes of himself that he is a lord of heaven and
 earth, and has in his hand both the civil and spiritual sword, and
 that every one must fall at his feet.
 
 Besides, St. Peter says that they do not tremble to blaspheme
 dignities; for it has become to the Pope a small and slight thing to
 put kings and princes under ban, to curse them, and depose them, and
 moreover excite mischief among them, and stir them up one against
 another. And as to those who have opposed themselves, these he has
 quickly overthrown and trodden on, not because they have done
 anything against faith or love, but only because they have not been
 willing to be subject to the Romish See, or kiss the Pope's foot,
 because, forsooth, his power was as much greater than that of secular
 princes as the sun is than the moon, or as the heaven is high above
 the earth; so they lyingly blasphemed, while yet they are bound to be
 subject and obedient to them, and should bless them and pray for
 them, as Christ our Lord subjected Himself to Pilate, and gave to the
 Emperor the penny tribute. They ought, therefore, to tremble at
 reviling against dignities; yet are they unaffrighted and
 presumptuous in regard to it, and they revile with all zeal and
 recklessness, while yet if even the strongest angels cannot endure
 judgment against themselves from the Lord, and besides are struck
 dumb from cursing and reviling the very One from whom they cannot
 escape, how then will these wretched people endure it?
 
 
 V. 12, 13. _But these are like unreasoning brutes, that are born, in
 accordance with their nature, to be taken and destroyed; they speak
 evil of that which they do not know, and in their own ruin shall they
 perish, and receive therefrom the reward of their unrighteousness._
 _Unreasonable brutes_, Peter calls them, as though they had within
 them not a spark of anything that smacked of spirit, performed no
 spiritual duty that they should do, but lived like the fool, and
 became effeminate through a carnal life. But in that he says they are
 naturally born to be taken and destroyed, it may be understood in a
 two-fold manner: first, as of those that take and destroy, such as
 the wolf, lion, bear, the sparrow-hawk and eagle,--so these grasp to
 themselves, and tear away from others all they can, goods and honor.
 Secondly, of those that shall be taken, crushed and destroyed at the
 judgment of the last day.
 
 
 _They count temporal enjoyment as the fullness of pleasure._ See how
 indignant St. Peter is! I must not chide the young gentlemen so
 grievously. They think if they only live well, and have good times,
 then they have enough of all things, and are right well off; this one
 can easily trace in their spiritual claim, when they say that whoever
 touches them as to their property or their belly, is of the devil.
 They themselves cannot deny this, that their whole system is framed
 to this end, that they may have lazy and idle times, and all that can
 suffice them. They will lade themselves with no trouble or labor, but
 every one must make and devote enough for them. They must go to the
 choir and pray. God has commanded all men that they should eat their
 bread by the sweat of their brow, and He has imposed trial and
 anxiety upon all. Meanwhile, these young masters would slip their
 heads out of this noose, and busy themselves with kisses. But this is
 the greatest blindness, that they are so dumb, and therefore hold
 that such a shameful life is right and lovely.
 
 
 _Spots are they, and blemishes._ They know not but that they adorn
 Christianity, as the sun and moon do heaven, and are the noblest and
 most precious jewels, like gold and precious stones; yet St. Peter
 calls them spots of shame and blemishes. The true christian life
 develops from faith, serves every one in love, bears the holy cross,
 which is the true badge, ornament, jewel and honor of the Christian
 Church;--but these have, in place of the cross, lust and luxury;
 instead of love to their neighbor, they seek their own interest,
 snatch all to themselves, and let nothing go from themselves to
 another for his advantage. Thus they know of faith just nothing at
 all. For they are nothing but the spots and stains which Christianity
 must have as its shame and derision. That is chiding enough,
 certainly, for our spiritual lords.
 
 
 _They lead an effeminate life through your charity, feast richly on
 your goods._ What was given at first out of christian love, to
 procure a common fund for widows and worthy persons, and also for the
 poor, so that no one among the Christians need suffer want or
 beg,--property of this kind is now all devoted to monasteries and
 cloisters, from which our ecclesiastics fill their bellies, living
 upon it most luxuriously, and revelling in it; and to this end they
 say it belongs to them, and no one shall restrain them for it. The
 Holy Spirit will not permit that the servants of the church should
 lead an effeminate life from other people's labor; but to the
 laboring class, and to man, woman and child generally, was it
 properly devoted of old.
 
 
 V. 14. _They have eyes full of adultery._ Such must always follow
 when the body is crammed with food and drink, and loiters indolent,
 as was said above. Wherefore does St. Peter say,--not, they are
 adulterers,--but, _they have eyes full of adultery_? It is as much as
 though he should say, They think ever on nothing but fornication, and
 can never restrain their roguery, nor be satisfied and quiet. This is
 the cause of their continual gluttony and revel, so far as they can
 push it, and thus they are suffered to live at large and unpunished,
 just as they like,--as follows:
 
 
 _Their sin is not to be interfered with._ The Pope has forbidden any
 prince or secular magistrate to punish ecclesiastics, and where they
 maintain their own authority he puts them under bann. But this matter
 is committed to the bishops; yet, since they are knaves themselves,
 they look through their fingers. Thus they have excepted themselves
 from subjection to civil government and the sword, so that no one
 shall dare to restrain them in their caprice, and they all live
 according to their own lusts, like those of old before the deluge.
 
 
 _They allure to themselves light-minded souls._ With such great show
 as they exhibit in their knavish life, as going through with mass,
 begging, singing, &c., do they allure and draw light-minded and
 unstable souls, who are without faith, to imagine that everything is
 spiritual; and all is shaped to this end, that men may think that in
 that estate every one shall have enough, and good times besides, and,
 moreover, that he shall reach heaven; and yet it is all done only to
 this end, that they may fill their bellies and their dirt-bag.
 
 
 _They have a heart penetrated with covetousness._ This vice is so
 gross and open among the ecclesiastics, that even the common people
 have complained of it. Yet he says not, they are covetous, but, they
 have a heart penetrated with covetousness, and especially exercised
 therein. This may be seen in the fact that they have invented so many
 swindling and cunning stories that it is impossible to count them, by
 which they bring all the world's wealth to themselves.
 
 All that this class practices and pursues is simple, pure
 covetousness, and must all be worth money enough. They show it also
 most plainly of all, as they are equipped and prepared on all sides
 to call on men for their gold; so that St. Peter was certainly not a
 liar.
 
 
 _They are children of cursing._ That is, in the Hebrew, as much as to
 say, they are cursed children, subject to the curse of God, so that
 before God they have no favor or salvation, and only become more
 wicked from day to day, and continually, also, greater blasphemers of
 God; so that they surely lade themselves full enough with the wrath
 and terrible judgment of God. That is surely spoken severely and
 fearfully enough; while it is high time that whoever can flee and
 run, should flee and run forth from this cursed state. Should we bear
 such a _title_, _that_ is certainly pitiful; but if the High Majesty
 also arraigns, curses, and condemns,--who will endure it?
 
 
 V. 15. _They have forsaken the right way, and gone in error._ They
 should have taught the right way,--how we must cleave to Christ, and
 come to God by faith, and through love to our neighbor; and
 thereafter bear the holy cross, and endure whatever meets us
 therefor. But they preach no more than this, "go hither and
 thither,--be monk and priest,--found churches, masses, &c., &c.;" and
 they lead away the people from faith to their own works, which yet
 are such as are of no use to their neighbor.
 
 
 V. 15, 16. _And have followed the way of Balaam, the son of Bosor,
 who loved the reward of unrighteousness, but had a rebuke for his
 transgression, the dumb beast of burden speaking with man's voice and
 reproving the folly of the prophet._ Here he brings in an
 illustration from the fourth book of Moses, xxii.-xxiv. When the
 children of Israel had journeyed out of Egypt and had come into the
 land of the Moabites, king Balak sent to a prophet in Syria, by the
 name of Balaam, and besought him that he would come and curse the
 Jewish people, that they might become weak and that he might slay
 them. Then God appeared to Balaam, and forbade him to curse the
 people; therefore the prophet declines to comply with Balak.
 Thereupon the king sent to him once more, and promised to give him
 large wealth. Then God permits him to go to him, yet he shall say
 nothing but what He shall direct him to say.
 
 Upon this, he rose up and mounted upon an ass. The angel of God came
 and walked in the way, and stood before him with a drawn sword. The
 ass saw it, and turned aside out of the way, at which the prophet
 struck her, that she should go in the way. Then the angel went to a
 narrow place where the ass could not turn aside, and when she presses
 herself against the wall and bruises the prophet's foot, she is
 forced to fall under him upon her knee, while he is angered so as in
 his rage to strike the ass with his staff. Then God opens the mouth
 of the beast to speak with the voice of a man, and she said, "What
 have I done to you that you should strike me so?" And he said, "Ah!
 if I had now a sword in my hand, I would slay you." Then the ass
 answered and said, "Am I yet the ass upon which thou hast ridden
 continually even to this day, and have I done it for no more than
 this?" Then were the eyes of the prophet opened, so that he saw the
 angel with the drawn sword, at which he was affrighted and would have
 turned back; but the angel of the Lord bade him go on, but thereupon
 forbade him to speak anything else than what He should say to him.
 
 When now the prophet was come to the king, he takes him up to a
 height from which he could see the whole people of Israel. Then the
 prophet bade him erect seven altars, and on each offer a sacrifice;
 and then went aside and asked the Lord what he should say. And God
 gave him his word in his mouth. And he rose up to bless and glorify
 the people of Israel with fair words; and this he did three times,
 one after another. Then was the king filled with wrath, and said,
 "Did I not call thee that thou shouldst curse mine enemies? and yet
 thou hast blest them now these three times. I had thought that I
 should have honored thee, but the Lord hath turned thee away from
 honor." Balaam answered and said, "Yet I told thee at first, that
 though thou shouldst give me thine house full of silver and gold,
 still I could speak nothing else but what God should say to me."
 
 Yet did the prophet afterward give the king counsel how he should
 manage with the people, although he might not curse them and overcome
 them by power,--so that they sinned against God. Then the king sets
 up an idol, by name Baal-Peor, and causes that the Moabite women,
 daughters of lords and princes, should ensnare the people to
 themselves to sacrifice to their gods; and when they had brought them
 to themselves, they made supplication to the idol with meats and
 drinks, and committed sin with the women. Then was God angry, and
 commanded the chief of the people to be hung upon the gallows, and
 permitted four and twenty thousand men to be overcome in one day.
 Such was this prophet Balaam's advice, for the sake of gold.
 
 Of this St. Peter here speaks, and would say that our ecclesiastics
 are specially Balaam's children and scholars; for just as he gave
 evil counsel to set up an idol so that the children of Israel should
 be brought to sin and provoke God that they should be slain, so have
 our bishops also set up an idol, in God's name,--to wit, their human
 doctrine of their own works; and they let faith go, and they lure to
 themselves christian souls whom they injure, and thereby provoke God
 to anger, so that he has punished the world with blindness and
 stupidity. For all this we may thank our spiritual masters.
 
 Thus Peter compares especially these false teachers to the prophet
 Balaam, since they even, like Balaam, purely for the sake of gold,
 set up such idolatry and ruin souls.
 
 Besides, he mentions his right name, for Bileaam or Balaam is he
 called in Hebrew, a swallower or swiller, like one who gapes his
 throat open, and swallows and devours all. This shameful name must he
 bear, because he has brought so many people into sin, insomuch that
 they are destroyed and overcome.
 
 Such Balaamites are our bishops and ecclesiastics, who are the throat
 of the devil, by which he draws so many souls to himself, and
 swallows them down. But the surname of this prophet is, the son of
 Bosor,--that is to say, flesh,--or, as Moses says, son of Beor, that
 is, of a fool. A fool is his father. So are these, also, blind, dull
 and foolish people, who must yet needs rule; such a people as the
 flesh bears, for the spirit makes men of another stamp. So God has
 given these in the Scripture their own name, and therein they are so
 painted to the life, that we may know in what account they are to be
 held.
 
 Now the dumb beast of burden, the ass, signifies the people that lets
 itself be bridled and ridden, and goes as it is led, like the ass,
 who was forced and beaten cruelly when he went out of the way into
 the ditch, and must neither give place before the angel in the way so
 long as it could help, nor turn aside, and so must fall down. For in
 the same way have these seducers also urged on the people, until
 these last have become sensible that it is a thing not to be endured,
 and that they deal unfairly with them, and have wished to turn them
 aside from the way. But the harshness has been so gross whereby they
 have troubled the people, that at length God has opened our lips and
 given words into our mouths, so that even the children speak of it;
 whereby their folly is made plain, so that they must be ashamed. In
 this way we ought to meet them when they go about, and give out that
 it belongs not to the laity to read the Scripture, and therefore say,
 we must hear what the Councils determine. For then you may answer,
 Has not God spoken even by an ass? Be content with our knowing that
 ye, in times past, preached the word of God; but now ye have become
 fools, and are possessed by avarice, what wonder is it that now the
 common people have been roused and impelled by God to speak the
 truth, though it has been so burdened and oppressed like a dumb beast
 of burden. This is their likeness, taken from the prophet Balaam. Now
 St. Peter says further of these false teachers:
 
 
 V. 17. _They are wells without water, and clouds driven about by the
 whirlwind._ In like manner Solomon presents us a comparison, in Prov.
 xxv., and says, "As when a great cloud and strong wind go forth, and
 yet no rain follows, so is a man who makes high boastings of himself,
 and does not make good his words." So Peter says here, also, _they
 are wells without water, and clouds driven about by the whirlwind_;
 that is, they make great show, and have nothing beside. They are like
 the dry, false and exhausted wells, although they have the fame and
 title of being true wells. For Scripture calls those who teach,
 wells, as the ones from whom should flow that wholesome doctrine by
 which souls are to be quickened. To this office are they anointed and
 set apart. But what do they do? Nothing, as a general thing; for they
 have nothing else but just the bare name, just as they are called
 shepherds, and yet are wolves.
 
 Besides, they are the clouds which the wind drives about--not like
 the thick, black and lowering clouds which are wont to give us rain,
 but like those fleecy ones which move about and fly in the air, and
 are very light, which the wind drives wherever it will, after which
 no rain can follow. So our teachers also sweep about and move high in
 Christendom, like the clouds in heaven, but let themselves be driven
 about wherever the devil chooses, to whom they are ready to yield in
 all kinds of lusts. But yet they preach not a word of God, like true
 teachers and preachers, who are called clouds in Scripture (as Is.
 v.),--as also by all that gives forth water, preachers are typified
 in Scripture.
 
 
 _For whom is reserved the blackness of darkness forever._ They live
 now at their ease, and things go with them just as they themselves
 would have them. But there shall come an eternal darkness upon them,
 although they do not believe nor apprehend it.
 
 
 V. 18. _For they speak in swelling words, which have nothing back of
 them._ If you ask how they may be called wells without water, and
 clouds without rain, while they yet preach throughout the whole
 world, St. Peter answers: they rain and preach, alas! altogether too
 much; but they are only vain, swollen and puffed-up words, by which
 they blow the poor people's ears full, so that men think it is
 something fine; and yet it is nothing but show. Just as the monks,
 with high, bold words, set forth their obedience, poverty and
 chastity, so that men think they are a holy people, while yet it is
 nothing but mere trickery, and certainly no faith nor love can be
 found among it. Like this, also, is their pretence that the estate of
 bishops is a more perfect estate, while these yet do nothing else but
 ride about pompously on their fine horses, and now and then
 consecrate churches and altars, and baptise bells. Such puffed-up and
 swollen words are the whole spiritual law of the Pope, throughout.
 
 
 _And they allure, through guile, to the lust of the flesh, those who
 had well-nigh escaped, and now they walk in error._ This is what
 these wells and teachers do, so that they who were almost escaped
 must fall into the snare of wickedness, and for the first time be
 truly captured. A child that has been baptised, rescued from all
 sins, snatched from the devil and set out from Adam into Christ, when
 he comes to reason is soon entangled and led away into error. Men
 should be taught of faith, and love, and the holy cross, while our
 clergy go their own way, throw up their work whereby these persons
 fall back again into error, even though they had escaped it. But how
 does this come to pass? Thus: in that by guile they allure the people
 to the lust of the flesh. Their strongest persuasion is in their
 saying that priests, monks and nuns should not be married, and should
 bind themselves to maintain chastity, by which they do no more than
 allure to unchastity, forasmuch as the wretched people must perish in
 their wicked lusts, and there is nothing to help them.
 
 But here you clearly see that Peter speaks of none other than
 teachers who bear rule in Christendom, where men are baptised and
 believers,--for among the Turks and heathen, no one has so escaped;
 it is only among Christians, where they have the chance to lead souls
 astray, and bring them into the snare of the devil.
 
 
 V. 19. _And they promise them freedom, while they themselves are the
 servants of corruption, for of whom any one is overcome, his servant
 has he become._ They set up Orders by which a man is to be saved,--as
 Thomas, the monk preacher, has shamelessly written, that when a man
 shall enter into one of these Orders, be it as vile as it may, it is
 as though he had but just come forth from his baptism; and then they
 promise him freedom and forgiving of sins by works of his own. Such
 blasphemy must we hear, while they set their human fancies and
 ludicrous conceits, destitute of faith, on a level with faith and
 baptism which God has established, and which are peculiarly his work.
 Who is to endure this and still keep silent? Such stories have the
 monks gotten up, and they cram them into the young; and such teachers
 as these men have set up for saints. But the other saints, truly
 such, they have burnt to ashes.
 
 
 V. 20. _For if they have escaped the pollution of the world through
 the knowledge of the Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ, but shall be
 again entangled and overcome in the same, their last end is worse for
 them than the first._ There Peter shows why they are the servant of
 corruption. To confess Christ is to know what he is, even our
 Saviour, who forgives us our sins from pure grace. By this confession
 we escape the vice and come out from the pollution of the world. But
 though they should already have been delivered from sin in baptism,
 they shall afterwards be plunged therein, for that they have again
 gone from faith to their own works. For where there is no faith, the
 Spirit is absent; but where the Spirit is absent, there is nothing
 but flesh, so that there can be nothing at all that is pure. So has
 it come to pass hitherto in regard to Christianity. Rome first heard
 the pure Gospel, but afterward went back and fell away to human
 doctrines, until even upon herself all abominations have come up; so
 that her last end has become worse than her first, in that she is now
 far more hopeless in her heathenism than she ever was before she
 heard the word of God.
 
 
 V. 21. _For it had been far better for them that they had never known
 the way of righteousness, than that they should know it, and turn
 themselves away from the holy command that has been given them. For
 it has happened to them according to the proverb, The dog turns to
 his own vomit again, and the sow after her washing wallows in the
 mire._ This proverb St. Peter has taken out of the book of Prov.
 xxvi., where Solomon says, "A man who repeats his folly is like the
 dog who turns again to his vomit." By baptism they have thrown off
 unbelief, and have been washed from their polluted life, and have
 entered upon a pure life of faith and love, while they fall off from
 it again to unbelief and their own works, and defile themselves again
 in the dirt. So that we are not to make this proverb bear on works;
 for little is accomplished by one's saying and directing at
 confession, "Thou shalt henceforth be chaste, meek, and patient," &c.
 But if you will be pious, pray God that he will give you a real
 faith, and see to it that you forsake your unbelief. When you shall
 then have attained faith, good works shall afterwards take care of
 themselves, so that you will live purely and chastely, even though
 you should secure yourself by no other means; and though, again, you
 might awhile conceal the mischief in your heart, yet at last it comes
 out.
 
 This is the second chapter of this Epistle, wherein Peter speaks
 specially of our teachers, how shamefully we have been treated by
 them. We have indeed had warning enough, but we have not minded it,
 so that the fault is ours that we have not laid hold on the Gospel,
 and that we have by our lives deserved such anger of God. We hear it
 generally, all of us, with gladness, when some one assaults and
 upbraids the Pope along with his priests and monks; but yet, no one
 will draw advantage to himself from it. It is not such a trifling
 matter of sport that one must laugh at it, but of such seriousness
 that the heart should fear and tremble on account of it. Therefore
 should we lay hold upon it with seriousness, and pray that God would
 turn away from us his anger and such plagues. For this calamity has
 not come upon us unforeseen, but it is sent upon us by God as a
 punishment,--as Paul says, II. Thes. ii.: "Since they have not
 received the love of the truth, that they might be saved, therefore
 shall God send upon them strong delusion so that they shall believe a
 lie," &c., &c. For had the punishment gone but so far that the false
 teachers only were lost, it would have been yet a little thing
 against the fact that they have had the rule, and carried all the
 world with them to hell. Therefore, in regard to the evil, we are to
 take no counsel except to apprehend the matter in Godly fear and
 humility, confess our guilt, and pray God to turn away the punishment
 from us. By prayer must one contend against the false teachers,
 although the devil do not let him win.--Now follows, next:
 
 
 
 
 CHAPTER III.
 
 
 V. 1, 2. _This is the second Epistle which I write to you, beloved,
 in which I stir up your pure minds to remembrance, that ye may think
 upon the word which was said to you before by the holy prophets, and
 upon our command, who are Apostles of the Lord and Saviour._ Here St.
 Peter comes to us again, and warns us in this chapter to be prepared,
 and look every moment for the last day. And so he says in the first
 of it, that he has written this Epistle, not in order to lay down a
 ground of faith, which he had done before, but to awaken, remind,
 arrest, and urge them not to forget the same, and to abide in the
 clear view and understanding which they have of a true christian
 life. For it is the preacher's office, as we have said often, not
 only to teach, but also continually to admonish and restrain. For
 since our flesh and blood ever clings to us, God's word must be
 stronger in us, that we may not give room to the flesh, but strive
 against it, and gain the upper hand of it.
 
 
 V. 3, 4. _And know, first of all, that in the last days there shall
 come scoffers who walk after their own lusts, and say, Where is the
 promise of his coming? for since the fathers fell asleep, all things
 remain as from the beginning of creation._ Yet are men swayed hither
 and thither by a book concerning Antichrist, wherein it is written
 that the people before the last day shall fall into such error that
 they shall say, there is no God, and shall scoff at all that is
 preached of Christ and the last day. That is true, whencesoever it
 has been taken. But we are not so to understand it as that the whole
 world shall say and hold such things, but the greater part. For that
 time is even now at hand, and shall prevail yet more when the Gospel
 shall come down among the people, when the proud ones shall lift
 themselves up, and the secrets of many hearts break forth, which are
 now hidden and unknown. There have even already been many who have
 altogether rejected the idea of the coming of the last day.
 
 Of such scoffers St. Peter here warns us, and tells us of them
 beforehand, that they must come, and rush into this hazard and live
 as they list. At Rome and in Italy this word is now at length
 fulfilled, and they who come thence, bring such errors also forth
 with them; for just as they have a long time perplexed themselves
 therein, so, also, must they perplex the people by the same means.
 And even though the last day were now before the door, such people
 must come abroad. So shall be fulfilled that which Christ says, Mat.
 xxiv.: "Just as it was in the time of Noah, so shall it also be at
 the coming of the Son of Man; for as they were in the days before the
 deluge, they ate, they drank, they married and were given in
 marriage, even to the day when Noah entered into the ark, and they
 knew it not till the flood came and swallowed them all; so, also,
 shall the coming of the Son of Man be." Also, "The Son of Man shall
 come at an hour when ye think not." Also, Luke xxi.: "This day shall
 come as a snare, upon all that dwell upon the earth." And once more,
 Luke xvii.: "As the lightning lightens over us from heaven, and
 shines upon all that is under the heaven, so shall the Son of Man be
 in His day,"--that is, so quick and unforeseen and sudden shall He
 break in upon it, while the world shall be living above all, for
 itself first, and shall throw God's word to the winds.
 
 Therefore this shall be a sign of the last day that it is near, when
 the people shall live as they list, according to all their lusts, and
 such talk goes about among them as this: "Where is the promise of his
 coming? the world has stood so long and continued to abide, is it now
 for the first time to be otherwise?" Thus Peter warns us that we
 should not be surprised, and that we have a sure sign that the day
 will soon come.--It follows, further:
 
 
 V. 5, 6. _But this in their obstinacy they will not know, that the
 heavens of old, besides the earth standing out of the water and in
 the water, were (made) by God's word, yet through the same, was the
 world in its time destroyed by the flood._ Such people they are, he
 says, as show not so much diligence as to read the Scripture, but
 obstinately refuse to think and be aware that so also it was of old,
 when Noah built the ark; the world which stood and was made through
 the water and in the water, was destroyed by water, and the people
 were yet so safe and secure that they thought, surely there is no
 danger,--yet they were all alike destroyed by water. As though he
 should say,--if God has for once destroyed the world by water, and
 shown by an example that he can sink it, how much more will he do it
 now that he has promised to do it.
 
 But here St. Peter speaks somewhat particularly of the creation. The
 heaven and the earth stood fast aforetime; they were made of water
 and stood in the water, by the word of God. Heaven and earth have a
 beginning; they have not been forever; the heaven was made from the
 water, and there was water above and beneath,--but the earth is made
 and stands in the water, as Moses writes, whom St. Peter here quotes.
 All is sustained by God's word, as it also was made by the same, for
 it is not their nature so to stand. Therefore if God did not sustain
 it, it must all soon fall down and sink into the water. For God spoke
 a word of power when he said, "let the waters under the heavens
 gather themselves into a separate place, that the dry land may be
 seen;" that is, let the water put itself aside and give room for the
 earth to come forth, whereon man might dwell,--yet naturally the
 waters should spread themselves over the earth. Therefore this is, at
 the present day, one of the greatest miracles that God works.
 
 Now St. Peter would say this: so obstinate and stupid are these
 scoffers, that they will not do honor to the Holy Spirit, though they
 read how God holds up the earth in the water, whence they should be
 convinced that all stands in the hands of God. Therefore, since God
 at that time drowned the earth, so he will deal with us even yet
 again. For that example should certainly convince us that, as in that
 very case he has not lied, so again he will not lie.
 
 
 V. 7. _But the heaven which yet is, and the earth, are by his word
 sustained, that they be reserved for fire in the day of Judgment and
 condemnation of ungodly men._ At that time, when God destroyed the
 world by a flood, the water pressed down from above, up from beneath
 and from all sides, so that nothing could be seen but water only;
 because the earth, as its nature was, must be swallowed up in the
 water. But now he has promised, and given the rainbow for a sign in
 heaven, that he will no more destroy the world by water. Therefore he
 will destroy it and let it perish by fire, so that here it shall be
 fire only, as there it was water only. Of which St. Paul, II. Thes.
 i., says: "When now the Lord Jesus shall be revealed from heaven,
 together with the angels of his power, and with flaming fire," etc.
 So I. Cor. iii.: "Every one's work shall be revealed; the day of the
 Lord shall make it clear, which shall be revealed with fire." So when
 the last day breaks and bursts in on the world, it will in a moment
 be fire only; what is in heaven and in earth shall be turned to dust
 and ashes, and all things must be changed by fire, as that change
 took place by water. This shall be a sign that God will not lie so
 long as He has left that for a sign.
 
 
 V. 8-10. _But of this one thing, beloved, be ye not ignorant; that
 one day with the Lord is as a thousand years, and a thousand years as
 one day. The Lord is not slack concerning his promise as some men
 count slackness, but he is long-suffering toward you, and wills not
 that any one should perish, but that all should come to repentance;
 but the Day of the Lord shall come as a thief in the night, in which
 the heavens shall pass away with a great noise, but the elements
 shall be melted with fervent heat, and the earth and the works that
 are therein shall be burned up._ With these words St. Peter meets
 those of whom he has just spoken, who say: "The Apostles have said
 much about the Last Day coming quickly,--and yet so long a time is
 past, and still all continues as heretofore." And he has quoted this
 passage from Moses, in the lxxxix. Ps., where he says: "A thousand
 years are in thine eyes as yesterday, when it is past." This is the
 scope of it.
 
 There are two ways of viewing things,--one for God, the other for the
 world. So also this present life and that to come, are twofold. This
 life cannot be that, since none can reach that but by death,--that
 is, by ceasing from _this_ life. This life is just to eat, drink,
 sleep, endure, bring up children, etc., in which all moves on
 successively, hours, day, year, one after another: if you wish now to
 apprehend that life, you must banish out of your mind the course of
 this present life; you must not think that you can so apprehend it,
 where it will all be one day, one hour, one moment.
 
 Since then in God's sight there is no reckoning of time, a thousand
 years must be before him, as it were, a day. Therefore the first man,
 Adam, is just as near to him as he who shall be last born before the
 last day. For God sees not time lengthwise but obliquely, just as
 when you look at right-angles to a long tree which lies before you,
 you can fix in your view both place and parts at once,--a thing you
 cannot do if you only look at it lengthwise. We can, by our reason,
 look at time only according to its duration; we must begin to count
 from Adam, one year after another, even to the last day. But before
 God it is all in one heap; what is long with us is short with
 him,--and again, here there is neither measure nor number. So when
 man dies, the body is buried and wastes away, lies in the earth and
 knows nothing; but when the first man rises up at the last day, he
 will think he has lain there scarcely an hour, while he will look
 about himself and become assured that so many people were born of him
 and have come after him, of whom he had no knowledge at all.
 
 This, then, is St. Peter's meaning: the Lord does not delay his
 promise as some scoffers let themselves imagine, but is
 long-suffering; therefore should ye be prepared for the last
 day,--for it will come soon enough to every one after his death, in
 that he will say, "lo! I have but just now died!" But it comes upon
 the world all too soon: when the people shall say, "there is peace,
 no danger threatens," it shall break forth and come upon them, as St.
 Paul says, I. Thess. v. And with so great a noise shall the day tear
 its way and burst forth like a great storm, that in a moment must all
 be wasted.
 
 
 V. 11, 12. _Since then all this must pass away, how careful should ye
 be in all holy conduct and a Godly life, that ye wait for and hasten
 to the coming of the day of the Lord._ Since ye know this, that all
 must pass away, both heaven and earth,--think how ye shall be
 prepared to meet this day, by a holy and godly life and conversation.
 For Peter describes this day as one that is to come even now, so that
 men should be prepared for it, to hope for it with joy, and even
 hasten to run to meet it, as that which sets us free from death, sin
 and hell.
 
 
 V. 12, 13. _In which the heavens shall pass away by fire, and the
 elements shall be melted with fervent heat; but we look for a new
 heaven and a new earth, according to his promise, in which dwelleth
 righteousness._ God has promised by the prophets, here and there,
 that he would create a new heaven and a new earth,--as in Is. lxv.,
 "Behold, I will create a new heaven and a new earth, wherein ye shall
 be happy, and shout and leap for joy." So in xxx. "The appearance of
 the moon shall be as the light of the sun, and the splendor of the
 sun shall be seven times as bright, as though seven days were joined
 one into another;" and Christ says, Matt. xiii., "The righteous shall
 shine like the sun, in their Father's kingdom." How that is to pass
 away we cannot know, except that the promise is, that such a heaven
 and earth are to be, wherein no sin, but righteousness only, and the
 children of God shall dwell; as also St. Paul says, Rom. viii., there
 shall be pure love, pure joy, and nothing but God's kingdom.
 
 Here some may disquiet themselves as to whether the saints shall have
 their station in heaven or on earth. The text seems to imply that man
 shall dwell upon the earth,--yet so that all heaven and earth shall
 be a paradise wherein God dwells, for God dwells not alone in heaven,
 but in all places, wherefore the elect shall be also even where He
 is.
 
 
 V. 14. _Therefore, my beloved, since ye look for such things, be
 diligent, that ye may be found of him without spot, and blameless, in
 peace._ Since ye have escaped, he says, such misery, and come to so
 great joy, ye should suffer yourselves to be persuaded to despise
 willingly all that is upon the earth, and suffer cheerfully whatever
 duty requires. Therefore should ye be diligent, that ye may live a
 peaceful and blameless life.
 
 
 V. 15. _And the long-suffering of our Lord Jesus Christ account for
 your salvation._ In that He so spares, and delays, and does not come
 to speedy judgment, take account of this as designed for your
 benefit. He had good reason to be angry and to punish, yet out of His
 grace He does it not.
 
 
 V. 15, 16. _As also our beloved brother Paul, according to the wisdom
 that has been given unto him has written, as he also in all his
 letters speaks thereof, in which are some things hard to be
 understood, which the unlearned and unstable wrest, as they also do
 other Scriptures, to their own destruction._ There St. Peter bears
 testimony for the Apostle Paul in respect to his doctrine, which
 shows plainly enough that this Epistle was written long after St.
 Paul's Epistles. And this is one of the passages which might be
 adduced to maintain that this Epistle is not St. Peter's, as also
 there was one before this in this chapter--namely, where he says,
 "the Lord wills not that any should be lost, but that every one
 should give himself to repentance." For it falls some little below
 the Apostolic spirit; still it is credible that it is none the less
 the Apostle's, for since herein, he is writing not of faith but of
 love, he lets himself down somewhat, as the manner of love is,
 inasmuch as it humbles itself toward its neighbor, just as faith
 rises above itself.
 
 But he has yet seen that many unstable spirits wrested and perverted
 St. Paul in his words and doctrines, inasmuch as some things in his
 Epistles are hard to be understood,--as when he speaks in this way,
 "that no one is justified by works, but by faith alone;" so, too,
 "the law is given to make sin more gross;" so, too, "where sin
 abounded, there grace much more abounds," and more passages of the
 same sort. For when men hear such, then they say, if that is true, we
 will go on indolently, and do no good work, and so be righteous, as
 men even now say, that we forbid good works; for if one so perverts
 St. Paul's own words, what wonder is it that they should, in like
 manner, pervert ours?
 
 
 V. 17, 18. _But ye, my beloved, since ye know this beforehand, beware
 for yourselves that ye be not led away by the error of the wicked
 likewise, and fall from your own steadfastness. But grow in grace,
 and in knowledge of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ, to whom be
 praise, now and forever. Amen._ Since ye know, he says, all that has
 been said above, and see that many false teachers must come, who lead
 the world astray, and such scoffers as pervert the Scripture and will
 not understand it, take care of yourselves; guard against them with
 diligence, that ye fall not from the faith by doctrines of error; and
 grow, so as to become stronger from day to day by the steadfast
 practice and preaching of the word of God. Here observe how great
 care the Apostle shows for those who have come to believe, which
 urged him even to write these two Epistles, wherein is richly
 comprehended what a Christian should know, besides also that which is
 yet to come. May God give his grace, that we also may seize hold upon
 and retain it. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 THE EPISTLE OF SAINT JUDE.
 
 
 V. 1, 2. _Jude, a servant of Jesus Christ, but a brother of James, to
 those that are called to be holy in God the Father, and preserved in
 Jesus Christ, mercy unto you and peace and love be multiplied._ This
 Epistle is ascribed to the holy Apostle, St. Jude, brother of the two
 Apostles, James the Less and Simon, by the sister of the mother of
 Christ, who is called Mary (wife) of James or Cleopas, as we read in
 Mark vi. But this Epistle cannot be looked upon as being that of one
 who was truly an Apostle, for the author speaks in it of the
 Apostles, as being much their junior. It has even nothing peculiar
 about it, except that it refers to the second Epistle of St. Peter,
 from which it has taken nearly all its words, and is scarcely
 anything else than an Epistle against our clergy, bishops, priests
 and monks.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: It is well known that at an early period the book of
 Jude was reckoned among the _antilegomena_. This was mainly in
 consequence of its references to the Apocryphal books of Enoch and of
 the Ascension of Christ. Yet De Wette, than whom none would be more
 disposed to sift it thoroughly, says, "no important objection to the
 genuineness of the Epistle can be made good; neither the use of the
 Apocryphal book of Enoch, nor the resemblance of v. 24 to Rom. xvi.
 25, nor a style of writing which betrays a certain familiarity with
 the Greek tongue. The Epistle is less open to suspicion, as the
 author does not distinctly claim to be an Apostle, nor can a pretext
 for forgery be discovered." Again, he says: "they who regard the Son
 of Alpheus and the brother of the Lord as one and the same person,
 are quite consistent in regarding our Jude likewise as an Apostle."
 To this view De Wette himself does not accede, and thus agrees
 substantially with Luther.]
 
 
 V. 3. _Beloved, since I gave all diligence to write unto you of the
 common salvation, I am necessitated to write to you, and admonish
 you, that ye should contend earnestly for the faith which was once
 delivered to the saints._ That is as much as to say,--I am
 necessitated to write to you, so that I may remind and admonish you
 how ye should go forward and persevere in the faith which has
 already, before this, been once preached to you; or as though he
 should say, It is necessary that I should admonish you that ye be on
 your guard and remain in the right way; but as to why this is needed,
 he gives the reason, and says:
 
 
 V. 4. _For there are some men who have secretly come in, who were
 ordained of old to this condemnation._ For this cause will I remind
 you that ye should abide in the faith which ye have heard, because
 there is even now a wavering, and already there have come preachers,
 who set up other doctrines besides faith, by which people are led
 away gently and unsuspectingly from the true way. So St. Peter also
 said, in his Epistle, "there shall be false teachers among you, who
 shall secretly bring in destructive heresies, &c." These, he says,
 "are long ago appointed to such a sentence of condemnation." This we
 now well understand, since we know that no one is righteous and
 justified by works of his own, but only through faith in Christ,
 insomuch that he must rely on the work of Christ as his chief good.
 Then where there is faith, whatever is done as works is all done for
 the good of our neighbor, and thus we guard ourselves against all
 works which are not performed with the intent that they shall be of
 service to our neighbor, as is now the estate of priests and monks.
 Therefore wherever any one now secretly introduces anything else than
 this doctrine of faith, in regard to such orders and works, he leads
 the people astray, so that they shall be condemned along with him.
 
 
 _Who are godless, and turn the grace of God into wantonness._ That
 Gospel which is given us concerning the grace of God, and which sets
 Christ before us, as he is offered to and bestowed upon us, with all
 that he has, that we may be freed from sin, death and all evil, such
 grace and blessing offered to us by the Gospel, they use merely to
 indulge their wantonness,--that is, they call themselves Christians,
 indeed, and praise the Gospel, but they bring in such an order, as
 therein to work their own caprice, in eating and drinking and wanton
 life, while they make their boast and say we are not in a secular but
 a spiritual estate, and under such names and pretence they have
 grasped all enjoyment, honor and pleasure. This, already, says Jude,
 begins. For we read that it had already begun a thousand years ago;
 that the bishops then wished to be Lords and to be more highly
 exalted than common christians, as we also see in St. Jerome's
 Epistles.
 
 
 _And they deny God, that he alone is Lord, and our Lord Jesus
 Christ._ This is what St. Peter said also in his Epistle; but this
 they deny (as we have heard). It is not done by their _mouth_, for
 with this they confess that God is one Lord, but they deny that
 Christ is Lord in fact, and by their works; they hold, not Him, but
 themselves as their Lord,--for while they preach that fasts,
 pilgrimages, church ordinances, chastity, obedience, poverty, etc.,
 are the way to salvation, they lead the people astray to their own
 works, and yet are silent about Christ; and it is just as much as if
 they said, Christ is of no avail to you, His works noway help you,
 but you must by your own works merit salvation. Thus they deny the
 Lord who has bought us with his blood, as Peter says.
 
 
 V. 5, 6, 7. _I will therefore remind you that ye once knew this, that
 the Lord, when he saved the people out of Egypt, afterward destroyed
 those that believed not. Also, the angels, who kept not their first
 estate, but left their own habitation, he has reserved to the
 judgment of the great day, in everlasting chains, under darkness. As
 also Sodom and Gomorrah, and the cities lying about them, which in
 like manner as these, rioted in fornication, and went after strange
 flesh, are set forth for an example, and bear the pain of eternal
 fire._ Here he adduces, also, three examples, as St. Peter does in
 his Epistle; but the first which he presents is to this effect: that
 God permitted the children of Israel whom he had brought out of Egypt
 by many wonderful works, when they did not believe, to be overthrown
 and defeated, so that of them all not more than two survived, when
 there were numbered, of all that went forth from twenty years of age
 and above, more than six hundred thousand men. This example he sets
 forth as a warning and a terror; as though he should say, those who
 are now called Christians, and under this name turn the grace of God
 into wantonness, are to beware to themselves that it do not come to
 pass with them as it came to pass with those. And true enough, these
 are the times when the Popedom is exalted and the Gospel kept secret
 through the whole world; when, too, there comes continually one
 plague after another, by which God has punished the unbelieving and
 thrown them into the throat of the Devil.
 
 
 V. 8. _Like them also are these dreamers, who defile the flesh._
 These teachers he calls dreamers; for just as when a man lies in a
 dream he deals with images, and thinks he has something real, but
 when he wakes up it is nothing at all,--but he sees then that it was
 a dream, and counts it of no importance,--so, too, what these say is
 nothing else than a mere dream; for when once their eyes shall be
 opened, they shall see that it is nothing at all. As when they go
 about pretending that their tonsure and cowl, obedience, poverty and
 chastity are well-pleasing to God, they have this before their eyes;
 yet, in God's sight it is nothing but a mere dream. So he has given
 them a truly fitting name, inasmuch as they deal with dreams, by
 which they cheat themselves and the world.
 
 But especially do the Apostles ascribe to the clerical order the vice
 of leading an unchaste life; and God long ago foretold that they
 should have no wives. Now it is scarcely possible that God should
 work as many miracles as there are persons in the order, so that it
 cannot be that they are chaste. So, likewise, has the prophet Daniel
 spoken, chap. xi., of the Pope's rule: "He shall not regard women (in
 marriage)." This is the external characteristic, as the inward is
 that they are dreamers.
 
 
 _Who despise government, and speak evil of dignities._ Their third
 characteristic is, that they will not be subject to civil authority.
 Yet we have been taught, while we live on earth, that we are all
 under obligation; that we are to be subject and obedient to the
 sovereignty; for the Christian faith does not do away with civil
 rule,--therefore no one can except himself from it, because the
 Pope's decree concerning the Church's freedom is a mere devil's law.
 
 
 V. 9. _But Michael the archangel, when he contended with the devil,
 and disputed about the body of Moses, durst not let drop against him
 a railing accusation, but said, The Lord rebuke thee._ This is one of
 the reasons why this Epistle was formerly rejected, because here an
 example is adduced which is not found in Scripture, to the effect
 that the angel Michael and the devil contended with one another about
 the body of Moses. But this should have been found there, since so
 much is written about Moses in the last of Deuteronomy, of God's
 burial of him, and yet no one knew his grave. Besides, Scripture
 testifies in regard to him, that no other prophet has arisen in
 Israel like Moses, whom the Lord knew face to face, &c. But it has
 been said, in reference to the same text also, that his body was left
 concealed, so that the Jews might not regard it with idolatrous
 veneration, and for this reason the angel Michael must needs oppose
 the devil, who wished that the body should be discovered, that the
 Jews might pray to it; and although Michael was an archangel (says
 Jude), yet was he not so bold as to curse even the devil,--and yet
 these scoffers trample under foot the authority that has been
 ordained of God; they curse in seven, eight and nine ways, though
 they are men merely; while this archangel dared not curse the worst
 devil that was ever condemned, but said no more than, the Lord
 restrain and punish thee.
 
 
 V. 10. _But these scoff at what they know nothing of, for what they
 know naturally as brute beasts, in those things they corrupt
 themselves._ Such scoffers are they, that they can do nothing else
 but anathematize and curse, and give over to the devil for his own
 not only kings and dignities, but God also and the saints, as may be
 seen in the bull, _C[oe]na Domini_. They know not that our salvation
 stands on the foundation of faith and love; they cannot endure that
 their works should be rejected and condemned, and that it should be
 preached that Christ alone must help us by His works. Therefore they
 curse and scoff at all Christian doctrine which they are ignorant of.
 But what they know, through natural perception,--as the founding of
 masses and the like,--will bring in gold and treasures; to this they
 devote themselves with energy, and thereby corrupt themselves and
 every one else.
 
 
 V. 11. _Woe unto them, for they have gone in the way of Cain._ Cain
 struck his brother dead, simply because he was more pious than
 himself. For his brother's offering was acceptable before God, but
 his own was not. So now the way of Cain is, to rely on one's own
 works, and scoff at those works which are good and true, and
 circumvent and slay those who go in the right way, just as these very
 ones also are doing.
 
 
 _And have hurried for reward into the error of Balaam._ They should
 be fixed inwardly in the hope of Divine grace; yet they go forth and
 put their trust in various outward works, of this kind and that, and
 they do them only for the sake of gold, that they may fill their
 bellies, like the prophet Balaam, as we have heard in Peter's
 Epistle.
 
 
 _And perished in the rebellion of Korah._ Of the rebellion of Korah,
 and how he was destroyed, with his house, we have an account in the
 fourth book of Moses, xvi. Moses was summoned and called for this
 purpose, that he should lead the people out of Egypt; and his brother
 Aaron likewise was appointed of God as High Priest. Now Korah was
 also of the same tribe, and their friendship should have been
 enduring, and something more than common: yet he attaches to himself
 two hundred and fifty men of the foremost and most distinguished
 among the people, and excites such a commotion and tumult, that Moses
 and Aaron are forced to flee. And Moses fell upon his face, and
 prayed that God might not accept their sacrifice; and he bade the
 congregation of the people draw back from them, and said to them:
 "Hereby shall ye surely know if the Lord hath sent me; if these men
 die and disappear as all men disappear, then the Lord hath not sent
 me; but if the Lord shall do some new thing, so that the earth shall
 open her mouth and swallow them up, and they go down alive into hell,
 then shall ye know that these men have reviled the Lord." When he had
 spoken these words, the earth quaked and opened, and swallowed up
 Korah, together with the other leaders of the rebellion, with all
 that they had, so that they went down alive into hell; and the fire
 consumed the other two hundred and fifty men who had joined
 themselves to him.
 
 This example Jude sets forth for these scoffers who blame us for
 making a commotion, while we preach against them, for they are the
 real ones who make all the trouble. For Christ is our Aaron and
 chief-priest, whom we should allow to rule alone; but this the Pope
 and bishops have been unwilling to endure. They have set themselves
 up, and have wished to have the power to rule along with the
 authority, and so have arrayed themselves against Christ; but God has
 punished them, in that the earth has swallowed them up and covered
 them, since they are absorbed and swallowed up in an earthly life and
 pleasure, and are nothing but pure worldliness.
 
 
 V. 12, 13. _These live on your charities, and are vileness itself,
 while they feast with you, feeding themselves without fear; clouds
 they are without water, driven about by the wind; barren, fruitless
 trees, twice dead and plucked up by the roots; wild waves of the sea,
 which foam out their own shame; wandering stars, for whom is reserved
 the blackness of darkness forever._ Of this we have heard enough in
 St. Peter's Epistle. All the world have brought up their children to
 be ecclesiastics, and to have an easy life of it, and not to support
 themselves by their own hands and labor; nor must they even preach,
 but only live without care in their luxury, and keep up good spirits
 by feeding on the wealth that poor people earn by their sweat. So men
 think they must be the best part, and the jewel, as it were, of
 Christendom, while they are merely shame-spots and an abomination,
 and live well, as we say, on the wealth that belongs to them as
 priests. They are without care or fear; they think the devil may not
 overthrow them; they feed not the sheep, but are themselves the
 wolves that devour the sheep; they are clouds that hang over us in
 the air, sit up high in the churches, as those that should preach,
 and yet they do not preach at all, but let themselves be driven by
 the devil this way and the other.
 
 So, too, he says, they are leafless, fruitless trees, like the trees
 of autumn; they have neither fruit nor leaf; they stand there only
 like other trees; let themselves be looked upon as Christian bishops,
 but there is with them neither word nor work, but all is dead to the
 root. Moreover, they are like wild waves of the sea; that is, as the
 wind tosses and throws up waves and billows upon the water, so these,
 too, go just as the devil leads them. And they foam out their own
 shame; like a heated pot, they are so full of pollution that they run
 over, and cannot retain command of themselves, but all must out. They
 are wandering stars, planets as they are called, that go backward,
 and not in a steady, straight course, so that they make no true
 progress; their life and doctrine is mere error, in which they lead
 themselves astray, and all that follow after them. Therefore for them
 is reserved the blackness of darkness forever.
 
 Thus Jude has appraised and painted our spiritual masters, who, under
 the name of Christ and Christianity, introduce all sorts of
 profligacy, and snatch to themselves all the wealth of the world, and
 authoritatively subject all men to themselves.
 
 There follows now, further:
 
 
 V. 14. _Enoch, also, the seventh from Adam, prophesied of such, and
 said, Behold, the Lord cometh with ten thousand of His saints, to
 execute judgment upon all._ This language of Enoch is nowhere to be
 found in Scripture. For this reason some of the Fathers did not
 receive this Epistle, although there is not a sufficient reason for
 rejecting a book on this account. For St. Paul, also, in II. Tim.
 iii., makes mention of two that opposed Moses, Jannes and Jambres,
 names that are not even to be found in the Scriptures. But be this as
 it will, we let it pass. Still this is true, that God, from the
 beginning of the world, has left it to some to make His word known
 (the word that promises His favor and salvation to believers, but
 threatens the unbelieving with judgment and condemnation), even till
 Christ's coming down from heaven, when it is openly preached to the
 whole world. But before the birth of Christ God took to Himself for
 this purpose only a single line, from Adam to Abraham, and thence to
 David, down to Mary the mother of Christ, who possessed His word.
 Thus the Gospel has always been preached in the world, but never so
 generally as now in these last times.
 
 Thus, also, this father, Enoch, insisted on that word of God which he
 received from his father, Adam, and which he had of the Holy Spirit.
 For the Scripture says also of him, Gen. v., that he led a godly
 life, and therefore he was taken of God, so that he was seen no more.
 Hence, also, has been derived the notion that He will come again
 before the last day; but it is not to be supposed that men would
 understand it of a spiritual advent, as that his preaching was based
 upon the last day, as this passage is, wherein that day is spoken of
 with as much assurance as though it were in full view. _The Lord is
 coming already_, he says, _with many thousand saints_; that is, with
 such a multitude as cannot be numbered. For this can only be said of
 the last day, on which He will come with all His saints, to execute
 judgment. For before this, He has not come with many thousand saints,
 but alone, into the world; and this, not to judge, but to bestow
 grace.
 
 
 V. 15. _And to punish all the ungodly among them, for all their
 godless life, wherein they have been ungodly._ This passage Jude does
 not inappropriately quote, inasmuch as he is speaking of false
 teachers, who are to come before the last day; and the conclusion is
 thence to be drawn, that the Lord by his coming will overthrow the
 Pope and his government; since there is no other help for it; for as
 long as the world stands, there will be no (voluntary) ending or
 reformation of it. The passage, moreover, cannot be understood of any
 others, but of our clergy, who have shamefully led all the world
 astray. Their system cannot be worse, and even though it were worse,
 it must yet hold on to the name of Christ, and under the same
 introduce all kinds of mischiefs. Thus he refers this passage to the
 last judgment, and names those who shall suffer judgment. Whence we
 infer what our young clerical gentlemen shall expect at the last day,
 be the time long or short.
 
 
 _And for all the hard speeches which Godless sinners have uttered
 against Him._ There he at once strikes upon their life and preaching,
 and would say this much:--They speak fiercely and harshly against the
 Lord who is to come; they are shameless and proud; they deride and
 revile him, as St. Peter has said. He speaks not of their sinful,
 shameful life, but of their godless state. But the godless is he who
 lives without faith, although he leads a passable life outwardly.
 Outwardly wicked works are indeed the fruits of unbelief, but we
 speak more particularly of that as a godless state, where the heart
 is full of unbelief. These very godless ones the Lord will punish, he
 says, because their preaching is shameless and presumptuous, for they
 stick ever to their own wilfulness; do not permit themselves to be
 swayed at all, and are as hard as an anvil, to condemn and revile
 continually. Thus has Enoch struck in this passage at the very estate
 which before the last day should be in the world, as we now see it
 before our eyes. Jude says, further:
 
 
 V. 16. _There are murmurers and complainers who walk after their own
 lusts, and their mouth speaketh swelling words._ When men will not
 let their own circumstances be fair and favorable, then there is
 nothing but murmuring and complaining. So when one does not give a
 Bishop the title he claims, then they cry out against disobedience.
 Besides, they are such a class of people as we cannot guard against,
 for they give out that they have a right over soul and body; they
 have grasped in their own hands both the civil and spiritual sword,
 so that they cannot be controlled, since no one must preach against
 them; they have got rid of all tax, tribute, and rent, so that no one
 dares to touch their wealth, besides, none dares preach a word
 without first asking them about it. And even though one should attack
 them with Scripture, yet they say that none but they only must be
 suffered to explain Scripture. Thus they live in all respects as they
 will, according to their lusts. For they cannot explain that to us,
 as they would be glad to, since we have subjected ourselves both to
 the Gospel and to the civil sword, but they would be free and
 uncontrolled of both. And, moreover, their whole law and claim is
 nothing but the fullness of mere high, proud, puffed-up words, which
 have nothing to back them.
 
 
 _And they hold themselves up for respect, for advantage sake._ This
 is their way of judging all, according to the person; in all the
 Pope's laws, through and through, you do not once find that a bishop
 is to humble himself below a priest, or aim at anything, as the fruit
 of a christian walk,--but all is merely of this sort: the curate is
 to be subject to the priest, the priest subject to the bishop, the
 bishop to the archbishop, but he to the patriarch, the patriarch to
 the Pope, and after this, how each is to wear the robe, the tonsure
 and the cowl, possess so many churches and benefices.
 
 Thus they have reduced it all to an outward matter, and such is the
 child's play and fool's work, they are driving at; and they have
 accounted it gross sin, if any one does not hold to such views. So
 that Jude says well, that they put a mask upon everything, and have
 this only before their eyes. Thus no one knows anything of faith, of
 love, nor of the Cross; whence the people generally are content to
 eat and play the fool, and devote all their property in the manner
 they do, as if to the true service of God; it is thus that they hold
 themselves up to respect for advantage sake.
 
 
 V. 17, 18. _But, my beloved, remember ye the words that were said
 before by the Apostles of our Lord Jesus Christ, when they said to
 you that in the last times there should come scoffers who should walk
 after their own lusts, in a godless state._ This passage shows also
 clearly, that this epistle is not by St. Jude the Apostle, for he
 does not count nor reckon himself among the other Apostles, but
 speaks of them as of those who preached long before him; so that it
 is reasonable to suppose that another pious man wrote the epistle,
 one who had read St. Peter's epistles and had drawn this from that
 source. Who these scoffers are, we have said above: they walk,
 moreover, after their own lusts,--not merely their fleshly lusts, but
 those of that godless life which they lead, and they shape all as it
 pleases them; they care neither for worldly authority, nor the word
 of God; they are neither under external nor internal government,
 whether divine or human; they float about between heaven and earth in
 their lust, just as the devil leads them.
 
 
 V. 19. _These are they who make sects, sensual, who have not the
 Spirit._ There he has touched on what Peter speaks of, their secretly
 bringing in of pestilent sects, for these are they that have
 separated themselves; they divide the unity that is in faith, will
 not let the ordinary estate of a Christian answer,--namely, that
 wherein one serves another,--but they set up other estates, and
 pretend to serve God by these. Besides they are sensual or brutish
 men, who have no more understanding and spirit than an ox or an ass;
 they walk according to their natural reason and fleshly mind. They
 have no God's-word by which they judge themselves, or by which they
 can live.
 
 
 V. 20, 21. _But, ye beloved, build yourselves up on your most holy
 faith, through the Holy Spirit, and pray, and keep yourselves in the
 love of God._ There he defines, in few words, that in which a
 thoroughly Christian life consists. Faith is laid for the foundation
 on which we are to build; but to build is to grow from day to day in
 the knowledge of God and of Jesus Christ, and this takes place
 through the working of the Holy Spirit. When we are thus built up, we
 shall do no work to merit anything or to be saved by it, but all to
 the service of our neighbor. Thus we are to watch, that we abide in
 love, and not fall from it, like these fools who set up particular
 works and a peculiar life, and so draw people away from love.
 
 
 _And look for the mercy of our Lord Jesus Christ unto eternal life._
 That is the hope, toward which the Holy Cross moves. Therefore should
 our life be so shaped as to be nothing else than a steady longing and
 waiting for that life to come; yet so that that waiting be grounded
 on the mercy of Christ, so that we shall call upon Him with such an
 understanding as that he is to help us from this to that life out of
 pure mercy, and not for any work or merit of ours.
 
 
 V. 22, 23. _And of these take pity, and distinguish them; but as to
 those, save them and draw them out of the fire._ That is not well
 expressed in Dutch, but Jude would say this much: on some take pity,
 some save; that is, let your life be so shaped that it shall allow
 you to have compassion on these who are wretched, blind and dumb;
 have no joy or pleasure over them, but let them go, keep from them
 and have nothing to do with them. But as to those others, whom ye can
 draw forth, save them by fear,--deal kindly and gently with them, as
 God has dealt with you; treat them not harshly or rudely, but feel
 toward them as toward those that lie in the fire, whom you are to
 draw forth and rescue with all care, consideration and diligence; if
 they will not suffer themselves to be drawn out, we should let them
 go and weep over them,--but not like the Pope and his inquisitors,
 burn and destroy them by fire.
 
 
 _And hate the garment spotted by the flesh._ We have indeed received
 the Holy Spirit by faith, and have been made clean; but as long as we
 live here, the old garment of our flesh and blood clings to us still
 and will not relax its hold. This is the spotted garment that we
 should lay off and draw away from as long as we live.
 
 
 V. 24, 25. _Now unto Him that is able to keep you from stumbling, and
 present you faultless before the presence of His glory with joy; to
 God who alone is wise, our Saviour, be glory and majesty, dominion
 and power, now and forever. Amen._ This is the close of this Epistle.
 Thus the Apostles do when they have written, taught, admonished and
 prophesied; thus they pray, express their wishes, and give thanks.
 Thus we have seen in the Epistles both what is true christian and
 false unchristian doctrine, as well as life.
 
 
 
 
 PRINTED AT WITTEMBERG BY HANS LUFFT, 1524.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 End of the Project Gutenberg EBook of The Epistles of St. Peter and St. Jude

 
 
 
 Produced by Ron Swanson (This file was produced from images
 generously made available by The Internet Archive/American
 Libraries)
 
 
 
 
 
 
 LUTHER'S
 EPISTLE SERMONS
 TRINITY SUNDAY TO ADVENT.
 
 
 TRANSLATED WITH THE HELP OF OTHERS
 BY
 PROF. JOHN NICHOLAS LENKER, D.D.
 
 AUTHOR OF "LUTHERANS IN ALL LANDS," TRANSLATOR OF
 LUTHER'S WORKS INTO ENGLISH, AND PRESIDENT OF
 THE NATIONAL LUTHERAN LIBRARY ASSOCIATION
 
 
 
 
 VOL. III.
 (_Volume IX of Luther's Complete Works_.)
 Third Thousand
 
 
 
 
 _The Luther Press_
 MINNEAPOLIS, MINN., U.S.A.
 1909.
 
 
 
 
 _Dedication_
 
 
 To all Laymen of Evangelical Christendom interested in developing a
 deeper Christian Life, on the basis of the spiritual classics of our
 Protestant Church Fathers, this volume of sermons that apply the pure
 doctrine of God's Word to everyday life, is prayerfully dedicated.
 
 
 
 
 Copyright, 1909, by J. N. LENKER.
 
 
 
 
 _Foreword_
 
 
 Here comes the English Luther in his twelfth visit to your home. In
 peasant boots, decorated by no star of worldliness nor even by the
 cross of churchliness, but by the Book from heaven pressed to his
 heart in a firm attitude of earnest prayer, he comes as the man of
 prayer and of the one Book, a familiar friend, to help you to live
 the simple Christian life.
 
 This volume of twenty-four practical sermons from Trinity Sunday to
 Advent marks an epoch in that it completes in an unabridged form one
 branch of Luther's writings, the eight volumes of his Gospel and
 Epistle Postil. They are bound in uniform size, numbered as in the
 Erlangen edition from the seventh to the fourteenth volume inclusive,
 paragraphed for convenient reference according to the Walch edition
 with summaries of the Gospel sermons by Bugenhagen. The few subheads
 inserted in the text are a new feature for American readers.
 
 These eight volumes of 175 sermons and 3,110 pages are the classic
 devotional literature of Protestantism. They were preached by its
 founder to the mother congregation of Evangelical Christendom in the
 birth-period of the greatest factor in modern civilization. No
 collection of Evangelical sermons has passed through more editions
 and been printed in more languages, none more loved and praised, none
 more read and prayed. They will be a valuable addition to the meager
 sermon literature on the Epistle texts in the English language.
 English Protestants will hereafter have no excuse for unacquaintance
 with Luther's spiritual writings.
 
 What Luther's two Catechisms were in the school room to teach the
 Christian faith to the youth, that these sermons were in the homes to
 develop the same faith in adults. They have maintained their good
 name wherever translated until the present and their contents are
 above the reach of critics. These Epistle sermons especially apply
 the Christian truth to everyday life. The order in developing the
 Christian life with the best help from the prince of the Teutonic
 church fathers, should be from the Small to the Large Catechism and
 then to his Epistle sermons. Blessed the pastor and congregation who
 can lead the youth to "Church Postil Reading"--to read in harmony
 with their church-going. Blessed is the immigrant or diaspora
 missionary who finds his people reading them in the new settlements
 he visits.
 
 Next to the Bible and Catechisms no books did more to awaken and
 sustain the great Evangelical religious movements under Spener in
 Germany, Rosenius in Sweden, and Hauge in Norway, than these sermon
 books devoutly and regularly read in the homes of church members.
 
 The transition of a people and church from a weak language into a
 stronger, is easy and accompanied by gain; while the opposite course
 from a strong into a weaker tongue is difficult; and accompanied by
 loss. While in our land the Germans and Scandinavians lose much in
 the transition ordeal, all is not lost; they have something to give.
 
 It is a good sign that two-tongued congregations are growing in
 favor. Familiar thought in a strange language is not so strange as
 when both language and thought are foreign. A church whose
 constituency is many-tongued should avoid becoming one-tongued.
 Church divisions are often more ethnological than theological. If
 exclusively English pastors learned one-tenth as much German and
 Scandinavian as these people do English, unity would be greatly
 promoted. As Protestantism is far more divided in the English
 language than in German or Scandinavian, the enthusiasm over the
 unifying influence of English is misleading. The hope is rather in
 the oneness of teaching and of spirit. This treasure, given first in
 Hebrew, Greek and German, can be translated into all languages. Who
 equals Luther as a translator? May his followers be inspired by his
 example and translate the Evangelical classics of this prophet of the
 Gentiles into all their dialects! That these volumes may contribute
 to this end is our prayer.
 
 The history of the writing of these sermons is found in volumes 10,
 11, 12 and 13 of the Gospel sermons of the "Standard Edition of
 Luther's Works in English."
 
 The German text will be readily found in the 12th volume of the Walch
 and of the St. Louis Walch editions, and in the 9th volume of the
 Erlangen edition of Luther's works.
 
 Grateful acknowledgment is hereby made for translations to the
 following: To Pastor H. L. Burry, the first sermon for Trinity
 Sunday; Pastor W. E. Tressel, Third Sunday after Trinity; Prof. A. G.
 Voigt, D. D., the Fifth and Twenty-fourth Sundays; Dr. Joseph Stump,
 Sixth, Eighth and Thirteenth Sundays; Prof. A. W. Meyer, Eighteenth
 and Nineteenth Sundays; and to Pastor C. B. Gohdes for revising the
 Second Sermon for Trinity Sunday and the sermons for the Second,
 Tenth, Twelfth and Sixteenth Sundays after Trinity.
 
 Next volumes to appear will be Genesis Vol. II, Psalms Vol. II and
 Galatians.
 
 Heartily do we thank all parts of the church for their complimentary,
 suggestive and helpful cooperation and earnestly hope our work may be
 worthy of its continuance.
 
   J. N. LENKER.
   Home for Young Women,
   Minneapolis, Minn., Pentecost, 1909.
 
 
 
 
 _Contents_
 
 
 Trinity Sunday.--The Article of Faith on the Trinity. The
   Revelation of the Divine Nature and Will. Romans 11, 33-36 . .    7
 
 Second Sermon.--The Trinity. Romans 11, 33-36  . . . . . . . . .   36
 
 First Sunday After Trinity.--Love. God is Love. 1 John 4, 16-21    40
 
 Second Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to Brotherly Love.
   1 John 3, 13-18  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   41
 
 Third Sunday After Trinity.--Humility, Trust, Watchfulness,
   Suffering. 1 Peter 5, 5-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   57
 
 Fourth Sunday After Trinity.--Consolation in Suffering and
   Patience. Waiting for the Revealing of the Sons of God. Romans
   8, 18-22 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .   96
 
 Second Sermon.--Suffering, Waiting and Sighing of Creation.
   Romans 8, 18-22  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  109
 
 Fifth Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to the Fruits of Faith.
   Duty of Unity and Love. 1 Peter 3, 8-15  . . . . . . . . . . .  119
 
 Sixth Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to Christian Living.
   Life in Christ. Romans 6, 3-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  141
 
 Seventh Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to Resist Sin. The
   Wages of Sin and the Gift of God. Romans 6, 19-23  . . . . . .  156
 
 Eighth Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to Live in the Spirit
   Since We Have Become the Children of God, Sons and Heirs.
   Romans 8, 12-17  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  168
 
 Ninth Sunday After Trinity.--Warning to Christians Against
   Carnal Security and Its Evils. 1 Corinthians 10, 6-13  . . . .  180
 
 Tenth Sunday After Trinity.--Spiritual Counsel for Church
   Officers. The Use of the Spiritual Gifts. 1 Corinthians 12,
   1-11 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  197
 
 Eleventh Sunday After Trinity.--Paul's Witness to Christ's
   Resurrection. 1 Corinthians 15, 1-10 . . . . . . . . . . . . .  221
 
 Twelfth Sunday After Trinity.--The Twofold Use of the Law and
   the Gospel. "Letter" and "Spirit." 2 Corinthians 3, 4-11 . . .  223
 
 Thirteenth Sunday After Trinity.--God's Testament and Promise in
   Christ, and Use of the Law. Galatians 3, 15-22 . . . . . . . .  248
 
 Fourteenth Sunday After Trinity.--Works of the Flesh and Fruits
   of the Spirit. Galatians 5, 16-24  . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  255
 
 Fifteenth Sunday After Trinity.--Conduct of Christians to One
   Another in Church Government. Sowing and Reaping. Galatians 5,
   25-26 and 6, 1-10  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  257
 
 Sixteenth Sunday After Trinity.--Paul's Care and Prayer for the
   Church That It May Continue to Abide in Christ. Ephesians 3,
   13-21  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  259
 
 Seventeenth Sunday After Trinity.--Exhortation to Live According
   to the Christian Calling, and in the Unity of the Spirit.
   Ephesians 4, 1-6 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  281
 
 Eighteenth Sunday After Trinity.--The Treasure Christians Have
   in the Preaching of the Gospel. The Call to Fellowship.
   1 Corinthians 1, 4-9 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  292
 
 Nineteenth Sunday After Trinity.--Putting on the New Man and
   Laying Off the Old Man. Ephesians 4, 22-28 . . . . . . . . . .  304
 
 Twentieth Sunday After Trinity.--The Careful Walk of the
   Christian and Redeeming the Time. Ephesians 5, 15-21 . . . . .  317
 
 Twenty-First Sunday After Trinity.--The Christian Armor and
   Weapons. Ephesians 6, 10-17  . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  329
 
 Twenty-Second Sunday After Trinity.--Paul's Thanks and Prayers
   for His Churches. Philippians 1, 3-11  . . . . . . . . . . . .  330
 
 Twenty-Third Sunday After Trinity.--The Enemies of the Cross of
   Christ and the Christian's Citizenship in Heaven. Philippians
   3, 17-21 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  343
 
 Twenty-Fourth Sunday After Trinity.--Knowledge of God's Will and
   Its Fruits. Prayer and Spiritual Knowledge. Colossians 1, 3-14  358
 
 Twenty-Fifth Sunday After Trinity.--Christ Will Take Both Alike
   to Himself, the Dead and Living, When He Comes.
   1 Thessalonians 4, 13-18 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .  379
 
 Twenty-Sixth Sunday After Trinity.--God's Righteous Judgment in
   the Future. When Christ Comes. 2 Thessalonians 1, 3-10 . . . .  380
 
 
 
 
 _Trinity Sunday_
 
 Text: Romans 11, 33-36.
 
 33 O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and the knowledge of
 God! How unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways past tracing
 out! 34 For who hath known the mind of the Lord? or who hath been his
 counsellor? 35 or who hath first given to him, and it shall be
 recompensed unto him again? 36 For of him and through him, and unto
 him, are all things. To him be the glory for ever. Amen.
 
 
 THE ARTICLE OF FAITH ON THE TRINITY.
 
 1. This epistle is read today because the festival of Holy Trinity,
 or of the three persons of the Godhead--which is the prime, great,
 incomprehensible and chief article of faith--is observed on this day.
 The object of its observance is that, by the Word of God, this truth
 of the Godhead may be preserved among Christians, enabling them to
 know God as he would be known. For although Paul does not treat of
 that article in this epistle, but touches on it only in a few words
 in the conclusion, nevertheless he would teach that in our attempts
 to comprehend God we must not speculate and judge according to human
 wisdom, but in the light of the Word of God alone. For these divine
 truths are too far above the reach of reason ever to be comprehended
 and explored by the understanding of man.
 
 2. And although I have, on other occasions, taught and written on
 this article fully and frequently enough, still I must say a few
 words in general concerning it here. True, it is not choice German,
 nor has it a pleasing sound, when we designate God by the word
 "Dreifaltigkeit" (nor is the Latin, Trinitas, more elegant); but
 since we have no better term, we must employ these. For, as I have
 said, this article is so far above the power of the human mind to
 grasp, or the tongue to express, that God, as the Father of his
 children, will pardon us when we stammer and lisp as best we can, if
 only our faith be pure and right. By this term, however, we would say
 that we believe the divine majesty to be three distinct persons of
 one true essence.
 
 3. This is the revelation and knowledge Christians have of God: they
 not only know him to be one true God, who is independent of and over
 all creatures, and that there can be no more than this one true God,
 but they know also what this one true God in his essential,
 inscrutable essence is.
 
 4. The reason and wisdom of man may go so far as to reach the
 conclusion, although feebly, that there must be one eternal divine
 being, who has created and who preserves and governs all things. Man
 sees such a beautiful and wonderful creation in the heavens and on
 the earth, one so wonderfully, regularly and securely preserved and
 ordered, that he must say: It is impossible that this came into
 existence by mere chance, or that it originated and controls itself;
 there must have been a Creator and Lord from whom all these things
 proceed and by whom they are governed. Thus God may be known by his
 creatures, as St. Paul says: "For the invisible things of him since
 the creation of the world are clearly seen, being perceived through
 the things that are made, even his everlasting power and divinity."
 Rom 1, 20. This is (a posteriori) the knowledge that we have when we
 contemplate God from without, in his works and government; as one,
 looking upon a castle or house from without, would draw conclusions
 as to its lord or keeper.
 
 5. But from within (a priori) no human wisdom has been able to
 conceive what God is in himself, or in his internal essence. Neither
 can anyone know or give information of it except it be revealed to
 him by the Holy Spirit. For no one knoweth, as Paul says (1 Cor 2,
 11), the things of man save the spirit of man which is in him; even
 so the things of God none knoweth save the Spirit of God. From
 without, I may see what you do, but what your intentions are and what
 you think, I cannot see. Again, neither can you know what I think
 except I enable you to understand it by word or sign. Much less can
 we know what God, in his own inner and secret essence is, until the
 Holy Spirit, who searcheth and knoweth all things, yea, the deep
 things of God--as Paul says above--reveals it to us: as he does in
 the declaration of this article, in which he teaches us the existence
 in the divine majesty of the one undivided essence, but in such
 manner that there is, first, the person which is called the Father;
 and of him exists the second person called the Son, born from
 eternity; and proceeding from both these is the third, namely, the
 Holy Spirit. These three persons are not distinct from each other, as
 individual brothers or sisters are, but they have being in one and
 the same eternal, undivided and indivisible essence.
 
 6. This, I say, is not discovered or attained to by human reason. It
 is revealed from heaven above. Therefore, only Christians can
 intelligently speak of what the Godhead essentially is, and of his
 outward manifestation to his creatures, and his will toward men
 concerning their salvation. For all this is imparted to them by the
 Holy Spirit, who reveals and proclaims it through the Word.
 
 7. Those who have no such revelation, and who judge according to
 their own wisdom, such as the Jews, Turks and heathen, must consider
 the Christian's declaration the greatest error and rankest heresy;
 they must say that we Christians are mad and foolish in imagining
 that there are three Gods, when, according to all reason--yea, even
 according to the Word of God--there can be but one God. It would not
 be reasonable, they will say, that there should be more than one
 householder over the same house, more than one lord or sovereign over
 the same government; much less reasonably should more than one God
 reign over heaven and earth. They imagine that thus with their wisdom
 they have completely overthrown our faith and exposed it to the
 derision and scorn of all the world. As if we were all blockheads and
 egregious fools and could not see their logic as well as they! But,
 thank God, we have understanding equal to theirs, and can argue as
 convincingly, or more so, than they with their Alkoran and Talmud,
 that there is but the one God.
 
 8. Further, we know, from the testimony of Holy Writ, that we cannot
 expound the mystery of these divine things by the speculations of
 reason and a pretense of great wisdom. To explain this, as well as
 all the articles of our faith, we must have a knowledge higher than
 any to which the understanding of man can attain. That knowledge of
 God which the heathen can perceive by reason or deduce from rational
 premises is but a small part of the knowledge that we should possess.
 The heathen Aristotle in his best book concludes from a passage in
 the wisest pagan poet, Homer: There can be no good government in
 which there is more than one lord; it results as where more than one
 master or mistress attempts to direct the household servants. So must
 there be but one lord and regent in every government. This is all
 rightly true. God has implanted such light and understanding in human
 nature for the purpose of giving a conception and an illustration of
 his divine office, the only Lord and Maker of all creatures. But,
 even knowing this, we have not yet searched out or fathomed the
 exalted, eternal, divine Godhead essence. For even though I have
 learned that there is an only divine majesty, who governs all things,
 I do not thereby know the inner workings of this divine essence
 himself; this no one can tell me, except, as we have said, in so far
 as God himself reveals it in his Word.
 
 9. Now we Christians have the Scriptures, which we know to be the
 Word of God. The Jews also have them, from whose fathers they have
 descended to us. From these, and from no other source, we have
 obtained all that is known of God and divine works, from the
 beginning of the world. Even among the Turks and the heathen, all
 their knowledge of God--excepting what is manifestly fable and
 fiction--came from the Scriptures. And our knowledge is confirmed and
 proven by great miracles, even to the present day. These Scriptures
 declare, concerning this article, that there is no God or divine
 being save this one alone. They not only manifest him to us from
 without, but they lead us into his inner essence, and show us that in
 him there are three persons; not three Gods or three different kinds
 of divinity, but the same undivided, divine essence.
 
 10. Such a revelation is radiantly shed forth from the greatest of
 God's works, the declaration of his divine counsel and will. In that
 counsel and will it was decreed from all eternity, and, accordingly,
 was proclaimed in his promises, that his Son should become man and
 die to reconcile man to God. For in our dreadful fall into sin and
 death eternal, there was no way to save us excepting through an
 eternal person who had power over sin and death to destroy them, and
 to give us righteousness and everlasting life instead. This no angel
 or other creature could do; it must needs be done of God himself.
 Now, it could not be done by the person of the Father, who was to be
 reconciled, but it must be done by a second person, with whom this
 counsel was determined and through whom and for whose sake the
 reconciliation was to be brought about.
 
 11. Here there are, therefore, two distinct persons, one of whom
 becomes reconciled, and the other is sent to reconcile and becomes
 man. The former is called the Father, being first in that he did not
 have his origin in any other; the latter is called the Son, being
 born of the Father from eternity. To this the Scriptures attest, for
 they make mention of God's Son; as, for instance, in Psalm 2, 7:
 "Thou art my son; this day have I begotten thee;" and again,
 Galatians 4, 4: "But when the fulness of the time came, God sent
 forth his Son," etc. From this it necessarily follows that the Son,
 who is spoken of as a person, must be distinct from the person of the
 Father.
 
 12. Again, in the same manner, the Spirit of God is specifically and
 distinctively mentioned as a person sent or proceeding from God the
 Father and the Son: for instance, God says in Joel 2, 28: "I will
 pour out my Spirit upon all flesh," etc. Here a spirit is poured out
 who is God's, or a divine spirit, and who must be of the same
 essence, otherwise he could not say, "my Spirit;" and yet he must be
 a person other than he who sent him or who pours out. Again, because
 when he was sent he manifested himself, and appeared in his descent
 in a visible form, like that of a dove or tongues of fire, he must be
 distinct in person from both the Father and the Son.
 
 13. But in this article of faith, in which we say that the Son of God
 became man and that he was of the same nature as we ourselves are, in
 order that he might redeem us from sin and death and give us eternal
 life without any merit or worthiness of our own, we give Jews and
 Turks no less occasion for laughter and mockery than when we speak of
 the three persons. For this is a more absurd assertion by far, in the
 estimation of human reason, which speculates in its Jewish and
 Turkish--yea, heathenish--teachings, on this wise: God is an only,
 almighty Lord of all, who has created all men and given them the law
 according to which they are to live; accordingly it follows that he
 will be merciful to the good and obedient, but will condemn and
 punish the disobedient. Therefore, he who does good works and guards
 himself against sin, God will reward. These are nothing but
 heathenish conclusions drawn from earthly, worldly experience and
 observation, as if God's government must be conducted on the same
 principles as that of a father among his children and domestics; for
 those are considered good rulers and masters who make a distinction
 with regard to their own interests.
 
 14. Such heathen ideas of wisdom, holiness and service of God are
 taught and practiced by the Pope. And so we believed, myself and
 others, while we were under him, not knowing any better; otherwise we
 would have done and taught differently. And, in fact, he who has not
 this revelation and Word of God, can neither believe nor teach other
 than pagan doctrine. With such a faith, how much better were we than
 the heathen and Turks? Yea, how could we guard ourselves against any
 deception and lying nonsense that might be offered as good works and
 as service of God? Then we had to follow every impostor who came with
 his cowl and cord, as if Christ were represented in him; and we
 thought that in the observance of these things we would be saved. So
 the whole world was filled with naught but false service of
 God--which the Scriptures properly call idolatry--the product of
 human wisdom, which is so easily deceived by that which pretends to
 be a good work and to be obedience to God. For human wisdom knows no
 better; and how could it know better without the revelation? Even
 when the revelation was proclaimed, human wisdom would not heed it,
 but despised it and followed its own fancies. Hence it continued to
 be hidden and incomprehensible to such wisdom, as Saint Paul says:
 "For who hath known the mind of the Lord?"
 
 15. But to us this counsel and mind of God in giving his Son to take
 upon himself our flesh, is revealed and declared. For from the Word
 of God we have the knowledge that no man of himself can be righteous
 before God; that our whole life and all our deeds are under wrath and
 condemnation, because we are wholly born in sin and by nature are
 disobedient to God; but if we would be delivered from sin and be
 saved, we must believe on this mediator, the Son of God, who has
 taken our sin and death upon himself, by his own blood and death
 rendering satisfaction, and has by his resurrection, delivered us. In
 this truth we will abide, regardless of the ridicule heaped upon us
 because of such faith, by heathen wisdom, which teaches that God
 rewards the pious. We understand that quite as well, if not better,
 than heathenism does. But in these mysteries we need a higher wisdom
 than our own minds have devised or can devise, a wisdom given to us
 by grace alone, through divine revelation.
 
 16. For it is not our intention thus to pry into the counsel,
 thoughts and ways of God with our understanding and opinions, and to
 be his counselors, as they do who meddle in the affairs that are the
 prerogative of the Godhead, and who even dare, in the face of this
 passage of Saint Paul, to refuse to receive or learn of God, but
 would impart to him that for which he must recompense again. And thus
 they make gods after their own fancy, as many gods as they have
 thoughts; so that every shabby monastic cowl or self-appointed work,
 in their estimation, accomplishes as much and passes for as much as
 God the Father, Son and Holy Spirit, in their eternal divine counsel,
 determine and accomplish. And they continue to be nothing but wearers
 of cowls and instructors in works, which works even they can do who
 know nothing of God and are manifestly scoundrels. And even though
 they have long been occupied with these things, they still do not
 know how matters stand between themselves and God. And it will ever
 be true as Saint Paul says: "For who hath known the mind of the Lord,
 or who hath been his counselor?"
 
 17. For your own theories--which are no more than what anyone can
 arrive at, conjecture or conceive in his own mind, without divine
 revelation--are not a knowledge of the mind of God. And what does it
 avail if you are not able to say more than that God is merciful to
 the good and will punish the wicked? Who will assure you that you are
 good and that you are pleasing to God with your papistic, Turkish
 monkery and holiness? Is it all that is necessary to assert: God will
 reward with heaven such as are faithful to the order? No, dear
 brother, mere presumption, or an expression of your opinion, will not
 suffice here. I could do that as well as you. Indeed, each may devise
 his own peculiar idea; one a black, and another a gray monk's cowl.
 But we should hear and know what God's counsel is, what is his will
 and mind. This none can tell you by his own understanding, and no
 book on earth can teach it except the Scriptures. These God himself
 has given, and they make known to us that he has sent his Son into
 the world to redeem us from sin and the wrath of God, and that
 whosoever believes in him should have everlasting life.
 
 
 DIVINE MYSTERIES INEXPLICABLE TO REASON.
 
 18. Behold, Paul's purpose in this epistle is to show Christians that
 these sublime and divine mysteries--that is, God's actual divine
 essence and his will, administration and works--are absolutely beyond
 all human thought, human understanding or wisdom; in short, that they
 are and ever will be incomprehensible, inscrutable and altogether
 hidden to human reason. When reason presumptuously undertakes to
 solve, to teach and explain these matters, the result is worthless,
 yea, utter darkness and deception. If anything is to be ascertained,
 it must be through revelation alone; that is, the Word of God, which
 was sent from heaven.
 
 19. We do not apply these words of Paul to the question of divine
 predestination for every human being--who will be saved and who not.
 For into these things God would not have us curiously inquire. He has
 not given us any special revelation in regard to them, but refers all
 men here to the words of the Gospel. By them they are to be guided.
 He would have them hear and learn the Gospel, and believing in it
 they shall be saved. Therein have all the saints found comfort and
 assurance in regard to their election to eternal life; not in any
 special revelation in regard to their predestination, but in faith in
 Christ. Therefore, where Saint Paul treats of election, in the three
 chapters preceding this text, he would not have any to inquire or
 search out whether he has been predestinated or not; but he holds
 forth the Gospel and faith to all men. So he taught before, that we
 are saved through faith in Christ. He says (Rom 10, 8): "The word is
 nigh thee, in thy mouth, and in thy heart," and he explains himself
 by saying that this word should be proclaimed to all men, that they
 may believe what he says in verses 12 and 13: "For the same Lord is
 Lord of all, and is rich unto all that call upon him: for, Whosoever
 shall call upon the name of the Lord shall be saved."
 
 20. But he speaks of the marvelous ruling of God in the Church,
 according to which they who have the name and honor of being the
 people of God, and the Church--the people of Israel--are rejected on
 account of their unbelief. Others, on the other hand, who formerly
 were not God's people, but were unbelieving, are now, since they have
 received the Gospel and believe in Christ, become the true Church in
 the sight of God, and are saved. Consequently it was on account of
 their own unbelief that the former were rejected. Then the grace and
 mercy of God in Christ was offered unto everlasting life, and without
 any merit of their own, to all such as were formerly in unbelief and
 sin, if only they would accept and believe it. He declares: "For God
 hath shut up all unto disobedience, that he might have mercy upon
 all." Rom 11, 32.
 
 21. Hereupon follows the text, which Saint Paul begins with emotions
 of profound astonishment at the judgment and dealings of God in his
 Church, saying:
 
 "O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and the knowledge of
 God! How unsearchable are his judgments, and his ways past tracing
 out!"
 
 22. Sublime are the thoughts and counsel of God, transcending by far
 the mind and comprehension of man, yea of all creatures, when he so
 richly pours forth his goodness and out of pure grace and mercy
 elects, as beneficiaries of that goodness, the poor and wretched and
 unworthy, who are concluded under sin--that is, those who acknowledge
 themselves before God to be guilty and deserving of everlasting wrath
 and perdition; when he does all this that they might know him in his
 real divine essence, and the sentiment of his heart--that through his
 Son he will give all who believe everlasting life. And, again, that
 they might know how he will reject and condemn the others--those who,
 in pride and security, boast of their own gifts and the fact that
 they are called the people of God in preference to all other nations;
 who boast that they have special promises, that they have the
 prophets, the fathers, etc.; who think that God will acknowledge no
 nation on earth but themselves as his people and his Church. He will
 reject them on account of their unbelief, in which they are fettered
 by the pride and imaginations of their own wisdom and holiness.
 
 23. This is that rich, inexpressible, divine wisdom and knowledge
 which they possess who believe in Christ, and by which they are
 enabled to look into the depths and see what the purposes and
 thoughts of the divine heart are. True, in their weakness they cannot
 fully reach it; they only can apprehend it in the revealed Word, by
 faith, as in a glass or image, as Saint Paul says. 1 Cor 13, 12. But
 to blind, unbelieving reason, divine wisdom will be foreign and
 hidden; nothing of it will enter reason's consciousness and thoughts,
 nor will reason desire more though a revelation be given.
 
 24. That attitude Saint Paul encountered, especially when the
 arrogant Jews opposed themselves so sternly and stubbornly to the
 preaching of the Gospel. Filled with astonishment, he exclaimed: What
 shall I say more? I see indeed that it is but the deep unsearchable
 wisdom of God, his incomprehensible judgment, his inscrutable ways.
 So he says elsewhere: "But we speak God's wisdom in a mystery, even
 the wisdom that hath been hidden, which God foreordained before the
 world unto our glory: which none of the rulers of this world hath
 known." 1 Cor 2, 7-8.
 
 25. This depth and richness of wisdom and knowledge, we Christians
 apprehend through faith; for, as Saint Paul says, it cannot be
 apprehended nor comprehended otherwise. Though the world will not do
 it, we will firmly believe that God is a true God and Lord, wise,
 just and gracious, whose riches and depth are ineffable. We will
 glorify him with our whole heart, therefore, as he ought justly to be
 praised and glorified by every creature, for his wonderful government
 of his Church, through his Word and revelation. Whosoever will hear
 and receive the same shall have light that will turn them to him and
 give them a knowledge of their salvation--an experience which others
 can never realize. And he is to be glorified because he manifests
 such unutterable goodness to all who are in sin and under God's wrath
 that he translates them, though they are unworthy and condemned, from
 the power of death and hell into the kingdom of eternal grace and
 life, if they will only seek grace and believe on Christ his Son.
 And, on the other hand, he is to be glorified because, as a just
 judge, he rightfully rejects and condemns those who will not believe
 the revelation and testimony of his will in his Son; who insist on,
 and boast of, their blind fancies, of their own wisdom and
 righteousness. Being accordingly deprived of such light, such grace
 and consolation, they must forever be separated and cast forth from
 the kingdom of God, regardless of what great name and fame may have
 been theirs when they were supposed to be the people and Church of
 God.
 
 26. And such are God's unsearchable judgments and his ways past
 tracing out. Such are his government and works. For by "judgments" is
 meant that which in his view is right or wrong; what pleases or does
 not please him; what merits his praise or his censure; in short, what
 we should follow or avoid. Again, by "his ways" is meant that which
 he will manifest unto men and how he will deal with them. These
 things men cannot and would not discover by their own reason, nor
 search out by their own intellect, and never should they oppose their
 judgments or speculations to God. It is not for them to say what is
 right or wrong, whether an act or ruling is divine. They should
 humble themselves before him and acknowledge that they cannot
 understand, they cannot teach God in such matters; they should give
 him, as their God and Creator, the honor of better understanding
 himself and his purposes than do we poor, miserable worms.
 
 "For who hath known the mind of the Lord? or who hath been his
 counselor? or who hath first given to him, and it shall be
 recompensed unto him again?"
 
 27. Paul states three propositions which take away from the world all
 its boasting concerning divine things: To know the mind of the
 Lord--what are his thoughts and purposes, or what he has determined
 within himself from eternity; to be his counselor--advising or
 showing him what to do and how to do it; to give to him--assisting
 him, by one's own ability, to accomplish his divine purpose. All this
 is impossible to human nature; it cannot know his mind, and how much
 less will it be able, with all of its wisdom and activity, to counsel
 him or give him anything.
 
 28. Therefore, it is a shameful presumption on the part of the world
 to presume by its own powers to ascertain and discover God's essence,
 his will and works, and to counsel him as to his duties and
 pleasures; and shameful is it that it presumes with its works to have
 merited something from him, and to have earned a recompense; shameful
 presumption to expect to be honored as having achieved much for God's
 kingdom and for the Church--strengthening and preserving them and
 filling heaven with holiness!
 
 29. God must defeat minds so perverted. In his administration he must
 disregard their opinions and attempts. Thus, being made fools by
 their own wisdom, they may stumble and be offended at it. So would
 God, by showing us the realities, convince us of the futility of our
 own endeavors and lead us to acknowledge that we have not fathomed
 his mind, his counsel and will, and that we cannot counsel him. No
 man or angel has ever yet first thought out for God his counsel, or
 offered suggestion to him. Much less is he compelled to call us into
 counsel, or recompense us for anything we have given to him.
 
 
 THREE CLASSES OF PEOPLE.
 
 30. There are three different kinds of people on earth, among whom
 Christians must live. The first of these are that rude class which is
 unconcerned about the nature of God and how he rules. They have no
 regard for God's Word. Their faith is only in their mammon and their
 own appetites. They think only of how they may live unto themselves,
 like swine in the sty. To such we need not preach anything of this
 text: "O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and the knowledge
 of God." They would understand nothing of it though we were to preach
 it to them everlastingly. They would rather hear of the husks and
 swill with which they fill themselves. Therefore we will let them
 remain the swine that they are, and separated from others as they
 are. But it is exasperating to have to encounter them among
 Christians.
 
 31. The second class are they who are still reasonable, concerning
 themselves, about God's purposes and their fulfilment, and how we may
 be saved. The heathen, and even we ourselves when under the papacy,
 contended, according to reason, over these things. Here is the
 beginning of all idolatry on earth; everyone teaches of God according
 to his own opinion. Mohammed says: He that believes his Koran and its
 doctrines is pleasing to God. A monk: He that is faithful to the
 order and its regulations will be saved. The Pope: He who observes
 his prescriptions and ritual, who makes a pilgrimage to the apostles
 at Rome, buys himself an indulgence; he has acquired the forgiveness
 of sins: but he who neglects it is under the wrath of God. These
 observances they call judgments and ways, controlling consciences and
 directing them to eternal life; and they imagine that they are God's
 judgments and ways.
 
 32. On the contrary, the Word declares that God wants none of these
 things; that they are error and darkness and a vain service--idolatry,
 which he hates and which provokes him to the utmost. All must
 acknowledge who have practiced their own self-appointed observances
 for any length of time, that they have no real assurance that God will
 be gracious unto them and take pleasure in them because of their lives
 and observances. Yet, in their blind delusion and presumption, they go
 on in their vagaries till God touches their hearts by a revelation of
 his law; then, alarmed, they must admit that they have lived without a
 knowledge of God and of his will, and that they have no counsel or
 help unless they lay hold on the words of the Gospel of Christ.
 
 33. We were all like that heretofore. Even I, a learned doctor of
 divinity, did not know better. I imagined that with my monk's cowl I
 was pleasing to God and on the way to heaven. I thought that I knew
 the mind of God well. I wanted to be his counselor, and to earn a
 recompense of him. But now I realize that my belief was false; it was
 blindness. I know that I must learn from his Word; that nothing else
 avails before him but faith in the crucified Christ, his Son; and
 that in such faith we must live, and do as our respective callings or
 positions require. Thus we may know right and wrong in God's sight;
 for our knowledge is not of our own invention, but we have it from
 revelation. By revelation God shows us his mind; as Saint Paul says
 (1 Cor 2, 16): "We have the mind of Christ." And again (verse 10):
 "But unto us God revealed them through the Spirit."
 
 34. The third class are those who transgress, having knowledge. They
 have the Word of revelation. I am not now speaking of those who
 knowingly persecute the truth--those of the first class, who are
 unconcerned about God--but I am speaking of those who recognize the
 revelation but are led by the devil to override it and go around it.
 They would conceive ways and judgments of God that he has not
 revealed. If they were Christians, they would be satisfied and thank
 God for having given us his Word, in which he shows us what is
 pleasing to him and how we may be saved. But instead, they allow
 themselves to be led by the devil to seek for other revelations and
 to speculate on what God in his invisible majesty is, and how he
 secretly governs the world, and what he has determined in regard to
 the future of each particular individual. And so presumptuous is our
 human nature that it would even interfere, with its wisdom, in God's
 judgment, and intrude into his most secret counsel, attempting to
 teach him and direct him. It was because of his arrogance that the
 devil was cast out into the abyss of hell; because he aspired to
 interference in the affairs of divine majesty, and would drag down
 man in the fall with himself. So did he cause man to fall in
 paradise, and so did he tempt the saints; and so he tempted Christ
 himself when he set him on the pinnacle of the temple.
 
 35. Against this third class Saint Paul directs his words, in answer
 to the impudent questions of wise reason as to why God punished and
 rejected the Jews, as he did, and allowed the condemned heathen to
 come into the Gospel grace; why he so administers justice as to exalt
 the godless and allow the godly to suffer and be oppressed; why he
 elected Judas as an apostle and afterwards rejected him and accepted
 a murderer and malefactor. With these words Saint Paul would command
 the wise to cease their impertinent strivings after the things of the
 secret majesty, and to confine themselves to the revelation he has
 given us; for all such searching and prying will be in vain and
 harmful. Though you were to search forever you would nowhere attain
 the secrets of God's purposes, but would only risk your soul.
 
 36. If you, therefore, would proceed wisely, you cannot do better
 than to be interested in the Word and in God's works. In them he has
 revealed himself, and in them he may be comprehended. For instance,
 he manifests his Son, Christ, to you, on the cross. This is the work
 of your redemption. In it you may truly apprehend God, and learn that
 he will not condemn you on account of your sins, if you believe, but
 will give you everlasting life. So Christ tells you: "God so loved
 the world, that he gave his only begotten Son, that whosoever
 believeth on him should not perish, but have eternal life." Jn 3, 16.
 In this Christ, says Saint Paul (Col 2, 3), are all the treasures of
 wisdom and knowledge hidden. Herein you will have more than enough to
 learn, to study and ponder. You will marvel at the wonderful
 revelation of God, and you will learn to delight in and love him. It
 is a mine which can never be exhausted in this life by study, and in
 the contemplation of which, as Peter says (1 Pet 1, 12), even the
 angels never tire, but find unceasing joy and pleasure.
 
 37. I say this so that we may be prepared to instruct and direct
 those we may meet who, assailed and tormented by such thoughts of the
 devil, are led to tempt God. They are beguiled by the devil to search
 and grope, in his false ways, after what may be the intention of God
 concerning them, and thereby they are led into such apprehension and
 despair that they are unable to endure it. Such individuals must be
 reminded of these words, and be reproved by them. So did Paul reprove
 the Jews and cavilers of his day when they presumed to comprehend God
 with their wisdom, to instruct him as his counselors and masters, to
 deal with him directly themselves, without any mediator, and to
 render him such service that he would owe them a recompense. Nothing
 will come of such searching. Against its endeavors he has erected
 barriers that, with all your striving, you will never be able to
 overcome. And so infinite are his wisdom, his counsel and riches,
 that you will never be able to fathom nor exhaust them. You ought to
 rejoice that he gives you some knowledge of his omnipotence in his
 revelation, as follows:
 
 "For of him, and through him, and unto him, are all things. To him be
 the glory for ever."
 
 38. Why should we boast, he would say here, when everything that has
 being--and our own wisdom and capabilities, of course--did not
 originate itself but had its origin in him and must be preserved by
 him, must exist through him? He says (Acts 17, 28): "For in him we
 live, and move, and have our being." And again (Ps 100, 3): "It is he
 that hath made us, and not we ourselves." That is, what we are and
 are able to do, and the fact that we live and have peace and
 protection--in short, all the good or evil that happens to us--comes
 to pass not by accident or chance. It all proceeds from his divine
 counsel and good pleasure. He cares for us as his people and flock.
 He governs us and gives us good things. He aids and preserves us in
 every time of need. Therefore, all honor and glory are due to him
 alone, from his creatures.
 
 
 EVERYTHING IS OF GOD.
 
 39. But when he says, Of him, through him, in him, are all things--he
 says in the simplest way that the beginning, middle and end is of
 God; that all creatures have their origin in him, also their growth
 and their limitations. To illustrate: Every little grain of corn has
 its beginning. A root springs from the dead seed in the ground; then
 a shoot comes forth and becomes a stalk, a leaflet, an ear of corn,
 and here it pauses, having the three parts it is intended to have.
 All creatures also have their beginning, their continuation and end,
 filling up the period of their existence. When this order ceases,
 every creature will cease to exist. That which has a beginning and
 grows but does not attain its end, does not reach perfection, is
 nothing. To sum it all up, everything must be of God. Nothing can
 exist without origin in him. Nothing that has come into being can
 continue to exist without him. He has not created the world as a
 carpenter builds a house and, departing, leaves it to stand as it
 may. God remains with and preserves all things which he has made;
 otherwise they would not continue to exist.
 
 40. Saint Paul does not simply say--as he does elsewhere--Of him are
 all things. He adds two other assertions, making a triple expression,
 and then unites the three thoughts into one whole when he says, "To
 him be the glory for ever." No doubt it was his intention therewith
 to convey the thought of this article of faith and to distinguish the
 three persons of the Godhead, even though he does not mention them by
 name, which is not necessary here. The ancient teachers also looked
 upon this passage as a testimony to the Holy Trinity. Their analysis
 was: All things are created by God the Father through the Son--even
 as he does all things through the Son--and are preserved, in God's
 good pleasure, through the Holy Spirit. So Paul is wont to say
 elsewhere; for example (1 Cor 8, 6): "There is one God, the Father,
 of whom are all things, and we unto him; and one Lord, Jesus Christ,
 through whom are all things." And concerning the Holy Spirit, Genesis
 1, 31 says: "And God saw everything that he had made, and, behold, it
 was very good."
 
 41. The Scriptures teach us that all creation is the work of one God,
 or the whole Godhead; and yet, inasmuch as they make a distinction
 between the three persons of the one Godhead, we may properly say
 that everything had its origin, everything exists and continues, in
 the Father as the first person; through the Son, who is of the
 Father; and in the Holy Spirit, who proceeds from both the Father and
 the Son; which three, nevertheless, are comprehended in the one
 undivided essence.
 
 42. But how such a distinction of persons exists in the divine
 essence from eternity is a mystery which we shall and must leave
 unsolved. For we cannot, with our crude understanding, even fathom
 God's creatures; no creature is wise enough to understand these three
 parts of itself--the beginning, the middle and the end. Though they
 are distinct from each other, nevertheless they are so closely
 connected that we cannot with our physical senses separate one from
 the other. Who has ever been able to discover or explain the process
 by which a leaflet grows from a tree, or a tiny grain of corn becomes
 a root, or a cherry grows from the blossom to wood and kernel? Again,
 who can explain how the bodily members of a human being manifestly
 grow; what the sight of the eye is; how the tongue can make such a
 variety of sounds and words, which enter, with marvelous diversity,
 into so many ears and hearts? Much less are we able to analyze the
 inner workings of the mind--its thoughts, its meditations, its
 memory. Why, then, should we presume, with our reason, to compass and
 comprehend the eternal, invisible essence of God?
 
 
 
 
 _Trinity Sunday_
 
 Second Sermon. Text: Romans 11, 33-36.
 
 
 THE DOCTRINE OF THE TRINITY.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon was first printed in 1535, at Wittenberg.]
 
 1. This festival requires us to instruct the people in the dogma of
 the Holy Trinity, and to strengthen both memory and faith concerning
 it. This is the reason why we take up the subject once more. Without
 proper instruction and a sound foundation in this regard, other
 dogmas cannot be rightly and successfully treated. The other
 festivals of the year present the Lord God clothed in his works and
 miracles. For instance: on Christmas we celebrate his incarnation; on
 Easter his resurrection from the dead; on Whitsunday the gift of the
 Holy Spirit and the establishment of the Christian Church. Thus all
 the other festivals present the Lord in the guise of a worker of one
 thing or another. But this Trinity Festival discloses him to us as he
 is in himself. Here we see him apart from whatever guise assumed,
 from whatever work done, solely in his divine essence. We must go
 beyond and above all reason, leaving behind the evidence of created
 things, and hear only God's own testimony concerning himself and his
 inner essence; otherwise we shall remain unenlightened.
 
 2. Upon this subject the foolishness of God and the wisdom of the
 world conflict. God's declaration that he is one God in three
 distinct persons, the world looks upon as wholly unreasonable and
 foolish; and the followers of mere reason, when they hear it, regard
 every one that teaches or believes it as no more than a fool.
 Therefore this article has been assailed continually, from the times
 of the apostles and the fathers down to the present day, as history
 testifies. Especially the Gospel of St. John has been subjected to
 attack, which was written for the special purpose of fortifying this
 dogma against the attacks of Cerinthus the heretic, who in the
 apostolic age already attempted to prove from Moses the existence of
 but one God, which he assigned as reason that our Lord Jesus cannot
 be true God on account of the impossibility of God and man being
 united in one being. Thus he gave us the prattle of his reason, which
 he made the sole standard for heaven to conform to.
 
 3. O shameless reason! How can we poor, miserable mortals grasp this
 mystery of the Trinity? we who do not understand the operation of our
 own physical powers--speech, laughter, sleep, things whereof we have
 daily experience? Yet we would, untaught by the Word of God, guided
 merely by our fallible head, pronounce upon the very nature of God.
 Is it not supreme blindness for man, when he is unable to explain the
 most insignificant physical operation daily witnessed in his own
 body, to presume to understand something above and beyond the power
 of reason to comprehend, something whereof only God can speak, and to
 rashly affirm that Christ is not God?
 
 4. Indeed, if reason were the standard of judgment in such matters, I
 also might make a successful venture; but when the conclusions of
 even long and mature reflections upon the subject are compared with
 Scripture, they will not stand. Therefore we must repeat, even though
 a mere stammering should be the result, what the Scriptures say to
 us, namely: that Jesus Christ is true God and that the Holy Spirit is
 likewise true God, yet there are not three Gods; not three divine
 natures, as we may speak of three brothers, three angels, three suns,
 three windows. There is one indivisible divine essence, while we
 recognize a distinction as to the persons.
 
 
 SCRIPTURE PROOF THAT CHRIST IS GOD.
 
 Paul, speaking of Christ in Hebrews 1, 3, refers to him as the
 express image of God's substance. Again, in Colossians 1, 15 he says
 of Christ: "Who is the image of the invisible God, the firstborn of
 all creation." We must take these words for what they say--that all
 creatures, even angels and men, are ranked below Christ. This
 classification leaves room for God only: taking away the creature,
 only God remains. It is one and the same thing, then, to say that
 Christ is the firstborn of all creatures and that Christ is true and
 essential God.
 
 5. To make the matter as clear as possible Paul uses the expression
 "image of the invisible God." If Christ be the image of God he must
 be a person distinct from him whose image he is, but at the same time
 in one divine essence with the Father. He and the Father are not one
 person, but two, and yet Christ could not be the express image of the
 Father's person, or essence, if he were not equally divine. No
 creature can be an image of the divine essence, for it does not
 possess that essence. To repeat, Christ could not be called the
 express image of God if he and the Father were not distinct persons;
 there must be one imaged and one who is the image. Expressed more
 clearly and according to Scripture, one person is the Father, who in
 eternity begets the other; the other is the Son, begotten in
 eternity, yet both are equally eternal, mighty, wise and just.
 
 6. Though the Jews and Turks ridicule our doctrine, as if we taught
 the existence of three brothers in heaven, it does not signify. Might
 I also cavil were it to serve any purpose here. But they do us wrong
 and falsify our teaching; for we do not conceive of the Trinity as in
 the nature of three men or of three angels. We regard it as one
 divine essence, an intimacy surpassing any earthly unity. The human
 body and soul are not so completely one as the Triune God. Further,
 we claim the Holy Scriptures teach that in the one divine essence,
 God the Father begot a son. Before any creature was made, before the
 world was created, as Paul says, "before the foundation of the
 world," in eternity, the Father begot a Son who is equal with him and
 in all respects God like himself. Not otherwise could Paul call
 Christ the express image of the invisible God. Thus it is proven that
 the Father and the Son are distinct persons, and that nevertheless
 but one God exists, a conclusion we cannot escape unless we would
 contradict Paul, and would become Jews and Turks.
 
 
 PAUL AND MOSES AGREE IN TESTIMONY.
 
 7. Again, Paul makes mention of Christ in different phrase, saying:
 "Neither let us tempt Christ, as some of them also tempted, and were
 destroyed of serpents." 1 Cor 10, 9. Now, keeping this verse in mind,
 note how Paul and Moses kiss each other, how clearly the one responds
 to the other. For Moses says (Num 14, 22): "All those men ... have
 tempted me these ten times, and have not hearkened to my voice," and
 in this connection the speaker is represented by the term "Lord,"
 everywhere in the Bible printed by us in capitals to indicate a name
 belonging only to the Eternal, applicable to none but the one true
 God. Other terms used to designate God are sometimes applied also to
 men, but this word "Lord" refers only to God.
 
 Now, Moses says: "And the Lord [Adonai, the true God] said ... All
 these men ... have tempted me these ten times." Then comes Paul
 explaining who this God is--saying they tempted "Christ." Crawl
 through this statement if you may; the fact remains that Paul
 declares it was Christ who was tempted, and Moses makes him the one
 eternal and true God. Moreover, Christ was not at that time born; no,
 nor were Mary and David. Nevertheless, the apostle plainly says, They
 tempted Christ, let us not also tempt him.
 
 8. Certainly enough, then, Christ is the man to whom Moses refers as
 God. Thus the testimony of Moses long before is identical with that
 of Paul. Though employing different terms, they both confess Christ
 as the Son of God, born in eternity of the Father, in the same divine
 essence and yet distinct from him. You may call this difference what
 you will; we indicate it by the term "person." True, we do not make a
 wholly clear explanation of the mystery; we but stammer when speaking
 of a "Trinity." But what are we to do? we cannot better the attempt.
 So, then, the Father is not the Son, but the Son is born of the
 Father in eternity; and the Holy Spirit proceeds from God the Father
 and God the Son. Thus there are three persons, and yet but one God.
 For what Moses declares concerning God Paul says is spoken of Christ.
 
 9. The same argument substantially Paul employs in Acts 20, 28, when,
 blessing the Church of Miletus and exhorting the assembled ministers
 concerning their office, he says: "Take heed unto yourselves, and to
 all the flock, in which the Holy Spirit hath made you bishops, to
 feed the church of the Lord which he purchased with his own blood."
 This, too, is a significant text, proving beyond all controversy that
 Christ our Lord, who purchased the Church with his blood, is truly
 God, and to him the Church belongs. For the apostle plainly asserts
 it was God who bought the Church with his blood and that the Church
 is his own.
 
 Now, in view of the fact already established that the persons are
 distinct, and of the further statement that God has purchased the
 Church through his own blood, we inevitably conclude that Christ our
 Saviour is true God, born of the Father in eternity, and that he also
 became man and was born of the Virgin Mary in time.
 
 10. If such blood--the material, tangible, crimson blood, shed by a
 real man--is truly to be called the blood of God, then he who shed it
 must be actually God, an eternal, almighty person in the one divine
 essence. In that case we truly can say the blood flowing from the
 side of the crucified One and spilled upon the ground is not merely
 the blood of an ordinary man, but God's own. Paul does not indulge in
 frivolous talk. He speaks of a most momentous matter; and he is in
 dead earnest when he in his exhortation reminds us that it is an
 exalted office to rule the Church and to feed it with the Word of
 God. Lest we toy in the performance of such an office we are reminded
 that the flock is as dear to him as the blood of his dear Son, so
 precious that all creatures combined can furnish no equivalent. And
 if we are indolent or unfaithful, we sin against the blood of God and
 become guilty of it, inasmuch as through our fault it has been shed
 in vain for the souls which we should oversee.
 
 11. There are many passages of similar import, particularly in the
 Gospel of John. So we cannot evade the truth but must say God the
 Father, God the Son and God the Holy Spirit are three individual
 persons, yet of one divine essence. We do not, as the Jews and Turks
 derisively allege, worship three Gods; we worship only one God,
 represented to us in the Scriptures as three persons.
 
 Christ said to Philip (Jn 14, 9), "He that hath seen me hath seen the
 Father." There Christ claims unity and equality with the Father in
 the one divine essence. So does Paul in Colossians 1, 15, where he
 calls Christ "the image of the invisible God," at the same time
 indicating two distinct persons: the Father is not the Son and the
 Son is not the Father, yet they are one God. Such passages, I say,
 are frequent. By means of them the sainted fathers valiantly
 maintained this dogma of the Trinity against the devil and the world,
 thus making it our heritage.
 
 12. Now, what care we that reason should regard it as foolishness? It
 requires no skill to cavil over these things; I could do that as well
 as others. But, praise God, I have the grace to desire no controversy
 on this point. When I know it is the Word of God that declares the
 Trinity, that God has said so, I do not inquire how it can be true; I
 am content with the simple Word of God, let it harmonize with reason
 as it may. And every Christian should adopt the same course with
 respect to all the articles of our faith. Let there be no caviling
 and contention on the score of possibility; be satisfied with the
 inquiry: Is it the Word of God? If a thing be his Word, if he has
 spoken it, you may confidently rely upon it he will not lie nor
 deceive you, though you may not understand the how and the when.
 
 Since, then, this article of the Holy Trinity is certified by the
 Word of God, and the sainted fathers have from the inception of the
 Church chivalrously defended and maintained the article against every
 sect, we are not to dispute as to how God the Father, the Son and the
 Holy Spirit are one God. This is an incomprehensible mystery. It is
 enough that God in his Word gives such testimony of himself. Both his
 nature and its revelation to us are far beyond our understanding.
 
 
 PHYSICAL LIFE INEXPLICABLE TO REASON.
 
 13. And why should you presume to comprehend, to exactly understand,
 the sublime, inconceivable divine essence when you are wholly
 ignorant of your own body and life? You cannot explain the action of
 your laughter, nor how your eyes give you knowledge of a castle or
 mountain ten miles away. You cannot tell how in sleep one, dead to
 the external world, is yet alive. If we are unable to understand the
 least detail of our physical selves, anything so insignificant as the
 growth of a mere hair, for instance, can we, unaided by the
 revelation of God's Word, climb by reason--that reason so blind to
 things within its natural realm--into the realm of heavenly mysteries
 and comprehend and define God in his majesty?
 
 If you employ reason from mere love of disputation, why not devote it
 to questions concerning the daily workings of your physical nature?
 for instance, where are the five senses during sleep? just how is the
 sound of your own laughter produced? We might without sin occupy
 ourselves with such questions. But as to the absolute truth in a
 matter such as this, let us abide patiently by the authority of the
 Word. The Word says that Christ is the express image of the invisible
 God, the firstborn of all creatures; in other words, he is God
 equally with the Father.
 
 14. Again, John 5, 23 testifies that all should honor the Son as they
 honor the Father. And in John 12, 44 we read: "He that believeth on
 me, believeth not on me, but on him that sent me." Also, John 14, 1:
 "Believe in God, believe also in me." And again, John 16, 15: "All
 things whatsoever the Father hath are mine." These and similar
 passages are armor that cannot be pierced: for they are uttered by
 God, who does not lie and who alone is qualified to speak the truth
 concerning himself. Thus the dogma of the Trinity is thoroughly
 founded upon the holy Scriptures.
 
 
 THE THIRD PERSON OF THE TRINITY.
 
 15. Now, having established the existence of Christ in the Trinity,
 we must next consider the third person, the Holy Spirit, in Scripture
 sometimes termed the "Spirit" of God and sometimes his "Soul." This
 person is not spoken of as "born"; he is not born like the Son, but
 proceeds from the Father and the Son. To express it differently, he
 is a person possessing in eternity the divine essence, which he
 derives from the Father and Son in unity in the same way the Son
 derives it from the Father alone. There are, then, three distinct
 persons in one divine essence, one divine majesty. According to the
 Scripture explanation of the mystery, Christ the Lord is the Son of
 God from eternity, the express image of the Father, and equally
 great, mighty, wise and just. All deity, wisdom, power and might
 inherent in the Father is also in Christ, and likewise in the Holy
 Spirit, who proceeds from Father and Son. Now, when you are asked to
 explain the Trinity, reply that it is an incomprehensible mystery,
 beyond the understanding of angels and creatures, the knowledge of
 which is confined to the revelations of Scripture.
 
 16. Rightly did the fathers compose the Creed, or Symbol, in the
 simple form repeated by Christian children: "I believe in God the
 Father Almighty, Maker of heaven and earth, and in Jesus Christ his
 only Son ... I believe in the Holy Ghost." This confession we did not
 devise, nor did the fathers of former times. As the bee collects
 honey from many fair and gay flowers, so is this Creed collected, in
 appropriate brevity, from the books of the beloved prophets and
 apostles--from the entire holy Scriptures--for children and for
 unlearned Christians. It is fittingly called the "Apostle's Symbol,"
 or "Apostle's Creed." For brevity and clearness it could not have
 been better arranged, and it has remained in the Church from ancient
 time. It must either have been composed by the apostles themselves or
 it was collected from their writings and sermons by their ablest
 disciples.
 
 17. It begins "I believe." In whom? "In God the Father." This is the
 first person in the Godhead. For the sake of clear distinction, the
 peculiar attribute and office in which each person manifests himself
 is briefly expressed. With the first it is the work of creation.
 True, creation is not the work of one individual person, but of the
 one divine, eternal essence as such. We must say, God the Father, God
 the Son and God the Holy Spirit created heaven and earth. Yet that
 work is more especially predicated of the person of the Father, the
 first person, for the reason that creation is the only work of the
 Father in which he has stepped forth out of concealment into
 observation; it is the first work wrought by the divine Majesty upon
 the creature. By the word "Father" he is particularly and rightly
 distinguished from the other persons of the Trinity. It indicates him
 as the first person, derived from no other, the Son and the Holy
 Spirit having existence from him.
 
 18. Continuing, the Creed says, I believe in another who is also God.
 For to believe is something we owe to no being but God alone. Who is
 this second person? Jesus Christ, God's only begotten Son. Christians
 have so confessed for more than fifteen hundred years; indeed, such
 has been the confession of believers from the beginning of the world.
 Though not employing precisely these words, yet this has been their
 faith and profession.
 
 19. The first designation of God the Son makes him the only Son of
 God. Although angels are called sons of the Lord our God, and even
 Christians are termed his children, yet no one of these is said to be
 the "only" or "only-begotten" Son. Such is the effect of Christ's
 birth from the Father that he is unequaled by any creature, not
 excepting even the angels. For he is in truth and by nature the Son
 of God the Father; that is, he is of the same divine, eternal,
 uncreated essence.
 
 20. Next comes the enumeration of the acts peculiar to him: "Who was
 conceived by the Holy Spirit, born of the Virgin Mary, suffered under
 Pontius Pilate, was crucified, dead and buried. He descended into
 hell; on the third day he rose again from the dead; he ascended into
 heaven, and sits at the right hand of God the Father Almighty; from
 thence he shall come to judge the quick and the dead." The distinct
 personality of the Son is thus demonstrated by acts peculiar to
 himself. Not the Father and not the Holy Spirit, but the Son alone,
 assumed human nature of flesh and blood, like unto ours, to suffer,
 die, rise again and ascend into heaven.
 
 21. In the third place we confess, "I believe in the Holy Ghost."
 Here again a distinct person is named, yet one in divine essence with
 the Father and the Son; for we must believe in no one but the true
 God, in obedience to the first commandment: "I am Jehovah thy God ...
 Thou shalt have no other gods before me."
 
 Thus briefly this confession comprehends the unity of the divine
 essence--we accept and worship only one God--and the revealed truth
 that in the Trinity are three distinct persons. The same distinction
 is indicated in holy baptism; we are baptized into the faith of one
 God, yet Christ commands us to baptize "into the name of the Father
 and of the Son and of the Holy Spirit."
 
 22. The peculiarity of this third person is the fact that he proceeds
 from both the Father and the Son. He is therefore called also the
 Spirit of the Father and the Son; he is poured into the human heart
 and reveals himself in the gathering of the Church of Christ in all
 tongues. Through the Word of the Gospel he enlightens and kindles the
 hearts of men unto one faith, sanctifying, quickening and saving
 them.
 
 23. So the Creed confesses three persons as comprehended in one
 divine essence, each one, however, retaining his distinct
 personality; and in order that the simple Christian may recognize
 that there is but one divine essence and one God, who is
 tri-personal, a special work, peculiar to himself, is ascribed to
 each person. And such acts, peculiar to each person, are mentioned
 for the reason that thus a confusion of persons is avoided. To the
 Father we ascribe the work of creation; to the Son the work of
 Redemption; to the Holy Spirit the power to forgive sins, to gladden,
 to strengthen, to transport from death to life eternal.
 
 The thought is not that the Father alone is the Creator, the Son
 alone Redeemer and the Holy Spirit alone Sanctifier. The creation and
 preservation of the universe, atonement for sin and its forgiveness,
 resurrection from the dead and the gift of eternal life--all these
 are operations of the one Divine Majesty as such. Yet the Father is
 especially emphasized in the work of creation, which proceeds
 originally from him as the first person; the Son is emphasized in the
 redemption he has accomplished in his own person; and the Holy Spirit
 in the peculiar work of sanctification, which is both his mission and
 revelation. Such distinction is made for the purpose of affording
 Christians the unqualified assurance that there is but one God and
 yet three persons in the one divine essence--truths the sainted
 fathers have faithfully gathered from the writings of Moses, the
 prophets and the apostles, and which they have maintained against all
 heretics.
 
 24. This faith has descended to us by inheritance, and by his power
 God has maintained it in his Church, against sects and adversaries,
 unto the present time. So we must abide by it in its simplicity and
 not be wise. Christians are under the necessity of believing things
 apparently foolish to reason. As Paul says (1 Cor 1, 21): "It was
 God's good pleasure through the foolishness of the preaching to save
 them that believe." How can reason adapt itself to comprehend that
 three are one, and one is three; that God became man; that he who is
 washed with water in obedience to Christ's command, is washed with
 the blood of our Lord Jesus Christ and cleansed from all sins? Such
 articles of faith appear utterly foolish to reason. Paul aptly calls
 the Gospel foolish preaching wherewith God saves such as do not
 depend on their own wisdom but simply believe the Word. They who will
 follow reason in the things dealt with in these articles, and will
 reject the Word, shall be defeated and destroyed in their wisdom.
 
 25. Now, we have in the holy Scriptures and in the Creed sufficient
 information concerning the Holy Trinity, and all that is necessary
 for the instruction of ordinary Christians. Besides, the divinity of
 our Lord Jesus Christ and that of the Holy Spirit is also attested by
 miracles not to be lightly esteemed nor disregarded. The Lord our God
 brings to pass miraculous things for the Christian's sake--for the
 strengthening of his faith--and not merely as a rebuke to false
 teachers. Were he to consider the false teachers alone, he might
 easily defer their retribution to the future life, since he permits
 many other transgressors to go unpunished for ten, twenty or thirty
 years. But the fact is, God openly in this life lays hold upon
 leaders of sects who blaspheme and slander him with their false
 doctrines. He inflicts upon them unusual punishments for the sake of
 warning others. Besides being openly convicted of blasphemy and
 having the condemnation of their own conscience, the misguided ones
 receive testimony to the fact that these false leaders are
 instigators of blasphemy against God's name and his Word. All men are
 compelled to admit God can have no pleasure in their doctrine, since
 he visits them with special marks of his displeasure, destroying them
 with severer punishments than ordinarily befall offenders.
 
 26. History records that John the evangelist had as contemporary a
 heretic, by the name of Cerinthus, who was the first to arise in
 opposition to the apostolic doctrine and in blasphemy against the
 Lord Jesus with the claim that Jesus is not God. This blasphemy
 spread to such an extent that John saw himself compelled to
 supplement the work of the other evangelists with his Gospel, whose
 distinct purpose it is to defend and maintain the deity of Christ
 against Cerinthus and his rabble.
 
 A feature of John's Gospel patent to all is the sublime beginning of
 his Gospel which renders it distinct from the others. He does not lay
 stress upon the miraculous doings of Christ, but upon his preaching,
 wherein he reveals himself powerfully as true God, born of the Father
 from eternity, and his equal in power, honor, wisdom, righteousness
 and every other divine work.
 
 With respect to John and Cerinthus it is reported that the former,
 having gone to a public bath with some of his disciples, became aware
 that Cerinthus and his rabble were there, also. Without hesitation he
 told his disciples to be up and away, and not to abide among
 blasphemers. The disciples followed his advice and departed.
 Immediately after their departure the room collapsed, and Cerinthus
 with his followers perished, not one escaping.
 
 27. We also read concerning the heretic Arius, the chief foe of his
 time toward the dogma of the deity of Christ. The injury done by this
 man to the cause of Christ was such as to occupy the Church for four
 centuries after his death; and still today his heresy has not been
 altogether rooted out. But the Lord took the matter in hand by the
 performance of a miracle which could not but be understood.
 
 History records that Arius had ingratiated himself into the favor of
 Constantine, the emperor, and his counselors. With an oath he had
 succeeded in impressing them with the righteousness of his doctrine,
 so that the emperor gave command that Alexander, bishop of
 Constantinople, should recognize him as a member of the Christian
 Church and restore him to the priestly office. When the godly bishop
 refused to accede to this demand, knowing full well the purpose
 pursued by Arius and his followers, Eusebius and the other bishops
 who supported Arius threatened him with the imperial edict and
 expressed the determination to drive him out by force and to have
 Arius restored by the congregation as such. However, they gave him a
 day to think the matter over.
 
 28. The godly bishop was fearful. The following of Arius was large
 and powerful, being supported by the imperial edict and the whole
 court. The bishop, therefore, resolved to seek help from God, where
 alone it is found in all things relating to God's honor. He fell down
 upon his face in the church and prayed all night long that God should
 preserve his name and honor by methods calculated to stem the tide of
 evil purpose, and to preserve Christendom against the heretics. When
 it was morning, and the hour had come when Alexander the bishop
 should either restore Arius to office or be cast out of his own,
 Arius convened punctually with his followers. As the procession was
 wending its way to the church, Arius suddenly felt ill and was
 compelled to seek privacy. The pompous procession halted, waiting his
 return, when the message came that his lungs and liver had passed
 from him, causing his death. The narrative comments: Mortem dignam
 blasphema et foetida mente--a death worthy such a blasphemous and
 turpid mind.
 
 29. We see, then, that this dogma has been preserved by God first
 through the writings and the conflicts of the apostles, and then by
 miracles, against the devil and his blasphemers. And it shall be
 preserved in the future likewise, so that, without a trace of doubt,
 we may believe in God the Father, God the Son, God the Holy Spirit.
 This is the faith which we confess with our children daily. To guard
 against a mixing of persons or the abandonment of the tri-personality,
 three distinct acts are predicated. This should enable the common
 Christian to avoid confusing the persons, while maintaining the divine
 unity as to essence.
 
 We proclaim these things on this Sunday in order to call attention to
 the fact that we have not come upon this doctrine in a dream, but by
 the grace of God through his Word and the holy apostles and Fathers.
 God help us to be found constant and without blemish in this doctrine
 and faith to our end. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 _First Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 John 4, 16-21.
 
 16 God is love; and he that abideth in love abideth in God, and God
 abideth in him. 17 Herein is love made perfect with us, that we may
 have boldness in the day of judgment; because as he is, even so are
 we in this world. 18 There is no fear in love: but perfect love
 casteth out fear, because fear hath punishment; and he that feareth
 is not made perfect in love. 19 We love, because he first loved us.
 20 If a man say, I love God, and hateth his brother, he is a liar:
 for he that loveth not his brother whom he hath seen, cannot love God
 whom he hath not seen. 21 And this commandment have we from him, that
 he who loveth God love his brother also.
 
 
 GOD IS LOVE.
 
 This epistle text is amply expounded in the "Explanation of Certain
 Epistles of the Apostles" printed in other volumes. Those who wish
 may read there one or more sermons for themselves or their people.
 They are too long to insert here.
 
 
 
 
 _Second Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 John 3, 13-18.
 
 13 Marvel not, brethren, if the world hateth you. 14 We know that we
 have passed out of death into life, because we love the brethren. He
 that loveth not abideth in death. 15 Whosoever hateth his brother is
 a murderer: and ye know that no murderer hath eternal life abiding in
 him. 16 Hereby know we love, because he laid down his life for us:
 and we ought to lay down our lives for the brethren. 17 But whoso
 hath the world's goods, and beholdeth his brother in need, and
 shutteth up his compassion from him, how does the love of God abide
 in him? 18 My little children, let us not love in word, neither with
 the tongue; but in deed and truth.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO BROTHERLY LOVE.
 
 1. The Epistles and Gospels selected for the Pentecost cycle of
 Sundays have love as their general theme. They deal not only with the
 love we owe to Christ and God, which is only to be thankful for the
 unspeakable blessing of forgiveness of sins and salvation through
 Christ's blood and death, but also of the love we owe our neighbor;
 not a love in return for favors, but one that unceasingly gives,
 forgives and works all good even when unrequited.
 
 2. John here admonishes the Christian to exercise the virtue of love.
 Considering the evident rarity of love among men, this admonition is
 necessary. He particularly warns Christians not to wonder at the
 world's hatred and desire for their death. Such was the hate of Cain
 for his brother, of which the apostle has just spoken. The world's
 hate, it must be admitted, repels love and powerfully obstructs its
 exercise.
 
 3. Is it not surpassing strange that one can hate those who love him
 and from whom he has received only kindness? Such wickedness is
 almost inconceivable, we say. What incentive is there for any to
 render the world service when in ingratitude it rewards love with
 hatred? But let us examine ourselves, who are baptized and have
 received the Gospel, and confess how we requite the supreme love of
 God in giving us his Son. What a beautiful example of glad gratitude
 we display! For the shame of it we ought to despise ourselves before
 God and his angels.
 
 And what shall we say of those who will not endure the preaching of
 the glorious message of God's grace and blessing, but condemn it as
 heresy? to whom they who seek to serve, to benefit and save the world
 by declaring the good news, must be, as Paul says, "as the filth of
 the world, the offscouring of all things," 1 Cor 4, 13. Indeed, no
 criminal receives more wretched and ignominious treatment and
 execution, of which the Pope and his followers are a case in point.
 
 
 THE WORLD'S HATRED.
 
 4. While experience has proven this otherwise incredible fact, John
 vouchsafes the admonition notwithstanding: "Marvel not, brethren, if
 the world hateth you." If we are not to wonder at this, is there
 anything in the world to incite wonder? I should truly think the
 hearing of a single sermon on the grace of Christ would suffice to
 bring the world to receive the Gospel with intense joy and never to
 forget the divine mercy and blessing. It would be no wonder should
 the earth suddenly open and engulf mankind because of its ingratitude
 to God who has given his Son to become man for the purpose of
 redeeming us condemned mortals from sin and death and restoring us to
 life and salvation. Is it not a horrible thing that any man should
 shun and oppose such a Savior and his doctrine even more than he does
 the devil himself?
 
 5. But what is God's attitude toward such conduct? Well does he say
 to the Jews through the prophet: "O my people, what have I done unto
 thee? and wherein have I wearied thee? testify against me. For I
 brought thee up out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed thee out of
 the house of bondage; and I sent before thee Moses, Aaron, and
 Miriam. O my people, remember now what Balak, king of Moab, devised;
 and what Balaam, the son of Beor, answered him; remember from Shittim
 unto Gilgal, that ye may know the righteous acts of Jehovah." Mic 6,
 3-5. And well does Christ say to his ungrateful people: "O Jerusalem,
 Jerusalem, that killeth the prophets, and stoneth them that are sent
 unto her! how often would I have gathered thy children together, even
 as a hen gathereth her chickens under her wings, and ye would not!"
 Mt 23, 37. As if he would say, "I surely did not come to effect your
 death and condemnation by my message. I am about to suffer death and
 God's wrath for your sins. I bring you God's endless grace and
 blessing for time and eternity. Then why this bitter hatred against
 me and my message?"
 
 6. "Since the world hates even God for his kindness," argues John,
 "marvel not, my beloved, that you suffer the same fate. What does it
 signify that I show my love by hazarding life and limb to sustain
 this doctrine of the Gospel and help my neighbor? Mine is but a poor,
 mean, uncouth, offensive love in comparison with the love that led
 Christ to die for me and to redeem me from eternal death. If God's
 supreme, unfathomable love fails to awaken the gratitude of the
 world, what wonder if the world hates you for all your kindness? Why
 will you bring down your fist and stamp your foot in anger at such
 ingratitude? You are yourselves of that race for whom the Son of God
 had to die. And even were you to die for the Gospel, your sacrifice
 would be as nothing in comparison to the fact that God, for the sake
 of the world, spared not his own Son but permitted the world to put
 him to death."
 
 7. But whence arises the world's hatred? John tells us in verse
 twelve when he mentions the incident of Cain, who, he says, "was of
 the evil one, and slew his brother. And wherefore slew he him?
 Because his works were evil, and his brother's righteous." An
 excellent reason, indeed, for hating--the hater and murderer is evil
 and the benefactor good! In civil and domestic affairs it is the
 evil-doers and disobedient who incur displeasure and receive
 punishment; and such reward is just. But whenever God has dealings
 with the world, it shows what a rotten fruit it is by hating,
 persecuting, and putting to death as evil-doers and impostors its
 very benefactors. This trait it inherits, John tells us, from its
 ancestor Cain, the great fratricide saint. He is a true picture of
 the world of all times, and ever its spirit and fashion is patterned
 after him.
 
 8. When mother Eve, the dear, godly woman, bore her first son, she
 declared in her joy and her hope of God's promise of the future seed
 that should bruise the serpent's head: "I have gotten a man with the
 help of Jehovah" (Gen 4, 1); and she named him Cain, which means
 "obtained," as if she would say, "I have obtained the true treasure."
 For she had not before seen a human being born; this was the first,
 precious fruit of man. Over Cain she rejoiced, pronouncing herself
 blessed. This son was trained in the hope that he should be a savior
 of the future race, a comfort to his brothers and sisters with all
 their offspring. Nor was he unaware of these proud hopes. Proudly he
 lorded it over his brother, who in contrast had to bear the
 ignominious name of Abel, meaning "nothing," or "vanity," as if
 voicing the thought of the parents' hearts: "Alas! this one has no
 future. Cain is the rightful heir to the blessing God has promised
 man; he is lord and master of his brethren."
 
 9. It is likely that the godly father and mother for many years drew
 their solace from the hope placed in their first-born son, as they
 looked forward with intensest longing to the redemption from their
 deplorable fall. Doubtless they trained both sons very carefully and
 instructed them concerning their own sin and fall and the promise God
 had given them, until they were fully grown and had entered into the
 priestly office. Cain the first-born was particularly zealous in that
 respect, desiring to be first inasmuch as he offered his first fruits
 of the earth, given by God and obtained by his own labor, as he no
 doubt had seen his father offer. Abel, however, the inferior, the
 poor shepherd, offered the firstlings of his sheep, given him of God
 and obtained without effort and toil of his own. Now, God in a
 wonderful way manifested his preference concerning the gifts upon the
 altar. Fire descended from heaven and consumed Abel's offering, but
 Cain's remained. The fire was the sign of God's favor. The text says:
 "And Jehovah had respect unto Abel and to his offering: but unto Cain
 and to his offering he had not respect." Gen 4, 4-5.
 
 10. Thereupon Adam and Eve saw that the hope and solace centering in
 their first-born son, were a delusion. They began to learn the
 wonderful judgments of God, who gave precedence to Abel, the male
 counterpart of Cinderella--which is all he was in his own sight when
 he compared himself with his brother. Now Cain, with full confidence
 in his position, spoiled by the delusion of his parents that as the
 first-born he was God's preference, felt himself outraged. His
 hypocrisy, hitherto masked, comes to the surface. He burns with
 secret hate against God, with hate and anger against his brother,
 which he takes no trouble whatever to disguise. The parents rebuke
 him, but effect nothing. The flame of his resentment rises higher,
 and meeting him alone upon the field, he fells him to the ground. Far
 from contemplating amendment of life or seeking grace from God, he
 has no mercy upon the only brother he has on earth, who has done him
 no harm whatever. He cannot forgive him and leave him in unenvied
 possession of the grace of God.
 
 11. Such was the solace and joy poor Adam and Eve lived to experience
 in their first children! From this time on their earthly life was
 fraught with gloom and sorrow, particularly since they could not but
 see the source of these in their own fall and they would have pined
 to death had not God comforted them with another son. For when it
 became evident that the hope they had placed in Cain was a delusion,
 and that they were deprived of the son who, beyond a doubt, possessed
 the grace of God, they, without another son, would not have known
 where to look for the solace of the promised seed.
 
 
 CAIN THE WORLD, ABEL THE CHURCH.
 
 12. Note, in this man Cain is pictured the world in its true,
 characteristic colors; in him its true spirit stands reflected.
 Certainly his equal has never been. In him are unquestionably
 prefigured the very flower, the very quintessence, of holiness on
 earth--the most pious servants of God. On the other hand, that poor,
 wretched, abject male counterpart of Cinderella, Abel, well
 represents the obscure little brotherhood, the Church of Christ. She
 must yield to Cain the lord the distinction of being everything
 before God, of being the recipient of every gift of God, of being
 entitled to all honor and every privilege. He feels important in his
 imagined dignity, permits this spirit to pervade his sacrifices and
 his worships, and thinks that God cannot but favor and accept his
 offering rather than that of his brother.
 
 Meanwhile, the pious Abel goes his way, meekly suffering his
 brother's contempt. He willingly yields Cain the honor, esteems
 himself vastly inferior and beholds no consolation for himself aside
 from the pure mercy and goodness of God. He believes in God and hopes
 for the promised future seed. In such faith he performs his sacrifice
 as a confession, a sign, of his gratitude.
 
 13. This illustration is intended by God as solace for his little
 throng; for the incident is not written for Abel's sake but for the
 sake of the humble children of God, whose condition is like that of
 Abel. God has not forgotten them, though they are haughtily ignored
 by proud Cain, who regards them as nothing in his presence. God
 graciously looks upon them and rejects proud Cain with his birthright
 and offering.
 
 14. Innocent Abel becomes the object of anger and hatred when the
 Word of God lays hold of Cain revealing God's displeasure where he
 had fancied himself worthy, and God's unwillingness to regard his
 offering and devotion as superior to this of his brother and more
 meritorious. Cain begins bitterly to hate and persecute his brother.
 He finds no rest until Abel is laid low and cut off from the earth.
 Now you have the cause of the world's hatred and anger against
 Christians; simply this, as John says of Cain: "Because his works
 were evil, and his brother's righteous."
 
 15. What offense had godly Abel committed against his brother to be
 so hated? He had even regarded that brother as the first-born, as
 vastly superior to himself, and had done him all honor and loved him
 as became a brother. He was easily satisfied, desiring simply the
 grace of God. He prayed for the future seed, that is, for the
 salvation and happiness of his parents, his brother and the entire
 human race. How could Cain be unmerciful and inhuman enough in his
 frenzy to murder his own flesh and blood?
 
 The answer is found in the fact that the devil had filled Cain's
 heart with pride and vanity over his birthright. He considered
 himself a man of distinction, with every claim upon God's favor and
 sinless, whilst his brother was nothing whatever. Cain's heart is
 devoid of true brotherly love; he has only contempt for Abel. He
 cannot endure God's manifest favor toward his brother, and will not
 be moved by the injunction to humble himself and seek God's grace.
 Anger and envy possess him to the extent that he cannot tolerate his
 brother alive. In violation of God's commandment and his own
 conscience, he becomes a murderer, and then goes his way as if he had
 done right.
 
 16. This is what John means when he says that Cain had no other cause
 for his crime than that his own works were evil and his brother's
 righteous. Similarly, that obedient daughter of Saint Cain, the
 world, hates the Christians; and for no other reason than the
 latter's love and goodness of heart. Witness the examples of the holy
 patriarchs, the prophets and, most of all, of Christ himself.
 
 17. What sin against the world did the beloved apostles commit? They
 desired the injury of none, but went about in extreme poverty and
 toil, teaching mankind how, through faith in Christ, to be saved from
 the devil's kingdom and from eternal death. This the world will not
 hear and suffer; hence the hue and cry: "Kill, kill these people!
 Away with them from off the earth! Show them no mercy!" Why this
 hostility? Because the apostles sought to relieve the world of its
 idolatry and damnable doings. Such good works the world could not
 tolerate. What it desires is nothing but praise and commendation for
 its own evil doings, expecting from God the impossible endorsement,
 "Your deeds are good and well-pleasing to me. Pious children of mine
 are you. Just keep on cheerfully killing all who believe and preach
 my Word."
 
 18. In the same way does the world conduct itself today with
 reference to our Gospel. For no other reason are we hated and
 persecuted than because we have, through God's grace, proclaimed his
 Word that recovered us from the blindness and idolatry in which we
 were sunken as deeply as the world, and because we desire to rescue
 others. That is the unpardonable sin by which we have incurred the
 world's irreconcilable anger and its inextinguishable hatred. It
 cannot permit us to live.
 
 We preach no other doctrine than faith in Christ, which our children
 pray and they themselves confess in words. We differ only in our
 claim that Christ having been crucified for us and having shed his
 blood to redeem us from sin and death, our salvation is not effected
 by our own works, or holiness or devotion. The fact that we do not
 regard their faithless worship equal to Christ himself, but teach men
 to trust in the grace of God and not their own worthiness, and to
 render him gratitude for his grace--this fact is intolerable to the
 world. It would be well for our adversaries if they would receive
 such teaching, since it would render them more than ever what they
 profess to be: our superiors in wisdom, knowledge and reputation--a
 claim we are willing to concede. But Cain's works are evil and Abel's
 righteous. The world simply cannot tolerate the Gospel, and no unity
 or harmony is ever to be hoped for. The world will not forsake its
 idolatry nor receive the faith. It would force us to renounce the
 Word of God and praise its Cain-like worship, or take death at their
 hands.
 
 19. Therefore, John says, "Marvel not, brethren, if the world hateth
 you," for it is compelled to act according to the nature inherited
 from its father Cain. It would have all merits and concede to Abel
 none. The world comprises the exalted, the wise, the learned, the
 mighty. The Scriptures represent these as under necessity to hate and
 persecute the poor throng of the Church of Christ by reason of the
 good works done by them. They can under no consideration tolerate the
 idea of being taught by this despised and humble throng the doctrine
 of salvation through the grace and mercy of God alone, not through
 man's own merits. They cannot endure the teaching that their
 offering--the mass, regarded by the Papists as a work of superlative
 merit and holiness--avails nothing before God.
 
 20. In the text the nature of the world is portrayed for our
 recognition. So to understand the world as to know what may be
 expected from it is essential and valuable knowledge for the
 Christian. Thus armed he will not be dismayed and become impatient of
 suffering, nor permit its malice and ingratitude to mislead him to
 hate and desire for revenge. He will keep his faith and love,
 suffering the world to go its way if it refuse to hear his message.
 The Christian should expect nothing better from the world than its
 bitter persecution in return for his good works and love. The Church
 of Christ on earth, let him remember, is never to have an easier lot.
 He is not to judge according to show and appearance, thinking: "They
 are the great throng, the wisest and cleverest people on earth; how
 is it possible that they should all be in error and under
 condemnation?"
 
 21. It is necessarily true that discipline and peace are impossible
 without the most excellent, exalted, erudite, clever people--royal,
 princely, noble in achievement and honor. Cain is never plain and
 lowly. He is always eminently clever, wise, holy and in every way
 vastly Abel's superior. In fact, he must in himself represent all
 desirable things, as his name indicates. And the same characteristic
 is manifest in his children, who are ingenious in the invention of
 every variety of art. Deplorable the fact that a man of Cain's
 qualifications, born of godly parents and signally honored of God,
 should display such hatred and inhumanity toward poor Abel merely
 because of God's Word and Abel's faith.
 
 22. Such knowledge is comforting to the godly little company of
 Christians, who are confident they have God's favor and know it to be
 the occasion of their persecution; they have no protection and succor
 but are exposed to the same fate as Abel. If they fare better, they
 may thank God for it. But they are ever to abide in love toward God,
 whose love they have received and felt, and likewise toward men,
 their enemies not excepted. This was Abel's way; could he have lived
 again, he would have kept his brotherly love for his murderer,
 forgiving him and even imploring God's forgiveness for him.
 
 "We know that we have passed out of death into life, because we love
 the brethren."
 
 
 LOVE MOVES CHRISTIANS.
 
 23. To abide in love should be the motive for us Christians. John
 contrasts it with the motive of the world in hating us--its
 wickedness. The world's hatred of you, as John's words imply, is not
 strange. The contrast between you and the world is exceedingly great.
 Through its own evil works, unbelief, pride, contempt for the Word
 and grace of God, and the persecution of the godly, the world has
 become by this time the victim of Satan and eternal death. It spurns
 all counsel and aid directed toward its rescue. Stiff-necked and
 hardened, under evident condemnation by its own conscience, it has
 chosen to persist in its doom. But we believers in Christ, God be
 praised! are different people. We have come forth from death; we have
 passed through death and entered into life through the knowledge and
 faith of the Son of God, who has loved us and given himself for us.
 
 24. Such grace and goodness of God, says the apostle, should prompt
 you not to be offended and vanquished by the world's ingratitude,
 hate and malice, and thus to cease from holy endeavor and become
 likewise, evil, which course will result in the loss of your
 treasure. It is yours, not by your own effort, but by grace alone;
 for at one time you as well as they languished in the kingdom and
 power of death, in evil works, far from faith and love.
 
 Remember to comfort yourselves, therefore, with the thought of this
 great blessing, an advantage you enjoy above the others. What if the
 world, abiding in death, does hate and persecute you who abide in
 life? Whom can its hatred injure? It cannot take from you the life
 which it lacks while you possess it, nor deliver you to death, from
 which you have passed, through Christ. When it does its worst it may
 perhaps falsely slander you, or deprive you of your property, or
 destroy your corrupt body--the final home of maggots and in any event
 doomed to corruption--and thus through the death of the body help you
 gain true life. Thus vengeance will be yours rather than its own.
 Yours will be the joy of being transplanted from death into life,
 whereas the world must abide in death. While they of the world think
 to deny you both the kingdom of heaven and the kingdom of earth, they
 themselves lose body and soul. What more terrible retribution could
 their hatred and envy receive? For the sake of denying gratification
 to the devil and the world, and much more for your own welfare, you
 must not allow your persecutions to rob you of your peace and
 salvation, nor to lead you to lose your faith through impatience and
 desire for revenge. Rather, pity their wretchedness and doom. You
 lose nothing by their oppression; yours is the gain, theirs the loss.
 For the slight grief inflicted upon you with reference to body and
 time, it shall dearly pay both here and hereafter.
 
 25. How do we know we have passed from death unto life? John says,
 because we love the brethren. Just what does he mean? Is it not our
 doctrine that Christ first loved us, as John elsewhere says? that
 before we ever loved him he died and rose again for us? When we fully
 believe in our Savior's love, then our own hearts respond with
 perfect love to God and our neighbor. Why, then, does John say, "We
 have passed out of death into life, because we love the brethren"?
 
 26. The explanation is found in the words "We know." John says
 plainly, "From the fact that we love the brethren, we know we have
 passed out of death into life." Love of the brethren is the test
 whereby we may ascertain who are the true believers. The apostle
 directed this epistle especially against false Christians; many there
 are who extol Christ, as did unbelieving Cain, and yet fail to bear
 the fruit of faith. John's reference is not to the means whereby we
 pass from sin and death to life, but to the proof whereby we may know
 the fact--not to the cause, but to the effect.
 
 27. It is not sufficient to boast of having passed from death into
 life; there must be evidence of the fact. Faith is not an inactive
 and lifeless thing. When there is faith in the heart, its power will
 be manifest. Where power is not in evidence, all boasting is false
 and vain. When the human heart, in its confidence in divine mercy and
 love, is thrilled with spiritual comfort, and also warmed into
 kindness, friendliness, humility and patience towards the neighbor,
 envying and despising none but cheerfully serving all and ministering
 unto necessity even to hazarding body and life--when this is the
 case, then the fruits of faith are manifest.
 
 Such fruits are proof that the believer has truly passed from death
 into life. Had he not true faith, but doubted God's grace and love,
 his heart would not prompt him, by reason of his love and gratitude
 to God, to manifest love for his neighbor. Where man has faith, and
 where he realizes God's infinite mercy and goodness in raising him
 from death to life, love is enkindled in his heart, and he is
 prompted to do all manner of good, even to his enemies, as God has
 done to him.
 
 28. Such is the right interpretation and understanding of John's
 expression: "We know that we have passed out of death into life,
 because we love the brethren." It leaves in its integrity the
 foundation, justification, or deliverance from death, through faith
 alone. This is the first element of Christian doctrine. Granting that
 faith does justify, the next question is whether the faith is real or
 simulated, being merely a deceptive show and unsupported claim. The
 clear information imparted by the apostles is, that love, indeed,
 does not deliver from death, but that deliverance from death and the
 presence of life becomes a matter of sight and knowledge in that love
 has been wrought. With true faith we must have come to the point
 where we no longer, like Cain, in our pride and conceit, despise our
 neighbor; where we are not filled with envy, hatred and bitterness;
 where we desire, and to the extent of our power, promote the
 interests of our neighbor and work him all good.
 
 29. John draws to a close by showing the opposite side of the
 picture, in that he addresses earnest words that re-echo like peals
 of thunder to those who make the carnal boast of being Christians
 while destitute of love. He cites several facts as evidence that
 where love is lacking, necessarily faith and deliverance from death
 are absent, likewise. Thus no opportunity is given for self-deception
 or a frivolous excuse based upon wordy boasting of one's faith. The
 reality of the inner life is known by the presence of love, which in
 turn attests the presence of faith in the heart.
 
 I. "He that loveth not abideth in death."
 
 30. Here, in clear, decisive words, the conclusion is expressed that
 no man may boast of life unless he has love. If it is true that faith
 must be active, it is conversely true that the absence of fruitage
 demonstrates one's continuance in the old Cain-like manner of
 existence, torpid and dead, bereft of solace and the experience of
 God's grace and life. Let no one presume to think he has passed into
 life so long as he is devoid of love and the fruits of faith. Let him
 become serious, and in alarm make ready to become a true believer,
 lest he remain in eternal death and under greater condemnation than
 those who have never heard the Gospel.
 
 II. "Whosoever hateth his brother is a murderer: and ye know that no
 murderer hath eternal life abiding in him."
 
 31. Still clearer and stronger becomes the argument that lack of love
 means continuance in death. The stern and frightful judgment is here
 expressed that the unloving person is no better than Cain the
 fratricide. His heart is under the influence of deadly hate and
 murderous malice against the brother who refuses to be subservient to
 his desires. Kindling rage will prove its existence by appropriate
 works unless restrained by the fear of disgrace and punishment. He
 wishes his brother nothing good, but rejoices in his misfortune.
 
 All this, however, is impossible for one who believes that he has
 been delivered from death. One who knows the wretchedness and misery
 of death from experience, but has entered upon life with its solace
 and joy, blessings he seeks to maintain--such a person will desire
 for others the same blessing; he cannot rejoice in another's death.
 Therefore it is true conversely: "We know that no murderer hath
 eternal life abiding in him."
 
 
 HATRED NATURAL TO HUMAN REASON.
 
 32. Thus we see the nature of the human heart without faith and the
 knowledge of Christ; at bottom it is but the heart of a Cain,
 murderous toward its neighbor. Nor can anything better be expected
 from him who is not a Christian. The Scriptures repeatedly denounce
 such faithless hypocrites as bloodthirsty and deceitful. "Jehovah
 abhorreth the bloodthirsty and deceitful man." Ps 5, 6. "For their
 feet run to evil, and they make haste to shed blood." Prov 1, 16. See
 also verse 11. All mankind are by nature the children of the murderer
 Cain. They are, of course, no better than their father. While Cain
 was a man most magnificent, intelligent and wise, being the first
 fruit born of those holy parents Adam and Eve, and in his superior
 endowment with natural virtues infinitely superior to all who come
 after him, he was nevertheless an unbeliever before God. Hence he
 became the murderer of his brother.
 
 III. "Hereby know we love, because he laid down his life for us: and
 we ought to lay down our lives for the brethren. But whoso hath the
 world's goods, and beholdeth his brother in need, and shutteth up his
 compassion from him, how doth the love of God abide in him?"
 
 33. These words delineate true Christian love and hold up the sublime
 example, or pattern, of God's love manifest in Christ. Christ's blood
 and death is God's own blood and death. Paul in Acts 20, 28, speaks
 of God having purchased the Church "with his own blood." The heart of
 man by faith receives and apprehends this sacrifice. Under its
 transforming influence he is disposed to work good to his neighbor as
 he has himself received good. He even jeopardizes his life to that
 end, being conscious of his redemption from eternal death, and
 knowing physical death powerless to affect his eternal life. But the
 heart that fails to appropriate Christ's sacrifice is without faith
 and insensible to God's love and eternal life.
 
 34. John uses an illustration plain enough for anyone to understand,
 and from which we may judge that the soul found wanting in small
 duties will be deficient in great ones. According to the apostle, if
 one possesses this world's goods and sees his neighbor want, he being
 able to render assistance without injury to himself, and yet closes
 his heart against that neighbor, not assisting him with even the
 slightest work of love, how can the love of God dwell in him since he
 appreciates it so little that he will not spare his needy brother a
 penny? How can he be expected, then, to render a greater service--to
 even lay down his life for his brother? What right has such a soul to
 boast--how can he know--that Christ has laid down his life for him
 and delivered him from death?
 
 35. How frequently are such people to be found! Having this world's
 goods and being able to help the needy, they close their hearts
 against the unfortunate, as did the rich glutton toward poor Lazarus.
 Where shall we find in imperial courts, among kings, princes and
 lords, any who extend a helping hand to the needy Church, or give her
 so much as a crust of bread toward the maintenance of the poor, of
 the ministry and of schools, or for other of her necessities? How
 would they measure up in the greater duty of laying down their lives
 for the brethren, and especially for the Christian Church? Note the
 terrible judgment that they who are devoid of brotherly love are in
 God's sight murderers and cannot have eternal life.
 
 36. But the merely selfish may well escape our censure in comparison
 with those who not only close their purses to the poor but
 shamelessly and forcibly deprive and rob their needy neighbor of his
 own by overreaching, by fraud, oppression and extortion; who take
 from the Church the property rightfully hers and especially reserved
 for her, snatching the bread from her mouth, so to speak. Not only is
 the papistical rabble today guilty of such sin, but many who would be
 known as evangelical practice the same fraud with reference to the
 parochial estates and general property of the Church, and, in
 addition, tyrannically harass and torment the poor ministers. But oh,
 how heavy and terrible the impending judgment for those who have
 denied to Christ the Lord in his thirst even the cup of cold water!
 
 IV. "My little children, let us not love in word, neither with the
 tongue; but in deed and truth."
 
 37. The world and the false Christians in word pretend great love;
 but in practice, when love should manifest itself in deeds, it is
 found to be insincere. So John admonishes that where our love is not
 ardent enough to lead us to lay down our lives for our brethren,
 however much we may profess Christ, that love is assuredly only a
 vain show, a false pretense, wherewith we deceive ourselves and
 remain in infidelity and death, and in a more deplorable condition
 than those who are wholly ignorant of the Gospel. Therefore, let him
 who would proceed safely and prove himself a Christian remember to
 prove himself such by his deeds and works. Then men will know that he
 does not, a murderer and liar, like others, follow the devil. They
 will know, on the contrary, that he truly and with the heart clings
 to the Word of God, having passed from death to life.
 
 
 
 
 _Third Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Peter 5, 5-11.
 
 5 Likewise, ye younger, be subject unto the elder. Yea, all of you
 gird yourselves with humility, to serve one another: for God
 resisteth the proud, but giveth grace to the humble. 6 Humble
 yourselves therefore under the mighty hand of God, that he may exalt
 you in due time; 7 casting all your anxiety upon him, because he
 careth for you. 8 Be sober, be watchful: your adversary the devil, as
 a roaring lion, walketh about, seeking whom he may devour: 9 whom
 withstand stedfast in your faith, knowing that the same sufferings
 are accomplished in your brethren who are in the world. 10 And the
 God of all grace, who called you unto his eternal glory in Christ,
 after that ye have suffered a little while, shall himself perfect,
 establish, strengthen you. 11 To him be the dominion for ever and
 ever. Amen.
 
 
 HUMILITY, TRUST, WATCHFULNESS, SUFFERING
 
 1. This is the conclusion of Saint Peter's epistle. It is an
 exhortation to good works, such as a Christian, or believer, should
 practice. It is evident that the doctrine of the Gospel is not such
 as is charged by some, forbidding good works, or not earnestly
 commanding and urging them. Most diligently and repeatedly it urges
 the doctrine of works--such works as are, indeed, good works. There
 are in this epistle four natural heads which furnish us four good
 sermons.
 
 
 I. HUMILITY.
 
 2. The apostle has, in the verses immediately preceding our text,
 exhorted the elders, that is, preachers, to be in their lives
 "ensamples to the flock," not "lording it over the charge allotted"
 to them, but using their office for the service of others. And here
 in our text he exhorts the others, especially the young, to "be
 subject unto the elder." And, in general, he admonishes all to "gird"
 themselves "with humility, to serve one another." So Paul likewise
 admonishes that we should honor one another. Humility is the noblest
 and sweetest virtue love brings forth, and it is the most essential
 to peace and discipline. But especially does it become and adorn the
 young, making them pleasing and precious to God and men, bringing
 forth an abundance of good fruits.
 
 3. If mankind could be led so to believe this that the virtue of
 humility would be generally practiced, it would be well everywhere.
 This would be a beautiful world, filled with discipline and good
 works. I would much prefer to see a city in which the young are
 reared in this virtue than a hundred monasteries of barefooted and
 Carthusian friars, though they lived ever so strictly. Alas! the
 greatest and most frequent complaint heard anywhere is concerning the
 disobedience, wantonness and pride of the younger generation found
 among all ranks. Therefore it is necessary to use all diligence that
 this exhortation be instilled into the hearts of the young and urged
 upon them, in the hope that it may benefit them.
 
 4. First of all, Peter presents the divine command. We are not left
 to our own good pleasure in the matter--to show humility or not, as
 we please. God earnestly asks it of us, and asks that we do it
 lovingly and willingly. Otherwise his anger will be poured out upon
 us and we will have no happiness nor favor, not even among men. For
 everyone is a foe to pride and arrogance. These offenses are
 condemned by the whole world, even by strangers whom they do not
 concern.
 
 One may be guilty of pride and not see his own shame, yet he cannot
 suffer it in another; he will hate and condemn that one. This vice
 hurts no one save himself. He makes himself hateful and contemptible
 before God and men. Everyone calls him a great, proud bag of filth
 and cries shame upon him. God metes out judgment and scorn to him,
 witnessing that he will not let this vice go unpunished, but will put
 the offender to shame. As Peter here says: "God resisteth the proud."
 
 5. Men should be moved by the examples which daily come to light in
 fulfilment of this passage. If we should have no regard for our own
 honor and standing before the world, neither for the contempt and the
 curses of all men; if the illustrious example of the noble character
 and eternal majesty of God's Son, our Lord, should not stir us (which
 ought to move us if we have one spark of Christianity in us), as we
 behold his unspeakable and incomprehensible humility which, rightly
 viewed, should melt the Christian's heart--if all this does not move
 us, we should be humbled by the many awful examples of God's fearful
 wrath which, from the beginning, he has hurled against pride.
 
 6. What is more terrible than the eternal, irreparable fall and
 banishment of once lofty angelic nature that resulted when the devil
 robbed himself of the honor and glory enjoyed by the noble blessed
 spirits, and of the contemplation of eternal God, and brought upon
 himself everlasting and intolerable damnation by seeking to make
 himself equal with God, and through similar pride, led the human race
 to its awful fall? But what a blind, condemned creature are you, who,
 with your filthy, shameful pride and haughtiness, become like the
 spirit of evil, thereby turning all the world into your enemy and
 opposing yourself to the divine majesty, before which even the angels
 must tremble! If you have no fear of losing the favor and prayers of
 mankind, at least be afraid lest God send down upon your head his
 lightning and thunder, with which he crushes iron, rocks, and
 mountains, and hurl you forever into the abyss, as he hurled down the
 proud spirit and his angels.
 
 7. Saint Peter exhorts both those who are in the office of the
 ministry, and other Christians, to whom God has given something, that
 they abide in their calling and office and conduct the same humbly,
 gladly obeying and serving others. Right here this vice of pride is
 the most hurtful to Christianity. For its whole government, life and
 essence are so ordered by God that no one should exalt himself and
 lord it over others, as the Pope, the true Antichrist has done. Only
 humility and deeds of Christian love and service should prevail in
 all classes and in all offices and works.
 
 
 PRIDE OPPOSED TO THE FIRST TABLE.
 
 8. Pride in this order of the Church is really and directly opposed
 to the first table of the law. It is a genuinely devilish pride in
 God's name and Word on the part of such people as would be wise in
 matters of faith and would lord it over God's Word. They puff
 themselves up if, forsooth, they have a gift more than others, and
 they hold God and all men as nothing. This vice is common among the
 great, learned and wise bishops and preachers. It prevails among
 those who learn of them and cling to them, especially beginners who,
 inexperienced and undisciplined, are brought into prominence. Such
 puff themselves up and boast: "I also am a learned doctor. I love the
 Spirit and other gifts just as well as, and even in greater measure
 than, these preachers." So they think they deserve to be heard and
 honored above others. They consider themselves so wise that all the
 world, in comparison, are geese and fools.
 
 And the greater one's gifts, the greater and more harmful such pride.
 It is common in other professions, also. He who has a little ability,
 or bears the title of doctor, makes much ado about it, and despises
 others. He acts as if what he has were not given him by God, but as
 if it were his by nature and birth, and therefore he deserves the
 praise and worship of all men. Such persons do not realize they are
 acting in opposition to God, and that they will themselves plunge
 into the abyss of hell before they can hurl God down from his
 heavenly throne.
 
 9. See, from the examples of our own time, how God has overthrown
 such people. Thomas Munzer, with his tumultuous prophets, and later
 the Anabaptist faction, were proud of heart, would not listen to
 admonition, and lo! suddenly they went down to ruin, not only in
 utter disgrace, but to their own miserable and eternal loss and that
 of many people who had been misled by them. So, too, there are at the
 present day many proud spirits. Some dare not yet publicly show
 themselves. Such as have perceived that they are learned, or are held
 in regard by men, thereupon grow boastful and, despite all their
 skill and learning, abide without the Spirit and without fruit, even
 if they do not work more harm in addition to bringing themselves into
 condemnation.
 
 10. Thus it is in all kinds of gifts and offices where men are not
 God-fearing and humble. For example, those who are intrusted with the
 civil government--princes, counselors, lawyers (where they are not
 "theologians," that is, Christians)--are so insolent and proud that
 they imagine themselves alone to be the people, whom others are to
 reverence as gods. In their pride, they despise God and men, and by
 their arrogance they lead the land and the people to destruction.
 These have already the judgment upon themselves that they, as God's
 enemies, must be hurled down. For they have cut themselves loose from
 God's kingdom and grace; and the blessings of baptism and of Christ,
 with his suffering and blood, are lost upon them.
 
 11. We have now shown how pride conflicts with the demands of the
 first table of the law. Men do not employ the spiritual treasures and
 gifts to God's honor nor to the good of their neighbors. Thus they
 mar these gifts and, in their wicked course, go to the devil, into
 whose likeness they have grown.
 
 
 PRIDE OPPOSED TO THE SECOND TABLE.
 
 12. Further, this vice is just as general in the sphere of the second
 table of the law--among the common people and in the temporal life of
 the world, each one boasting of himself and despising others. Prince
 and nobleman think that all the world is nothing in comparison with
 themselves. Commoner and peasant, puffed up because they have much
 wealth, imagine they must defy everybody, and do good to nobody.
 These deserve to be spit upon by all men. Such pride does not become
 them better than ornaments of gold or silver would become an image of
 stone or a wooden block. Finally, the women, with their foolish pride
 of dress, must not be forgotten. One prides herself on being better
 or more beautifully adorned than her neighbor. She is, in truth, a
 finely decorated goose. She imagines that no other woman equals her.
 Yea, there is scarcely a house-servant or maid but brags over others.
 
 13. In short, we have come to the point where all men, with their
 insolence and boastfulness, seek to lord it over others. None will
 humble himself to another. Each thinks he has full right to act as he
 does, and is under no obligation to yield to others. And the civil
 government has grown so weak that there is no hope of restraining the
 haughtiness of all classes, from the highest to the lowest. At last,
 God must strike with thunder and lightning to prove to us that he
 resists such people and will not tolerate pride. Therefore the young,
 who can still be led, should be exhorted and trained, as far as
 possible, to guard themselves against this vice.
 
 14. Peter uses for his purpose a peculiar term when he says, "Gird
 yourselves with humility." "Gird" has the meaning of being bound or
 joined together most firmly; or, as a garment, most carefully woven
 through and through so that it cannot tear. He illustrates by this
 term how Christians, with all diligence, should strive after the
 virtue, and manifest and practice it among themselves, as if upon
 them as a band it was a special obligation. Thus, he says, must you
 be twined together and bound to each other, and your hands clasped
 together. So must you be joined by humility, which cannot be
 dissolved, dismembered, or torn, even though occasion be given one,
 here and there, incited by the devil, or the evil word of someone
 else, to fly into a passion, and grow defiant and boastful, as if to
 say: Must I suffer such things at the hands of this man? But rather
 say to yourselves. We are Christians, and must bear with each other
 and yield, in many things; for we are all one body, and we are placed
 together here on earth for the sole reason that we may, through love,
 serve one another.
 
 15. And each should recognize his own weakness. He should remember
 that God has given others also something and can give them yet more,
 and that therefore he should gladly serve and yield to others,
 remembering that he needs their help. Each one is created for the
 sake of others, and we are all to serve one another. God gives the
 same grace and salvation to all, so that none may exalt himself above
 his neighbor; or, if he lift himself up, that he lose the grace
 conferred and fall into deeper condemnation. Therefore we must hold
 fast to this humility, so that the unity may not be destroyed. For
 Satan seeks to destroy this also, and uses every possible means to
 lead people to despise each other and to be proud and insolent in
 their treatment of each other. And these are things to which flesh
 and blood, even without special incitement, are inclined. Thus
 humility is easily and quickly lost if men are not alert to fight
 against the devil and their own flesh.
 
 
 THE BEAUTY OF HUMILITY.
 
 16. Humility is one of the beautiful garments and ornaments with
 which Christians should adorn themselves before God and the world.
 Paul, in Colossians 3, 12, says, "Put on humility." He regards this
 virtue as more precious than all earthly crowns and splendor. This is
 the true spiritual life. It is not to be sought elsewhere, by running
 into the cloisters or the deserts, by putting on gray gown or cowl.
 Peter here admonishes all classes to cultivate this virtue. This
 sermon on good works concerns every station in every house, city or
 village. It is for all churches and schools. Children, servants and
 the youth should be humbly obedient to parents, superiors and the
 aged. On the other hand, it is for those in the higher stations of
 life who serve their inferiors, even the lowest. If all men so
 observed this virtue the world would be full of good works. For it is
 impossible that humility should do evil. It is profitable and
 pleasant to all men.
 
 17. By this virtue, true saints and Christians can better be known
 than by monastic seclusion and holiness. It requires no great effort
 to wear a gray cowl. It is not even such a great trial to lie on the
 ground at night and to arise at midnight; scoundrels, thieves, and
 murderers must often do the same. But to wear and hold fast to this
 angelic garment, humility--this the world is not so willing to accept
 as monasticism and its works. And thus it comes to pass that flesh
 and blood do not strive after this holy life. Each man seeks an easy
 life, in which he can live to himself and need serve no one nor
 suffer anything at the hands of others; just as the monks have sought
 and chosen.
 
 18. Peter adds to this admonition the reason: "For God resisteth the
 proud, but giveth grace to the humble." As I have said above, he
 strives to show the earnestness of God's command. The command is
 accompanied by a threat. He does not simply say, God punishes the
 proud, or God is hostile to them; but he "resisteth" them, he sets
 himself against them. Now, what is the pride of all men toward God?
 Not so much as a poor, empty bubble. Their pride puffs itself up and
 distends itself as though it would storm the sky and contend against
 the lightning and thunder, that can shatter heaven and earth. What
 can the combined might of all creatures accomplish if God oppose
 himself thereto? And how does a miserable man, whose heart is
 overwhelmed by a small pestilence, rise against the majesty of heaven
 which can, any moment, cast him down into the abyss? What are earth
 and ashes proud of? says Sirach, 10, 9.
 
 19. Is it not enough and more than enough that other sin and
 disobedience are laid to our account, by which we anger God and merit
 heavy punishment, without our trying further to provoke him with our
 pride and haughtiness, so that he must arise in his majesty and
 resist us? With other sins he can have patience, that he may exhort
 and incite us to repentance. But if, in hardened impenitence, we defy
 and oppose him, he cannot but rise up against us. Who is there that
 will bear it, or be able to stand, when God sets his countenance and
 his power against a poor man already subject, every moment, to death
 and the power of the devil?
 
 
 THE CONSEQUENCE OF PRIDE.
 
 20. From the beginning, innumerable instances in history have proved
 the truth of this saying, "God resisteth the proud." They show how he
 has always overthrown and destroyed the proud world and has cast down
 the haughty, scornful kings and lords. The great king of Babylon,
 Nebuchadnezzar, was humbled when banished from his royal throne to
 the companionship of the beasts of the field and compelled to eat
 grass with them, Dan 4, 30ff. Again, remember how suddenly the great
 king Alexander was hurled down, when after the victory and good
 fortune God had given him, he began to grow proud, and wanted to be
 reverenced as a god? Again, there was King Herod Agrippa, Acts 12,
 23. The proud, learned emperor Julian, a virulent mocker and
 persecutor of Christ, whom he had denied--how soon was he drowned in
 his own blood! And since then, what has become of all the proud,
 haughty tyrants, who proposed to oppress and crush Christianity?
 
 21. The Pope, also, has ever, in devilish pride, exalted himself, and
 in the temple of God set himself forth as God. Further, in worldly
 pomp and pride he has lifted himself above all others. He has even
 learned, from heathen emperors, as Diocletian and other tyrants, to
 have men kiss his feet. Yea, he has forced emperors and kings to
 submit to this humiliating act. What open, inhuman insolence and
 pride Pope Alexander the Third practiced when, by threatening against
 him his empty ban, he compelled the pious and mighty German emperor,
 Frederick Barbarossa, to prostrate himself at his feet while he
 stepped upon him and said, Thou shalt tread upon the lion and adder;
 and when the emperor protested against such shameful pride and said,
 Non tibi, sed Petro (Not to thee, but to Peter), the Pope, with
 increasing scorn, replied, "Et mihi, et Petro" (Both to me, and to
 Peter). This is pride carried almost to its highest point.
 
 22. The Turk, too, is prouder now than ever, and, I hope, has reached
 the heights of pride, beyond which he cannot and shall not proceed.
 Meantime, may he not attack and humble us! But it will come to pass,
 in the end, that God will overthrow both pope and Turk through his
 divine power, and, as Daniel says, without the aid of men. This word
 will not fail, "God resisteth the proud." Its truth must appear in
 human events, so that men may see what is meant by the declaration,
 "God resisteth"; otherwise no one would believe it. Though the Turk
 and all the world should be a thousand times more proud and powerful,
 this should not help them when he who is above sees and grows angry,
 and lifts his hand. He asks as little about the power of all Turkish
 emperors and of the Pope as about a dead fly.
 
 23. "It is a fearful thing to fall into the hands of the living God,"
 Heb 10, 31. This, however, is nothing else than with scorn and
 defiance to oppose his will, so that he, in turn, must set himself
 against man and must lift his hand. Therefore, let everyone beware
 lest he boast and grow defiant in the presence of the divine majesty.
 Not only must he beware, that he may not awaken God's anger, but that
 he may have grace and blessing in the things he ought to do. For, if
 thou beginnest something in thine own power, and wisdom, and
 haughtiness, think not he will grant thee success and blessing to
 carry out thy purpose. On the other hand, if thou humblest thyself,
 and beginnest aught in accordance with his will, in the fear of God
 and trusting in his grace, there is given thee the promise, "He
 giveth grace to the humble." So, then, thou shalt not only have favor
 with men, but success shall crown thine efforts. Thou shalt prove a
 useful man, both to God and to the world, and shalt complete and
 maintain thy work despite the resistance of the devil. For where
 God's grace is, there his blessing and protection must follow, and
 his servant cannot be overthrown or defeated. Though he be oppressed
 for a time, he shall finally come forth again and be exalted. So
 Peter concludes by saying:
 
 "Humble yourselves, therefore, under the mighty hand of God, that he
 may exalt you in due time."
 
 24. Peter shows in these words what true humility is and whence it
 comes. The heart, through knowledge of its sin, becomes terrified in
 the presence of God's anger and anxiously seeks grace. Thus a
 humility is born, not merely external and before men, but of the
 heart and of God, from fear of God and knowledge of one's own
 unworthiness and weakness. He who fears God and "trembles at his
 word" (Is 66, 5), will surely defy or hector or boast against nobody.
 Yea, he will even manifest a gentle spirit toward his enemies.
 Therefore, he finds favor both with God and men.
 
 25. The cause of this, Peter says, shall be "the mighty hand of God."
 As though he would say: Ye may not do nor leave undone this thing for
 the sake of men, but ye ought to humble yourselves under the hand of
 God. God's hand is powerful and mighty in a twofold respect: It
 dashes down and overthrows the proud and self-secure, however hard
 and iron their heads and hearts may be. They must languish in dust
 and ashes; yea, must lie despondent and desperate in the anguish and
 torments of hell, if he touch them but a little with the terrors of
 his anger. These are experiences through which the saints also pass,
 and concerning whose severity they make lamentation. "For thine
 arrows stick fast in me, and thy hand presseth me sore. There is no
 soundness in my flesh because of thine indignation," Ps 38, 2-3. "For
 I have eaten ashes like bread, and mingled my drink with weeping.
 Because of thine indignation and thy wrath: for thou hast taken me
 up, and cast me away," Ps 102, 9-10. "I am consumed by the blow of
 thy hand. When thou with rebukes dost correct man for iniquity, thou
 makest his beauty to consume away like a moth," Ps 39, 10-11.
 
 
 THE REWARD OF HUMILITY.
 
 26. In the second place, God's hand is mighty to raise, to comfort
 and strengthen the humbled and the fearful, and, as Peter says here,
 to exalt them. Those who in terror have been cast down should not,
 therefore, despair, or flee before God, but rise again, and be
 comforted in God. God wants it preached and published that he never
 lays his hand upon us in order that we may perish and be damned. But
 he must pursue this course in order to lead us to repentance;
 otherwise we would never inquire about his Word and will. And if we
 seek grace, he is ready to help us up again, to grant us forgiveness
 of sins, the Holy Spirit, and eternal life. The Psalms and the
 Prophets here and there speak of this. "Jehovah hath chastened me
 sore; but he hath not given me over unto death," Ps 118, 18. "Jehovah
 raiseth up them that are bowed down," Ps 146, 8.
 
 27. God will "exalt you in due time," says Peter. Though God's help
 be delayed, and the humbled and suffering seem to lie oppressed all
 too long under God's hand, and on that account to languish,
 nevertheless, let them hold to the promise Paul has given: God "will
 not suffer you to be tempted above that ye are able," 1 Cor 10, 13,
 but he will hear your cry, and will, at the right time, help; and
 with this let them be comforted. But again, let the proud fear, even
 though he permit them to go unpunished and to continue in their
 boastful course for a time. He watches their lives, and, when the
 proper time comes, he will descend all too heavily upon them, so that
 they cannot bear it. He has already stretched forth his mighty hand,
 both to cast down the godless and to exalt the humble.
 
 II. "Casting all your anxiety upon him, because he careth for you."
 
 28. What will become of him who lives a God-fearing and humble life,
 suffering the insolence, pride and wantonness of the world? Or, where
 will he find protection and defense, to abide in his godly ways? We
 see daily how the pious are harassed and persecuted, and are trod on
 by the world. The Apostle says: "Ye Christians must endure temptation
 and adversity, want and need, both physical and spiritual, in the
 world, and your heart is oppressed with anxiety and cares, and ye
 think within yourselves: O, what will become of me? How shall I be
 supported? What if I should die?" (The world only concerns itself
 about how it may be enriched and be filled, and anxious, unbelieving
 consciences would, through themselves and their own good works, seek
 to have a gracious God and to die in peace.) "In view of all this,"
 he says, "only hearken, I will counsel and instruct you aright as to
 what disposition you should make of your troubles."
 
 There is a brief passage in the 55th Psalm, verse 22, which reads:
 "Cast thy burden upon Jehovah, and he will sustain thee: he will
 never suffer the righteous to be moved." Follow ye this advice. Let
 not your burden rest upon yourselves; for ye cannot bear it, and must
 finally perish beneath its weight. But, confident and full of joy,
 cast it from you and throw it on God, and say: Heavenly Father, thou
 art my Lord and God, who didst create me when I was nothing; moreover
 hast redeemed me through thy Son. Now, thou hast committed to me and
 laid upon me, this office or work, and things do not go as well as I
 would like. There is so much to oppress and worry, that I can find
 neither counsel nor help. Therefore I commend everything to thee. Do
 thou supply counsel and help, and be thou, thyself, everything in
 these things.
 
 29. Such a prayer is pleasing to God, and he tells us to do only what
 we are commanded, and throw upon him all anxiety as to the issue and
 what we shall accomplish. As also other passages of Scripture
 declare: "Commit thy way unto Jehovah, trust also in him, and he will
 bring it to pass," Ps 37, 5. No heathen, philosopher, jurist, if he
 have not God's Word, can throw his care and complaint upon God. He
 thinks that all the world, especially the great, the wise, who rule,
 must accomplish everything by their own planning and circumspection.
 And where trouble arises--for it is quite common for even the
 greatest and wisest people to make mistakes--he becomes a madman or a
 fool, and begins to murmur and argue against God and his government,
 as though God's rule merited criticism. But such men receive their
 deserts when God permits their calculations and hopes to fail, and
 lets the reverse obtain. For they will not admit they have need of
 him. They think they have sufficient wisdom and power, and that God
 must respect their plans. Thus, they spend their lives in many vain,
 useless cares and projects, and must, in the course of their
 experience, learn and confess, many a time, that the very opposite of
 their judgment is the truth.
 
 30. Christians have the rare faculty, above all other people on
 earth, of knowing where to place their care, whilst others vex and
 torture themselves and at length must despair. Such must be the
 consequence of unbelief, which has no God and would provide for
 itself. But faith understands this word Peter quotes from the
 Scriptures: "Because he careth for you." It joyfully meditates
 thereon and does and suffers faithfully. For faith knows this to be
 its duty. Its trouble, however, it commits to God, and proceeds with
 vigor against all that opposes. It can call upon God as a father, and
 it says: I will do what God has commanded me and leave the result
 with him.
 
 31. The Christian must take this course if he would proceed safely
 and happily in matters of the highest import. In time of danger and
 in the hour of death, when, with all his worrying, he cannot discover
 where he is or how he is journeying, he must, with eyes, senses and
 thoughts closed to the world, surrender himself in faith and
 confidence and cast himself upon God's hand and care and protection,
 and say: God has permitted me to live until this hour, without my
 solicitude. Moreover, he has given me his beloved Son as a treasure
 and sure pledge of eternal life. Therefore, my dear soul, journey on
 in joy. Thou hast a faithful Father and Savior, who has taken thee
 into his own hand, and will preserve thee.
 
 32. The Christian Church collectively must so proceed in the
 discharge of its high spiritual office, of which Peter speaks here,
 that no man or creature, by his own wisdom and power, can sustain or
 accomplish any work. No power, might, or protection that can comfort,
 or upon which one may rely, is to be sought in the world. Wholly in
 God, and in God alone, must help be sought. By his divine power God
 must uphold the Church. He has, from the beginning, always and
 wonderfully preserved it in the world, in the midst of great
 weakness, in disunion occasioned by schismatics and heretics, in
 persecution by tyrants. And the government is wholly his, though he
 commits the office and service to men, whom he would summon and use
 to administer his Word and sacrament. Therefore, each Christian,
 especially if he fills such an office and partakes of this
 fellowship, should be intent, in that whereunto God has called and
 appointed him, upon serving God faithfully and doing that which is
 commanded him. The anxiety respecting the Church's continued
 existence and her preservation against the devil and the world, can
 be left to the Lord. He has taken this upon himself and thus has
 removed the burden from our shoulders, that we might be certain of
 the permanence of the Church. If its preservation were committed to
 human counsel, might and will, the devil, with his power, would soon
 overthrow and destroy it.
 
 33. Likewise, in every office and station, each one should follow
 this counsel of Saint Peter. A prince should seek to protect his land
 and people, to promote God's Word, to maintain discipline and peace,
 to do justice to every man, to punish the disobedient, etc. Councils,
 officials, and those in authority should faithfully advise and direct
 to this end. Pastors and preachers should rightly and fearlessly
 declare God's Word and truth. Every citizen and subject should be
 intent upon his work and duty, and whatever, in connection therewith,
 is unusual he must simply commit to God.
 
 But the world does not pursue this course. Each one says: Why should
 I incur so much danger, opposition and hostility? Again, why should I
 labor and toil for naught? I will not accomplish my work at any rate.
 In this spirit of fear and worry, his proper office and work are
 delayed, or he is always careless.
 
 But let such people know that they are not Christians, nor do they
 promote God's kingdom or profit the offices conferred on them. If
 they do not propose to mend their ways, they should give up the
 office bestowed on them by God. It is not enough to simply sit at
 ease in one's office and accept the plaudits of men. We all like to
 render esteem and honor to office and station. But know this, that
 you are not in office to parade about in beautiful garments, to sit
 in the front row, and be called "Gracious Master" and "Esquire." You
 are to conduct faithfully the office with which God has clothed and
 honored you, regardless of human honor and profit, shame or injury.
 
 34. But men are not generally inclined to believe and trust God. They
 are not inclined to remember that he cares for us; that he has
 assumed and must bear the greatest of burdens, which no man on earth
 can bear; that he cared for us before we were born, and could still,
 of himself, execute all things dispensing with all human help, but he
 prefers to accomplish his purpose through human means, and to employ
 us as instruments in these divine works--governing, punishing,
 teaching, comforting.
 
 35. The world is particularly culpable in this matter of pride. When
 divinely charged with some great work, it always seeks to determine,
 in advance, by its own wisdom, all future danger and accidents, and
 tries to anticipate them. The world looks for man's help, and seeks
 friendship and assistance wherever it can. It makes alliances, and
 resorts to other schemes. It puts its trust in these and then
 considers itself strong enough to meet opposition, and is sure of its
 cause by reason of its own efforts. This is not showing faith in God.
 It is not committing our cause and all care for ourselves to him. It
 is maintaining the cause through one's own anxiety and forethought.
 It is ignoring and disbelieving the fact that nothing can be
 accomplished by one's own vexed effort. No human wisdom has power to
 foresee the future. If we looked back at the examples furnished by
 history, we should learn how woefully human wisdom is deceived when
 it relies upon itself. The results are not what was expected, but the
 very opposite.
 
 36. The Scriptures give many pertinent examples of the kings of Judah
 and Israel, whom the prophets often and severely rebuked because they
 sought refuge and help among strange nations and kings. The prophets
 warned them that they should not trust in human aid, but should do
 according to God's Word and command. They told them he would protect
 and uphold them. But the kings would not hear. They continued to form
 friendships and alliances with the kings of Egypt, Syria, Babylon and
 Assyria, and thus invited them as guests into the land, whereupon the
 heathen kings came with force and led away captive the inhabitants
 and laid everything desolate. That was their reward for not heeding
 God's Word; for not believing that he cared for them, and desired to
 protect and defend them if they would but trust and obey him.
 
 The wisest and most eminent, even among the heathen, have lamented,
 in the light of their own experience, that they have been shamefully
 deluded by their counsels, even though founded on the most careful
 deliberations. Nor can it be said that the world has grown wiser in
 consequence of its own or others' sufferings.
 
 37. This exhortation is preached to no one except the few who are
 Christians. They have regard for God's Word, and, now humbled, have
 learned that they should not rely on their own wisdom and reason, or
 upon human help and comfort. They have come to the belief that God
 cares for them. So they do what they know is right and are in duty
 bound to do, and suffer themselves not to be hindered by such fears
 as possess the world concerning dangers, injuries, and adversities.
 They commend all such things to God, and at his word go right through
 with courage.
 
 38. Let me illustrate from my own experience. What should I have done
 when I began to denounce the lies of the indulgence system, and later
 the errors of the papacy, if I had listened and given heed to the
 terrible things all the world wrote and said would happen to me? How
 often I heard it said that if I wrote against such and such eminent
 people I would provoke their displeasure, which would prove too
 severe for me and the whole German nation. But, since I had not begun
 this work of myself, being driven and led thereto by reason of my
 office (otherwise I should have preferred to keep silence), I must
 continue. I commended the cause to God and let him bear the burden of
 care, both as to the result of the work and also as to my own fate.
 Thus I advanced the cause farther, despite tumultuous opposition,
 than I had ever before dared to think or hope.
 
 39. Oh, how much good would God accomplish through us if people could
 be persuaded, especially the eminent lords and kings, that what Peter
 here says is true: "He careth for you!" How much he could do if they
 believed that truth instead of seeking, through their own wisdom and
 reason, to equip, strengthen, and compose themselves by aid of human
 might and assistance, friendship and alliance, for the accomplishment
 and maintenance of their cause! It is apparent that mortal plans fail
 and have always failed, and that they accomplish nothing. God hinders
 and resists man's work when he will not trust him. Hence God can
 grant no success or favor to that which is founded on human wisdom or
 on trust in human powers. This is a truth men must finally perceive
 by experience, and they must lament because they would not believe
 it.
 
 40. Let him who would be a Christian learn to believe this. Let him
 practice and exhibit faith in all his affairs, bodily and spiritual,
 in his doing and his suffering, his living and his dying. Let him
 banish cares and anxious thoughts. Courageous and cheerful, let him
 cast them aside; not into a corner, as some vainly think to do, for
 when burdens are permitted to conceal themselves in the heart they
 are not really put away. But let the Christian cast his heart and its
 anxieties upon God. God is strong to bear and he can easily carry the
 burden. Besides, he has commanded that all this be put upon himself.
 The more thou layest upon him, the more pleasing it is to him. And he
 gives thee the promise that he will carry thy cares for thee, and all
 things else that concern thee.
 
 41. This is a grand promise, and a beautiful, golden saying, if men
 would only believe it. If a powerful ruler here on earth were to give
 such a promise, and were to demand that we let him have all the
 concern about gold and silver and the needs of this life, how
 cheerfully and contentedly would every one cling to such promise! But
 now a greater lord says all this, one who is almighty and truthful,
 who has power over the body and life, and who can and will give us
 everything we need, both temporal and eternal. We should have in all
 this, if we only believed it, half of heaven, yea, a perfect paradise
 on earth. For what is better and nobler than a quiet, peaceful heart?
 For this all men are striving and laboring. So have we been doing
 hitherto, running to and fro after it. Yet it is found nowhere except
 in God's word, which bids us cast our cares and burdens on God and
 thus seek peace and rest. It counsels us to throw upon him everything
 that threatens to oppress and worry us. God would not have anxiety
 dwell in our hearts, for it does not belong there; it is put there by
 the devil.
 
 42. Therefore, a Christian, even though obliged to suffer all manner
 of adversity, temptation and misfortune, can cheerfully go forward
 and say: Dear Lord God, thou hast commanded me to believe, to teach,
 to govern and to act; this I will attempt in thy name, and I will
 commend to thee whatever may happen to me in the course of duty.
 There you have a man who is equal to any task, and can do much good.
 For he is freed from the greatest misfortune and has laid the
 heaviest weight upon God, whilst another man does nothing except fill
 his heart with anxiety and gloom. This other can apply himself to no
 good work. He becomes unfit both to do and to suffer. He is afraid of
 every trifle and, because of his vexation or impatience, can do
 nothing worth mentioning.
 
 What is the world doing now? Princes, lords, counselors, citizens,
 and peasants--all want only power, honor, and wealth. None desires to
 render service. Everyone fears that this or the other thing might
 happen to him. Though the world never needed more careful rule than
 at the present time, lords and princes, simply because they are such,
 idly sit adorned with beautiful crowns, though they have received
 their trust from God to discharge their princely office. For the
 world must be governed, the youth must be educated, the wicked must
 be punished. But if thou desirest the honor only, and art not willing
 to step in the mire, to suffer people's displeasure, and through it
 all learn to trust God and for his sake do everything, thou art not
 worthy of the grace given for the accomplishment of a good and
 praiseworthy work. In punishment, resting under God's wrath, thou
 must remain unfit for every good work.
 
 III. "Be sober, be watchful: your adversary the devil, as a roaring
 lion, walketh about, seeking whom he may devour: whom withstand
 stedfast in your faith."
 
 43. The apostle has set forth two things to be practiced throughout
 the Christian life; namely, Christian humility--which is fear of
 God--and faith and confidence in God. Now he admonishes his readers
 to battle and warfare, that these blessings may be preserved. He
 shows us our enemy and adversary who seeks to rob us of our treasure
 and deprive us of our salvation and eternal blessedness. Hence he
 would say: Be not concerned about living a life of earthly glory, and
 let not anxious cares fill your soul. But be intent on humbling
 yourselves before God. Trust in him. Let this be your care, that you
 may abide in the grace of humility. Let it never be wrested from you.
 For the devil seeks to instill these forbidden cares, and to produce
 disobedience against God, that he may tear faith and God's Word out
 of your heart.
 
 
 WATCHFULNESS ENJOINED.
 
 Therefore, you must not ignore these facts, and meanwhile strive
 after something else. You are not to go along in false security or
 sleep and snore as though there were no danger. You must rather know
 that you have not been placed in a garden of roses here, but in the
 midst of heavy conflicts, where you must be on your guard, always
 watchful and prepared for resistance. For you have an adversary who
 is not insignificant or to be despised, but is strong, mighty, and
 moreover wicked and ferocious. He does not fight with stone and wood,
 destroying rocks and trees, but he has his eye fixed on you
 Christians. He never grows tired or weary, but without rest and
 ceasing he pursues you; not only to spy upon you and to harass you,
 in which he can be withstood, but he desires utterly to devour you.
 
 44. His sole purpose and plan is to murder and destroy men,
 spiritually and bodily; even as, at the beginning, when man had been
 created, he led and cast him into death. He practices his schemes
 with awful and deadly effect in the world against those who do not
 believe in Christ, and he will never stop until the judgment day. One
 can perceive his incessant activity. He bustles about and openly
 raves and roars against all Christendom. He uses for his purpose the
 Turks, and other tyrants and godless people, not to speak of the
 sorrow and murder he works by so possessing people that in their
 frenzy they do themselves injury, or without cause murder others. He
 otherwise, through wicked and shameful snares, leads men into
 misfortune and sorrow.
 
 In short, the world is nothing else than the devil's murderous cave,
 both spiritually and physically. God, in order to somewhat hinder and
 restrain physical murder, has ordained temporal government, parental
 and other authority. These in their office are to be sober, watchful,
 and diligent. We ought to thank God for his preservation of such
 authority, for otherwise there would be no peace--everywhere on earth
 nothing but murder. Nevertheless, the awful murder the devil
 perpetrates on those who are without God's Word and faith, is not
 thereby checked.
 
 45. Some other defense and protection, then, another kind of
 watchfulness, must be sought, in order that men may remain
 undestroyed and unharmed in the presence of this bloodthirsty
 murderer. Of this Peter speaks here to the little company of
 Christians, and says: Ye, through Christ's blood and death rescued
 from the devil's lies and murderous intent, have been made alive and
 have been transplanted into the heavenly life, like your beloved
 fathers, Adam, Abel, and others. They are no longer under bondage to
 Satan, but live in Christ, though the body lie for a time in the
 earth and truth and life must be supplied to their body and soul. But
 because ye still dwell in the world, ye are exposed to all danger.
 Physically, ye are yet in the murderer's house; therefore ye must
 take good heed, that he may not kill you again, and murder your souls
 dwelling in these mortal bodies. It shall harm you none that the soul
 was ruined and the body is yet subject to death. "Because I live,"
 says Christ (Jn 14, 19), "ye shall live also." However, ye must
 struggle if ye are to abide in the truth and life. To this ye are
 appointed whilst ye live here on earth; otherwise ye would already be
 in Paradise. But the devil has not yet been consigned wholly to the
 punishment of his damnation, which will be at the last day, when he
 will finally be cast down from his airy height, and from the earth,
 into the abyss of hell. Then he will no more be able to attack us,
 and there will no longer be cloud or veil between us and God and the
 angels.
 
 
 SOBERNESS ESSENTIAL.
 
 46. In order, now, he continues, that ye may be saved from his
 murderous designs, and may preserve the life you have begun, ye must
 be sober and watchful; not only mindful of the body, but much rather
 of the mind and soul. It is true that a Christian who is to resist
 the devil must be physically sober, for a full hog and drunkard
 cannot be watchful nor can he plan defense against the devil. Yet
 must a Christian much more guard himself, lest the soul become sleepy
 or drunken. As the soul is burdened by the body when the latter is
 overwhelmed by drunkenness, so, when the soul is watchful and sober,
 the body also is temperate and prepared to hear God's Word. But where
 the body is oppressed by drunkenness, there the soul must first have
 been a drunkard, not heeding God's Word nor giving attention to
 prayer. Where the soul is drunken and drowned in such security, it
 will not avail that the body suffer hurt by strict fasting and
 self-mortification, after the fashion of the Carthusians and hermits.
 
 47. Saint Peter, then, forbids not only bodily drunkenness, but also
 drunkenness of the soul. One's soul is drunk when he lives in carnal
 security, without thought and anxiety as to whether he have and hold
 God's Word or not; when he asks no questions, either about God's
 wrath or his grace; and when he, moreover, lets himself be filled
 with the sweet poison of false doctrine through the mob of evil
 spirits Satan employs for this purpose, until he grows numb, loses
 faith and clear judgment and finally becomes overfull of drunkenness
 and spews it out upon others.
 
 48. The same thing results when men begin to be wise in divine things
 by following human reason. Saint Peter aptly describes this false
 doctrine with the expression, "cunningly devised fables," 2 Pet 1,
 16. He says: "We did not follow cunningly devised fables, when we
 made known unto you the power and coming of our Lord Jesus Christ."
 Such are the beautiful words and sermons which make a great show of
 wisdom and holiness, and naturally please men. For instance it is a
 cunningly devised fable when one with the aid of philosophy, which
 reason can understand, sets forth in grandiloquent words what a fine
 thing it is for a man to live honorably, chastely, and to practice
 good works and virtues. The aim is, with such pretense, to have us
 believe that we, through these works (not alone through faith), are
 justified before God; that is, are redeemed from sin and death.
 
 49. Again, other factious spirits travel about with worthy sayings
 which they have heard from us--externals do not help souls; the
 Spirit must do the work--and then they proceed to fling contempt on
 baptism and the Lord's Supper. So Thomas Munzer, with his seditious
 peasants, and the Anabaptist rabble, went about, with great
 demonstration, preaching about the shameful, wicked life of the
 world, especially of the authorities, declaring that these were
 godless people and tyrants, and deserved God's wrath and punishment;
 that therefore men should depose and execute them, and establish a
 new government, of only pious and holy people.
 
 These and similar things Peter calls "cunningly devised fables." They
 are exaggeratingly pretended to be the product of great wisdom and
 art, and are rendered sweet and palatable to reason. So has all
 idolatry, heresy, and false doctrine, from the beginning on,
 prevailed, being fashioned and most beautifully adorned by people
 learned and wise and held in the esteem of the world.
 
 50. How admirable did the position of Arius and his adherents appear
 in comparison with the true faith concerning the divinity of Christ,
 when they declared that though Christ should be exalted above all
 angels and creatures, and that all honor, dominion and power in
 heaven and on earth belong to him, yea, that he is quite equal to
 God--all this, yet he is not "homo-ousios"; that is, he is not in one
 undivided, divine, eternal essence, which is of such unity that it
 could be imparted to no one else. It would be too much to say that a
 man is God, etc. With such pretense was a great multitude of
 Christians seduced. Even few bishops remained in the pure doctrine
 and faith. And afterward this poison prevailed among the wise people
 of Asia and Greece, until Mohammed, with his Saracens and Turks, had
 miserably corrupted the greatest part of the world.
 
 51. Likewise the Pope has adorned and colored with a glorious form
 his abominations and idolatry, claiming for his order of service that
 it is a meritorious and beautiful thing. Again, he calls attention to
 the serviceableness of the beautiful, orderly government and power of
 the Church, with its well regulated gradations of office and
 position--bishops superior to the ordinary priests, and over the
 bishops Saint Peter's chair at Rome. In that chair is vested the
 authority for the convocation of general councils so often as these
 may be necessary. These councils are to judge and decide in all
 matters of faith, and their decisions everyone must follow and obey.
 Again, he boasts what great service and consolation to the whole
 world is the work of the priests in the mass, when they daily renew
 and offer to God the sacrifice made by Christ on the cross. This is
 the sweet wine in the "golden cup" of the scarlet harlot of Babylon,
 with which she has made drunken all kings and nations, Rev 17, 2-4.
 
 52. Where the devil finds those who give ear to such fables, he takes
 them captive and so fills them with these falsehoods that they
 neither see nor hear anything else. They think their belief is the
 only one, and they will not suffer themselves to be instructed out of
 God's Word. And so, in their madness, without rightful intelligence
 of faith and all principles of pure doctrine, they continue in their
 darkened mind, with their fantastic, lying prattle, without
 repentance and amendment, having no grace to learn or do anything
 good. This is amply proved by the example of all seditious spirits.
 
 53. Therefore, Peter admonishes us to be "sober and watchful,"
 especially in spirit, and to guard ourselves against this sweet
 poison and these beautiful, adorned lies and fables of the devil. He
 teaches us how to equip and defend ourselves against his wicked
 devices.
 
 "Whom withstand stedfast in your faith."
 
 54. The true defense and resistance, in which we are to be sober and
 watchful, is to be well grounded in God's Word and cling firmly
 thereto when the devil seeks, with his cunningly devised fables, born
 of human understanding and reason, to overthrow our faith. Reason is
 the devil's bride, and always vaunts itself wise and skilful in
 divine things, and thinks what it holds to be right and good must be
 accounted so before God. But faith holds to God's Word alone. It
 knows that before God, human wisdom, skill and power, and whatever
 gifts and virtues man may have, count for nothing. Only his grace and
 the forgiveness of sins in Christ has value. Therefore, faith can
 repel and defeat all these fine pretensions and cunning fables.
 
 55. Worldly dominion and authority boasts before God in this fashion:
 My crown is a crown in God's sight, for my power and sovereignty have
 been given me by God. Therefore, whatever I say he must respect and
 regard as valid, and everyone must endorse my words and actions.
 
 The wise philosopher or jurist would thus give expression to his
 boasts and pretensions: We are the learned, the wise rulers of the
 world, and have admirable laws and statutes. We have superior and
 beautiful doctrines concerning good works and virtues. Men must
 listen to us and allow our judgment to have precedence. He who can
 do, or does, such things as we have done is, in God's sight, superior
 to others.
 
 
 FAITH, NOT WORLDLY WISDOM, ESSENTIAL.
 
 56. No, dear man, says faith to this, I grant that the things of
 which thou boastest have been ordained and confirmed by God; but they
 are not of value save for this temporal life. The world regards it a
 crown to be known as wise. But in the presence of God thou shouldst
 lay aside thy crown, let thy might and power, thy law and wisdom, go,
 and say: God, be merciful to me a poor sinner! Reason has this
 advantage, that it is equipped and adorned with God's promise to
 confirm its rule here on earth and to be pleased therewith; but with
 the provision that reason shall not interfere in God's government, or
 boast over against him. Let it be known that what is called wisdom
 and prudence on earth, is foolishness before God. What in the sight
 of the world is commended and honored as beautiful, valuable, as of
 honor and virtue, is before God sin, and subject to his wrath. What
 on earth is called life, is before God nothing but death.
 
 57. If, now, the parental, governmental, and other authority which
 he, himself, has arrayed and through his word established, and which
 is even administered by Christians, does not endure before him in
 that other life, how much less will he allow that to stand which man
 has devised or subtly contrived out of his own head and heart!
 Wouldst thou be wise and prudent, then cultivate these virtues in the
 sphere appointed thee, in thy home, the State, and whatever office
 thou hast. In these temporal things, rule as well as thou canst. Thou
 wilt find little enough to help in all thy books, thy reason and
 wisdom. But when thou beginnest to devise out of thine own reason the
 things of God, though they may all seem trustworthy wisdom, yet, as
 Peter says, they are nothing else than fables and lies.
 
 58. For example, a monk's words: Whoever dons a cowl can lead a holy
 life, for he is cut off from the world, can banish all care and
 sorrow, and can undisturbed, in peace and quietness, serve God--these
 words appear wisely spoken, but at bottom they are nothing but
 unreliable and useless chatter. This is proved from God's Word, which
 teaches that God has forbidden us to invent our own worship; also,
 that God would have us serve him in our ordinary life and station and
 not by fleeing therefrom. Hence, such monkery can not be a holy,
 godly life. In Psalm 119, 85, we read: "The proud have digged pits
 for me, who are not according to thy law." That is, they preach to me
 about praiseworthy things, and represent their cause as most worthy,
 in order to overcome me. But when I look at their words aright, I do
 not find them to be in accord with thy Word and commandments, which
 (says he) "are faithful." A lie is always beautiful. It attracts and
 pretends to be truth. It has, further, the advantage that it can
 adorn itself from the wardrobe of God's Word, and, perverting the
 Word, can use it in an uncertain sense. On the other hand, the truth
 does not so glitter, because it does not make itself plain to reason.
 For example, a common Christian, a type of the brethren, hears the
 Gospel, believes, uses the sacraments, leads a Christian life at home
 with wife and children--that does not shine as does the fascinating
 lie of a saintly Carthusian or hermit, who, separated from his fellow
 men, would be a holier servant of God than other people. Yet the
 latter is useful to nobody. He lets others preach and rule, and labor
 in the sweat of their brows.
 
 
 GOD'S WORD THE CHRISTIAN'S GUIDE.
 
 59. The one important thing, then, is to see to it that we have God's
 Word, and that we regulate all the teachings and claims of men in
 accordance therewith. We will thus distinguish between the true and
 the false. We must remember, also, that human reason holds a far
 inferior position to faith and is not to be acknowledged as
 trustworthy, save as it is authorized by God for temporal authority.
 He who has faith can easily perceive when reason conflicts with God's
 Word or seeks, in its wisdom, to rise superior thereto; just as, in
 worldly things, each one in his station, office, or calling, knows
 full well, when another attempts the same work, whether he does it
 right or not. So every householder well understands that in his home
 wantonness and wrong-doing on the part of the servants are not to be
 tolerated. However, in divine things, reason can so attire and adorn
 itself as not to be recognized except by one who, guided by faith,
 has a right knowledge of God's Word.
 
 Reason will not refrain from intruding, with its wisdom and prudence,
 into the affairs of God, where it has no orders. Thus the devil
 creates endless misery, as he did at the beginning in the case of our
 first parents. And yet reason will not permit, in its own domain, the
 slightest interference of one unskilled in reason's code.
 
 60. If a cobbler were to arise in the Church and censure the people
 because they did not wear his make of shoes, and should try to
 convince people that such a procedure was necessary to salvation,
 they would pursue him out of the Church with shoes and slippers, and
 cry after him: Stay at home in your shop with your shoes and lasts!
 What does that concern the spiritual estate?
 
 But when a factious spirit stands up and in his supposed wisdom
 grunts forth: I am a holy, pious man. I have a special illumination
 from the spirit. Therefore do not believe what the others say, which
 is nothing but the dead letter, that one person can be God and man;
 that a virgin can be a mother; that a man can be cleansed from sin by
 water and the spoken Word, etc.,--when he does this, then there is no
 one to offer resistance. Reason then gains the victory if it only
 claims the glory of guidance by the Spirit, of a holy life, etc.,
 even though God's Word and faith are not present in their purity.
 Behold, what mischief the Turk, with his Mohammed, has wrought and is
 still working, solely by claiming the honor of worshipping the one
 God, and asserting that he alone has the true God! He declares that
 only he and his followers are God's people on earth, to honor which
 God they war and fight against the Christians. He presses his cause
 the more vigorously because he has such large fortune and victory; so
 even many Christians who come among them adopt their faith and become
 Turks. But none of the Turks turn Christian.
 
 61. Therefore, no other counsel can be offered for resisting the
 devil and escaping destruction by him, than this, that we remain firm
 in faith, says Saint Peter. One must have a heart which holds fast to
 God's Word and fully understands the same and holds it to be true.
 For faith cannot exist or endure without the Word, nor can it hear or
 understand aught else. One must separate the Word far from all reason
 and wisdom, placing it above these. He must hold reason as
 nothing--yea, as dead--in matters pertaining to God's government and
 to how man is to escape sin and eternal death. Reason must keep
 silent and give to God's Word alone the honor which belongs to the
 truth, "bringing every thought into captivity to the obedience of
 Christ," as Saint Paul says, 2 Cor 10, 5. If reason is to be my
 teacher in these things, what need is there of faith? And why should
 I not throw away all the Scriptures? We Christians, says Paul (1 Cor
 1, 20-21), preach something else and higher than reason comprehends,
 for the wisdom of the world is mere folly. If reason taught me that
 the mother of Christ is a virgin, the angel Gabriel might have
 remained in heaven and kept silent concerning the matter. Your faith,
 says Paul again (1 Cor 2, 4), should not stand in the wisdom of men,
 but in the power of God. Now you have seen the tricks and wiles of
 the devil with which he seeks to devour you, which he bases on reason
 as opposed to God's Word.
 
 62. Peter admonishes all Christians, especially the preachers, how to
 defend themselves against the devil's intrigues and artifices, with
 which he seeks to capture them. In order that Christians may be
 properly equipped, Saint Peter calls attention to two things: First,
 we must know the enemy and realize his purpose; second, we must be
 armed to meet him and defend ourselves, that we may stand before him
 and conquer. He is a terrible, mighty foe, says Peter, and is the god
 of this world. He has more wisdom and more deceptive snares than all
 men, and can so blind and unsettle reason that it will cheerfully
 believe and follow him.
 
 He is, moreover, a wicked and bitter enemy to you who in Christ have
 life. He cannot bear to see you Christ's. He thinks and plots about
 nothing else than your overthrow. And think not that he is far from
 you, or that he will pursue you from a distance. He has encamped
 close to you and right around you; yea, in your own territory--that
 is, in your flesh and blood. There he seeks how to reach you, and
 overtake you when unguarded, attempting now this, now that. Misguided
 faith, doubt, anger, impatience, covetousness, evil passions, etc.,
 are points of attack--any place where he finds an opening or
 discovers that you are weak. Therefore, think not that he is simply
 jesting. He is more furious and hungry than a famished and angry
 lion. He does not purpose merely to wound or prick you, but wholly to
 consume you, so that nothing of body or soul will remain.
 
 63. Whoever would withstand such a foe must be equipped with other
 armor and weapons than those furnished by human wit and
 understanding, by human powers or ability. Your defense is nothing
 else, says Peter, than faith, which holds and grasps God's Word. And
 because the believer holds fast to this, the devil can gain nothing.
 It is God's truth and power, before which, with his lying and
 murdering, he cannot stand; he must yield and flee. Therefore
 Ephesians 6, 16 says: "Taking up the shield of faith, wherewith ye
 shall be able to quench all the fiery darts of the evil one." These
 fiery darts are chiefly those he hurls into the heart through the
 beautiful thoughts of human reason. He thus transforms himself into
 an angel of light, to displace right thoughts and faith, and to
 introduce human whims and false faith. His aim is, also, to lead into
 doubt, distrust, hatred, and anger toward God.
 
 Thus it is, too, in the other temptations and trials of life, when
 Satan drives men into sin and disobedience against God's commandment,
 into such sins as avarice, usury, anger, revengefulness, unchastity,
 and other vices. Here he uses the same insidious arts, first tearing
 God's Word out of the heart, then blinding reason with sweet and
 beautiful thoughts. He says: The thing proposed is not so wicked. God
 will not be so angry with you. He can afford to be patient with you,
 you still love the Gospel. With such suggestions as these he carries
 you away and plunges you under God's fearful anger and condemnation.
 
 64. If you would withstand these wiles, there can be no other plan or
 counsel than this: Fight with God's Word in firm faith against these
 suggestions and allurements. Further, keep in mind both your former
 misery and your present treasures of grace. Remember how you were
 once under God's wrath when, without fear of God and without faith,
 you were the devil's own, subject to all his will, and must have
 perished had not God, in boundless goodness, forgiven you your sin
 and bestowed on you his grace. And now give heed that you may not
 lose this treasure, to which end the Holy Spirit has been promised
 you. You need not succumb if you remain in faith. Again, if you
 experience weakness and suffer want, you are bidden to call upon him,
 certain that he will hear you. The promise is: "If ye shall ask
 anything of the Father, he will give it you in my name," Jn 16, 23.
 Also: "If ye abide in me, and my words abide in you, ask whatsoever
 ye will, and it shall be done unto you," Jn 15, 7.
 
 65. Peter would, with his admonitions, make Christians bold and
 confident for resisting the temptations of the devil and defending
 themselves. He would not have us feel terrified nor despair before
 Satan, even though that wicked one press us hard through the
 instrumentality of the world and of our own flesh, as well as by his
 direct onslaughts. We are not to fear though he seem too strong for
 us, and though surrender to his prowess seems inevitable. We are to
 have a manly heart and fight valiantly through faith. We must be
 assured that, if we remain firm in the faith, we shall have strength
 and final victory. The devil shall not defeat us; we shall prove
 superior to him.
 
 We have been called of God and made Christians to the end that we
 renounce the devil and contend against him, and thus maintain God's
 name, Word, and kingdom against him. Christ, our head, has already,
 in himself, smitten and destroyed for us the devil and his power. In
 addition, he gives us faith and the Holy Spirit, whereby we can
 wholly defeat Satan's further wickedness and his attempts to
 overthrow us.
 
 66. A Christian should bear all this in mind, I say, and learn to
 experience the strength and power of faith. So will he not yield to
 temptation and enticement. Nor will he, from love of the devil or the
 world, to his own eternal hurt, and for the sake of small temporal
 advantage, pleasure, or honor, cast from him God's grace and the Holy
 Spirit, and put himself again under God's eternal anger and
 condemnation.
 
 IV. "Knowing that the same sufferings are accomplished in your
 brethren who are in the world."
 
 67. This is a very precious and comforting passage, the truth of
 which Peter learned not only by inspiration of the Holy Spirit, but
 from his own experience. One instance of his experience was when, in
 the high-priest's house, he thrice denied his Lord, and soon
 thereafter fell into such anxiety and despair that he would have
 followed the traitor Judas had not Christ turned and looked on him.
 It was for this reason that Christ, so soon after his resurrection,
 first of all commanded that the glad tidings should be announced to
 Peter. Christ also said to him, before all this happened: "Simon, ...
 I made supplication for thee, that thy faith fail not; and do thou,
 when once thou hast turned again, establish thy brethren," Lk 22,
 31-32.
 
 
 CONDUCT IN SUFFERING.
 
 Peter makes faithful use of the present passage for his readers'
 comfort: Ye must expect, in the world, says he, to suffer many and
 severe things, both in temptations of soul and body, against the
 first and the second table of the law, Satan lying in wait for you
 with his deceitful and murderous arts.
 
 68. Weak Christians suffer beyond measure because they are plagued
 and beset so constantly by the devil. Their afflictions so sorely
 oppress them that they conclude that no one suffers so severely as do
 they. Especially does this seem the case in the great spiritual
 temptations which come to those endowed with peculiar gifts and who
 are called to positions of prominence in the Church. So Paul often
 laments his great temptations, which the common people do not
 understand and cannot endure. God, moreover, is careful to lay on
 each one just the cross he is able to carry. Still these sufferings
 are such that even the great and strong must languish and wither
 beneath them were it not for the comfort God bestows. These troubles
 grip the heart, and consume the very marrow, as the Psalms often
 lament.
 
 69. Some of those living in cloisters, and other pious, tender
 consciences, have learned by experience how hard such burdens are to
 bear, especially in the darkness of the papacy, where they receive
 but little genuine comfort. There are, also, some inexperienced and
 forward spirits who have seen but have not understood these things,
 and who yet desire to be regarded as people of large experience.
 When, however, the test comes, they are found wanting. It is related
 of one of this class, who heard others bemoaning their temptations,
 that he prayed God to let temptation visit him also; whereupon God
 permitted him to be tempted with carnal lust. But when he found he
 could not bear it, he again prayed God, asking that the burden of his
 brother, whom he regarded inferior to himself, be given him. But when
 this request was granted, he prayed yet more earnestly that God would
 give him back his former burden.
 
 70. Amid such temptations Peter comforts suffering Christians by
 telling them that they are not the first, nor the only ones, to be
 thus assailed. They are not to feel as if it were a wonderful, rare,
 unheard of cross which they bear, or that they bear it alone. They
 are to know that their brethren, the Christians of all times, and
 scattered through all the world, must, because they are in the world,
 suffer the same things at the hand of Satan and his minions. It
 assuages and comforts beyond measure for the sufferer to know that he
 does not suffer alone, but with a great multitude.
 
 71. It is true that in external temptations this comfort is easily
 grasped, because of the knowledge of others' experiences. But when
 Satan assails thee alone with his poisonous darts--for example, when
 he tempts thee to doubt God's grace, as if thou alone hadst been cast
 off; or when he suggests horrible blasphemies, hatred of God,
 condemnation of his government, and so tortures and fills with
 anguish thy heart that thou art led to think that no man on earth is
 more fearfully assailed than thyself--then there is need to make use
 of this comfort which Peter offers thee and all Christians. In other
 words, Peter would say: "My friend, let not the devil and thy
 sufferings terrify thee or lead thee to despair. Thou shouldst know
 this for a certainty, that thou sufferest not alone. No matter how
 shamefully he attacks thee, he has done and is doing the same to
 others."
 
 The devil seeks, not only our own destruction, but also that of all
 Christendom. It is ever his purpose to tear out of men's hearts, in
 the midst of their sufferings, God's Word and faith. He would rob
 them of their comfort in Christ, and depict God in the most horrible
 and hostile light, that the heart may have not one kind thought
 regarding him. And he can do this; not only with lofty, refined,
 subtle thoughts, but also by gross suggestions from without, before
 which a man must fear and shudder. I, myself, saw and heard a girl
 who complained of a temptation of this nature; namely, that while she
 stood in the church and saw the sacrament elevated, the thought
 occurred to her: Lo, what a big knave the priest is elevating. And
 she was suddenly so frightened at the terrible thought that she sank
 to the floor.
 
 72. Such terror and anxiety proceed from the fact that one imagines
 that no one else has ever experienced such dreadful assaults. He
 thinks he has a special, strange, and unusual affliction. Although it
 is true that men's temptations differ and come from different sources
 and one may imagine his own a peculiar kind, yet the sufferings and
 temptations of all Christians are alike in this, that the devil tries
 to drive them all from the fear and confidence of God into unbelief,
 contempt, hatred, and blasphemy against God. Therefore, the apostles
 are accustomed to call Christians' sufferings a fellowship in pain
 and tribulations. They point all men who suffer to the agonies of
 Christ our Lord, as the head and exemplar. Peter says in his first
 epistle, ch. 1, 11: "The Spirit of Christ ... testified beforehand
 the sufferings of Christ, and the glories that should follow them."
 And Paul says, "I fill up on my part that which is lacking of the
 afflictions of Christ in my flesh," Col 1, 24.
 
 73. If one would speak of specially severe sufferings, surely no
 human heart can comprehend, much less tell, how great and heavy were
 the anxiety and sorrow of our first parents on account of their
 miserable fall. And what sorrow must Adam have witnessed during the
 nine hundred years of his life in the experiences of his first son
 Cain, and his children! No man has ever borne such a burden as lay on
 both parents for nearly a hundred years after Abel's death, until
 their third son was born. Truly, these nine hundred years were a
 period of sorrow and misery.
 
 Perhaps, on the last day, we shall discuss with this our father the
 solitary suffering of that time, of which we know nothing. And we
 shall willingly confess that in sorrow's school he stands far above
 us and we have been only insignificant pupils. It must have been most
 severe and dangerous for him, since he had no example before him of
 similar suffering with which to comfort himself.
 
 74. Likewise, if thou couldst rightly understand what the other holy
 patriarchs, the prophets and apostles--especially Paul and Peter--and
 later all the beloved martyrs and saints, have endured thou wouldst
 be forced to say that all thy temptation and suffering are nothing in
 comparison. But above all these must we reckon the experiences of the
 Lord Christ, whose heart was so pierced by Satan's fiery darts and
 bitter thrusts that the bloody drops of sweat were pressed out of his
 body. He has gone before and surpassed us on the way of sorrow. We,
 with all our suffering, can only follow his footsteps.
 
 
 OF TEMPTATION.
 
 75. Therefore, learn well this saying of Peter, and think not that
 thou alone endurest this severe, fearful temptation and these
 onslaughts of the devil. Remember that thy brethren, not only they
 who are dead--who also have set thee a good example--but also those
 who live with thee in the world, have suffered and do suffer such
 terror and distress. For they have the very same enemy Christ and all
 Christendom have. Thou canst be glad and shout: God be praised! I am
 not the only one that suffers, but with me there is a great
 multitude, all Christians on earth, my beloved brothers and sisters,
 even down to the last who shall walk this earth. And in this passage
 Peter comforts and strengthens me, as Christ commanded him, who also
 has tasted of these sorrows, and, indeed, in far greater measure than
 I and others have.
 
 76. I have at times thought, in my trials, that I should like to
 argue with Peter and Paul as to whether they were tried more severely
 than I. For, when he can do nothing else, the devil resorts to the
 plan of leading a man to fix his attention solely on his own
 affliction, and oppresses him with the thought: No man has been so
 cast off by God, or has sunk so deep into anxiety and distress. The
 devil has often so wearied me with such arguments that at length I
 could offer no further opposition to him, but simply turned him over
 to Christ, who can quickly silence him with arguments. If we have not
 Christ with us, Satan proves far too strong for us. We cannot silence
 him. He soon renders helpless all our skill, and slays us with our
 own sword.
 
 77. Ah, these seditious leaders and other self-secure spirits are
 poor, miserable people, who know nothing at all of this conflict!
 They drown in their own imaginations, and think they are perfect. And
 some of them are so shameless and without fear as to blaspheme,
 saying that God himself could not take their virtue from them. The
 devil simply strengthens them in these thoughts, and hardens them the
 more. This very thing is a sign that they do not yet know the devil;
 they are already blinded and taken captive by him, so that he can
 ruin them when he pleases.
 
 78. Genuine Christians are not thus self-confident and boastful when
 they are attacked. In severe conflicts and anxieties they labor that
 the devil may not deprive them of the sword. I know that I am learned
 and have seen something of what the devil can do; but I must bear him
 witness, from my daily experience, that he can overcome me unless I
 am well established in faith and have Christ in my heart. Thomas
 Munzer was so firm and inflexible, as he thought, that he dared to
 say that he would not behold Christ, if he did not himself wish to
 speak with him. But at last, when the devil began to attack him, men
 saw what his pride and boasts were. No, they are not the ones to
 accomplish anything, who go about so boastful, as if they had
 consumed the devil. They do not see that they, themselves, were long
 since devoured seven times over by him and are held fast in his jaws.
 
 79. The heretic Arius was also secure and proud enough against the
 pious bishops and Christians. Yea, when he was punished for his error
 by his bishop, and admonished to desist, he became the more
 obstinate. He complained about the bitter persecution to which he was
 subjected. But his suffering was that they would not approve his
 horrible blasphemy. Just so in every age the heretics and
 blasphemers, yea, even open murderers and tyrants, pose as martyrs
 when they are not permitted to run against God's Word and against
 pious people. So confident do they try to be that they have no fear
 of God. They count the devil a dead bee until, at length, he suddenly
 seizes and destroys them in a moment.
 
 80. But the poor, tempted Christians have need of the comfort and the
 strength furnished by God's Word. They must anxiously contend lest
 they lose, in their hours of severe temptation, God, Christ, faith,
 and Our Father. Therefore, the mission intrusted to Peter, to
 strengthen his brethren, is most needful. So the same comfort was
 necessary in his own temptations, and he was even given it beforehand
 by Christ, who declared that he had prayed for him that his faith
 might not be extinguished nor fail, which faith, however, from the
 time of his denial on to the third day did almost die, and scarcely
 the smallest spark remained.
 
 Hence he now, as a true apostle, comforts those who are in the like
 fears and straits of a sinking and expiring faith. He says to all the
 suffering and comfortless: My dear brother, think not that thou alone
 sufferest distress and temptation. Many of thy brethren have suffered
 quite as heavily, perhaps more heavily. I, myself, have been as weak
 as thou canst ever be. If thou dost not believe this, look and see
 what occurred in the house of Caiaphas, the high-priest, when I, who
 protested my readiness to go with Christ into prison and death, at a
 word spoken to me by a maid, fell, and denied and abjured most
 shamefully my beloved Lord. For three whole days I lay in misery. I
 had no one to comfort me and none who suffered equally with myself. I
 had no consolation except that my dear Master gave me, with his eyes,
 one friendly look.
 
 81. Therefore, no one should regard his distress and need as too
 heavy and fearful, as if it were an entirely new thing, something
 which had never been experienced by others. To thee it may be
 something new and untried. But look about thee, at the great
 multitude of the Church, from the beginning until this hour. The
 Church has been set in the world to suffer the attacks of the devil,
 and without ceasing it must be sifted as wheat, as Christ's words
 suggest, Luke 22, 31.
 
 My friend, thou hast not yet seen nor experienced what our first
 parents endured their whole life long, and after them all the holy
 fathers until Christ. Peter, also, has been farther in this school
 than I and thou, and I would say that the same temptation as his
 could hardly be found. Paul says of him and the beloved apostles (1
 Cor 4, 9): "For, I think, God hath set forth us the apostles last of
 all, as men doomed to death: for we are made a spectacle unto the
 world, both to angels and men"--so that Satan may torment us
 according to his will, and thus work out his pleasure upon us. And
 what are the sufferings of all men combined when compared with
 Christ's agony and conflict, in that he sweat blood for thee?
 
 82. When the devil plagues and assails thee with his manifold
 temptations, refer him to Christ, with whom to dispute about the
 severe temptations, the death struggle, the anguish of hell, etc.
 Comfort thyself that thou art one of a great company of sufferers,
 past present and future. O beautiful, glorious company! All under one
 lord and head, who took from the devil his power and hell-fire. In
 short, thy affliction cannot prove so great that thou wilt not find
 it paralleled in the lives of the apostles, prophets, patriarchs and
 all the saints, especially of Christ himself; with whom, if we
 suffer, let us not doubt, says Paul, that we shall "be also
 glorified," Rom 8, 17.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Romans 8, 18-22.
 
 18 For I reckon that the sufferings of this present time are not
 worthy to be compared with the glory which shall be revealed to
 us-ward. 19 For the earnest expectation of the creature waiteth for
 the revealing of the sons of God. 20 For the creation was subjected
 to vanity not of its own will, but by reason of him who subjected it,
 in hope 21 that the creation itself also shall be delivered from the
 bondage of corruption into the liberty of the glory of the children
 of God. 22 For we know that the whole creation groaneth and
 travaileth in pain together until now.
 
 
 CONSOLATION IN SUFFERING, AND PATIENCE.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon was first printed in 1535, at Wittenberg.]
 
 1. Paul's language here is peculiar. He speaks in a manner wholly
 different from the other apostles. There is something particularly
 strange about the first sentences of the passage. His words must be
 faithfully studied and their meaning learned by personal experience.
 The Christian life consists altogether in the practice and experience
 of what the Word of God tells us. He who has no experimental
 knowledge of the Word will have but little conception and
 appreciation of Paul's words here. Indeed, they will be wholly
 unintelligible to him.
 
 2. Up to the point where our text begins, Paul has been assuring us
 in this epistle that through faith in our Lord Jesus Christ we attain
 the high privilege of calling God our Father; that the Holy Spirit
 bears witness in our hearts of our sonship, and makes us bold enough
 to come, by faith in Christ the Mediator, joyfully before God,
 trusting him to fill and bless us. Then Paul draws the conclusion,
 first, that we are children of God; next, he says: "If children, then
 heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs with Christ." The second
 conclusion is the outcome of the first. For the reason that we have
 the boldness and assurance to call God our Father in sincerity and
 nothing doubting, we are become not only children but heirs, heirs of
 God and brethren to Christ, joint-heirs with him. But all this, as
 Paul says, is true "if so be that we suffer with him" (verse 17).
 
 3. The high prerogative of heirship, Paul faithfully enjoins, is
 dependent on a sacred duty. Let him who would be Christ's brother,
 and joint-heir with him, remember he must also be a joint-martyr and
 joint-sufferer with Christ. The apostle's meaning is: Many are the
 Christians, indeed, who would be joint-heirs with Christ and gladly
 enjoy the privilege of sharing his inheritance, but who object to
 suffering with him; they separate themselves from him because
 unwilling to participate in his pain. But Paul says this will not do.
 The inheritance follows only as a consequence of the suffering. Since
 Christ, our dear Lord and Savior, had to suffer before he could be
 glorified, we must be martyrs with him, with him be mocked by the
 world, despised, spit upon, crowned with thorns and put to death,
 before the inheritance will be ours. It cannot be otherwise.
 
 A consistent sympathy is essential to Christian faith and doctrine.
 He who would be Christ's brother and fellow-heir must also suffer
 with him. He who would live with Christ must first die with him. The
 members of a family not only enjoy good together but also share in
 their ills. As the saying is, "He who would be a companion in eating
 must also be a companion in labor."
 
 4. Paul would earnestly admonish us not to become false Christians
 who look to find in Christ mere pleasure and enjoyment, but to
 remember that if we are to participate in the "eternal weight of
 glory" we must first bear the "light affliction, which is for the
 moment." 2 Cor 4, 17.
 
 By the words "if so be that we suffer with him" the writer means that
 we are to do more than exercise the sympathy that grieves over
 another's misfortune, though such sympathy is binding upon Christians
 and is a superior Christian virtue, a work of mercy: we ourselves
 must suffer, non solum affectu, sed etiam effectu, that is, we are
 overwhelmed by like sufferings. As Christ our Lord was persecuted, we
 also must endure persecution. As the devil harassed him, we also must
 be harassed unceasingly. And so Satan does torment true Christians.
 Indeed, were it not for the restraining hand of the Lord our God, the
 devil would suffer us to have no peace. Paul has reference to a
 heartfelt sympathy intense enough to enter into actual suffering. He
 says to the Hebrews (ch. 10, 32-33): "Ye endured a great conflict of
 sufferings; partly, being made a gazing stock both by reproaches and
 afflictions."
 
 5. And in the verse preceding our text he tells us that as our
 blissful inheritance through brotherhood and joint-heirship with
 Christ is not a mere fancy and false hope of the heart, but a real
 inheritance, so our sympathy must amount to real suffering, which we
 take upon ourselves as befitting joint-heirs. Now Paul comforts the
 Christian in his sufferings with the authority of one who speaks from
 experience, from thorough acquaintance with his subject. He seems to
 view this life as through obscurities, while beholding the life to
 come with clear and unobstructed vision. He says:
 
 "For I reckon that the sufferings of this present time are not worthy
 to be compared with the glory which shall be revealed to us-ward [in
 us]."
 
 6. Notice how he turns his back to the world and his face to the
 future revelation, as if seeing no suffering anywhere, but all joy.
 "Even if it does go ill with us," he would argue, "what indeed is our
 suffering in comparison with the unspeakable joy and glory to be
 revealed in us? It is too insignificant to be compared and unworthy
 to be called suffering." We fail to realize the truth of these words
 because we do not see with our bodily eyes the supreme glory awaiting
 us; because we fail to grasp fully the fact that we shall never die
 but shall have a body that cannot suffer nor be ill. If one could
 conceive the nature of this reward he would be compelled to say:
 "Were it possible for me to suffer ten deaths by fire or flood, that
 would be nothing in comparison to the future life of glory. What is
 temporal suffering, however protracted, contrasted with eternal life?
 It is not worthy to be called suffering or to be esteemed
 meritorious."
 
 7. In this light does Paul regard suffering, as he says, and he
 admonishes Christians to look upon it similarly. Then shall they find
 the infinite beyond all comparison with the finite. What is a single
 penny measured by a world of dollars? though this is not an
 appropriate comparison since the things compared are both perishable.
 The suffering of the world is always to be counted as nothing
 measured by the glorious and eternal possessions yet to be ours. "I
 entreat you, therefore, beloved brethren," Paul would say, "to fear
 no sufferings, not even should it be your lot to be slain. For if you
 are actually joint-heirs, it must be your fortune, a part of your
 inheritance, to suffer with others. But what is your pain measured by
 the eternal glory prepared for you and obtained by the sacrifice of
 your Savior Jesus Christ? It is too insignificant to be contrasted."
 So Paul makes all earthly suffering infinitely small--a drop, a tiny
 spark, so to speak; but of yonder hoped-for glory he makes a
 boundless ocean, an illimitable flame.
 
 8. Why cannot we take his view of the insignificance of our
 afflictions and the magnitude of the future glory? The extravagance
 of our conduct is apparent in the fact that but a harsh word uttered
 by one to his fellow will make the injured one ready to overturn
 mountains and uproot trees in his resentment. To them who are so
 unwilling to suffer, Paul's word of encouragement here is wholly
 unintelligible. Christians are not to conduct themselves in this
 impatient manner. It ill becomes them to make extravagant complaint
 and outcry about injustice. "But," you say, "I have truly suffered
 injustice." Very well, so be it. But why do you make so much of your
 sufferings and never give a thought to what awaits you in heaven? Why
 not exalt the future glory also? If you desire to be a Christian,
 truly it will not do to conduct yourself in this impatient manner. If
 you must air your grievances, surely you may do it quietly and
 decorously.
 
 9. In this life it must be otherwise than in the life of glory. If
 you essay to be a joint-heir with the Lord Jesus Christ and do not
 suffer with him, to be his brother and are not like unto him, Christ
 certainly will not at the last day acknowledge you as a brother and
 fellow-heir. Rather he will ask where are your crown of thorns, your
 cross, the nails and scourge; whether you have been, as he and his
 followers ever have from the beginning of time, an abomination to the
 world. If you cannot qualify in this respect, he cannot regard you as
 his brother. In short, we must all suffer with the Son of God and be
 made like unto him, as we shall see later, or we shall not be exalted
 with him in glory.
 
 10. Upon this same topic Paul addresses also the Galatians (ch. 6,
 17): Henceforth let no one confuse me, say nothing to me about the
 doctrine that friendship is rewarded on earth; for I bear branded on
 my body the marks of my Lord Jesus Christ. His reference is to the
 signs in ancient paintings of Christ, where the Savior was
 represented as bearing his cross upon his shoulders, with the nails,
 the scourge, the crown of thorns and other emblems in evidence. These
 marks or signs, Paul instructs, all Christians as well as himself
 must exhibit, not painted on a wall but branded in their flesh and
 blood. They are made when inwardly the devil affrights and assails us
 with all manner of terrors and overwhelming afflictions, and at the
 same time outwardly the world slanders us as heretics, laying her
 hand to our throats whenever possible and putting us to death.
 
 
 THE REWARD.
 
 Such marks, or scars, for Christ the Lord, Paul admonishes all
 Christians to exhibit. Thus he encourages them not to be terrified
 though they suffer every conceivable wrong, such as our brethren here
 and there have suffered now for several years. But brighter days are
 in store for us when once the hour of our enemies and the power of
 darkness shall come. Our adversaries annoy us now with malignant
 words and slanderous writings, and indeed they may take our lives. So
 be it. We must in any event suffer if we are ever to attain true
 glory. But what they will secure by putting us to death they
 certainly shall experience.
 
 11. In Paul's reference to the glory that shall be revealed in us
 there is a hint as to the cause of man's unwillingness to suffer:
 faith is yet weak and fails to descry the hidden glory; that glory is
 yet to be revealed in us. Could we but behold it with mortal vision,
 what noble, patient martyrs we should be! Suppose one stood on yonder
 side of the Elbe with a chest full of gold, offering it to him who
 should venture to swim across for it. What an effort would be made
 for the sake of that tangible wealth!
 
 12. Take the case of the adventurous officer. For a few dollars per
 month he defies spears and guns, exposing himself to almost certain
 death. The merchant hurries to and fro in the world in a frenzied
 effort to amass riches, hazarding life and limb, apparently careless
 of physical cost so long as God's mercy preserves to him but the
 shattered hulk of a body. And what must not one endure at court
 before he realizes, if he ever does, the fulfilment of his ambition?
 
 In temporal things man can do and suffer everything for the sake of
 honor, wealth and power, because these are manifest to earthly
 vision. But in the spiritual conflict, because the reward is not
 discernible to the senses it is very difficult for the old man in us
 to believe that God will finally grant us glorious bodies, pure souls
 and hearts of gladness, and make us superior to any earthly king.
 Indeed, the very reverse of this condition obtains now. Here is one
 condemned as a heretic; there one is burned or in some other way put
 to death. Glory, wealth and honor are not in evidence now. So it
 seems hard for us to resign ourselves to suffering and wait for the
 redemption and glory yet unrevealed.
 
 Again, no hardship is too great for the world to undergo for the sake
 of sordid gain; it willingly suffers whatever comes for that which
 moth and rust consume and thieves steal.
 
 13. Paul means to say: "I am certain there is reserved for us
 exceeding glory, in comparison wherewith all earthly suffering is
 actually of no consideration; only it is not yet manifest." If we
 have to face the slightest gale of adversity, or if a trifling
 misfortune befalls us, we begin to make outcry, filling the heavens
 with our false complaint of a terrible calamity. Were our faith
 triumphant, we would regard it but as a small inconvenience to
 suffer, even for thirty or forty years or longer; indeed, we should
 think our sufferings too trifling to be taken into account. May the
 Lord our God only forbear to reckon with us for the sins we have
 committed! Why will we have so much to say about great sufferings and
 their merits? How utterly unworthy we are of the free grace and
 ineffable glory which are ours in the fact that through Christ we
 become children and heirs of God, brethren and joint-heirs with
 Christ!
 
 Well may we resolve: "I will maintain a cheerful silence about my
 sufferings, boasting not of them nor complaining about them. I will
 patiently endure all my merciful God sends upon me, meanwhile
 rendering him my heartfelt gratitude for calling me to such
 surpassing grace and blessing." But, as I said, the vision of glory
 will not enter our hearts because of our weak and miserable flesh,
 which allows itself to be more influenced by the present than by the
 future. So the Holy Spirit must be our schoolmaster to bring the
 matter home to our hearts.
 
 14. Note particularly how Paul expressly states that the glory is to
 be revealed in us. He would remind us that not only such as Peter or
 Paul are to participate in the blessing, as we are prone to believe,
 but that we and all Christians are included in the word "us." Indeed,
 even the merest babe obtains at death, wherein it is a joint-sufferer
 with mankind, this unspeakable glory, which the Lord Jesus into whose
 death it was baptized has purchased and bestowed upon it. Though in
 the life beyond one saint may have more glory than another, yet all
 will have the same eternal life. Here on earth men differ in point of
 strength, comeliness, intellect, yet all enjoy the same animal life.
 So in the other life there will be degrees of radiance or glory, as
 Paul teaches (1 Cor 15, 41), yet all will share the same eternal
 happiness and joy; there will be one glory for all, for we shall all
 be the children of God.
 
 15. Now the first point of consolation is that we turn our backs upon
 all suffering, saying: "What is all my pain, though it were tenfold
 greater, compared to the eternal life unto which I am baptized, to
 which I am called? My sufferings are not worthy to be so termed in
 connection with the exceeding glory to be revealed in me." Paul
 magnifies the future glory to make the temporal sufferings the more
 insignificant. Then follows:
 
 "For the earnest expectation of the creature waiteth for the
 revealing [manifestation] of the sons of God. For the creation was
 subjected to vanity, not of its own will, but by reason of him who
 subjected it, in hope: [For the creature was made subject to vanity,
 not willingly, but by reason of him who hath subjected the same in
 hope;]"
 
 16. Here is the second point of consolation. Paul holds up as an
 example to us the condition of the whole creation. He exhorts us to
 endure patiently, as the creature does, all the violence and
 injustice we suffer from the devil and the world, and to comfort
 ourselves with the hope of future redemption. Remarkable doctrine
 this, unlike anything elsewhere found in the Scriptures, that heaven
 and earth, sun, moon and stars, leaf and blade, every living thing,
 waits with sighing and groaning for the revelation of our glory.
 
 
 THE TRAVAIL OF CREATION.
 
 17. Such sighing and agony of the creature is not audible to me, nor
 is it to you. But Paul tells us he sees and hears it, not expressed
 by one creature alone, but by all God has made. What does he mean?
 What is the sighing and longing of creation? It is not that annually
 the leaves wither and the fruits fall and decay: God purposes that
 every year new fruits shall grow; he decrees the shattering of the
 fallen tree. But Paul refers to the creature's unwilling subjection
 to the ungodly; "subject to vanity," he phrases it.
 
 For instance, the blessed sun, most glorious of created things,
 serves the small minority of the godly, but where it shines on one
 godly man it must shine on thousands and thousands of knaves, such as
 enemies of God, blasphemers, persecutors, with whom the world is
 filled; also murderers, robbers, thieves, adulterers. To these it
 must minister in all their ungodliness and wickedness, permitting its
 pure and glorious influence to benefit the most unworthy, most
 shameful and abandoned profligates. According to the apostle, this
 subjection is truly painful, and were the sun a rational creature
 obeying its own volition rather than the decree of the Lord God who
 has subjected it to vanity against its will, it might deny every one
 of these wicked wretches even the least ray of light; that it is
 compelled to minister to them is its cross and pain, by reason of
 which it sighs and groans.
 
 Just as we Christians endure many kinds of injustice and consequently
 sigh for and implore help and deliverance in the Lord's prayer, so do
 the creatures sigh. Although they have not human utterance, yet they
 have speech intelligible to God and the Holy Spirit, who mark the
 creatures' sighs over their unjust abuse by the ungodly.
 
 18. Nowhere else in the Holy Scriptures do we find anything like
 Paul's declaration here concerning the earnest expectation and
 waiting of the creatures for the revelation of the children of God;
 which waiting the apostle characterizes as a sighing in eager desire
 for man's redemption. A little later he compares the state of the
 creature to a woman in travail, saying it cries out in its anguish.
 The sun, moon and stars, the heavens and earth, the bread we eat, the
 water or wine we drink, the cattle and sheep, in short, all things
 that minister to our comfort, cry out in accusation against the world
 because they are subjected to vanity and must suffer with Christ and
 his brethren. This accusing cry is beyond human power to express, for
 God's created things are innumerable. Rightly was it said from the
 pulpit in former times that on the last day all creatures will utter
 an accusing cry against the ungodly who have shown them abuse here on
 earth, and will call them tyrants to whom they were unjustly
 subjected.
 
 19. Paul presents this example of the creatures for the comfort of
 Christians. His meaning is: Be not sorrowful because of your
 sufferings; they are small indeed when the ensuing transcendent glory
 is considered. You are not alone in your tribulation and your
 complaint at injustice; the whole creation suffers with you and cries
 out against its subjection to the wicked world. Every bleat of the
 flock, every low of the herd, is an outcry against the ungodly as
 enemies of God and not worthy to enjoy the creatures' ministrations;
 not even to receive a morsel of bread or a drink of water. Along this
 line St. Augustine is eloquent. "A miserly wretch," he says, "is
 unworthy the bread he eats, for he is an enemy of God."
 
 Paul tells us the whole creation groans and travails with us, as if
 desiring relief from anguish; that it suffers like a woman in
 travail. For instance: the heavenly planets would gladly be freed
 from serving, yes, in the extent of their anguish would willingly
 suffer eclipse; the earth would readily become unfruitful; all waters
 would voluntarily sink from sight and deny the wicked world a
 draught; the sheep would prefer to produce thorns for the ungodly
 instead of wool; the cow would willingly yield them poison rather
 than milk. But they must perform their appointed work, Paul says,
 because of him who has subjected them in hope. God will finally
 answer the cry of creation; he has already determined that after the
 six thousand years of its existence now passed, the world shall have
 its evening and end.
 
 20. Had not our parents sinned in paradise, the world would never be
 dissolved. But since man has fallen in sin, we all--the whole
 creation--must suffer the consequence; because of our sins, creation
 must be subjected to vanity and dissolution. During the six thousand
 years, which are as nothing compared to eternal life, all created
 things must be under the power of a condemned world, and compelled to
 serve with all their energies until God shall overthrow the entire
 world and for the elect's sake purify again and renew the creature,
 as Peter teaches. 2 Pet 3, 13.
 
 21. The sun is by no means as gloriously brilliant as when created.
 Because of man's ungodliness its brightness is to an extent dimmed.
 But on the day of visitation God will cleanse and purify it by fire
 (2 Pet 3, 10), giving it a greater glory than it had in the
 beginning. Because it must suffer in our sins, and is obliged to
 shine as well for the worst knave as the godly man, even for more
 knaves than godly men, it longs intensely for the day when it shall
 be cleansed and shall serve the righteous alone with its light.
 
 Neither would the earth produce thistles nor thorns were it not
 cursed for our sins. So it, with all creatures, longs for the day
 when it shall be changed and renewed.
 
 22. This is the explanation of Paul's remarkable declaration
 concerning the "earnest expectation of the creation." The creature
 continually regards the end of service, and freedom from slavery to
 the ungodly. This event will not take place before the revealing of
 the sons of God; therefore the earnestly expectant creation desires
 that revelation to come without delay, at any moment. Until such
 manifestation the world will not consider godly souls as children of
 the Father, but as children of the devil. So it boldly abuses and
 slanders, persecutes and puts to death, God's beloved children,
 thinking it thereby does God service. In consequence the whole
 creation cries: "Oh, for a speedy end of this calamity, and the
 dawning of glory for the children of God!"
 
 23. We have plain authority for the interpretation of the groaning of
 creation in Paul's further words, "the creation was subjected to
 vanity, not of its own will." He thus makes all creation--sun and
 moon, fire, air, water, heaven and earth with all they
 contain--merely poor, captive servants. And whom do they serve? Not
 our Lord God; not for the most part his children, for they are a
 minority among those ministered unto. To whom, then, is their service
 given? To the wicked--to vanity. The created things are not, as they
 would be, in righteous service. The sun, for instance, would choose
 to shine for Paul, Peter and other godly ones. It begrudges to wicked
 characters like Judas, Pilate, Herod, Annas and Caiaphas the least
 ray of light; for it is useless service, yielding no good. To serve
 Peter and Paul would be productive of pleasure and profit; well may
 its benefit be bestowed upon these godly ones. But the sun must shine
 as well for the wicked as for the ungodly. Indeed, where it fittingly
 serves one godly individual, thousands abuse its service.
 
 The case is similar with gold and other minerals, and with all the
 articles of food, drink and clothing. To whom do these minister?
 Wicked desperadoes, who in return blaspheme and dishonor God, condemn
 his holy Gospel and murder his Christians. This is wasted service.
 
 24. So Paul says, "The creature was made subject to vanity;" it must
 render service against its consent, having no pleasure therein. The
 sun does not shine for the purpose of lighting a highway robber to
 murder. It would light him in godly deeds and errands of mercy; but
 since he follows not these things the service of the blessed sun is
 abused and that creature ministers with sincere unwillingness. But
 how is it to avoid service?
 
 A wicked tyrant, a shameful harlot, may wear gold ornaments. Is the
 gold responsible for its use? It is the good creature of the Lord our
 God and fitted to serve righteous people. But the precious product
 must submit to accommodating the wicked world against its will. Yet
 it endures in hope of an end of such service--such slavery. Therein
 it obeys God. God has imposed the obligation, that man may know him
 as a merciful God and Father, who, as Christ teaches (Mt 5, 45),
 makes his sun to rise on the evil and the good. For the Father's sake
 the blessed sun serves wickedness, performing its service and
 bestowing its favors in vain. But God in his own good time will
 reckon with those who abuse the glorious sunlight and other
 creatures, and will richly recompense the created things for their
 service.
 
 25. Beloved, Paul thus traces the holy cross among all creatures;
 heaven and earth and all they contain suffer with us. So we must not
 complain and excessively grieve when we fare ill. We must patiently
 wait for the redemption of our bodies and for the glory which is to
 be revealed in us; especially when we know that all creatures groan
 in anguish, like a woman in travail, longing for the revealing of the
 sons of God. For then shall begin their redemption, when they shall
 not be slaves to wickedness but shall willingly and with delight
 serve God's children only. In the meantime they bear the cross for
 the sake of God, who has subjected them in hope. Thus we are assured
 that captivity will not endure forever, but a time must come when the
 creatures will be delivered.
 
 "Do ye likewise, beloved Christians," Paul would advise, "and reflect
 that as the creature will rejoice with you on the last day, so does
 it now mourn with you; that not you alone must suffer, but the whole
 creation suffers with you and awaits your redemption, a redemption so
 great and glorious as to make your sufferings unworthy to be
 considered."
 
 
 
 
 _Fourth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Second Sermon. Text: Romans 8, 18-22.
 
 
 REDEMPTION OF THE CREATURES.
 
 1. We have heard how Paul comforts the Christians in their
 sufferings, pointing them to the future inconceivable and eternal
 glory to be revealed in us in the world to come; and how he has, for
 our greater consolation, reminded us that the whole creation as one
 being suffers in company with the Christian Church. We have noted how
 he sees, with the clear, keen eye of an apostle, the holy cross in
 every creature. He brings out this thought prominently, telling us it
 is not strange we Christians should suffer, for in our preaching, our
 reproving and rebuking, we easily merit the world's persecution; but
 creation must suffer being innocent, must even endure forced
 subjection to the wicked and the devil himself.
 
 2. Could the sun voice its experience from Adam's time down, what
 misery it has witnessed and endured, undoubtedly it would tell of its
 heavy cross in being compelled to serve innumerable adulterers,
 thieves, murderers, in fact, the devil's whole kingdom. Yet it is a
 noble and admirable work of creation, fit to serve only God, angels
 and pious Christians, who thank God for it. But it must serve those
 who blaspheme and dishonor God and who are guilty of all wickedness
 and lawlessness. Notwithstanding its dislike of such service, it is
 with every other created thing obedient to God.
 
 3. This is a fine and comforting thought of the apostle's, that all
 creatures are martyrs, having to endure unwillingly every sort of
 injustice. The creatures do not approve the conduct of the devil and
 of the wicked in their shameful abuse of creation, but they submit to
 it for the sake of him who has subjected them to vanity, at the same
 time hoping for a better dispensation in the fulfilment of time, when
 they shall again be rightly received and abuse be past. Hence Paul
 points to another life for all creation, declaring it to be as weary
 of this order as we are and to await a new dispensation. By his
 reference to the earnest expectation of the creature he means that it
 does not expect to remain in its present condition, but with us looks
 toward heaven and hopes for a resurrection from this degraded life
 into a better one where it will be delivered from the bondage of
 corruption, as he says later.
 
 4. By these sayings Paul gives us to understand that all creation is
 to attain a perfection far beyond its present state where with us it
 must be subject to tyrants. These tyrants wantonly abuse our
 characters, our bodies, our property rights, just as the devil abuses
 our souls. But we must suffer our lot, remembering that mankind is
 captive on earth in the kingdom of the devil, and all creation with
 it. The earth must submit to be trodden and to be cultivated by many
 a wicked one, to whom it must yield subsistence. Likewise is this
 submission true of the elements--air, fire, water--all creation
 having its cross, yet hoping for the end of the dispensation.
 
 5. There is a refined and comforting perception in the apostle's
 exposition where he represents the entire creation as one being, with
 us looking forward to entrance upon another life. We are satisfied
 that our present life is not all, that we await another and true
 life. Likewise the sun awaits the restoration coming to it, to the
 earth and all creatures, when they shall be purified from the
 contaminating abuse of the devil and the world.
 
 6. And this condition is to come about when the children of God are
 revealed. True, they are God's children on earth, but they have not
 yet entered into their glory. Similarly, the sun is not now in
 possession of its real glory, for it is subject to evil; it awaits
 the appointed time when its servitude shall cease. With all creation
 and with the true saints it waits and longs, being meanwhile subject
 to vanity--that is, the devil and the wicked world--for the sake of
 God alone, who subjects, yet leaves hope that the trial shall not
 continue forever.
 
 7. We are children of God now on earth. We are blessed if we believe
 and are baptized, as it is written: "He that believeth and is
 baptized shall be saved." Mk 16, 16. And again: "As many as received
 him, to them gave he the right to become children of God, even to
 them that believe on his name." Jn 1, 12. Baptism is a visible rite
 and we behold with mortal vision those who receive it; the Word of
 the Gospel we hear, and we have in ourselves the witness of the Holy
 Spirit that our faith, however weak, is acceptable to God. But who
 among men recognizes us as children of God? Who will apply the term
 to a class imprisoned and tortured and tormented in every conceivable
 way, as if they were children of the devil, condemned and accursed
 souls?
 
 8. Not without significance is Paul's assertion that the glory of
 God's children is now unmanifest but shall be revealed in them. In
 Colossians 3, 3-4 he declares: "Ye died, and your life is hid with
 Christ in God. When Christ, who is our life, shall be manifested,
 then shall ye also with him be manifested in glory." So long as God's
 children are here upon earth they are not arrayed in the garb of his
 own, but wear the livery of the devil. It would be fitting for the
 children of the devil to be bound, fettered and imprisoned and to
 suffer all manner of misfortune; but it does not so come to pass.
 They have the world's pleasures. They are wealthy and powerful, have
 honor and money in plenty and withal bear God's name and wear the
 garb of his children, as if having his approval. Meanwhile they
 regard us as heretics and enemies of God. Thus the rightful order of
 things is reversed: they who are God's appear to be the devil's, and
 the devil's to be God's. This condition is painful to the pious.
 Indeed, heaven and earth and all creatures cry out in complaining
 protest, unwilling to be subject to evil and to suffer the abuse of
 the ungodly; to endure that dishonor of God that opposes the
 hallowing of his name, the extension of his kingdom and the execution
 of his will on earth as in heaven.
 
 9. Because God's children are thus unrevealed and denied their true
 insignia, all creation, as Paul says, cries out with them for the
 Lord God to rend the heavens and come down to distinguish his
 children from those of the devil. Considering the unrevealed state of
 God's own on earth, the ungodly in their great blindness are not able
 to discern them. The doctrine of the righteous which magnifies God's
 grace manifest in Christ is by the wicked termed error, falsehood,
 heresy and diabolical teaching. So Paul says the whole creation waits
 for the manifestation of the children of God.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN'S GLORY TO BE REVEALED.
 
 John, also, says: "Beloved, now are we children of God, and it is not
 yet made manifest what we shall be. We know that, if he shall be
 manifested, we shall be like him." 1 Jn 3, 2. That is, when our Lord
 Jesus Christ comes with his loved angels and we are drawn up into the
 clouds to meet him in the air, he will bring to God's children a
 glory consistent with their name. They will be far more splendidly
 arrayed than were the children of the world in their lifetime, who
 went about in purple and velvet and ornaments of gold, and as the
 rich man, in silk. Then shall they wear their own livery and shine as
 the sun in the kingdom of their Father. Such is the wonderful glory
 of the revelation that the radiant beauty of poor Lazarus who lay in
 wretchedness at the rich man's gate surpasses all expectation. Upon
 this topic, see Wisdom of Solomon, chapter 5, 2ff.
 
 10. The hope of this wonderful glory, Paul says, is ours and that of
 all creation with us, for creation is to be purified and renewed for
 our sakes. Then will we be impressed with the grandeur of the sun,
 the majesty of the trees and the beauty of the flowers. Having so
 much in prospect, we should, in the buoyancy of our hope, attach
 little importance to the slight suffering that may be our earthly
 lot. What is it compared to the glory to be revealed in us? Doubtless
 in yonder life we shall reproach ourselves with the thought: "How
 foolish I was! I am unworthy to be called the child of God, for I
 esteemed myself all too highly on earth and placed too little value
 upon this surpassing glory and happiness. Were I still in the world
 and with the knowledge I now have of the heavenly glory, I would,
 were it possible, suffer a thousand years of imprisonment, or endure
 illness, persecution or other misfortunes. Now I have proven true
 that all the sufferings of the world are nothing measured by the
 glory to be manifested in the children of God."
 
 11. We find many, even among nominal Christians, with so little
 patience they scarce can endure a word of criticism, even when well
 deserved. Rather than suffer from the world some slight reproach,
 some trifling loss, for the sake of the Gospel, they will renounce
 that Gospel and Christ. But how will it be in the day of revelation?
 Beloved, let us be wise now and not magnify our temporal sufferings;
 let us patiently submit to them as does creation, according to Paul's
 teaching. We may imagine the earth saying: "I permit myself to be
 plowed and cultivated for man's benefit, notwithstanding the
 Christians whom I bless are in the minority, the great mass of those
 profiting by me being wicked men. What am I to do? I will endure the
 conditions and permit myself to be tilled because my Creator so
 orders; meanwhile I hope for a different order eventually, when I
 shall no longer be subject to wickedness and obliged to serve God's
 enemies."
 
 12. Peter also alludes to the new order of creation, saying: "The
 heavens shall pass away with a great noise, and the elements shall be
 dissolved with fervent heat ... But according to his promise, we look
 for new heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth righteousness." 2
 Pet 3, 10 and 13. In other words: Here on earth men as a rule are
 dishonorable and wicked and obey not the will of the Lord God as it
 is done in heaven; but the day will come when only righteousness and
 holiness shall dwell on the earth--none but godly, righteous souls.
 As in heaven all is righteousness, the devil being banished, so on
 the last day, Satan and all the ungodly shall be thrust from the
 earth. Then will there be none but holy ones in both heaven and
 earth, who will in fullness of joy possess all things. These will be
 the elect. This is Peter's meaning in the words, "According to his
 promise, we look for new heavens and a new earth, wherein dwelleth
 righteousness." Paul adds that all creation waits with us for the
 revelation, groaning and crying out in anguish.
 
 13. But Paul protects the creature from condemnation and reproach for
 sinful submission to abuse. He says, in effect: "True, it is subject
 to vanity, yet not willingly." Likewise I do not desire to suffer
 reproach as a heretic and a deceiver, but I endure it for God's sake,
 who permits it. This attitude on my part does not make me partaker of
 the sin committed against me by enemies of the truth who reproach me.
 The case is the same as that of the creature suffering abuse for the
 sake of him who has subjected it. And you Christians are to imitate
 the example of creation. The sun seems to say: "Great God, I am thy
 creature; therefore I will perform, I will suffer, whatsoever is the
 divine will." So when the Lord God sends upon you some affliction and
 says, "Endure a little suffering for my sake; I will largely repay
 it," you are to say: "Yes, gladly, blessed Lord. Because it is thy
 will, I will suffer it with a willing heart."
 
 
 OF HOPE.
 
 It also belongs to the consolation against suffering to be conscious
 that the suffering will not last forever, but will sometime have an
 end--on the day of judgment, when the godless shall be separated from
 the godly. For this life on earth is nothing else than a masquerade
 where people walk in masks, and one sees another different than he
 is. He who appears to be an angel is a devil, and those considered
 the children of the devil are angels and the children of our dear
 Lord. Hence it is that they are attacked, plagued, martyred and put
 to death as heretics and children of the devil. This masquerade must
 be tolerated until the day of judgment; when the wicked will be
 unmasked and will no longer be able to pass as holy people.[1] The
 text now continues:
 
 "That the creation itself also shall be delivered from the bondage of
 corruption into the liberty of the glory of the children of God."
 
 "[Because the creature itself also shall be delivered from the
 bondage of corruption into the glorious liberty of the children of
 God.]"
 
 [Footnote 1: This paragraph is from the pamphlet edition of 1535.]
 
 14. We Christians are not the only beings to receive deliverance,
 Paul declares; the creature in bondage has the same hope of release
 as the poor, enslaved human being. Sun, moon and every other created
 thing is captive to the devil and to wicked people, and must serve
 them in every form of sin and vice. Hence these sigh and complain,
 waiting for the manifestation of the children of God, when the devil
 and the ungodly shall be thrust into hell, and for all eternity be
 denied sight of sun and moon, the enjoyment of a drop of water or a
 breath of air, and forever deprived of every blessing.
 
 15. So the apostle tells us, "Creation itself also shall be delivered
 from the bondage of corruption." In other words, creation must now
 subserve most shameful ends. Sun, moon and all creatures must be
 slaves to the devil and the ungodly because God so desires. He wills
 for his beautiful creation to lie at the feet of Satan and his
 adherents and to serve them for the present. Likewise many a
 sensitive heart is compelled to obey a tyrant or a Turk because the
 Lord has imposed that servitude upon it. Some may even have to clean
 the Turk's boots, or perform still more menial duties, and in
 addition suffer all sorts of indignities from that individual.
 
 16. These words, "Creation itself also shall be delivered from the
 bondage of corruption," signify that all created things must until
 the final reckoning be servants and menials, not to the godly, but to
 the devil and wicked men. Paul himself regards with pity the sun and
 other creatures because of their forced service to Satan and to
 tyrannical beings. The created works no more desire such servility
 than we desire subjection to the Turk. Nevertheless, they submit and
 wait--for what? The glorious liberty of the children of God. Then
 shall they be released from slavery and be no longer bound to serve
 the wicked and worthless. More than that, in their freedom they will
 have a grandeur far in excess of their present state and shall
 minister only unto God's children. They will be done with bondage to
 the devil.
 
 "For we know that the whole creation groaneth and travaileth in pain
 together until now."
 
 17. Paul uses forcible language here. Creation is aware, he says, not
 only of its future deliverance from the bondage of corruption, but of
 its future grandeur. It hopes for the speedy coming of its glory, and
 waits with the eagerness of a maiden for the dance. Seeing the
 splendor reserved for itself, it groans and travails unceasingly.
 Similarly, we Christians groan and intensely desire to have done at
 once with the Turks, the Pope, and the tyrannical world. Who would
 not weary of witnessing the present knavery, ungodliness and
 blasphemy against Christ and his Gospel, even as Lot wearied of the
 ungodliness he beheld in Sodom? Thus Paul says that creation groaneth
 and travaileth while waiting for the revelation and the glorious
 liberty of the children of God.
 
 18. "And not only so," he adds, "but ourselves also, who have the
 firstfruits of the Spirit, even we ourselves groan within ourselves,
 waiting for our adoption, to wit, the redemption of our body." We
 pray, we cry with great longing, in the Lord's Prayer, "Thy kingdom
 come," meaning: "Help, dear Lord, and speed the blessed day of thy
 second advent, that we may be delivered from the wicked world, the
 devil's kingdom, and may be released from the awful distress we
 suffer--inwardly from our own consciences and outwardly from the
 wicked. Afflict to the limit these old bodies of ours so long as we
 may obtain others not sinful, as these; not given to iniquity and
 disobedience; bodies that can never know illness, persecution or
 death; bodies delivered from all physical and spiritual distress and
 made like unto thine own glorified body, dear Lord Jesus Christ. Thus
 may we finally realize our glorious redemption. Amen."
 
 19. Paul uses a peculiar word here in the text, which we cannot
 render by any other in our language than "travail." It carries the
 idea of pains and pangs such as a woman knows in childbirth. The
 mother's ardent desire is to be delivered. She longs for it with an
 intensity that all the wealth, honor, pleasure and power of the world
 could not awaken. This is precisely the meaning of the word Paul
 applies to creation. He declares it to be in travail, suffering pain
 and anguish in the extremity of its desire for release. But who can
 discern the anguish of creation? Reason cannot believe, nor human
 wisdom imagine, the thing. "It is impossible," declares reason. "The
 sun cannot be more glorious, more pleasing and beneficent. And what
 is lacking with the moon and stars and the earth? Who says the
 creature is in travail or unwillingly suffers its present state?"
 
 The writer of the text, however, declares creation to be weary of
 present conditions of servitude, and as eager for liberation as a
 mother for deliverance in the hour of her anguish. Truly it is with
 spiritual sight, with apostolic vision, that Paul discerns this fact
 in regard to creation. He turns away from this world, oblivious to
 the joys and the sufferings of earthly life, and boasts alone of the
 future, eternal life, unseen and unexperienced. Thus he administers
 real and effectual comfort to Christians, pointing them to a future
 life for themselves and all created things after this sinful life
 shall have an end.
 
 20. Therefore, believers in Christ are to be confident of eternal
 glory, and with sighs and groans to implore the Lord God to hasten
 the blessed day of the realization of their hopes. For so Christ has
 taught us to pray in the Lord's Prayer, "Thy kingdom come." May he
 who has commanded give us grace and strength to perform, and a firm
 faith in our future glory. Our faith is not to be exercised for the
 attainment of earthly riches, but as a means to bring us into another
 life. We are not baptized unto the present life, nor do we receive
 the Gospel as ministering to our temporal good; these things are to
 point us to yonder eternal life. God grant the speedy coming of the
 glad day of our redemption, when we shall realize all these
 blessings, which now we hear of and believe in through the Word.
 Amen.
 
 
 
 
 _Fifth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Peter 3, 8-15.
 
 8 Finally, be ye all like-minded, compassionate, loving as brethren,
 tender-hearted, humble-minded: 9 not rendering evil for evil, or
 reviling for reviling; but contrariwise blessing; for hereunto were
 ye called, that ye should inherit a blessing. 10 For,
 
      He that would love life,
      And see good days,
      Let him refrain his tongue from evil,
      And his lips that they speak no guile:
   11 And let him turn away from evil, and do good;
      Let him seek peace, and pursue it.
   12 For the eyes of the Lord are upon the righteous,
      And his ears unto their supplication:
      But the face of the Lord is upon them that do evil.
 
 13 And who is he that will harm you, if ye be zealous of that which
 is good? 14 But even if ye should suffer for righteousness' sake,
 blessed are ye: and fear not their fear, neither be troubled; 15 but
 sanctify in your hearts Christ as Lord.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO THE FRUITS OF FAITH.
 
 1. Here you have enumerated again a long list of eminently good works
 enjoined upon Christians who believe and have confessed their faith
 in the Gospel. By such fruits is faith to be manifest. Peter
 classifies these works according to the obligations of Christians to
 each other, and their obligations to enemies and persecutors.
 
 2. Immediately preceding the text, Peter has been instructing
 concerning the domestic relations of husband and wife; how they
 should live together as Christians in love and companionship, giving
 due honor and patiently and reasonably bearing with each other. Now
 he extends the exhortation to Christians in general, enjoining them
 to live together in Christian love, like brothers and sisters of a
 household. In the rehearsal of many preeminently noble virtues and
 works, he portrays the ideal church, beautiful in its outward
 adornment, in the grace wherewith it shines before men. With such
 virtues the Church pleases and honors God, while angels behold with
 joy and delight. And what earthly thing is more desirable to man's
 sight? What happier and more pleasing society may he seek than the
 company of those who manifest a unity of heart, mind and will;
 brotherly love, meekness, kindliness and patience, even toward
 enemies? Surely, no man is too depraved to command such goodness and
 to desire companionship among people of this class.
 
 3. The first virtue is one frequently mentioned by the apostles.
 Paul, for instance, in Romans 12, 16, says: "Be of the same mind one
 toward another." Also in Ephesians 4, 3: "Giving diligence to keep
 the unity of the Spirit in the bond of peace." Harmony is the
 imperative virtue for the Christian Church. Before the other
 virtues--love, meekness--can be manifest, there must first be concord
 and unity of heart among all. It is impossible that outward
 circumstances of human life be always the same; much dissimilarity in
 person, station, and occupation is inevitable.
 
 To this very unlikeness and to the natural depravity of flesh and
 blood is due the discord and disagreement of men in this world. Let
 one become conscious of personal superiority in point of uprightness,
 learning, skill or natural ability, or let him become aware of his
 loftier station in life, and he immediately grows self-complacent,
 thinks himself better than his fellows, demands honor and recognition
 from all men, is unwilling to yield to or serve an inferior and
 thinks himself entitled to such right and privilege because of his
 superiority and virtue.
 
 4. Pride is the common vice of the world, and the devil fosters it
 among his numerous followers thereby causing every sort of misery and
 unhappiness, corrupting all ranks and stations, and rendering men
 vicious, depraved and incapable of executing good. In opposition to
 this vice the apostles diligently admonish Christians to be of one
 mind, regardless of station or occupation, since every individual
 must remain in the position to which he has been ordained and called
 of God. All ranks and stations cannot be one. Particularly is this
 true in the Church; for in addition to the outward difference of
 person, station, and so on, there are manifold divine gifts unequally
 distributed and varyingly imparted. Yet these many dissimilarities,
 both spiritual and secular, are to be amenable to the unity of the
 spirit, as Paul calls it, or a spiritual unity. Just as the members
 of the physical body have different offices and perform different
 functions, no one member being able to do the work of the other, and
 yet all are in the unity of one bodily life; so also Christians,
 whatever the dissimilarity of language, office and gift among them,
 must live, increase and be preserved in unity and harmony of mind, as
 in one body.
 
 5. This matter of harmony is the first and most necessary commandment
 enjoined by the doctrine of faith; ay, this virtue is the first fruit
 which faith is to effect among Christians, who are called in one
 faith and baptism. It is to be the beginning of their Christian love.
 For true faith necessarily creates in all believers the spirit that
 reasons: "We are all called by one Word, one baptism and Holy Spirit,
 to the same salvation; we are alike heirs of the grace and the
 blessings of God. Although one has more and greater gifts than
 another, he is not on that account better before God. By grace alone,
 without any merit of ours, we are pleasing to God. Before him none
 can boast of himself."
 
 6. How can I think myself better than another by reason of my person
 or my gifts, rank or office? Or what more than I has another to boast
 of before God concerning himself? No one has a different baptism or
 sacrament, a different Christ, from mine, or grace and salvation
 other than I have. And no individual can have another faith than have
 Christians in general, nor does he hear any other Gospel or receive a
 different absolution, be he lord or servant, noble or ignoble, poor
 or rich, young or old, Italian or German. When one imagines himself
 different from or better than his fellows, desiring to exalt and
 glorify himself above others, he is truly no longer a Christian;
 because he is no longer in that unity of mind and faith essential to
 Christians. Christ with his grace is always the same, and cannot be
 divided or apportioned within himself.
 
 7. Not without reason did the beloved apostles urge this point. They
 clearly saw how much depends upon it, and what evil and harm result
 from disregard of the commandment. Where this commandment is
 dishonored, schisms and factions will necessarily arise to corrupt
 pure doctrine and faith, and the devil will sow his seed, which
 afterwards can be eradicated only with difficulty. When once
 self-conceit rules, and one, pretending more learning, wisdom,
 goodness and holiness than his fellows, begins to despise others and
 to draw men to himself, away from the unity of mind which makes us
 one in Christ, and when he desires the first praise and commendation
 for his own doctrine and works, his own preaching, then the harm is
 already done; faith is overthrown and the Church is rent. When unity
 becomes division, certainly two sects cannot both be the true Church.
 If one is godly, the other must be the devil's own. On the other
 hand, so long as unity of faith and oneness of mind survives, the
 true Church of God abides, notwithstanding there may be some weakness
 in other points. Of this fact the devil is well aware; hence his
 hostility to Christian unity. His chief effort is to destroy harmony.
 "Having that to contend with," he tells himself, "my task will be a
 hard and wearisome one."
 
 8. Therefore, Christians should be all the more careful to cherish
 the virtue of harmony, both in the Church and in secular government.
 In each instance there is of necessity much inequality. God would
 have such dissimilarity balanced by love and unity of mind. Let
 everyone be content, then, with what God has given or ordained for
 him, and let him take pleasure in another's gifts, knowing that in
 eternal blessings he is equally rich, having the same God and Christ,
 the same grace and salvation; and that although his standing before
 God may differ from that of his fellows, he is nevertheless in no way
 inferior to them, nor is anyone for the same reason at all better
 than or superior to himself.
 
 9. In temporal affairs, every inequality in the world can be
 harmonized by a unity of mind and heart. In relations other than
 spiritual there is mutual love and friendship. How great the outward
 dissimilarity between man and wife--in person, nature and employment!
 likewise between masters and their subjects. Yet, in mutual
 conscientiousness they mutually agree and are well satisfied with
 each other. So it would be possible to enjoy life upon earth in peace
 and happiness were it not that the devil cannot suffer it. He must
 divide hearts and alienate love, allowing no one to take pleasure in
 another. He who is illustrious, of noble birth, or has power or
 riches, feels bound to despise others as silly geese or witless
 ducks.
 
 
 SYMPATHY A CHRISTIAN VIRTUE.
 
 10. The other virtues enjoined by Peter are easily
 recognized--"Compassionate, loving as brethren, tenderhearted, and
 humbleminded" [Luther translates "friendly"--courteous]. These
 particularly teach that Christians should esteem one another. God has
 subjected them all to love and has united them, with the design that
 they shall be of one heart and soul, and each care for the other as
 for himself. Peter's exhortation was especially called for at that
 time, when Christians were terribly persecuted. Here a pastor, there
 a citizen, was thrown into prison, driven from wife, child, house and
 home, and finally executed. Such things happen even now, and may
 become yet more frequent considering that unfortunate people are
 harassed by tyrants, or led away by the Turks, and Christians are
 thus dispersed in exile here and there. Wherever by his Word and
 faith God has gathered a church, and that spiritual unity, the bond
 of Christianity, exists in any measure, there the devil has no peace.
 If he cannot effect the destruction of that church by factiousness,
 he furiously persecutes it. Then it is that body, life and everything
 we have must be jeopardized--put to the stake--for the sake of the
 Church.
 
 11. Christians, according to Peter, should, in the bond of a common
 heart and mind, sympathetically share the troubles and sufferings of
 their brethren in the faith, whoever and wherever the brethren may
 be. They are to enter into such distresses as if themselves
 suffering, and are to reason: "Behold, these suffer for the sake of
 my precious faith, and standing at the front, are exposed to the
 devil, while I have peace. It does not become me to rejoice in my
 security and to manifest my pleasure. For what befalls my dear
 brethren affects me, and my blessings are the cause of their
 misfortune. I must participate in their suffering as my own."
 According to the admonition of Hebrews 13, 3: "Remember them that are
 in bonds, as bound with them; that is, as if in the same bonds and
 distress. Remember them that are illtreated, as being yourselves also
 in the body;" as members of the same body.
 
 12. We are all bound to one another, just as in the body one member
 is bound to another. As you know by your own physical experience,
 "Whether one member suffereth, all the members suffer with it; or one
 member is honored, all the members rejoice with it," as Paul says in
 1 Corinthians 12, 26. Note how, when a foot is trodden upon or a
 finger pinched, the whole body is affected: eyes twitch, nose is
 contorted, mouth cries out--all the members are ready to rescue and
 help. No one member can forsake the others. In reality not the foot
 or the finger is injured, but the whole body suffers the accident. On
 the other hand, benefit received by one member is pleasing to all,
 and the whole body rejoices with it. Now the same principle should
 hold in the Church, because it likewise is one body of many members
 with one mind and heart. Such unity naturally entails the
 participation by each individual in the good and evil of every other
 one.
 
 13. This virtue of sympathy, resulting as it does from a unity of
 mind and faith, is impossible to the world. In the world every man
 looks only upon what benefits himself and regards not how others,
 especially the godly, fare. Indeed, the world is capable of scornful
 smiles and extreme pleasure at sight of Christians in poverty and
 distress, and in their sufferings it can give them vinegar and gall
 to drink. But you who claim to be a Christian, should know it is
 yours to share the sufferings of your brethren and to prove your
 heartfelt sympathy with them. If you cannot do more, at least show it
 with comforting words or prayer. Their suffering concerns you as well
 as themselves, and you must expect the same afflictions from the
 devil and the wicked world.
 
 
 OF LOVE.
 
 14. "Loving as brethren." This virtue must prevail among Christians
 everywhere. They are to manifest toward one another the love and
 faithfulness of brothers according to the flesh. It is a law of
 nature that brothers have a peculiar confidence in one another, being
 of the same blood and flesh and having a common inheritance.
 Particularly is this true when in distress. Although they may not be
 united in other respects, yet when stranger blood assails and
 necessity comes, they of the same flesh and blood will take one
 another's part, uniting person, property and honor.
 
 15. Likewise Christians should exercise a peculiar brotherly love and
 faithfulness toward one another, as having one Father in heaven and
 one inheritance, and in the bond of Christianity being of one faith,
 united in heart and mind. None may despise another. Them among us who
 are still weak, frail and eccentric in faith and morals, we are to
 treat with gentleness, kindness and patience. They must be exhorted,
 comforted, strengthened. We should do by them as do the brothers and
 sisters of a household toward the member who is weak or frail or in
 need. Indeed we cannot otherwise dwell in peace. If we are to live
 together we must bear with one another much weakness, trouble and
 inconvenience; for we cannot all be equally strong in faith and
 courage and have equal gifts and possessions. There is none without
 his own numerous weaknesses and faults, which he would have others
 tolerate.
 
 
 OF MERCY.
 
 16. "Tenderhearted, humbleminded" [friendly]. Here Peter has in mind
 mankind in general--friends and enemies, Christians and persecutors.
 Owing to original sin, man is naturally disposed to seek revenge,
 especially upon those who injure him without cause. If he can do no
 more, he at least maliciously invokes evil upon his enemy and
 rejoices in his misfortune. Now, Christians more than any others in
 this world are innocently persecuted, injured, oppressed and
 aggrieved, even by those having the name and honor of Christians, a
 thing of frequent occurrence today. God's people are aggrieved by
 such treatment, and if the natural instinct of flesh and blood could
 have its way, they would gladly revenge themselves; just as they of
 the world mutually exercise their revenge, not content until passion
 is cooled.
 
 17. But a Christian should not, and indeed consistently he cannot, be
 unmerciful and vindictive, for he has become a child of God, whose
 mercy he has accepted and therein continues to live. He cannot seek
 pleasure in injury to his neighbor or enjoy his misfortune. He cannot
 maintain a bitter or hard and stubborn heart toward him. Rather he is
 disposed to show mercy even to his hostile neighbor, and to pity his
 blindness and misery; for he recognizes that neighbor as under God's
 wrath and hastening to everlasting ruin and condemnation. Thus the
 Christian is already more than revenged on his enemy. Therefore he
 should be friendly towards the hostile neighbor and do him every
 kindness he will permit, in an effort to lead him to repentance.
 
 18. Yet, in showing mercy, as frequently enjoined heretofore we are
 not to interfere with just and ordained punishments. God's Word does
 not teach us to demand mercy or commend kindness where sin and evil
 practices call for punishment, as the world would have us believe
 when their sins merit rebuke, particularly the vices of those in high
 places. These transgressors claim that when reproved their honor is
 assailed and occasion is given for contempt of their office and
 authority, and for rebellion, a thing not to be tolerated. This is
 not true. The lesson teaches the duty of each individual toward all
 other individuals, not toward the God-ordained office. Office and
 person must be clearly distinguished. The officer or ruler in his
 official capacity is a different man from what he is as John or
 Frederick. The apostle or preacher differs from the individual Peter
 or Paul. The preacher has not his office by virtue of his own
 personality; he represents it in God's stead. Now, if any person be
 unjustly persecuted, slandered and cursed, I ought to and will say:
 "Thank God;" for in God I am richly rewarded for it. But if one
 dishonors my baptism or sacrament, or the Word God has commanded me
 to speak, and so opposes not me but himself, then it is my duty not
 to be silent nor merciful and friendly, but to use my God-ordained
 office to admonish, threaten and rebuke, with all earnestness, both
 in season and out of season--as Paul says in 2 Timothy 4, 2--those
 who err in doctrine or faith or who do not amend their lives; and
 this regardless of who they are or how it pleases them.
 
 19. But the censured may say: "Nevertheless you publicly impugn my
 honor; you give me a bad reputation." I answer: Why do you not
 complain to him who committed the office to me? My honor is likewise
 dear to me, but the honor of my office must be more sacred still. If
 I am silent where I ought to rebuke, I sully my own honor, which I
 should maintain before God in the proper execution of my office;
 hence I with you deserve to be hanged in mid-day, to the utter
 extinguishment of my honor and yours. No, the Gospel does not give
 you authority to say the preacher shall not, by the Word of God, tell
 you of your sin and shame. What does God care for the honor you seek
 from the world when you defy his Word with it? To the world you may
 seem to defend your honor with God and a good conscience, but in
 reality you have nothing to boast of before God but your shame. This
 very fact you must confess if you would retain your honor before him;
 you must place his honor above that of all creatures. The highest
 distinction you can achieve for yourself is that of honoring God's
 Word and suffering rebuke.
 
 20. "Yes, but still you attack the office to which I am appointed."
 No, dear brother, our office is not assailed when I and you are
 reminded of our failure to do right, to conduct the office as we
 should. But the Word of God rebukes us for dishonoring that divinely
 ordained appointment and abusing it in violation of his commandment.
 Therefore you cannot call me to account for reproving you. However,
 were I not a pastor or preacher, and had I no authority to rebuke
 you, then it would be my duty and my pleasure to leave your honor and
 that of every other man unscathed. But if I am to fill a divine
 office and to represent not my own but God's dignity, then for your
 own sake I must not and will not be silent. If you do wrong, and
 disgrace and dishonor come upon you, blame yourself. "Thy blood shall
 be upon thine own head," says Scripture, 1 Kings 2, 37. Certainly
 when a judge sentences a thief to the gallows, that man's honor is
 impugned. Who robs you of your honor but yourself, by your own theft,
 your contempt of God, disobedience, murder, and so on? God must give
 you what you deserve. If you consider it a disgrace to be punished,
 then consider it also no honor to rob, steal, practice usury and do
 public wrong; you disgrace yourself by dishonoring God's commandment.
 
 21. This much by way of reminder of the difference between official
 rebuke and personal anger and revenge. It must constantly be kept
 before us because of the artfulness of flesh and blood, which ever
 seeks to disregard that difference. True, God would have all men to
 be merciful and friendly, to forgive and not to avenge wrong; but the
 office, which is ordained for the punishment of the wicked, will not
 always admit of that course. Few are willing to forgive, and
 therefore God must enforce his government over the merciless. They
 must be punished without mercy. This divine principle must not be
 restricted. Neither must it be applied beyond measure. Every official
 must be careful not to exceed the demands of his office, exercising
 his own revenge, his own envy and hatred, in the name and under
 pretense of that position.
 
 22. Peter continues to expatiate upon this topic--the good works he
 has been discussing: gentleness, mercy, friendliness--citing
 beautiful passages of Scripture and using other exhortations--to
 incite Christians to practice these virtues. He says:
 
 "Not rendering evil for evil, or reviling for reviling; but
 contrariwise blessing: for hereunto were ye called, that ye should
 inherit a blessing."
 
 23. We have now seen whose prerogative it is to avenge, rebuke and
 punish evil. This passage does not refer to official duty. When the
 judge declares sentence of execution upon a thief we have truly an
 instance of vengeance and reproach, and a public and extreme
 reflection upon honor. But it is God's judgment and his doing, with
 which we are not here concerned. The Christian of true faith and
 innocent life, who confesses his doctrine and belief, and as he is
 commanded rebukes opposing forces, will provoke the devil and the
 world, and will be persecuted, oppressed and harassed in the name of
 office and right, even by individuals whose official duty it is to
 protect the godly and restrain unjust power. If these cannot do more,
 they will at least annoy, hinder and oppose that Christian as far as
 possible. If the Christian be quick-tempered and fail to curb his
 anger and impatience, he will effect no good. He will only bring upon
 himself that disquiet of heart which consumes and worries itself with
 thoughts of revenge and retaliation upon the offender; which when the
 devil perceives, he rejoices. He so urges and instigates as to cause
 more mischief on both sides. Thus he doubly injures the
 Christian--through his enemy and through the anger wherewith the
 Christian torments himself and spoils his own peace.
 
 
 OF PATIENCE.
 
 24. What then shall we do, you say, when we must suffer such abuse
 and without redress? The only resource, Peter says, is to possess
 your heart in patience and commit the matter to God. This is all that
 remains when they whose duty it is will not help you, nor restrain
 and punish the wrong, but even do you violence themselves. If the
 evil receive not judicial punishment, let it go unpunished until God
 looks into it. Only see that you keep a quiet conscience and a loving
 heart, not allowing yourself, on account of the devil and wicked men,
 to be disturbed and deprived of your good conscience, your peaceful
 heart and your God-given blessing. But if in your official capacity
 you are commanded to punish the evil, or if you can obtain protection
 and justice from rightful authorities, avail yourself of these
 privileges without anger, hatred or bitterness, ay, with a heart that
 prompts to give good for evil and blessing for reviling.
 
 25. Such conduct is becoming you as Christians, the apostle says, for
 you are a people called to inherit a blessing. Oh, wonderful and
 glorious fact, that God has decreed and appropriated to you this
 blessing whereby all the riches of his grace and everything good are
 yours! and that he will abundantly give you his Spirit to remain with
 you, blessing body and soul, if only you hold fast his grace and do
 not allow yourselves to be deprived of it. What price would you not
 gladly pay for this blessing, were it purchasable, instead of being
 freely given, without your merits, and were you privileged thus to
 buy the assurance of having a God so gracious, one willing to bless
 you in time and eternity? Who would not willingly give even body and
 life, or joyfully undergo all suffering to have the perfect assurance
 of heart which says: "I know I am a child of God, who has received me
 into his grace and I live in the sure hope that I will be eternally
 blessed and saved." Think, Peter says, what a vast difference God
 makes between you and others because you are Christians. He has
 appointed you to be heirs of everlasting grace and blessing and of
 eternal life. But they who are not Christians--what have they but a
 terrible sentence like a weight about their necks? the sentence
 pronouncing them children of the curse and of eternal condemnation.
 
 26. If men would take this to heart, it would be easy by teaching and
 persuasion to win them to friendship and kindness toward their
 fellow-men; to induce them not to return evil or reviling from motive
 of revenge, but when their own privileges and protection and the
 punishment of evil cannot be obtained, quietly and peaceably to
 suffer injury rather than lose their eternal comfort and joy.
 Christians have excellent reason, a powerful motive, for being
 patient and not revengeful or bitter in the fact that they are so
 richly blessed of God and given that great glory whereof, as Peter
 afterwards remarks, they cannot be deprived, nor can they suffer its
 loss, if only they abide in it. The apostle emphasizes this fact and
 further persuades Christians by citing the beautiful passage in Psalm
 34, 12-16:
 
 "He that would love life, and see good days, let him refrain his
 tongue from evil, and his lips that they speak no guile: and let him
 turn away from evil, and do good; let him seek peace, and pursue it.
 For the eyes of the Lord are upon the righteous, and his ears unto
 their supplication: but the face of the Lord is upon them that do
 evil."
 
 27. These words the Holy Spirit uttered long ago through the prophet
 David, for the instruction and admonition of all saints and children
 of God. David presents to us the matter as he daily saw it in his own
 life and learned from his own experience, and as he gathered from
 examples of the dear fathers from the beginning of the world. "Come
 hither, dear children," he would say, "if you will be taught and
 advised, I will give you sound instruction as to how we are to fear
 God and become his children. Who desires peace and comfort?" "Oh, who
 would not desire peace and comfort?" cries the world. For these
 everyone seeks and strives, and all the efforts of the world are
 directed toward this end.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN'S PEACE.
 
 28. There are two ways to the goal of peace. One is that chosen by
 the world. The world seeks to obtain peace by preserving its own with
 violence. It desires the death of all who oppose it and will suffer
 injury or evil in word or deed from no one. This method, it is true,
 is appointed to governmental authority. It is the duty of civil
 rulers to faithfully employ it to arrest and hinder evil as far as
 possible. But they can never wholly restrain evil nor punish every
 offense. Much wickedness will remain, particularly secret evil, which
 must punish itself, either by repentance here or in hell hereafter.
 By this procedure Christians will not accomplish for themselves any
 personal advantage; the world is too wicked and it will not give them
 support.
 
 29. Therefore, if you desire peace for yourself personally,
 particularly as a Christian, you must choose another way. The Psalm
 shows it to you when it says: "Refrain thy tongue from evil, and thy
 lips that they speak no guile." This injunction really applies to
 doctrine, meaning that we are to abide by the true Word of God and
 not to allow ourselves to be seduced by false teaching. But Peter
 here extends the application to the outward life and conduct of
 Christians in the work, the circumstances being such as to call for
 this admonition in the matter of refraining the tongue. On account of
 the faith and confession for which men are called Christians, they
 must suffer much; they are endangered, hated, persecuted, oppressed
 and harassed by the whole world. Christ foretold (Mt 10, 22): "Ye
 shall be hated of all men for my name's sake." Easily, then,
 Christians, might believe they have cause to return evil, and being
 still flesh and blood mortals, they are inevitably moved to be angry
 and to curse, or to forsake their confession and doctrine and with
 unbelievers to join the false church with its idolatrous teaching.
 Here the Psalm admonishes: Dear Christian, let not all this move you
 to rave, curse, blaspheme and revile again, but abide in the blessing
 prepared for you to inherit; for you will not by violence remedy
 matters or obtain any help. The world will remain as it is, and will
 continue to hate and persecute the godly and believing. Of what use
 is it for you to hate, chafe and curse against its attitude? You only
 disturb your own heart with bitterness, and deprive yourself thereby
 of the priceless blessing bestowed upon you.
 
 30. We have the same teaching in the fourth verse of Psalm 4, which
 comforts saints and strengthens them against the temptation and
 provocation to anger and impatience which they must experience in the
 world. "Be ye angry," David says, "and sin not: commune with your own
 heart upon your bed, and be still." That is, although according to
 the nature of flesh and blood you fret because you are compelled to
 witness the prosperity of the world in its ungodly life and
 wickedness, and how it spites, despises and persecutes you with pride
 and insolence, nevertheless let not yourselves be easily provoked;
 let wrong, displeasure, vexation and worry remain outside the inner
 life; let them affect only the outward life, body and possessions. By
 no means let them become rooted in your heart. Still your hearts and
 content yourselves, and regard all this vexation as not worth losing
 sleep over. If you desire to serve God truly and to render acceptable
 sacrifice to him, then with faith in his Word place your hope in him
 as your dear Father who cares for you, hears you and will wondrously
 support you.
 
 
 GUARDING THE LIPS.
 
 31. But the psalmist's additional words, "Refrain your lips that they
 speak no guile," refer, as I have said, primarily to confession of
 the doctrine; but there is another thought: When one is prompted to
 anger and to complaint about injury and wrong, in his impatience and
 irritation he cannot speak fairly concerning the matter of offense,
 but invariably exaggerates. So it is with anger and retaliation. One
 receiving but a pin-point wound will fly into a passion and be ready
 to break the offender's head. The individual that suffers a single
 adverse word immediately proceeds to abuse and slander in the extreme
 his opponent. In short, an angry heart knows no moderation and cannot
 equally repay, but must make of a splinter, even a mote, a great
 beam, or must fan a tiny spark into a volcano of flame, by
 retaliating with reviling and cursing. Yet it will not admit that it
 does wrong. It would, if possible, actually murder the offender, thus
 committing a greater wrong than it has suffered.
 
 32. So wicked and unjust is human nature that when offended it stops
 not with equal measure in retribution; it goes beyond and in its
 anger and revenge spares neither the neighbor's honor nor his body
 and life. James 1, 20 says: "The wrath of man worketh not the
 righteousness of God"; that is, it suffers not a man to abide in his
 faith and good conscience. But official indignation, which is God's
 wrath, does not so. It seeks not the destruction of man, but only the
 punishment of the actual fault. Man's anger and revenge, so wicked
 and insatiable are they, return ten blows for one, or even double
 that number, and repay a single abusive word with a hundred.
 
 33. So Peter admonishes you to restrain your tongues, to curb them,
 lest they suddenly escape your control and sin with wicked words,
 doing injury double that you have received. Guard your lips that your
 mouth utter not guile or falsehood through your anger, and that it
 may not calumniate, abuse and slander your neighbor contrary to truth
 and justice and in violation of the eighth commandment. Such conduct
 is, before God and man, unbecoming a Christian and leads to that most
 disgraceful vice of slander, which God supremely hates. It is the
 devil's own, whence he has his name of liar or slanderer--diabolus,
 or devil.
 
 
 GOOD WORKS.
 
 34. The Psalm says further: "Turn away from evil and do good"; that
 is, beware lest on account of the wickedness of another you also
 become wicked, for anger and revenge meditate only harm and
 wickedness. Therefore be all the more diligent to do good, if you
 can, that your heart may retain its honor and joy and that you may
 abide in righteousness, and not fall from God's grace and from
 obedience to him into the service of the devil. By anger and revenge
 the devil tempts you, endeavoring to get you again into his toils and
 to embitter your heart and conscience until you shall exceed others
 in sin.
 
 35. "Seek peace and pursue it," continues the apostle. This is a
 sublime exhortation, and faithful, divine counsel. You must not
 think, Peter would say, that peace will run after you, or that the
 world--much less the devil--will bring it into your house. Rather you
 will find the very opposite true. From without strife will be carried
 to you in bales, and within your own heart will be kindled anger and
 bitterness to fill you with everlasting disquiet. Therefore if you
 desire peace, wait not until other people help you to obtain it, nor
 until you create it for yourself by force and revenge. Begin with
 yourself. Turn from the evil to the good. Even undergo suffering to
 provide your heart with the peace which endures in spite of all that
 would rob you of it. Strive ever to keep your heart firm in the
 resolve: I will not be angry nor seek revenge, but will commit my
 affairs to God and to those whose duty it is to punish evil and
 wrong-doing. As for my enemy, may God convert and enlighten him. And
 however much more of violence and wrong I may suffer, I will not
 allow my heart to be robbed of its peace.
 
 36. Notice, the way to preserve peace and to see good days even in
 evil times is to keep a silent tongue and a quiet heart through the
 comfort of divine grace and blessing. No outward occasion may be
 given for strife, but always peace is to be sought with good words,
 works and prayers. We must even pursue peace, follow after it, with
 genuine and strong suffering. Thus we preserve it by force. In no
 other way can a Christian see good days and hold fast his blessing.
 Remember you must make strenuous effort if you would not reject your
 blessing nor be influenced by another to carelessly lie and otherwise
 sin with your tongue. Flesh and blood are weak and sluggish in the
 matter of preserving peace, therefore Peter strengthens his
 exhortation and further encourages us by the promise of God's help
 and protection for the faithful and his punishment of their enemies.
 He says:
 
 "For the eyes of the Lord are upon the righteous, and his ears unto
 their supplication."
 
 37. Inscribe this verse upon your heart in firm faith and see if it
 does not bring you peace and blessings. Try to believe that God sits
 above, sleepless and with his vigilant eye ever upon you. With
 watchful vision he beholds the righteous as they suffer violence and
 wrong. Why will you complain and become discouraged by reason of the
 harm and grief you experience, when the gracious eyes of the true
 Judge and God are upon you and his intent is to help you? All the
 wealth of the world would I give, if I might, to purchase that
 watchful care, or rather to obtain the requisite faith; for surely
 the lack is not in his regarding, but in our faith.
 
 
 GOD OVER ALL.
 
 38. More than this, God's ears, the apostle tells us, are also open
 to the prayers of the righteous. As he looks upon you with gracious,
 winning eyes, so also are his ears alert to even the faintest sound.
 He hears your complaint, your sighing and prayer, and hears, too,
 willingly and with pleasure; as soon as you open your mouth, your
 prayer is heard and answered.
 
 39. Again, Peter says: "The face of the Lord is upon them that do
 evil." True, God's eyes are upon the righteous, but nevertheless he
 sees also the others. In this case he beholds not with a friendly
 look or gracious countenance, but with a displeased and wrathful
 face. When a man is angry the forehead frowns, the nostrils dilate
 and the eyes flash. Such a manifestation of anger are we to
 understand by the Scripture when it refers here to "the face of the
 Lord." On the other hand it illustrates the pleased and gracious
 aspect of God by "the eyes of the Lord."
 
 40. Now, why is "the face of the Lord" upon evil-doers and what is
 its effect? Certainly God's purpose is not to heed or to help them,
 to bestow blessing or success upon their evil-doing. His purpose is,
 according to the succeeding words in the psalm, "to cut off the
 remembrance of them from the earth." This is a terrible, an appalling
 sentence, before which a heart may well be prostrated as from a
 thunderbolt. And ungodly hearts would be thus appalled were they not
 so hardened as to despise God's Word.
 
 41. Notwithstanding the indifference of the wicked, the sentence is
 passed. Verily it is no jest with God. It illustrates how sincerely
 he cares for the righteous and how he will avenge them on the wicked,
 toward whom his countenance bespeaks punishment in due time and the
 cutting off of their memory from the earth. In contrast, the
 righteous, because they have feared God and abode in their piety
 though suffering for it, shall, even here upon earth, live to see
 blessing and prosperity upon their children's children. Although for
 a time the company of the wicked conduct themselves with pride upon
 the earth, and imagine themselves secure beyond the possibility of
 being unseated, nevertheless when their hour comes they are suddenly
 hurled down from earth into the abyss of hell and must suffer the
 righteous to remain in possession of the earth. So testifies Christ
 in Matthew 5, 5, and Psalm 37 more fully explains the matter.
 
 42. It is proven by all the examples of Scripture and also by the
 experience of the whole world from the beginning, that God casts down
 those who seek only to injure. They who have despised God's threats
 and angry countenance with security and defiance have at last
 experienced the fulfillment of these warnings and perished thereby.
 King Saul thought to destroy godly David, to exterminate his root and
 branch and blot out his name as if he had been a rebellious, accursed
 man. But God effected the very opposite. Because David in his
 sufferings and persecution walked in the fear of God and trusted him
 with simplicity, desiring no harm to his enemy, God's gracious eye
 was ever upon him and preserved him from that enemy. On the other
 hand, the angry face of God was bent upon King Saul, and before David
 was aware of it the king had fallen, and his whole family met ruin
 with him; they were obliged to surrender crown and kingdom to the
 persecuted David.
 
 43. Christians should strengthen their faith with the comforting
 thought that God's gracious countenance is over them and he turns eye
 and ear toward them; and that on the other hand he looks with angry
 face upon their enemies and those seeking to injure, and will take a
 hand in their game, obliging them either to refrain from their
 evil-doing, or to perish by it. Such retribution is certain. No one
 can live long without proving by his own experience and that of other
 men the truth of the proverb, "Right will assert itself." However, we
 lack in faith and cannot wait God's hour. We think he delays too long
 and that we suffer too much. But in reality his time will come
 speedily, and we can well wait and endure if we believe in God, who
 but grants our enemies a brief opportunity to be converted. But their
 appointed hour is already at hand and they will not escape if it
 overtakes them without repentance.
 
 "And who is he that will harm you, if ye be zealous of that which is
 good? But even if ye should suffer for righteousness' sake, blessed
 are ye."
 
 44. According to Peter's words here, you have a very great advantage
 over all your enemies, whoever they be, in being richly endowed by
 God with eternal blessing. You know he will protect, support and
 avenge you, hence you abide in your faith and godliness. Although
 your adversaries think to trouble and harm you, they can do you no
 real injury whatever they effect. For wherein can persecution harm if
 you strive for godliness and abide in it? Not by malice, might and
 violence can your enemies take from you, or diminish, your piety and
 God's grace, his help and blessing. And even from all the bodily and
 temporal harm they can inflict, you suffer no loss. For the more they
 seek to injure you, the more they hasten their own punishment and
 destruction, and the greater is your recompense from God. By the very
 fact that they slander, disgrace, persecute and trouble you, they
 multiply your blessing with God and further your cause, for God must
 the sooner consider your case, supporting you and overthrowing them.
 They but prepare your reward and benefit by their wicked, venomous
 hatred, their envy, anger and fury. At the same time they effect for
 themselves conditions the very reverse. Being condemned by their own
 evil consciences, they cannot in their hearts enjoy one good day, one
 peaceful hour; and they heap up for themselves God's wrath and
 punishment.
 
 45. Indeed, you are all the more blessed, temporally and eternally,
 Peter declares, for the very reason that you suffer for
 righteousness' sake. You are so to regard the situation and to praise
 and thank God for your suffering. The apostle looks upon tribulation
 in this light and exalts it as supreme blessedness and a glorious
 thing. Christ says in Matthew 5, 11-12: "Blessed are ye when men
 shall reproach you, and persecute you, and say all manner of evil
 against you falsely, for my sake. Rejoice and be exceeding glad: for
 great is your reward in heaven." Oh, your adversaries should purchase
 a little of this comfort regardless of cost and boast of suffering a
 little for the sake of righteousness! Could they understand the
 promise and be worthy of it, how intensely might they desire to have
 suffered all and much more than they thought to inflict upon you, if
 only they might be blessed and prove the comfort of this precious,
 divine promise!
 
 "Fear not their fear, neither be troubled; but sanctify in your
 hearts Christ as Lord."
 
 46. Here again Peter resorts to Scripture and cites a verse from the
 prophet Isaiah (ch. 8, 12-13) where he admonishes God's people not to
 be terror-stricken by the wrath and threats of men, but firmly and
 confidently to trust in God. The prophet speaks similarly in chapter
 51, verse 7: "Fear ye not the reproach of men, neither be ye dismayed
 at their revilings." As if he would say: Why will you permit
 yourselves to be disturbed by the persecutions of men, however great,
 mighty and terrible enemies they may be, when you are blessed and
 happy in God to the extent that all creatures must pronounce you
 blessed? Moreover, you know the eyes of your God behold you and his
 ears are open to your cry, and whatever you desire and pray for is
 heard and granted. More than this, your adversaries are threatened by
 his angry face. What are all men--tyrants, pope, Turk, Tartars, ay,
 the devil himself--compared to this Lord, and what can they do
 against him, when and wheresoever he chooses to show his power? They
 are but as a straw to a mighty thunderbolt which makes the earth
 tremble. Therefore, if you are indeed Christians and believe in God
 you ought in no wise to fear all these adversaries, but rather,
 joyfully and with scornful courage to despise their defiance, their
 threatening and rage, as something utterly harmless to you; they are
 but effecting their own destruction in hurling themselves at the
 Majesty before which all creatures must tremble.
 
 
 TRUST IN GOD ENJOINED.
 
 47. But this you are to do: Sanctify God; that is, regard and honor
 him as holy. This is nothing else than to believe his Word; be
 confident that in God you have truly one who, if you suffer for
 righteousness' sake, neither forgets nor forsakes, but graciously
 looks upon you and purposes to give his support and to revenge you on
 your enemies. Such faith and confession honors him as the true God,
 upon whom man can confidently and joyfully call for help, reposing
 his whole trust in him upon the authority of his sure Word and
 promise, which cannot deceive or fail.
 
 48. In contrast, unbelievers cannot sanctify God; they cannot render
 him due honor, although they may talk much of him and display much
 divine worship. They do not accept God's Word as the truth, but
 always remain in doubt. In the hour of suffering they deem themselves
 utterly forgotten and forsaken by the Lord. Therefore they murmur and
 fret, being very impatient and disobedient toward God. They rashly
 seek to protect and revenge themselves by their own power. That very
 conduct betrays them as beings without a God, as blind, miserable,
 condemned heathen. Such are the great multitude of Turks, Jews,
 Papists and unbelieving saints today throughout the world.
 
 
 
 
 _Sixth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Romans 6, 3-11.
 
 3 Or are ye ignorant that all we who were baptized into Christ Jesus
 were baptized into his death? 4 We were buried therefore with him
 through baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised from the
 dead through the glory of the Father, so we also might walk in
 newness of life. 5 For if we have become united with him in the
 likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness of his
 resurrection; 6 knowing this, that our old man was crucified with
 him, that the body of sin might be done away, that so we should no
 longer be in bondage to sin; 7 for he that hath died is justified
 from sin. 8 But if we died with Christ, we believe that we shall also
 live with him; 9 knowing that Christ being raised from the dead dieth
 no more; death no more hath dominion over him. 10 For the death that
 he died, he died unto sin once: but the life that he liveth, he
 liveth unto God. 11 Even so reckon ye also yourselves to be dead unto
 sin, but alive unto God in Christ Jesus.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO CHRISTIAN LIVING.
 
 1. In this epistle lesson Paul gives Christians instruction
 concerning the Christian life on earth, and connects with it the hope
 of the future and eternal life, in view of which they have been
 baptized and become Christians. He makes of our earthly life a
 death--a grave--with the understanding, however, that henceforth the
 risen man and the newness of life should be found in us. And he
 treats of this doctrine because of an error that always prevails:
 When we preach that upon us is bestowed grace and the forgiveness of
 sins, without any merit on our part, people are disposed to regard
 themselves as free from obligation and will do no works except those
 to which their own desires prompt them. This was Saint Paul's
 experience when he so strongly commended the grace of Christ and its
 consolation (ch. 5, 20), declaring that "where sin abounded, grace
 did abound more exceedingly," and that where there are many and great
 sins, there also reigns great, abundant and rich grace. The rude
 crowd cried: Oh, is it true that great grace follows upon great sin?
 In that case we will cheerfully load ourselves with sin so that we
 may receive the greater grace.
 
 
 GRACE DOES NOT GIVE LICENSE TO SIN.
 
 2. Such argument Paul now confutes. He says: It is not the intention
 of the Gospel to teach sin or to allow it; it teaches the very
 opposite--how we may escape from sin and from the awful wrath of God
 which it incurs. Escape is not effected by any doings of our own, but
 by the fact that God, out of pure grace, forgives us our sins for his
 Son's sake; for God finds in us nothing but sin and condemnation. How
 then can this doctrine give occasion or permission to sin when it is
 so diametrically opposed to it and teaches how it is to be blotted
 out and put away?
 
 3. Paul does not teach that grace is acquired through sin, nor that
 sin brings grace; he says quite the opposite--that "the wrath of God
 is revealed from heaven against all ungodliness and unrighteousness
 of men," Rom 1, 18. But because the sins of men which are taken away
 are so grievous and numerous, the grace which drowns and destroys
 them must be mighty and abundant also. Where there is great thirst, a
 great draft is needed to quench it. Where there is a mighty
 conflagration, powerful streams of water are necessary to extinguish
 it. In cases of severe illness, strong medicine is essential to a
 cure. But these facts do not give us authority to say: Let us
 cheerfully drink to satiety that we may become more thirsty for good
 wine; or, Let us injure ourselves and make ourselves ill that
 medicine may do us more good. Still less does it follow that we may
 heap up and multiply sins for the purpose of receiving more abundant
 grace. Grace is opposed to sin and destroys it; how then should it
 strengthen or increase it?
 
 4. Therefore he begins his sermon by inquiring, in this sixth chapter
 (verses 1-3): "What shall we say then? Shall we continue in sin, that
 grace may abound? God forbid. We who died to sin, how shall we any
 longer live therein?" In other words: How is it possible that because
 grace should destroy sin ye should live unto sin? And then, further
 to illustrate this, he says:
 
 "Or are ye ignorant that all we who were baptized into Christ Jesus
 were baptized into his death?"
 
 5. He speaks here in figurative language to clearly and forcibly
 impress this matter upon us; ordinarily it would have been sufficient
 for him to ask: "We who died to sin, how shall we any longer live
 therein?" that is to say, Inasmuch as ye have been saved from sin
 through grace, it is not possible that grace should command you to
 continue in sin, for it is the business of grace to destroy sin. Now,
 in the figurative words above quoted, he wishes to vividly remind us
 what Christ has bestowed upon us. He would say to us: Do but call to
 mind why you are Christians--you have been baptized into Christ. Do
 you know why and whereunto you have been baptized, and what it
 signifies that you have been baptized with water? The meaning is that
 not only have you there been washed and cleansed in soul through the
 forgiveness of sins, but your flesh and blood have been condemned,
 given over unto death, to be drowned, and your life on earth to be a
 daily dying unto sin. For your baptism is simply an overwhelming by
 grace--a gracious overwhelming--whereby sin in you is drowned; so may
 you remain subjects of grace and not be destroyed by the wrath of God
 because of your sin. Therefore, if you let yourself be baptized, you
 give yourself over to gracious drowning and merciful slaying at the
 hands of your God, and say to him: Drown and overwhelm me, dear Lord,
 for gladly would I henceforth, with thy Son, be dead to sin, that I
 may, with him, also live through grace.
 
 
 THE POWER OF BAPTISM.
 
 6. When he says, "All we who were baptized into Christ Jesus were
 baptized into his death," and again, "We were buried therefore with
 him through baptism into death," he speaks in his own Pauline style
 concerning the power of baptism, which derives its efficacy from the
 death of Christ. By his death he has paid for and taken away our
 sins; his death has been an actual strangling and putting to death of
 sin, and it no longer has dominion over him. So we, also, through his
 death have obtained forgiveness of sins; that sin may not condemn us,
 we die unto sin through that power which Christ--because we are
 baptized into him--imparts to and works in us.
 
 7. Yea, he further declares that we are not only baptized into his
 death, but, by the same baptism, we are buried with him into death;
 for in his death he took our sins with him into the grave, burying
 them completely and leaving them there. And it follows that, for
 those who through baptism are in Christ, sin is and shall remain
 completely destroyed and buried; but we, through his
 resurrection--which, by faith, gives us the victory over sin and
 death and bestows upon us everlasting righteousness and life--should
 henceforth walk in newness of life.
 
 8. Having these things through baptism, we dare no longer obey--live
 unto--the sin which still dwells in our flesh and blood in this life;
 we must daily strangle it so that it may have no power nor life in us
 if we desire to be found in the estate and life of Christ. For he
 died unto sin, destroying it by his death and burying it in his
 grave; and he acquired life and the victory over sin and death by his
 resurrection, and bestows them upon us by baptism. The fact that
 Christ himself had to die for sin is evidence of the severe wrath of
 God against sin. Sin had to be put to death and laid away in the
 grave in the body of Christ. Thereby God shows us that he will not
 countenance sin in us, but has given us Christ and baptism for the
 purpose of putting to death and burying sin in our bodies.
 
 9. Thus Paul shows us in these words what has been effected by
 Christ's death and burial, and what is the signification of our being
 buried with him. In the first place, Christ was buried that he might,
 through forgiveness, cover up and destroy our sin, both that which we
 have actually committed and that which is inherent in us; he would
 not have it inculpate and condemn us. In the second place, he was
 buried that he might, through the Holy Spirit, mortify this flesh and
 blood with its inherent sinful lusts; they must no longer have
 dominion over us, but must be subject to the Spirit until we are
 utterly freed from them.
 
 10. Thus, we still lie with Christ in the grave according to the
 flesh. Although it be true that we have the forgiveness of sins, that
 we are God's children and possess salvation, yet all this is not
 perceptible to our own senses or to the world. It is hidden in Christ
 by faith until the judgment day. For we do not yet experience in
 ourselves such righteousness, such holiness, such life and such
 salvation as God's Word describes and as faith expects to find.
 Wherefore Paul says in Colossians 3, 3-4 (as we have heard in the
 Easter sermons), "Your life is hid with Christ in God. When Christ,
 who is our life, shall be manifested, then shall ye also with him be
 manifested in glory."
 
 11. On the other hand, we are outwardly oppressed with the cross and
 sufferings, and with the persecution and torments of the world and
 the devil, as with the weight of a heavy stone upon us, subduing our
 old sinful nature and checking us against antagonizing the Spirit and
 committing other sins.
 
 "For if we have become united [planted together] with him in the
 likeness of his death, we shall be also in the likeness of his
 resurrection; knowing this, that our old man was crucified with him,
 that the body of sin might be done away, that so we should no longer
 be in bondage to sin; for he that hath died is justified from sin."
 
 12. This is another distinctly apostolic discourse. Being baptized
 into Christ's death and buried with him, to which Paul had just
 referred, he here calls being united, or planted together, with
 Christ in the likeness of his death. Christ's death and resurrection
 and our baptism are intimately united with, and related to, one
 another. Baptism is not to be regarded a mere empty sign, as
 Anabaptists erroneously hold. In it is embodied the power of both
 Christ's death and resurrection. Hence Paul says, "we are planted
 together with him," engrafted into him as a member of his body, so
 that he is a power in us and his death works in us. Through baptism
 he dedicates us to himself and imparts to us the power of his death
 and resurrection, to the end that both death and life may follow in
 us. Hence our sins are crucified through his death, taken away, that
 they may finally die in us and no longer live.
 
 13. Being placed under the water in baptism signifies that we die in
 Christ. Coming forth from the water teaches, and imparts to, us a new
 life in him, just as Christ remained not in death, but was raised
 again to life. Such life should not and can not be a life of sin,
 because sin was crucified before in us and we had to die to it. It
 must be a new life of righteousness and holiness, Christ through his
 resurrection finally destroyed sin, because of which he had to die,
 and instead he brought to himself the true life of righteousness, and
 imparts it to us. Hence we are said to be planted together with
 Christ or united with him and become one, so that we both have in us
 the power of his death and resurrection. The fruits and results of
 this power will be found in us after we are baptized into him.
 
 14. The apostle speaks consolingly of the death of the Christian as a
 being planted, to show that the Christian's death and sufferings on
 earth are not really death and harm, but a planting unto life; being
 redeemed, by the resurrection, from death and sin, we shall live
 eternally. For that which is planted is not planted unto death and
 destruction, but planted that it may sprout and grow. So Christ was
 planted, through death, unto life; for not until he was released from
 this mortal life and from the sin which rested on him and brought him
 into death on our account, did he come into his divine glory and
 power. Since this planting begins in baptism, as said, and we by
 faith possess life in Christ, it is evident that this life must
 strike root in us and bear fruit. For that which is planted is not
 planted without purpose; it is to grow and bear fruit. So must we
 prove, by our new conversation and by our fruits, that we are planted
 in Christ unto life.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN GROWTH.
 
 15. Paul gives the reason for new growth. He says: "Knowing this,
 that our old man was crucified with him, that the body of sin might
 be done away, that so we should no longer be in bondage to sin." It
 does not become us, as baptized Christians, to desire to remain in
 our old sinful estate. That is already crucified with Christ; the
 sentence of condemnation upon it has been pronounced and carried out.
 For that is what being crucified means. Just so, Christ, in suffering
 crucifixion for our sins, bore the penalty of death and the wrath of
 God. Christ, innocent and sinless, being crucified for our sins, sin
 must be crucified in our body; it must be utterly condemned and
 destroyed, rendered lifeless and powerless. We dare not, then, in any
 wise serve sin nor consent to it. We must regard it as actually
 condemned, and with all our power we must resist it; we must subdue
 and put it to death.
 
 16. Paul here makes a distinction. He says, "Our old man was
 crucified with him [Christ]," and "that the body of sin might be done
 away." He intimates that the "old man" and "the body of sin" are two
 different things. By the term "old man" he means not only the
 body--the grossly sinful deeds which the body commits with its five
 senses--but the whole tree with all its fruits, the whole man as he
 is descended from Adam. In it are included body and soul, will,
 reason and understanding. Both inwardly and outwardly, it is still
 under the sway of unbelief, impiety and disobedience. Man is called
 old, not because of his years; for it is possible for a man to be
 young and strong and vigorous and yet to be without faith or a
 religious spirit, to despise God, to be greedy and vainglorious, or
 to live in pride or the conceit of wisdom and power. But he is called
 the old man because he is unconverted, unchanged from his original
 condition as a sinful descendant of Adam. The child of a day is
 included as well as the man of eighty years; we all are thus from our
 mother's womb. The more sins a man commits, the older and more unfit
 he is before God. This old man, Paul says, must be crucified--utterly
 condemned, executed, put out of the way, even here in this life. For
 where he still remains in his strength, it is impossible that faith
 or the spirit should be; and thus man remains in his sins, drowned
 under the wrath of God, troubled with an evil conscience which
 condemns him and keeps him out of God's kingdom.
 
 17. The "new man" is one who has turned to God in repentance, one who
 has a new heart and understanding, who has changed his belief and
 through the power of the Holy Spirit lives in accordance with the
 Word and will of God. This new man must be found in all Christians;
 it begins in baptism or in repentance and conversion. It resists and
 subdues the old man and its sinful lusts through the power of the
 Holy Spirit. Paul declares, "They that are of Christ Jesus have
 crucified the flesh with the passions and the lusts," Gal 5, 24.
 
 18. Now, although in those who are new men, the old man is crucified,
 there yet, Paul says, remains in them in this life "the body of sin."
 By this we understand the remaining lusts of the old man, which are
 still felt to be active in the flesh and blood, and which would fain
 resist the spirit. But inasmuch as the head and life of sin are
 destroyed, these lusts cannot harm the Christian. Still the Christian
 must take care not to become obedient to them, lest the old man come
 to power again. The new man must keep the upper hand; the remaining
 sinful lusts must be weakened and subdued. And this body of ours must
 finally decay and turn to dust, thereby utterly annihilating sin in
 it.
 
 19. Now, he says, if ye be dead to sin under the reign of the spirit
 and the new man, and adjudged to death under the reign of the body,
 ye must no longer permit sin to bring you under its dominion, lest it
 inculpate and condemn you. But ye must live as those who are wholly
 released from it, over whom it no longer has any right or power. For
 we read, "He that hath died is justified from sin." This is said of
 all who are dead. He that has died has paid for his sin; he need not
 die for it again, for he no longer commits sin and evil deeds. If sin
 be destroyed in man by the Spirit, and the flesh also is dead and
 gone, man is completely released and freed from sin.
 
 20. Paul comprehends the whole existence of the Christian on earth in
 the death of Christ, and represents it as dead and buried, in the
 coffin; that is, the Christian has ceased from the life of sin, and
 has nothing more to do with it. He speaks of sin as being dead unto
 the Christian and of the latter as being dead unto sin for the reason
 that Christians no longer take part in the sinful life of the world.
 And, too, they are doubly dead. First, spiritually they are dead unto
 sin. And this, though painful and bitter to flesh and blood, is a
 blessed, a comfortable and happy dying, sweet and delightful, for it
 produces a heavenly life, pure and perfect. Secondly, they are
 physically dead--the body dies. But this is not really death; rather
 a gentle, soothing sleep. Therefore ye are, Paul would say, beyond
 measure happy. In Christ ye have already escaped death by dying unto
 sin; that death ye need die no more. It--the first death, which ye
 have inherited from Adam through sin--is already taken away from you.
 That being the real, the bitter and eternal death, ye are
 consequently freed from the necessity of dying. At the same time
 there is a death, or rather only the semblance of one, which ye must
 suffer because ye are yet on earth and are the descendants of Adam.
 
 
 SPIRITUAL AND PHYSICAL RESURRECTION.
 
 21. The first death, inherited from Adam, is done away with, changed
 into a spiritual dying unto sin, by reason of which the soul no
 longer consents to sin and the body no longer commits it. Thus, in
 place of the death which sin has brought upon us, eternal life is
 already begun in you. Ye are now freed from the dreadful damning
 death; then accept the sweet, holy and blessed death unto sin, that
 ye may beware of sin and no longer serve it. Such is to be the result
 of the death of Christ into which ye are baptized; Christ has died
 and has commanded you to be baptized in order that sin might be
 drowned in you.
 
 22. The other, the "little death," is that outward, physical death.
 In the Scriptures it is called a sleep. It is imposed upon the flesh,
 because, so long as we live on earth, the flesh never ceases to
 resist the spirit and its life. Paul says: "The flesh lusteth against
 the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh; for these are contrary
 the one to the other; that ye may not do the things that ye would."
 Gal 5, 17. The spirit, or soul, says: I am dead unto sin and will not
 sin any more. But the flesh says: I am not dead and must make use of
 my life while I have it. The spirit declares: I believe that God has
 forgiven my sins and taken them away from me through Christ. But the
 flesh asks: What do I know of God or his will? The spirit resolves: I
 must be meek, pure, chaste, humble, patient, and seek the future
 life. But the flesh in reply makes a loud outcry: Away with your
 heaven! if only I had enough of bread and money and property here!
 Thus the flesh does continually, as long as it lives here; it draws
 and drags sin after itself; it is rebellious and refuses to die.
 Therefore God must finally put it to death before it becomes dead
 unto sin.
 
 23. And after all, it is but a gentle and easy death. It is truly
 only a sleep. Since soul and spirit are no longer dead, the body
 shall not remain dead; it shall come forth again, cleansed and
 purified, on the last day, to be united with the soul. Then shall it
 be a gentle, pure and obedient body, without sin or evil lust.
 
 24. These words of Paul are an admirable Christian picture of death,
 representing it not as an awful thing, but as something comforting
 and pleasant to contemplate. For how could Paul present a more
 attractive description than when he describes it as stripped of its
 power and repulsiveness and makes it the medium through which we
 attain life and joy? What is more desirable than to be freed from sin
 and the punishment and misery it involves, and to possess a joyful,
 cheerful heart and conscience? For where there is sin and real
 death--the sense of sin and God's wrath--there are such terror and
 dismay that man feels like rushing through iron walls. Christ says,
 in Luke 23, 30, quoting from the prophet Hosea (ch. 10, v. 8), that
 such a one shall pray that the mountains and the hills may fall on
 him and cover him.
 
 25. That dreadful death which is called in the Scriptures the second
 death is taken away from the Christian through Christ, and is
 swallowed up in his life. In place of it there is left a miniature
 death, a death in which the bitterness is covered up. In it the
 Christian dies according to the flesh; that is, he passes from
 unbelief to faith, from the remaining sin to eternal righteousness,
 from woes and sadness and tribulation to perfect eternal joy. Such a
 death is sweeter and better than any life on earth. For not all the
 life and wealth and delight and joy of the world can make man as
 happy as he will be when he dies with a conscience at peace with God
 and with the sure faith and comfort of everlasting life. Therefore
 truly may this death of the body be said to be only a falling into a
 sweet and gentle slumber. The body ceases from sin. It no longer
 hinders or harasses the spirit. It is cleansed and freed from sin and
 comes forth again in the resurrection clothed with the obedience, joy
 and life which the spirit imparts.
 
 26. The only trouble is that the stupid flesh cannot understand this.
 It is terrified by the mask of death, and imagines that it is still
 suffering the old death; for it does not understand the spiritual
 dying unto sin. It judges only by outward appearance. It sees that
 man perishes, decays under the ground and is consumed. Having only
 this abominable and hideous mask before its eyes, it is afraid of
 death. But its fear is only because of its lack of understanding. If
 it knew, it would by no means be afraid or shudder at death. Our
 reason is like a little child who has become frightened by a bugbear
 or a mask, and cannot be lulled to sleep; or like a poor man, bereft
 of his senses, who imagines when brought to his couch that he is
 being put into the water and drowned. What we do not understand we
 cannot intelligently deal with. If, for instance, a man has a penny
 and imagines it to be a five-dollar gold piece, he is just as proud
 of it as if it were a real gold piece; if he loses it he is as
 grieved as if he had lost that more valuable coin. But it does not
 follow that he has suffered such loss; he has simply deluded himself
 with a false idea.
 
 27. Thus it is not the reality of death and burial that terrifies;
 the terror lies in the flesh and blood, which cannot understand that
 death and the grave mean nothing more than that God lays us--like a
 little child is laid in a cradle or an easy bed--where we shall
 sweetly sleep till the judgment day. Flesh and blood shudders in fear
 at that which gives no reason for it, and finds comfort and joy in
 that which really gives no comfort or joy. Thus Christians must be
 harassed by their ignorant and insane flesh, because it will not
 understand its own good or harm. They must verily fight against it as
 long as they live, at the cost of much pain and weariness.
 
 28. There is none so perfect that he does not flee from and shudder
 at death and the grave. Paul complains and confesses of himself, and
 in his own person of all Christians: "For that which I do I know not:
 for not what I would, that do I practice." Rom 7, 15. In other words:
 By the spirit, I am well aware that when this body comes to die God
 simply lays me to rest in sweetest slumber, and I would gladly have
 my flesh to understand this; but I cannot bring it to it. The spirit
 indeed is willing and desires bodily death as a gentle sleep. It does
 not consider it to be death; it knows no such thing as death. It
 knows that it is freed from sin and that where there is no sin there
 is no death--life only. But the flesh halts and hesitates, and is in
 constant dread lest I die and perish in the abyss. It will not allow
 itself to be tamed and brought into that obedience and into that
 consoling view of death which the spirit exercises. Even Saint Paul
 cries out in anxiety of spirit: "Wretched man that I am! who shall
 deliver me out of the body of this death?" Rom 7, 24. Now we see what
 is meant by the statement, "The flesh lusteth against the Spirit."
 The flesh must be dragged along and compelled by the spirit to
 obediently follow, in spite of its resistance and trembling. It must
 be forced into submission until it is finally overcome. Just so the
 mother so deals with the child that is fretful and restless that she
 constrains it to sleep.
 
 29. Paul says, "Knowing this, that our old man was crucified"--that
 is, we know that, in soul and spirit, we are already dead unto
 sin--"that the body of sin might be done away." The meaning is:
 Because the body does not willingly and cheerfully follow the spirit,
 but resists and would fain linger in the old life of sin, it is
 already sentenced, compelled to follow and to be put to death that
 sin may be destroyed in it.
 
 30. He does not say that the body is destroyed as soon as a man has
 been baptized and is become a Christian, but that the body of sin is
 destroyed. The body which before was obstinate and disobedient to the
 spirit is now changed; it is no longer a body of sin but of
 righteousness and newness of life. So he adds, "that we should no
 longer be in bondage to sin."
 
 "But if we died with Christ, we believe that we shall also live with
 him; knowing that Christ being raised from the dead dieth no more;
 death no more hath dominion over him. For the death that he died, he
 died unto sin once; but the life that he liveth, he liveth unto God."
 
 31. Here he leads us out of the death and grave of sin to the
 resurrection of spirit and body. When we die--spiritually unto sin,
 and physically to the world and self--what doth it profit us? Is
 there nothing else in store for the Christian but to die and be
 buried? By all means yes, he says; we are sure by faith that we also
 shall live, even as Christ rose from death and the grave and lives.
 For we have died with him, or, as stated above, "we have become
 united with him in the likeness of his death." By his death he has
 destroyed our sin and death; therefore we share in his resurrection
 and life. There shall be no more sin and death in our spirit or body,
 just as there is no more death in him. Christ, having once died and
 been raised again, dieth no more. There is nothing to die for. He has
 accomplished everything. He has destroyed the sin for which he died,
 and has swallowed up death in victory. And that he now lives means
 that he lives in everlasting righteousness, life and majesty. So,
 when ye have once passed through both deaths, the spiritual death
 unto sin and the gentle death of the body, death can no more touch
 you, no more reign over you.
 
 32. This, then, is our comfort for the timidity of the poor, weak
 flesh which still shudders at death. If thou art a Christian, then
 know that thy Lord Jesus Christ, being raised from the dead, dieth no
 more; death hath no more dominion over him. Therefore, death hath no
 more dominion over thee, who art baptized into him. Satan is defied
 and dared to try all his powers and terrors on Christ; for we are
 assured, "Death no more hath dominion over him." Death may awaken
 anger, malice, melancholy, fear and terror in our poor, weak flesh,
 but it hath no more dominion over Christ. On the contrary, death must
 submit to the dominion of Christ, in his own person and in us. We
 have died unto sin; that is, we have been redeemed from the sting and
 power, the control, of death. Christ has fully accomplished the work
 by which he obtained power over death, and has bestowed that power
 upon us, that in him we should reign over death. So Paul says in
 conclusion:
 
 "Even so reckon ye also yourselves to be dead unto sin, but alive
 unto God in Christ Jesus."
 
 33. "Reckon ye also yourselves," he says. Ye, as Christians, should
 be conscious of these things, and should conduct yourselves in all
 your walk and conversation as those who are dead to sin and who give
 evidence of it to the world. Ye shall not serve sin, shall not follow
 after it, as if it had dominion over you. Ye shall live in newness of
 life, which means that ye shall lead a godly life, inwardly by faith
 and outwardly in your conduct; ye shall have power over sin until the
 flesh--the body--shall at last fall asleep, and thus both deaths be
 accomplished in you. Then there will remain nothing but life--no
 terror or fear of death and no more of its dominion.
 
 
 
 
 _Seventh Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Romans 6, 19-23.
 
 19 I speak after the manner of men because of the infirmity of your
 flesh: for as ye presented your members as servants to uncleanness
 and to iniquity unto iniquity, even so now present your members as
 servants to righteousness unto sanctification. 20 For when ye were
 servants of sin, ye were free in regard of righteousness. 21 What
 fruit then had ye at that time in the things whereof ye are now
 ashamed? for the end of those things is death. 22 But now being made
 free from sin and become servants to God, ye have your fruit unto
 sanctification, and the end eternal life. 23 For the wages of sin is
 death; but the free gift of God is eternal life in Christ Jesus our
 Lord.
 
 
 EXHORTATION TO RESIST SIN.
 
 1. The text properly should include several verses preceding. Paul
 has not yet concluded the subject of the epistle for last Sunday.
 There he urges that since we are baptized into Christ and believe, we
 should henceforth walk in a new life; that we are now dead to sin
 because we are in Christ, who by his death and resurrection has
 conquered and destroyed sin. He illustrates the power of Christ's
 death and resurrection by saying: "For sin shall not have dominion
 over you: for ye are not under law, but under grace." That is, being
 in Christ and possessed of the power of his resurrection--in other
 words, having God's grace and the forgiveness of sins--you can now
 readily resist sin. Although you may not perfectly fulfill the letter
 of the Law in its demands, yet it cannot condemn you as a sinner nor
 subject you to God's wrath.
 
 
 GOOD WORKS NOT FORBIDDEN.
 
 2. Then Paul presents again the question raised by the obstinate
 world when it encounters this doctrine. "What then?" he asks, "shall
 we sin because we are not under the law but under grace?" It is the
 perversity of the world that, when we preach about forgiveness of
 sins by pure grace and without merit of man, it should either say we
 forbid good works, or else try to draw the conclusion that man may
 continue to live in sin and follow his own pleasure; when the fact
 is, we should particularly strive to live a life the very reverse of
 sinful, that our doctrine may draw people to good works, unto the
 praise and honor and glory of God. Our doctrine, rightly apprehended,
 does not influence to pride and vice, but to humility and obedience.
 
 3. In affairs of temporal government, whether domestic or civil,
 judge or ruler, it is understood that he who asks for pardon
 confesses himself guilty, acknowledges his error and promises to
 reform--to transgress no more. For instance, when the judge extends
 mercy and pardon to the thief deserving of the gallows, the law is
 canceled by grace. Suppose now the thief continues in wrong-doing and
 boasts, "Now that I am under grace I may do as I please, I have no
 law to fear"; who would tolerate him? For though the law is indeed
 canceled for him and he receives not merited punishment, though grace
 delivers him from the rope and the sword, life is not granted him
 that he may continue to steal, to murder; rather he is supposed to
 become honest and virtuous. If he does not, the law will again
 overtake him and punish him as he deserves. In short, where grace
 fulfills the law, no one is for that reason given license to continue
 in wrong-doing; on the contrary, he is under increased obligation to
 avoid occasions of falling under condemnation of the law.
 
 4. Everyone can readily comprehend this principle in temporal things;
 no one is stupid enough to tolerate the idea of grace being granted
 to extend opportunity to do wrong. It is only the Gospel doctrine
 concerning God's grace and the forgiveness of sin that must suffer
 the slanderous misrepresentation that makes it abolish good works or
 give occasion for sin. We are told how God, in his unfathomable
 grace, has canceled the sentence of eternal death and hell fire
 which, according to the Law and divine judgment, we deserved, and has
 given us instead the freedom of life eternal; thus our life is purely
 of grace. Yet certainly we are not pardoned that we may live as
 before when, under condemnation and wrath, we incurred death. Rather,
 forgiveness is bestowed that we in appreciation of the sublimity and
 sanctity of God's unspeakably great blessing which delivers us from
 death unto life, should henceforth take heed that we lose it not;
 that we fall not from grace to pass again under judgment and the
 sentence of eternal death. We are to conduct ourselves as men made
 alive and saved.
 
 5. So Paul says in verse 16, "Know ye not, that to whom ye present
 yourselves as servants unto obedience, his servants ye are whom ye
 obey; whether of sin unto death, or of obedience unto righteousness?"
 Meaning, Since you now have, under grace, obtained forgiveness of sin
 and are become righteous, you owe it to God to live in obedience to
 his will. Necessarily your life must be obedient to some master.
 Either you obey sin, to continue in the service of which brings death
 and God's wrath, or you obey God, in grace, unto a new manner of
 life. So, then, you are no more to obey sin, having been freed from
 its dominion and power. Paul continues the topic in this Sunday's
 epistle text, saying:
 
 
 GOOD AND EVIL "AFTER THE MANNER OF MEN."
 
 "I speak after the manner of men, because of the infirmity of your
 flesh: for as ye presented your members as members to uncleanness,"
 etc.
 
 6. Heretofore he had been speaking, under the inspiration of the Holy
 Spirit, in language unusual and unintelligible to the world. To the
 gentiles it was a strange and incomprehensible thing he said about
 dying with Christ unto sin, being buried and planted into his death,
 and so on. But now, since his former words are obscure to the natural
 understanding, he will, he says, speak according to human
 reason--"after the manner of men."
 
 7. Even reason and the laws of all the gentiles, he goes on to say,
 teach we are not to do evil; rather to avoid it and do good. All
 sovereigns establish laws to restrain evil and preserve order.
 
 How could we introduce through the Gospel a doctrine countenancing
 evil? Though the wisdom of the Gospel is a higher gift than human
 reason, it does not alter or nullify the God-implanted intelligence
 of the latter. Hence it is a perversion of our doctrine to say it
 does not teach us to love good works and practice them. "Now, if you
 cannot understand this truth from my explanation," Paul would
 say--"that through faith you have, by baptism, died to the sinful
 life, even been buried--then learn it through your accustomed
 exercise of reason. You know for yourselves that pardon for former
 transgression and release from lawful punishment gives no one license
 to do evil--to commit theft or murder."
 
 8. It is a commonly recognized fact among men that pardon does not
 mean license. God's Word confirms the same. Yet the disadvantage is
 that although reason teaches, through the Law, good works and forbids
 evil, it is unable to comprehend why its teachings are not fulfilled.
 It perceives from the results which follow dishonoring of the Law,
 that to honor is best, that it is right and praiseworthy not to steal
 and commit crime. But it fails to understand why, given the teachings
 at first, they are not naturally fulfilled. Nor, again, does it know
 how existing conditions may be removed or bettered. It resorts to
 this expedient and that to restrain evil, but it cannot attain the
 art of uprooting and destroying it. With the sword, rack and gallows
 the judge may restrain public crime, but he cannot punish more than
 what is known and witnessed to before the court. Whatever is done
 secretly and never comes before him, he cannot punish or restrain.
 The Word of God, however, takes hold of the difficulty in a different
 manner. It teaches how to crush the head of the serpent and to slay
 the evil. Then the judge and the executioner are no longer necessary.
 But where we may not control the cause of the wrong, we should,
 nevertheless, restrain so far as possible its manifest workings.
 
 Now, the utmost reason can teach is that we are not to do evil even
 in thought or desire, and the extent of its punishment relates only
 to outward works; it cannot punish the thought and inclination to do
 evil.
 
 9. "But we preach another doctrine," Paul means to say, "a doctrine
 having power to control the heart and restrain the will. We say you
 believers in Christ, who are baptized into his death and buried with
 him, are not only to be reckoned dead, but are truly dead unto sin."
 A Christian has certain knowledge that through the grace of Christ
 his sins are forgiven--blotted out and deprived of condemning power.
 Because he has obtained and believes in such grace, he receives a
 heart abhorrent of sin. Although feeling within himself, perhaps, the
 presence of evil thoughts and lusts, yet his faith and the Holy
 Spirit are with him to remind him of his baptism. "Notwithstanding
 time and opportunity permit me to do evil," he says to himself, "and
 though I run no risk of being detected and punished, yet I will not
 do it. I will obey God and honor Christ my Lord, for I am baptized
 into Christ and as a Christian am dead unto sin, nor will I come
 again under its power."
 
 So acted godly Joseph, who, when tempted by his master's wife, "left
 his garment in her hand, and fled, and got him out" (Gen 39, 12);
 whereas another might have been glad of the invitation. He was but
 flesh and blood and naturally not insensible to her inducement, to
 the time and opportunity, the friendship of the woman and the offered
 enjoyment; but he restrained himself, not yielding even in thought to
 the temptation. Such obedience to God destroys indeed the source of
 evil--sin. Reason and human wisdom know nothing of it. It is not to
 be effected by laws, by punishment, by prison and sword. It can be
 attained only by faith and a knowledge of Christ's grace, through
 which we die to sin and the world, and restrain the will from evil
 even when detection and punishment are impossible.
 
 10. Now, such doctrine is not to be learned from human reason; it is
 spiritual and taught of the Scriptures. It reveals the source of evil
 and how to restrain it. Since, then, we teach restraint of evil and
 show withal a way higher and more effectual than reason can find, the
 accusation that we prohibit good works and license sin is
 sufficiently answered and disproved. But Paul would say to the
 Romans, "If you cannot comprehend our superior doctrine as to the
 questions raised, then answer them according to the teachings of your
 own reason, for even that will tell you--and no man will dispute
 it--we are to do no wrong. The Word of God confirms this doctrine."
 
 11. The apostle says he will speak of the point they raise, after the
 manner of men. That does not mean according to corrupt flesh and
 blood, which are not capable of speaking anything good, but according
 to natural reason as God created it, where some good still remains,
 for there are to be found many upright individuals who make just
 laws. I speak thus "because of the infirmity of your flesh," Paul
 declares. As if he would say, I have not yet said as much as reason,
 the teachers of the Law and the jurists would demand, but I will go
 no further because you are yet too weak spiritually, and too
 unaccustomed to my manner of speech, for all of you to understand it.
 I must come down to your apprehension and speak according to your
 capacity. Now, I want to say, ask your own statutes, your own laws,
 whether they authorize the prohibition of good works; if they license
 evil, though they may not be able to prevent it. Thus I convince you
 that such a pretense regarding our doctrine is not to be tolerated.
 
 
 THE TEACHINGS OF REASON.
 
 "Even reason teaches that your lives must conform to your business;
 each is in duty bound to obey him whom he serves. As Christians you
 are obliged to render another service than that you gave when under
 the dominion of sin, and obedient to it; when you were unable to
 escape its power and to do any work good before God. You have now
 come out of bondage and are relieved from obedience to sin, through
 grace, having devoted yourselves to the service of God, to obeying
 him. Therefore, assuredly you must change your manner of life."
 
 12. Truly, Paul here argues reasonably and within the scope of man's
 natural understanding. We preach the same truths, but, presenting
 them in the form of Christian doctrine, we necessarily employ
 different language and a loftier tone, lest it be offensive to the
 world. We may say that theft, murder, envy, hate and other crimes and
 vices are transgressions, yet we cannot remedy the evils by the mere
 prohibitions of the law. The remedy must be effected through God's
 grace, and is accomplished in the believer, not by our power, but by
 the Holy Spirit. But when we so explain, the stupid world immediately
 blurts out, "Oh, if it be true that our works do not remedy evils,
 let us enjoy ourselves and not bother about good works!"
 
 13. That their implication is false and a wanton perversion of the
 true doctrine is manifest from the fact that we exalt and endorse the
 command of God, and also the doctrine of reason, that teach us to do
 good and avoid evil. Indeed, we assist reason, which is powerless to
 remedy evil. If reason were itself sufficient, men would not permit
 themselves to be deceived by their own visionary ideas and false
 doctrines about worthless and vain works, as are followers of the
 papacy and of all false worship. No doubt such error has its rise in
 the principle that we are to do good and avoid evil. The principle
 fundamentally is true, and accepted by all men; but when it comes to
 the theories we build upon it, the speculations as to how it is to be
 put into practice, there is disagreement. Only the Word of God can
 show how to accomplish it.
 
 Reason is easily blinded on this point and deceived by false
 appearances, being led by anything merely called good. Even when it
 has performed all it believes to be right, it is still uncertain of
 acceptance. Indeed, it perceives no fruits, no benefit, to result
 from its teaching; for at best its achievements extend no farther
 than outward works--the object being to make the doer appear
 righteous and respectable before men--while inward sinfulness is
 unrestrained and the soul remains captive to its former life,
 obedient to the lusts of sin. And the motive of such a one is not
 sincere; he would conduct himself quite otherwise were he not
 restrained by fear of shame and punishment.
 
 
 GOSPEL HIGHER THAN REASON.
 
 14. We present a higher doctrine--the Gospel. The Gospel teaches
 first how sin in ourselves is, through Christ, slain and buried. Thus
 we obtain a good conscience, a conscience hating and opposing sin,
 and become obedient to another power. Being delivered from sin we
 would serve God and exert ourselves to do his pleasure, even though
 no fear, punishment, judge or executioner existed.
 
 With this point accepted--with the settlement of this minor subject
 of controversy as to how we are delivered from sin and attain to
 truly good works, we unite once more on the fundamental principle
 that good is to be done and evil avoided. Therefore, we immediately
 conclude: Since we are free from sin and converted to God, we must in
 obedience to him do good and live no more in sin.
 
 15. Thus does Paul make use of the Law, and of human reason so far as
 it is able to interpret the Law, to resist them who speak falsely and
 pervert the right doctrine. Evidently, then, the doctrine of the
 Gospel does not oppose the doctrine of good works, but transcends it.
 For it reveals the source and inspiration of good works--not human
 reason, not human ability, but the grace and power of the Holy
 Spirit. Now Paul deduces the point:
 
 "For as ye presented [yielded] your members as servants to
 uncleanness and to iniquity unto iniquity, even so now present
 [yield] your members as servants to righteousness unto sanctification
 [holiness]."
 
 
 BODY NOT TO SERVE SIN.
 
 16. Even reason teaches that, being no more subject to sin and
 unrighteousness, you are no longer to serve them with your body and
 members--your whole physical life. And further, having yielded
 yourselves to obey God and righteousness, you are in duty bound to
 serve them with body and life. To put it concisely and clearly, Let
 him who formerly was evil and lived contrary to his own conscience
 and to God's will, now become godly and serve the Lord with a good
 conscience. Or, as Paul says, "Let him that stole steal no more," Eph
 4, 28.
 
 17. Formerly, he tells them, their members--eyes, ears, mouth, hands,
 feet--even the whole body, served uncleanness. For "vice" he uses
 this term "uncleanness," readily intelligible to reason and inclusive
 of all forms of sin. "You permitted your members to serve
 unrighteousness," he would say, "and devoted them to every sort of
 unholy life, every wicked work, committing one iniquity after another
 and exercising all manner of villainy that can be named. Now reverse
 the order. Reasoning according to your own logic: while before you
 willingly witnessed, heard and uttered things shameful and unchaste,
 and sought lewdness, lending your bodies to it, let impurity now be
 distressing to your sight and hearing; let the body flee from it; be
 pure in words and works. All the members of the body, all its
 functions, are to be devoted to righteousness."
 
 Thus your members, your whole bodies, are to become holy--to be God's
 own--and given over solely to his service. The longer and the more
 ardently they serve, the more cheerfully will they honor and obey
 God, being devoted to all that is divine, praiseworthy, honorable and
 virtuous. The instructions God has written upon your own heart would
 teach you this principle, even were there no Word of God. It is
 useless for you to protest: "Yes, but you have taught that good works
 do not save," for that doctrine is not inconsistent, but beyond your
 understanding. Indeed, it is the true light whereby you may fulfill
 the teachings of reason.
 
 "For when ye were servants of sin, ye were free in regard of [free
 from] righteousness."
 
 18. All these expressions Paul uses "after the manner of men,"
 adapting them from the laws and customs of the times concerning
 slavery, service and freedom. Then servants were bondmen, purchased
 by their masters, with whom they must abide until set at liberty by
 those owners, or otherwise freed. His allusion to a former service of
 unrighteousness and a present service of righteousness implies two
 conditions of servitude and consequently two conditions of freedom.
 He who serves sin, the apostle teaches, is free from righteousness;
 that is, he is captive under sin, unable to attain to righteousness
 and to do righteous works. Even reason can comprehend the principle
 that he is free who does not serve--who is not servant. Again,
 servants of righteousness means service and obedience to
 righteousness, and freedom from sin.
 
 
 FRUITS OF TWO KINDS OF SERVICE.
 
 Paul now puts the matter a little differently, contrasting the
 experience of the Romans in the two forms of service. He leaves it
 with them to determine which has been productive of benefit and which
 of injury, and to choose accordingly as to future service and
 obedience.
 
 "What fruit then had ye at that time in the things whereof ye are now
 ashamed? for the end of those things is death. But now being made
 free from sin and become servants to God, ye have your fruit unto
 sanctification [holiness], and the end eternal life."
 
 19. Rather recall your manner of life when you were free from
 righteousness and obeyed only the urgings and enticements of sin.
 What pleasure or gain had you in it? None, except that for which you
 are now ashamed. Further, had you remained in it you would at last
 have found death. Only these two grand results--shame and death.
 Nothing better have you earned in its service. Munificent reward
 indeed for him who, choosing freedom from righteousness, lives to his
 own pleasure. He is deceived into thinking he has chosen a highly
 desirable life, for it gratifies the fleshly desires, and he thinks
 to go unpunished.
 
 But gratification is succeeded by two severe punishments: First,
 shame--confession of disgrace before God and the world. Thus Adam and
 Eve in Paradise, when they chose to violate God's command and,
 enticed by the devil, followed their desire for a forbidden thing,
 were made to feel the disgrace of their sin; they were in their
 hearts ashamed to appear in the presence of God. The other and added
 punishment is eternal death and the fires of hell, into which also
 fell our first parents.
 
 20. Is it not better, then, to be free from the service of sin and to
 serve righteousness? So doing, you would never suffer shame nor
 injury but would receive a double blessing: First, a clear conscience
 before God and all creatures, proof in itself that you live a holy
 life and belong to God; second and chief, the rich and incorruptible
 reward of eternal life.
 
 21. In all these observations Paul is still speaking after the manner
 of men; in a way comprehended and accepted by reason, even without
 knowledge of Christ. It is universally true in the world that
 evil-doers--thieves, murderers and the like--are punished in addition
 to the public disgrace they feel. Similarly, they who do good
 receive, in addition to the honor of men, all manner of happy reward.
 
 "For the wages of sin is death; but the free gift of God is eternal
 life in Christ Jesus our Lord."
 
 22. It seems a strange saying, that evil-doers are to receive wages,
 seemingly implying right and deserving action on their part.
 Ordinarily the term "wages" signifies a good reward, given to those
 who acquit themselves righteously and bravely. Paul uses the word to
 discomfit them who pervert his teaching. For they say, "Ah, Paul
 preaches of grace alone, yet he promises wages to sin." "Yes," Paul
 would respond, "boast as you will, you will receive a reward--death
 and hell-fire. You must confidently expect it if you interpret the
 Gospel to teach that God shall reward you who serve sin." With the
 convincing words of the text, Paul would undeceive those who
 advocate, or suffer themselves to believe, that man can serve God in
 sin and can receive a happy reward. He chooses words familiar to
 them. "Yes, if, as you maintain, wages must be the reward of every
 service, you will of course receive yours--death and hell. These any
 may have who desire them and regard them precious."
 
 23. Paul says further, "The free gift of God is eternal life."
 Observe his choice of words. He does not here use the term "wages,"
 because he has previously taught that eternal life is not the reward
 of our works, but is given of pure grace, through faith and for
 Christ's sake. So he speaks of it as a "free gift of God, through
 Christ Jesus our Lord." The soul possessing eternal life is furnished
 with power to crush the serpent's head, and none can deprive him of
 his priceless blessing. He has also power to avoid sin and to
 constantly crucify his flesh. These are things not to be effected by
 any law, any human ability; faith is requisite. Through faith we are
 incorporated into Christ and planted with him in the death of sin,
 unto eternal life and truly good works.
 
 
 
 
 _Eighth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Romans 8, 12-17.
 
 12 So then, brethren, we are debtors, not to the flesh, to live after
 the flesh: 13 for if ye live after the flesh, ye must die; but if by
 the Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye shall live. 14
 For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, these are sons of God.
 15 For ye received not the spirit of bondage again unto fear; but ye
 received the spirit of adoption, whereby we cry, Abba, Father. 16 The
 Spirit himself beareth witness with our spirit, that we are children
 of God: 17 and if children, then heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs
 with Christ; if so be that we suffer with him, that we may be also
 glorified with him.
 
 
 LIVING IN THE SPIRIT AS GOD'S CHILDREN.
 
 1. This text, like the preceding one, is an exhortation to Christian
 life and works. The language employed, however, is of different
 construction. The hateful machinations of the devil, by which he
 produces so much disaster in the world, make it necessary to urge
 this exhortation in many different forms upon those who have become
 Christians. For when God out of grace, without any merit on our part,
 bestows upon us the forgiveness of sins which we ourselves are unable
 to buy or acquire, the devil instigates men at once to conclude and
 exclaim: Oh, in that case we need no longer do good! Whenever,
 therefore, the apostle speaks of the doctrine of faith, he is obliged
 continually to maintain that grace implies nothing of that kind. For
 our sins are not forgiven with the design that we should continue to
 commit sin, but that we should cease from it. Otherwise it would more
 justly be called, not forgiveness of sin but permission to sin.
 
 2. It is a shameful perversion of the salutary doctrine of the Gospel
 and great and damnable ingratitude for the unfathomable grace and
 salvation received, to be unwilling to do good. For we ought in fact
 to be impelled by this very grace to do, with all diligence and to
 the utmost of our knowledge and ability, everything that is good and
 well-pleasing to God, to the praise and glory of his name.
 
 3. Of this Paul reminds and admonishes us here, in plain and simple
 but earnest and important words, in which he points out to us how
 much we owe to God for that which we have received from him, and what
 injury we shall suffer if we do not value it as we should, and act
 accordingly. He says:
 
 "We are debtors, not to the flesh, to live after the flesh."
 
 4. Because we have been redeemed from the condemnation we deserved by
 our sins, and now have eternal life through the Spirit of Christ
 dwelling in us (he speaks of this in the preceding verses), therefore
 we are debtors to live after the Spirit and obey God. This Paul
 declares also in the text for last Sunday: "Now being made free from
 sin and become servants to God, ye have your fruit unto
 sanctification." Rom 6, 22. Therefore, he says, ye are debtors; your
 new calling, station, and nature require of you that, since ye have
 become Christians and have the Holy Spirit, ye should live as the
 Holy Spirit directs and teaches. It is not left to your own caprice
 to do or to leave undone. If ye desire to glory in the possession of
 grace and the Holy Spirit, ye must confess yourselves debtors to
 live, not after the flesh, the only desire of which is to continue in
 sin, but after the Spirit; the Spirit shows you that, having been
 baptized and redeemed from sin, ye must turn from sin to the new life
 of righteousness and not from that new life to sin.
 
 "For if ye live after the flesh, ye must die."
 
 5. Here judgment is plainly and tersely pronounced on the pretensions
 of those foolish people who seek to make the freedom of grace a
 pretext for giving license to the flesh. The apostle speaks these
 words that he may deter them from presumption, lest in place of the
 life and grace in which they pride themselves, they bring upon
 themselves again eternal wrath and death. It would be utterly
 inconsistent in you who are now saved and freed from eternal death to
 desire henceforth to live after the flesh. For if ye do that, ye need
 not imagine that ye shall retain eternal life; ye will be subject to
 death and condemned to hell. For ye know that it was solely because
 of your sins that ye lay under the wrath of God and had incurred
 death, and that it was because ye lived after the flesh that ye
 deserved condemnation. Most assuredly Christ has not died for those
 who are determined to remain in their sins; he has died that he might
 rescue from their sins those who would gladly be released but cannot
 liberate themselves.
 
 6. Therefore, let him that is a Christian take care not to be guilty
 of such nonsense as to say: I am free from the Law, therefore I may
 do as I please. Rather let him say and do the contrary. Let him,
 because he is a Christian, fear and shun sin, lest he fall from his
 freedom into his former state of bondage to sin under the Law and
 God's wrath; or lest the life, begun in God, lapse again into death.
 For here stands the express declaration, "If ye live after the flesh,
 ye must die;" as if the apostle meant: It will not avail you that ye
 have heard the Gospel, that ye boast of Christ, that ye receive the
 sacraments, so long as ye do not, through the faith and Holy Spirit
 received, subdue your sinful lusts, your ungodliness and impiety,
 your avarice, malice, pride, hatred, envy and the like.
 
 7. For the meaning of "living after the flesh" has been repeatedly
 stated and is readily understood. It includes not only the gross,
 sensual lust of fornication or other uncleanness, but everything man
 has inherited by his natural birth; not only the physical body, but
 also the soul and all the faculties of our nature, both mental and
 corporal--our reason, will and senses--which are by nature without
 the Spirit and are not regulated by God's Word. It includes
 particularly those things which the reason is not inclined to regard
 as sin; for instance, living in unbelief, idolatry, contempt of God's
 Word, presumption and dependence on our own wisdom and strength, our
 own honor, and the like. Everything of this nature must be shunned by
 Christians (who have the Holy Spirit and are hence able to judge what
 is carnal) as a fatal poison which produces death and damnation.
 
 
 PUTTING TO DEATH SIN.
 
 "But if by the Spirit ye put to death the deeds of the body, ye shall
 live."
 
 8. Here the apostle confesses that even in the Christian there is a
 remnant of the flesh, that must be put to death--all manner of
 temptation and lusts in opposition to God's commandments. These are
 active in the flesh and prompt to sin. They are here called the
 "deeds of the body." Of this nature are thoughts of unbelief and
 distrust, carnal security and presumption instead of the fear of God,
 coldness and indolence with respect to God's Word and prayer,
 impatience and murmurings under suffering, anger and vindictiveness
 or envy and hatred against our neighbor, avarice, unchastity and the
 like. Such inclinations as these dwell in flesh and blood and cease
 not to move and tempt man. Yea, because of human infirmity they at
 times overtake him when he is not careful enough about transgression.
 They will certainly overpower him unless he resolutely opposes them
 and, as here stated, "puts to death the deeds of the body." To do
 this means a severe struggle, a battle, which never abates nor ceases
 so long as we live. The Christian dare never become slothful or
 negligent in this matter. He must arouse himself through the Spirit
 so as not to give place to the flesh. He must constantly put to death
 the flesh lest he himself be put to death by it. The apostle
 declares, "If ye live after the flesh, ye must die," and again
 comforts us, "If by the Spirit ye put to death [mortify] the deeds of
 the body, ye shall live." For the Christian receives the gift of the
 Holy Spirit that he may become willing and able to mortify these
 sinful lusts.
 
 9. This mortifying of sin through the Spirit is accomplished on this
 wise: Man recognizes his sin and infirmity, at once repents,
 remembers God's Word, and, through faith in the forgiveness of sins,
 strengthens himself against sin, and so resists it that he does not
 consent to it nor permit it to come to deeds.
 
 10. This constitutes the difference between those who are Christians
 and sanctified and those who are without faith and the Holy Spirit or
 who grieve and lose the Spirit. For although believers, as well as
 unbelievers, are not wholly free from the sinful lusts of the flesh,
 they yet remain in repentance and the fear of God; they hold fast to
 the belief that their sins are forgiven, for Christ's sake, because
 they do not yield to them but resist them. Therefore they continue
 under forgiveness, and their remaining infirmity is not fatal nor
 damning to them as it is to those who, without repentance and faith,
 go on in carnal security and purposely follow their evil lusts
 against their own conscience; who thus cast away from themselves both
 faith and the Holy Spirit.
 
 11. So Paul admonishes the Christians to remember what they have
 received, and whereunto they are called. Having received the
 forgiveness of sins and the Holy Spirit, they are to be careful not
 to lose these again; they must use them in contending against the
 sinful lusts of the flesh. They are to comfort themselves with the
 fact that they have the Holy Spirit, that is, have help and strength
 by means of which they can resist and mortify sin. These things are
 impossible to those who have not faith. Therefore Paul declares
 further:
 
 "For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, these are the sons of
 God."
 
 12. Like ourselves, Paul had to deal with two classes of people, the
 true and the false Christians. There is not so much danger from the
 adversaries of the doctrine; for instance, from popery: their
 opposition is so open that we can readily beware of them. But since
 the devil sows even among us his seed--they are called Christians and
 boast of the Gospel--it behooves us to take heed, not to the mouth,
 but to the works, of those who claim to be Christians. Not what they
 say, but what they do, is the question. It is easy enough to boast of
 God and of Christ and of the Spirit. But whether such boasting has
 any foundation or not, depends on whether or not the Spirit so works
 and rules in one as to subdue and mortify sin. For where the Spirit
 is, there assuredly the Spirit is not idle nor powerless. He proves
 his presence by ruling and directing man and prevailing on man to
 obey and follow his promptings. Such a man has the comfort that he is
 a child of God, and that God so reigns and works in him that he is
 not subject to death; he has life.
 
 
 MEANING OF "LED BY THE SPIRIT OF GOD."
 
 13. To be "led by the Spirit of God" means, then, to be given a heart
 which gladly hears God's Word and believes that in Christ it has
 grace and the forgiveness of sins; a heart which confesses and proves
 its faith before the world; a heart which seeks, above all things,
 the glory of God, and endeavors to live without giving offense, to
 serve others and to be obedient, patient, pure and chaste, mild and
 gentle; a heart which, though at times overtaken in a fault and it
 stumble, soon rises again by repentance, and ceases to sin. All these
 things the Holy Spirit teaches one if he hears and receives the Word,
 and does not wilfully resist the Spirit.
 
 14. On the other hand, the devil, who also is a spirit, persuades the
 hearts of the worldlings. But it soon becomes evident that his work
 is not that of a good spirit or a divine spirit. For he only leads
 men to do the reverse of that which the Spirit of God leads them to
 do; then they find no pleasure in hearing and obeying God's Word, but
 despise God, and become proud and haughty, avaricious, unmerciful.
 
 15. Let every one therefore take heed that he do not deceive himself.
 For there are many who claim to be Christians and yet are not. We
 perceive this from the fact that not all are led by the Spirit of
 God. Some spirit there must be by which men are led. If it is not the
 Spirit of God leading them to oppose the flesh, then it must be the
 other and evil spirit leading them to give way to the flesh and its
 lusts and to oppose the Spirit of God. They must, therefore, either
 be God's own, his dear children, his sons and his daughters, called
 to eternal life and glory; or they must be rejected and abandoned,
 children of the devil, and with him heirs of eternal fire.
 
 16. Paul takes occasion to speak more at length on the words "sons of
 God," and proceeds in beautiful and comforting words to describe the
 nature and glory of this sonship. He only begins the subject,
 however, in today's text. He says:
 
 "For ye received not the spirit of bondage again unto fear; but ye
 received the spirit of adoption, whereby we cry, Abba, Father."
 
 17. This is a noble and comforting text, worthy of being written in
 letters of gold. Because ye now through faith, he means to say, have
 the Holy Spirit and are led by him, ye are no longer in bondage as ye
 were when under the Law; ye need no longer be afraid of its terrors
 and its demands, as if God would condemn and reject you on account of
 your unworthiness and the remaining infirmity of your flesh. On the
 contrary, ye have the consolation that, through faith, ye have the
 assurance of God's grace, and may consider God your Father and call
 upon him as his children.
 
 
 TWO KINDS OF PREACHING AND OF WORKS.
 
 18. Thus he contrasts the two kinds of works which spring from the
 two kinds of preaching and doctrine--of the Law and of the
 Gospel--and which constitute the difference between the Christians
 and those still without faith and the knowledge of Christ. They who
 have nothing and know nothing but the Law, can never attain to true,
 heartfelt trust and confidence in God, though they do ever so much
 and exercise themselves ever so earnestly in the Law. For when the
 Law shines upon them in real clearness and they see what it demands
 of them and how far they come short of its fulfilment, when it thus
 discloses to them God's wrath, it produces in them only a terror, a
 fear and dread, of God under which they must at last perish if they
 be not rescued by the Gospel. This is what Paul here terms "the
 spirit of bondage," one that produces only fear and dread of God.
 But, on the other hand, if the heart grasps the preaching of the
 Gospel, which declares that, without any merit or worthiness on our
 part, God forgives us our sins, for Christ's sake, if we believe in
 him--then it finds in God's grace comfort against the terrors of the
 Law; then the Holy Spirit enables it to abide in that confidence, to
 hold fast to that comfort, and to call upon God sincerely in that
 faith, even though it feels and confesses to be still weak and
 sinful. This is what is meant by receiving "the spirit of adoption."
 
 19. Paul speaks of the "spirit of bondage" and the "spirit of
 adoption" according to the customs of his times. In those days
 men-servants and maid-servants were the property of the master of the
 house in the same sense that a cow was his property. He bought them
 with his money; he did with them as he pleased, just as with his
 cattle. They were afraid of their master and had to expect stripes,
 imprisonment and punishment even unto death. They could not say, So
 much of my master's property belongs to me, and he must give it to
 me. But they had always to reflect: Here I serve for my bread only; I
 have nothing to expect but stripes, and must be content to have my
 master cast me out or sell me to someone else whenever he chooses.
 They could never have a well-grounded hope of release from such fear
 and bondage and coercion.
 
 20. Such a slavish spirit, such a captive, fearful and uncertain
 spirit, ye do not have, says the apostle. Ye are not compelled to
 live continually in fear of wrath and condemnation as are the
 followers of Moses and all who are under the Law. On the contrary, ye
 have a delightful, free spirit, one confident and contented, such as
 a child entertains toward its father, and ye need not fear that God
 is angry with you or will cast you off and condemn you. For ye have
 the Spirit of his Son (as he says above and in Galatians 4, 6) in
 your heart and know that ye shall remain in his house and receive the
 inheritance, and that ye may comfort yourselves with it and boast of
 it as being your own.
 
 
 CHILDREN OF GOD.
 
 21. On this "spirit of adoption," that is on what the apostle means
 when he says "whereby we cry, Abba, Father," I have spoken at some
 length in my sermon on the text Galatians 4, 6, where the same words
 are used. In short, Paul describes here the power of the kingdom of
 Christ, the real work and the true exalted worship the Holy Spirit
 effects in believers: the comfort by which the heart is freed from
 the terror and fear of sin and given peace, and the heartfelt
 supplication which in faith expects of God an answer and his help.
 These blessings cannot be secured through the Law or our own
 holiness. By such means man could never obtain the comfort of God's
 grace and love to him; he would always remain in fear and dread of
 wrath and condemnation, and, because of such doubt, would flee from
 God, not daring to call upon him. But where there is faith in Christ,
 there the Holy Spirit brings the comfort spoken of, and a childlike
 trust which does not doubt that God is gracious and will answer
 prayer, because he has promised all these--grace and help, comfort,
 and answer to prayer--not for the sake of our worthiness, but for the
 sake of the name and merit of Christ, his Son.
 
 22. Of these two works of the Holy Spirit, comfort and supplication,
 the prophet Zechariah (ch. 12, 10) said that God would establish a
 new dispensation in the kingdom of Christ when he should pour out
 "the spirit of grace and of supplication." The spirit he speaks of is
 the same who assures us that we are God's children, and desires us to
 cry to him with heartfelt supplications.
 
 23. The Hebrew word "Abba"--which, as the apostle himself interprets
 it, means "Father"--is the word which the tiny heir lisps in
 childlike confidence to its father, calling him "Ab, Ab"; for it is
 the easiest word the child can learn to speak: or, as the old German
 language has it, almost easier still, "Etha, Etha." Such simple,
 childlike words faith uses toward God through the Holy Spirit, but
 they proceed out of the depth of the heart and, as afterwards stated,
 "with groanings which cannot be uttered." Rom 8, 26. Especially is
 this the case when the doubtings of the flesh and the terrors and
 torments of the devil bring conflict and distress. Man must defend
 himself against these and cries out: O dear Father! Thou art, indeed,
 my Father, for thou hast given thine only and beloved Son for me.
 Thou wilt not be angry with me or disown me. Or: Thou seest my
 distress and my weakness; do thou help and save me.
 
 "The Spirit himself beareth witness with our spirit, that we are
 children of God."
 
 24. That we are children of God and may confidently regard ourselves
 as such, we do not learn from ourselves nor from the Law. We learn it
 from the witness of the Spirit, who, in spite of the Law and of our
 unworthiness, testifies to it in our weakness and assures us of it.
 This witness is the experience within ourselves of the power of the
 Holy Spirit working through the Word, and the knowledge that our
 experience accords with the Word and the preaching of the Gospel. For
 thou art surely aware whether or no, when thou art in fear and
 distress, thou dost obtain comfort from the Gospel, and art able to
 overcome thy doubts and terror; to so overcome that thy heart is
 assured of God's graciousness, and thou no longer fleest from him,
 but canst cheerfully call upon him in faith, expecting help. Where
 such a faith exists, consciousness of help must follow. So Saint Paul
 says, Rom 5, 4-5: "Stedfastness worketh approvedness; and
 approvedness, hope: and hope putteth not to shame."
 
 25. This is the true inward witness by which thou mayest perceive
 that the Holy Spirit is at work in thee. In addition to this, thou
 hast also external witnesses and signs: for instance, it is a witness
 of the Holy Spirit in thee that he gives thee special gifts, acute
 spiritual understanding, grace and success in thy calling; that thou
 hast pleasure and delight in God's Word, confessing it before the
 world at the peril of life and limb; that thou hatest and resistest
 ungodliness and sin. Those who have not the Holy Spirit are neither
 willing nor able to do these things. It is true, that even in the
 Christian, these things are accomplished in great weakness; but the
 Holy Spirit governs them in their weakness, and strengthens in them
 this witness, as Paul says again: "The Spirit also helpeth our
 infirmity." Rom 8, 26.
 
 
 HEIRS OF GOD.
 
 "And if children, then heirs; heirs of God, and joint-heirs with
 Christ; if so be that we suffer with him, that we may be also
 glorified with him."
 
 26. Here, then, thou hast the high boast, the honor and the glory of
 the Christian. Leave to the world its splendor, its pride and its
 honors, which mean nothing else--when it comes to the point--than
 that they are the children of the devil. But do thou consider the
 marvel of this, that a poor, miserable sinner should obtain such
 honor with God as to be called, not a slave nor a servant of God, but
 a son and an heir of God! Any man, yea the whole world, might well
 consider it privilege enough to be called one of God's lowest
 creatures, only so that they might have the honor of being God's
 property. For who would not wish to belong to such a Lord and
 Creator? But the apostle declares here that we who believe in Christ
 shall be not his servants, but his own sons and daughters, his heirs.
 Who can sufficiently magnify or utter God's grace? It is beyond the
 power of our expression or comprehension.
 
 27. Yet here our great human weakness discovers itself. If we fully
 and confidently believed this, then of what should we be afraid or
 who could do us harm? He who from the heart can say to God, Thou art
 my Father and I am thy child--he who can say this can surely bid
 defiance to all the devils in hell, and joyfully despise the
 threatenings and ragings of the whole world. For he possesses, in his
 Father, a Lord before whom all creatures must tremble and without
 whose will they can do nothing; and he possesses a heritage which no
 creature can harm, a dominion which none can reduce.
 
 28. But the apostle adds here the words, "if so be that we suffer
 with him," to teach us that while we are on earth we must so live as
 to approve ourselves good, obedient children, who do not obey the
 flesh, but who, for the sake of this dominion, endure whatever
 befalls them or causes pain to the flesh. If we do this, then we may
 well comfort ourselves and with reason rejoice and glory in the fact
 the apostle declares, that "as many as are led by the Spirit of God,"
 and do not obey the promptings of the flesh, "these are the sons of
 God."
 
 29. O how noble it is in a man not to obey his lusts, but to resist
 them with a strong faith, even though he suffer for it! To be the
 child of a mighty and renowned king or emperor means to possess
 nobility, honor and glory on earth. How much more glorious it would
 be, could a man truthfully boast that he is the son of one of the
 highest of the angels! Yet what would be all that compared with one
 who is named and chosen by God himself, and called his son, the heir
 of exalted divine majesty? Such sonship and heritage must assuredly
 imply great and unspeakable glory and riches, and power and honor,
 above all else that is in heaven or in earth. This very honor, even
 though we had nothing but the name and fame of it, ought to move us
 to become the enemies of this sinful life on earth and to strive
 against it with all our powers, notwithstanding we should have to
 surrender all for its sake and suffer all things possible for a human
 being to suffer. But the human heart cannot grasp the greatness of
 the honor and glory to which we shall be exalted with Christ. It is
 altogether above our comprehension or imagination. This Paul declares
 in what follows, in verse 18, where he says: "I reckon that the
 sufferings of this present time are not worthy to be compared with
 the glory which shall be revealed to us-ward," as we have heard in
 the text for the fifth Sunday after Trinity.
 
 
 
 
 _Ninth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Corinthians 10, 6-13.
 
 6 Now these things were our examples, to the intent we should not
 lust after evil things, as they also lusted. 7 Neither be ye
 idolaters, as were some of them; as it is written, The people sat
 down to eat and drink, and rose up to play. 8 Neither let us commit
 fornication, as some of them committed, and fell in one day three and
 twenty thousand. 9 Neither let us make trial of the Lord, as some of
 them made trial, and perished by the serpents. 10 Neither murmur ye,
 as some of them murmured, and perished by the destroyer. 11 Now these
 things happened unto them by way of example; and they were written
 for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the ages are come. 12
 Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall.
 13 There hath no temptation taken you but such as man can bear: but
 God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that ye
 are able; but will with the temptation make also the way of escape,
 that ye may be able to endure it.
 
 
 CARNAL SECURITY AND ITS VICES.
 
 1. Here is a very earnest admonition, a message as severe as Paul
 ever indited, although he is writing to baptized Christians, who
 always compose the true Church of Christ. He confronts them with
 several awful examples selected from the very Church, from Israel the
 chosen people of God.
 
 2. Paul's occasion and meaning in writing this epistle was the
 security of the Corinthians. Conscious of their privileged enjoyment
 of Christ, of baptism and the Sacrament, they thought they lacked
 nothing and fell to creating sects and schisms among themselves.
 Forgetting charity, they despised one another. So far from reforming
 in life, and retrieving their works of iniquity, they became more and
 more secure, and followed their own inclinations, even allowing a man
 to have his father's wife. At the same time they desired to be
 regarded Christians, and boastfully prided themselves on having
 received the Gospel from the great apostles. So Paul was impelled to
 write them a stern letter, dealing them severity such as he nowhere
 else employs. In fact, it seems almost as if it were going too far to
 so address Christians; the rebuke might easily have struck weak and
 tender consciences with intolerable harshness. But, as in the second
 epistle, seeing how his sternness has startled the Corinthians, he
 modifies it to some extent, and deals tenderly with the repentant.
 
 3. However, in the striking Scripture examples of the text here, he
 sufficiently shows the need for such admonition to them who would,
 after having received grace, become carnally secure and abandon the
 repentant life.
 
 4. The text should properly include the beginning of this tenth
 chapter, which is read in the passage for Third Sunday before Lent.
 He begins with: "I would not, brethren, have you ignorant, that our
 fathers were all under the cloud, and all passed through the sea; and
 were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the sea; and did all
 eat the same spiritual food; and did all drink the same spiritual
 drink.... Howbeit with most of them God was not well pleased: for
 they were overthrown in the wilderness." Then follows our text
 here--"Now these things were our examples."
 
 5. As we said, the admonition is to those already Christians. Paul
 would have them know that although they are baptized unto Christ, and
 have received and still enjoy his blessing through grace alone,
 without their own merit, yet they are under obligation ever to obey
 him; they are not to be proud and boastful, nor to misuse his grace.
 Christ desires obedience on our part, though obedience does not
 justify us in his sight nor merit his grace. For instance, a bride's
 fidelity to her husband cannot be the merit that purchased his favor
 when he chose her. She is the bridegroom's own because it pleased him
 to make her so, even had she been a harlot. But now that he has
 honored her, he would have her maintain that honor henceforth by her
 purity; if she fails therein, the bridegroom has the right and power
 to put her away.
 
 Again, a poor, wretched orphan, a bastard, a foundling, may be
 adopted as a son by some godly man and made his heir, though not
 meriting the honor. Now, if in return for such kindness the child
 becomes disobedient and refractory, he justly may be cut off from the
 inheritance. Not by the merit of their devotion, as Moses often
 hinted, did the Jews become the people of God; they were ever
 stiff-necked and continually rebelled against him. God, having chosen
 them and led them out of Egypt, urgently commanded them to serve him
 and obey his Word. But when they failed to fulfil the commandments,
 they had to feel the terrific force of his punishment.
 
 
 ISRAEL'S CARNAL SECURITY A WARNING TO US.
 
 6. Their example Paul here, with great earnestness, holds up to the
 world as a warning against carnally and confidently presuming upon
 the grace and goodness of God because we have already received of
 them. In unmistakable colors the apostle portrays the teaching of
 this striking and important, this weighty and specific, example.
 Rightly viewed, there certainly is no greater, more wonderful, story
 from the creation of the world down to the present time, nothing more
 marvelous to be found in any book--except that supremely wonderful
 work, the death and resurrection of the Son of God--than this history
 of a people led by God's power out of Egypt, through the wilderness
 and into the promised land. It is filled with the remarkably
 wonderful works of God, with striking examples of his anger and of
 his great kindness.
 
 7. Referring to these examples, Paul goes on to imply: "As Christians
 and baptized, you should be familiar with them. If you are not, I
 would not fail to bring them before you for reflection on what befell
 other people of God, according to the Scripture record. They were our
 fathers, a noble, intelligent and great company and congregation of
 men, numbering over six hundred thousands, not counting wives and
 children."
 
 They, Paul tells us, were termed, and rightly, the holy people of
 God. God designed their welfare; and through Moses, their bishop and
 pope, they had the Word of God, the promise and the Sacrament. Under
 Moses they were all baptized, when he led them through the sea, and
 by the cloud, under the shadow of which, sheltered from the heat,
 they daily pursued their journey. At night a beautiful pillar of
 fire, an intense lightning-like brilliance, protected them. In
 addition, their bread came daily from heaven and they drank water
 from the rock. These providences were their Sacrament, and their sign
 that God was with them to protect. They believed on the promised
 Christ, the Son of God, their guide in the wilderness. Thus they were
 a noble, highly-favored and holy people.
 
 8. But with the great mass of the people, how long did faith last? No
 longer than until they came into the wilderness. There they began to
 despise God's Word, to murmur against Moses and against God and to
 fall into idolatry. Whereupon God vindicated himself among them; of
 all that great nation which came out from Egypt, of all the
 illustrious ones who assisted Moses in leading and governing, only
 two individuals passed from the wilderness into Canaan. Plainly,
 then, God had no pleasure in the great mass of that host. It did not
 avail them to be called the people of God, a holy people, a company
 to whom God had shown marvelous kindness and great wonders; because
 they refused to believe and obey the Word of God.
 
 The prospect was good when they were so wonderfully and gloriously
 delivered from their enemies, and had at Mount Sinai received from
 God the Law and a noble order of worship--their prospect was good for
 them to enter into the land; they were already at the gate. But even
 in that auspicious moment they provoked God until he turned them back
 to wander forty years in the wilderness, where they perished.
 
 9. Their punishment was wholly the result of their odious arrogance
 in boasting in the face of God's Word, of their privileges as the
 people of God, upon whom he daily bestowed great kindness. "Do you
 not recognize," they bragged, "the holiness of this entire
 congregation, among whom God dwells, daily performing his marvelous
 wonders?" In their pride and defiance they became stiff-necked and
 obstinate enough to continually complain against Moses and to oppose
 him whatever course he took with them. Thus they day by day awakened
 God's wrath against themselves, forcing him to visit them with many
 terrible plagues. These failing to humble, he was compelled to remove
 the entire nation. Many times God would have destroyed them all at
 once had not Moses prostrated himself before him in their behalf and
 with earnest entreaty and strong supplication turned aside his wrath.
 Because of their perversity, Moses was a most wretched and harassed
 man. "The man Moses was very meek, above all the men that were upon
 the face of the earth." Num 12, 3. For he was daily vexed with the
 defiance, disobedience and opposition of this great company of
 people; and further, he had to witness and endure for the entire
 forty years the numerous and awful plagues sent upon his people, his
 heart being filled with anguish for them. Then, too, it was his
 continually to withstand God's wrath.
 
 10. Terrible indeed is the thing we learn of this famously great
 people--God's own nation, unto whom he reveals himself, to whom God
 and Christ himself are revealed; a nation God governs and leads by
 his angels; a people he honors by wonders marvelous beyond anything
 ever heard on earth of any nation. As Moses says in Deuteronomy 4, 7:
 "What great nation is there, that hath a god so nigh unto them, as
 Jehovah our God is whensoever we call upon him?" Yet all who came out
 of Egypt and had witnessed the mighty wonders God wrought among
 themselves and among their enemies, fell and glaringly sinned; not
 according to the measure of the mere weakness and imperfection of
 human nature, but they sinned disobediently and in willful contempt
 of God. Hardened in unbelief unto insensibility, they brought upon
 themselves overwhelming punishment.
 
 11. Paul mentions several instances of the sin whereby they merited
 the wrath of God, to illustrate how they fell from faith and
 disregarded God's Word. First, he makes the general assertion that
 with many of them God was not well pleased. He means to include the
 great mass of the people; particularly the officials and leaders, the
 eminent of their number, individuals looked up to as the worthiest
 and holiest of the congregation, and who actually had wrought great
 things. Many of these fell into hypocrisy through boasting of the
 divine name, the divine office and spirit; Korah, for instance, with
 his faction, including two hundred and fifty princes of the
 congregation. Num 16, 1-2. He and his leaders claimed right to the
 priesthood and government equal with Moses and Aaron, and so
 ostentatiously and boastfully that only God could say whether they
 were right. Necessarily God had to make it manifest that he had no
 pleasure in them; for they boasted until the earth swallowed them up
 alive, and many who adhered to and upheld them were consumed by fire.
 
 
 ISRAEL'S VICES IN THE WILDERNESS PUNISHED.
 
 12. Proceeding, Paul recounts the vices which occasioned God's
 punishment and overthrow of the people in the wilderness. First, he
 says, they lusted after evil things. In the second year from the
 departure, when they actually had come into Canaan, they forgot God's
 kindness and wonderful works in their behalf and, becoming
 dissatisfied, longed to be back in Egypt to sit by the flesh-pots.
 They murmured against God and Moses until God was forced summarily to
 stop them with fire from heaven. Many of the people were consumed and
 a multitude more were smitten with a great plague while yet they ate
 of the flesh they craved; therefore the place of the camp was named
 the "Graves of Lust." Num 11. Such was the reward of their
 concupiscence, which Paul here aptly explains as "lusting after evil
 things."
 
 13. Truly it is but lusting after the wrath and punishment of God
 when, in forgetfulness of and ingratitude for his grace and goodness
 we seek something new. The world is coming to be filled with the
 spirit of concupiscence, for the multitude is weary of the Gospel.
 Particularly are they dissatisfied with it because it profits not the
 flesh; contributes not to power, wealth and luxury. Men desire again
 the old and formal things of popery, notwithstanding they suffered
 therein extreme oppression and were burdened not less than were the
 people of Israel in Egypt. But they will eventually have to pay a
 grievous penalty for their concupiscence.
 
 14. In the third place, the apostle mentions the great sin--idolatry.
 "Neither be ye idolaters," he counsels, "as were some of them." Not
 simply the lower class of people were guilty in this respect, but the
 leaders and examples. As they led, the multitude followed. Even
 Aaron, the brother of Moses, himself high-priest, swayed by the
 influential ones, yielded and set up the golden calf (Ex 32, 4) while
 Moses tarried in the mount. We are astounded that those eminently
 worthy individuals, having heard God's Word and seen his wonders
 liberally displayed, should so soon fall unrestrainedly into the
 false worship of idolatry, as if they were heathen and possessed not
 the Word. Much less need we wonder that the blind world always is
 entangled with idol-worship.
 
 15. Where the Word of God is lacking or disregarded, human wisdom
 makes for itself a worship. It will find its pleasure in the thing of
 its own construction and regard it something to be prized, though it
 may be imperatively forbidden in God's Word, perhaps even an
 abomination before him. Human reason thinks it may handle divine
 matters according to its own judgment; that God must be pleased with
 what suits its pleasure. Accordingly, to sanction idolatry, it
 appropriates the name of the Word of God. The Word must be forced
 into harmony with the false worship to give the latter an admirable
 appearance, notwithstanding the worship is essentially the reverse of
 what it is made to appear. Similarly popery set off its abominations
 of the mass, of monkery and the worship of saints; and the world in
 turn seeks to set off that idolatry to make it stand before God's
 Word.
 
 Such is the conduct of the eminent Aaron when he makes for the people
 the golden calf (Ex 32, 5-6), an image or sign of their offerings and
 worship. He builds an altar to it and causes to be proclaimed a feast
 to the Lord who has led them out of the land of Egypt. They must
 imitate the worship of the true God, a worship of sincere devotion
 and honest intention, with their offering, the calf, in the attempt
 to introduce a refined and ennobling worship.
 
 16. Thereupon follows what is recorded in Exodus 32, 6, to which Paul
 here refers: "And they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt
 offerings, and brought peace offerings; and the people sat down to
 eat and to drink, and rose up to play." That is, they rejoiced and
 were well pleased with themselves, content to have performed such
 worship, and deemed they had done well. Next they proceed to their
 own pleasure, as if having provided against God's anger. Thenceforth
 they would live according to their inclinations, wholly unrestrained
 and unreproved by the Word of God; for, as they said, Aaron made the
 people free.
 
 17. Such is the usual course of idolatry. Refusing to be considered a
 sin, it presumes to merit grace and boasts of the liberty of the
 people of God. It continues unrepentant and self-assured, even in the
 practice of open vice, imagining every offense to be forgiven before
 God for the sake of its holy worship. Thus have the priestly rabble
 of popery been doing hitherto; and they still adorn--yes, strengthen
 and defend--their shameful adultery, unchastity and all vices, with
 the name of the Church, the holy worship, the mass, and so on.
 
 
 ISRAEL'S TRIAL OF GOD.
 
 18. In the fourth admonition, the apostle says, "Neither let us make
 trial of the Lord, as some of them made trial, and perished by the
 serpents." This, too, is a heinous sin, as is proven by the terrible
 punishment. In Numbers 21 we read that after the people had journeyed
 for forty years in the wilderness and God had brought them through
 all their difficulties and given them victory over their enemies, as
 they drew near to the promised land, they became dissatisfied and
 impatient. They were setting out to go around the land of the
 Edomites, who refused them a passage through their country, when they
 began to murmur against God and Moses for leading them out of Egypt.
 Thereupon God sent among them fiery serpents and they were bitten, a
 multitude of the people perishing.
 
 Complaining against God is here called tempting him. Men set
 themselves against the Word of God and blaspheme as if God and his
 Word were utterly insignificant, because his disposing is not as they
 desire. Properly speaking, it is tempting God when we not only
 disbelieve him but oppose him, refusing to accept what he says as
 true and desiring that our own wisdom rule. That is boasting
 ourselves against him. Paul says in 1 Corinthians 10, 22: "Do we
 provoke the Lord to jealousy? are we stronger than he?"
 
 19. Such was the conduct of the Jews. Notwithstanding God's promise
 to be their God, to remain with them and to preserve them in trouble,
 if only they would believe in him and trust him; and notwithstanding
 he proved his care by daily providences expressed as special
 blessings and strange wonders, yet all these things availed not to
 save them from murmuring. When the ordering of events accorded not
 exactly with their wisdom or desire, or when, perhaps, disaster or
 failure threatened, immediately they began to make outcry against
 Moses; in other words, against his God-given office and message. "Why
 have you led us out of Egypt?" they would complain, meaning: "If you
 bore, as you say you do, the word and command of God and if he truly
 designed to work such marvels with us, he would not permit us to
 suffer want like this." In fact, they could not believe God's
 dealings with them were in accord with his promise and design. They
 insisted that he should, through Moses, perform what they dictated;
 otherwise he should not be their God.
 
 At the outset, when they entered the wilderness, after having come
 out of Egypt and having experienced God's wonderful preservation of
 them in the Red Sea and his deliverance from their enemy, and having
 received from him bread and flesh, they immediately began to murmur
 against Moses and Aaron and to chide them for leading into the
 wilderness where no water was. "Is Jehovah among us, or not?" they
 burst forth. Ex 17, 7. This was, indeed, as our text says, tempting
 God; for abundantly as his word and his wonders had been revealed to
 them, they refused to believe unless he should fulfil their desires.
 
 20. And they persisted in so opposing and tempting God as long as
 they were in the wilderness, unto the fortieth year; to which God
 testifies when he says to Moses: "Because all those men that have
 seen my glory, and my signs, which I wrought in Egypt and in the
 wilderness, yet have tempted me these ten times, and have not
 hearkened to my voice," etc., Num 14, 22. It was in the second year
 after the departure from Egypt that the Jews murmured about the
 water, and now in the fortieth year, when they should have been
 humbled after so long experience, and when they whose lives covered
 that period ought to have been conscious of the wonderful
 deliverances they had experienced in not being destroyed with others
 of their number, but being brought safely to the promised land--now
 they begin anew to complain with great impatience and bitterness:
 "Why have you brought us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness?"
 Or, in other words: "You often remind us you represent God's command,
 and you have promised us great things. This is a fine way you take to
 lead us into the land when here we have yet farther to journey and
 are all going to die in the wilderness!"
 
 21. Notice, Paul in speaking of how they tempted God says, "They
 tempted Christ," pointing to the fact that the eternal Son of God was
 from the beginning with his Church and with the people who received
 from the ancient fathers the promise of his coming in the form of
 man. They believed as we do that Christ--to use Paul's words in the
 beginning--was the rock that followed them.
 
 Therefore the apostle gives us to understand, the point of the
 Israelites' insult was directed against faith in Christ, against the
 promise concerning him. Moses was compelled to hear them protest
 after this manner: "Yes, you boast about a Messiah who is one with
 God, and who is with us to lead us; one revealed to the fathers and
 promised to be born unto us of our flesh and blood, to redeem us and
 bring relief to all men; a Messiah who for that reason adopts us for
 his own people, to bring us into the land; but where is he? This is a
 fine way he relieves us! Is our God one to permit us to wander for
 forty years in the wilderness until we all perish?"
 
 22. That such sin and blasphemy was the real meaning of their
 murmurings is indicated by the fact that Moses afterward, in the
 terrible punishment of the fiery serpents by which the people were
 bitten and died, erected at God's command a brazen serpent and
 whoever looked upon it lived. It was to them a sign of Christ who was
 to be offered for the salvation of sinners. It taught the people they
 had blasphemed against God, incurred his wrath and deserved
 punishment, and therefore in order to be saved from wrath and
 condemnation, they had no possible alternative but to believe again
 in Christ.
 
 
 MURMURING AGAINST GOD OPEN REVOLT.
 
 23. This last point is akin to the one preceding. Paul defines
 murmuring against God as an open revolt actuated by unbelief in the
 Word, a manifestation of anger and impatience, an unwillingness to
 obey when events are not ordered according to the pleasure of flesh
 and blood, and a readiness instantly to see God as hating and
 unwilling to help. Just so the Jews persistently behaved, despite
 Moses' efforts to reconcile. Being also continually punished for
 their perversity, they ought prudently to have abandoned their
 murmurings; but they only murmured the more.
 
 24. The apostle's intent in the narration is to warn all who profess
 to be Christians, or people of God, as we shall hear later. He holds
 that the example of the Israelites ought deeply to impress us,
 teaching us to continue in the fear of God and to be conscious of it,
 and to guard against self-confidence. For God by the punishments
 mentioned shows forcibly enough to the world that he will not trifle
 with, nor excuse, our sin--as the world and our own flesh fondly
 imagine--if we, under cover of his high and sacred name, dare despise
 and pervert his Word; if we, actuated by presumptuous confidence in
 our own wisdom, our own holiness and the gifts of God, follow our
 private opinions, our own judgment and inclinations, and vainly
 satisfy ourselves with the delusion: "God is not angry with me, one
 so meritorious, so superior, in his sight."
 
 25. You learn here that God spared none of the great throng from
 Egypt, among whom were many worthy and eminent individuals, even the
 progenitors of Christ in the tribe of Judah. He visited terrible
 punishment upon the distinguished princes and the leaders among the
 priesthood and other classes, and that in the sight of the entire
 people among whom he had performed so many marvelous wonders. Having
 by Moses delivered them from temporal bondage in Egypt, and through
 his office spiritually baptized and sanctified them; having given
 Christ, to speak with, lead, defend and help them; having dealt
 kindly with them as would a father with his children: yet he visits
 terrible destruction upon these Jews because they have abused his
 grace and brought forth no fruits of faith, and have become proud,
 boasting themselves the people of God, children of Abraham and
 circumcised, sole possessors of the promise of a Messiah, and
 consequently sure of participating in the kingdom of God and enjoying
 his grace.
 
 26. Now, as Paul teaches, if terrible judgment and awful punishment
 came upon these illustrious and good people, let us not be proud and
 presumptuous. We are far inferior to them and cannot hope, in these
 last ages of the world, to know gifts and wonders as great and
 glorious as they knew. Let us see ourselves mirrored in them and
 profit by their example, being mindful that while we are privileged
 to glory in Christ, in the forgiveness of sins and the grace of God,
 we must be faithfully careful not to lose what we have received and
 fall into the same condemnation and punishment before God which was
 the fate of this people. For we have not yet completed our
 pilgrimage; we have not arrived at the place toward which we journey.
 We are still on the way and must constantly go forward in the
 undertaking, in spite of dangers and hindrances that may assail. The
 work of salvation is indeed begun in us, but as yet is incomplete. We
 have come out of Egypt and have passed through the Red Sea; that is,
 have been led out of the devil's dominion into the kingdom of God,
 through Christian baptism. But we are not yet through the wilderness
 and in the promised land. There is a possibility of our still
 wandering from the way, into defeat, and missing salvation.
 
 27. Nothing is lacking on God's part; he has given us his Word and
 the Sacraments, has bestowed the Spirit, given grace and the
 necessary gifts, and is willing to help us even further. It rests
 with ourselves not to fall from grace, not to thrust it from us
 through unbelief, ingratitude, disobedience and contempt of God's
 Word. For salvation is not to him who only begins well, but, as
 Christ says (Mt 24, 13), "He that endureth to the end, the same shall
 be saved." But the apostle continues:
 
 "Now these things happened unto them by way of example; and they were
 written for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the ages are come."
 
 
 ISRAEL'S CAREER AN ADMONITION TO INDIVIDUALS.
 
 28. When you read or hear this historical example, the terrible
 punishment the Jewish people suffered in the wilderness, think not it
 is an obsolete record and without present significance. The narrative
 is certainly not written for the dead, but for us who live. It is
 intended to restrain us, to be a permanent example to the whole
 Church. For God's dealings with his own flock are always the same,
 from the beginning of time to the end. Likewise must the people of
 God, or the Church, be always the same. This history is a portrait of
 the Church in every age, representing largely its actual life--the
 vital part; for it shows on what the success of the Church on earth
 always depends and how it acts. The record teaches that the Church is
 at all times wonderfully governed and preserved by God, without human
 agency, in the midst of manifold temptations, trials, suffering and
 defeat; that it does not exist as an established government regulated
 according to human wisdom, with harmony of parts and logical action,
 but is continually agitated, impaired and weakened in itself by much
 confusion and numerous penalties; that the great and best part, who
 bear the name of the Church, fall and bring about a state of things
 so deplorable God can no longer spare, but is compelled to send
 punishments in the nature of mutinies and similar disorders, the
 terrible character of which leaves but a small proportion of the
 people upright.
 
 29. Now, if such disaster befell the nation selected of God, chosen
 from the first as his people, among whom he performed works marvelous
 and manifest beyond anything ever known since, what better thing may
 we expect for ourselves? Indeed, how much greater the danger
 threatening us; how much reason we have to take heed that the same
 fate, or worse, overtake not ourselves!
 
 With reference to the things chronicled in our text, Paul tells us:
 "They were written for our admonition, upon whom the ends of the ages
 are come." That is, we are now in the last and most evil of days, a
 time bringing many awful dangers and severe punishments. It is
 foretold in the Scriptures, predicted by Christ and the apostles,
 that awful and distressing times will come, when there shall be wide
 wanderings from the true faith and sad desolations of the Church.
 And, alas, we see the prophecies only too painfully fulfilled in past
 heresy, and later in Mohammedanism and the papacy.
 
 30. The era constituting the "last time" began with the apostles. The
 Christians living since Christ's ascension constitute the people of
 the latter times, the little company left for heaven; and we
 gentiles, amidst the innumerable multitude of the ungodly generation
 in the wide world, must experience worse calamities than befell the
 Jews, who lived under the law of Moses and the Word of God, under an
 admirable external discipline and a well-regulated government. Yet
 even in this final age so near the end of time, when we should be
 occupied with proclaiming the Gospel everywhere, the great multitude
 are chiefly employed with boasting their Christian name. We see how
 extravagantly the Pope extols his church, teaching that outside its
 pale no Christians are to be found on earth, and that the entire
 world must regard him as the head of the Church.
 
 31. True, his subjects were baptized unto Christ, called to the
 kingdom of God and granted the Sacrament and the name of Christ. But
 how do they conduct themselves? Under that superior name and honor,
 they suppress Christ's Word and his kingdom. For more than a thousand
 years now they have desolated the Church, and to this hour most
 deplorably persecute it. On the other hand, great countries, vast
 kingdoms, claiming to be Christian but disregarding the true doctrine
 of faith, are punished by the Turk's desolating hand, and instead of
 the incense of Christianity, with them is the revolting odor of
 Mohammed's faith.
 
 32. Great and terrible was the punishment of the Jewish people.
 Seemingly no disaster could befall man more awful than overtook them
 in the wilderness. Yet it was physical punishment, and although many,
 through unbelief and contempt of God, fell and incurred everlasting
 condemnation, still the Word of God remained with a remnant--Moses
 and the true Church. But the punishment of this last age is
 infinitely more awful, for God permits the pure doctrine to be lost,
 and sends strong delusions, that they who receive not the truth nor
 love it shall believe falsehood and be eternally lost. 2 Thes 2, 10.
 Such has been our reward; we have only too terribly suffered
 punishment. And if we are not more thankful for the grace God extends
 in his Word--a last gleam of light, on the point of extinction--we
 shall meet with retribution even more appalling.
 
 "Wherefore let him that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he fall."
 
 33. Here is summed up the teaching of the above examples. The sermon
 is directed against the self-confident. Some there were among the
 Christian Corinthians who boasted they were disciples of the great
 apostles, and who had even received the Holy Spirit, but who stirred
 up sects and desired to be commended in all their acts. To these Paul
 would say: "No, dear brother, be not too secure, not too sure where
 you stand. When you think you stand most firmly you are perhaps
 nearest to falling, and you may fall too far to rise again. They of
 the wilderness were worthy people and began well, doing great deeds,
 yet they fell deplorably and were destroyed. Therefore, be cautious
 and suffer not the devil to deceive you. You will need to be
 vigilant, for you are in the flesh, which always strives against the
 spirit; and you have the devil for enemy, and dangers and
 difficulties beset you on all sides. Be careful lest you lose what
 you have received. You have only made a beginning; the end is yet to
 be attained." So we must be wary and steadfast, that we may, as Paul
 has it, work out our own salvation with fear and trembling. Phil 2,
 12.
 
 "There hath no temptation taken you but such as man can bear [such as
 is common to man]: but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be
 tempted above that ye are able."
 
 34. Paul's meaning is: I must not terrify you too much. I would in a
 measure comfort you. So far you have had no temptations greater than
 flesh and blood offer. They have risen among yourselves--one holding
 another in contempt, one doing another injustice; allowing adulteries
 and other evils to creep in, which things are indeed not right nor
 decent. You must resolve to reform in these things lest worse error
 befall you. For should Satan get hold of you in earnest with his
 false doctrine and spiritual delusions, his strong temptations of the
 soul--contempt of God, for instance--such as assailed Peter and many
 others of the saints, you could not stand. You are yet weak; you are
 new and untried Christians. Then thank God who gives you strength to
 bear your present temptations; who, to retain you, presents what is
 best for you, admonishing you, through his Word, to be on your guard
 against falling yet deeper into temptation.
 
 
 
 
 _Tenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Corinthians 12, 1-11.
 
 1 Now, concerning spiritual gifts, brethren, I would not have you
 ignorant. 2 Ye know that when ye were Gentiles ye were led away unto
 those dumb idols, howsoever ye might be led. 3 Wherefore I make known
 unto you, that no man speaking in the Spirit of God saith, Jesus is
 anathema [accursed], and no man can say, Jesus is Lord, but in the
 Holy Spirit. 4 Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same
 Spirit. 5 And there are diversities of ministrations, and the same
 Lord. 6 And there are diversities of workings, but the same God, who
 worketh all things in all. 7 But to each one is given the
 manifestation of the Spirit to profit withal. 8 For to one is given
 through the Spirit the word of wisdom; and to another the word of
 knowledge, according to the same Spirit; 9 to another faith, in the
 same Spirit; and to another gifts of healings, in the one Spirit; 10
 and to another workings of miracles; and to another prophecy; and to
 another discernings of spirits; to another divers kinds of tongues;
 and to another the interpretation of tongues; 11 but all these
 worketh the one and the same Spirit, dividing to each one severally
 even as he will.
 
 
 SPIRITUAL COUNSEL FOR CHURCH OFFICERS.
 
 1. This epistle selection treats of spiritual things, things which
 chiefly pertain to the office of the ministry and concern the Church
 authorities. Paul instructs how those in office should employ their
 gifts for the benefit of one another and thus further the unity and
 advancement of the Churches. Inharmony is a deplorable offense in the
 case of Christians, putting them in the worst possible light, and
 making it impossible for them to steer clear of factions. Divisions
 are an offense to the world's wisest and best, who cry out, "If the
 Christians' doctrine were true, they would preserve unity among
 themselves, but as it is they envy and slander and devour one
 another." For, though the world carries its own great beam in its
 eye, it cannot refrain from judging us for our mote, and thus
 exalting itself as if it were pure and beautiful.
 
 
 PERFECT HARMONY NOT TO BE EXPECTED.
 
 2. Well, we cannot altogether prevent inharmony in the Church. Paul
 says (1 Cor 11, 19), "For there must be also factions among you, that
 they that are approved may be made manifest among you." Wherever the
 Word of God has a foothold, there the devil will be. By the agency of
 his factions he will always build his taverns and kitchens beside
 God's house. So he did at first, in Paradise. In the family of Adam
 he entrenched himself, establishing there his church. And such has
 been his practice ever since, and doubtless will ever be. He who
 takes offense at differences in the Church, who when he sees any
 inharmony at once concludes there is no Church there, will in the end
 miss both the Church and Christ. You will never find any congregation
 of such purity that all its members are unanimous on every point of
 belief and teaching and all live in perfect harmony.
 
 3. Paul had experience in this matter in the case of the beautiful
 and famed Church at Corinth in Achaia, which he himself planted and
 where he taught two years. Soon after his departure they began to
 disagree about their preachers and to attach themselves to certain
 ones--some to Paul, some to Peter, some to Apollos. Though these had
 all taught correctly, though they had been unanimous in their
 doctrine, yet men would cleave to a certain one because he was more
 or differently gifted than the others, could speak better, or was
 more attractive in personal appearance. And among the ministers of
 the Church, if one had a special gift or office, he thought he ought
 to be a little better and a little greater than the others.
 Necessarily, from such division and inharmony, grew hatred, strife
 and jealousy, resulting in great injury and disorder to the Church.
 
 4. We must, then, so far as possible, guard against this fatal evil,
 though we cannot altogether keep it out of the Church. Were we to
 offer no resistance at all, the devil would seize all authority and
 bring every element into discord. But when we resist Satan, God will
 continue to extend his grace and favor, and some fruit and
 improvement will follow. Even were it not possible for us to
 accomplish anything, yet as faithful ministers we must not keep
 silent if we would not be regarded indolent hirelings who flee when
 the wolf comes. See Jn 10, 12.
 
 5. Such is the tenor of this text from Paul. He begins by preaching
 on spiritual gifts and admonishing the Corinthians how to conduct
 themselves in respect to them. In proportion to the greatness and
 excellence of the gifts are flesh and blood inclined to discord and
 to coveting personal honor. Let one have a good understanding of the
 Scriptures and be able to explain them, or let him have the power to
 work miracles, and he will soon begin to have an extravagantly good
 opinion of himself, deeming himself worthy the honor of all men,
 desiring the multitude to follow only him, and positively refusing to
 regard anyone his equal. He will seek to create something new in
 doctrine, to change the old order, as if he could introduce something
 better than others, who must be infinitely below him or at least his
 inferiors.
 
 6. The same thing has taken place in our day--and will continue to
 take place--with respect to the Gospel. But through the grace of God
 that Gospel is brought to light again, and rightly instructs and
 harmonizes the people. The devil, unable to rest, had to rouse his
 factious rabble, his selfish souls, who desired the name of being
 superior and inspired people, a people who could preach, write and
 explain the Scriptures better than others; for they had learned a
 little from us. They conceded that the Gospel had indeed made a
 beginning, had somewhat purified ecclesiastical doctrine, but claimed
 it had not gone far enough; it was necessary that greater improvement
 be made--Church doctrine must be brought to far greater perfection.
 But as Paul says (1 Cor 3, 11), they could, with their doctrine, lay
 no other foundation, could preach no other Christ, than the Christ of
 the Gospel. Nevertheless, they pretended to teach something better
 and higher. They hindered and perverted the true doctrine. Their work
 could not be called building up the faith, but was rather breaking up
 and destroying its foundation and leading the people back into error
 and blindness. So Paul begins his admonition in these words:
 
 "Ye know that when ye were Gentiles ye were led away unto those dumb
 idols, howsoever ye might be led."
 
 7. Paul reminds the Corinthians of their manner of life before they
 became Christians, for he would have them pause to think that their
 gifts, past and present, are not of their own procuring, nor are any
 gifts bestowed upon them because of merit on their part. It is his
 intent to restrain them from pride in their gifts and from
 disputations concerning them; to keep them from divisions and from
 pretending to teach and introduce into the Church something new and
 better. But at the same time he deals a blow to those who take
 offense at inharmony among Christians.
 
 8. "Recall, all of you," Paul would say, "your manner of life before
 you came to Christ. What were you? Mere darkened heathen, having no
 knowledge of God but suffering yourselves blindly to be led by anyone
 who should say aught to you of God. All your devotion was but a
 discordant worship. Each one--even the child in the cradle, the
 infant at the mother's breast--must find his own idol wherever he
 might turn." St. Augustine tells us that the city of Rome alone had
 more than four hundred gods, and that it erected a church for all the
 gods in the world, which building still stands--the Pantheon.
 
 "These superstitions," Paul's words imply, "you followed as you were
 led; you flocked after them, praying and sacrificing, hanging your
 hearts upon dumb idols which could not teach and advise you, could
 not comfort, relieve or help you. In return for your devotion you
 obtained only the privilege of being a blind, wretched, divided,
 miserable people, unable to fortify yourselves against any error, and
 allowing yourselves to be distracted by the advocate of any doctrine.
 You were like a flock of helpless sheep scattered by wolves.
 
 9. "But now you have been turned from that manifold idolatry to the
 one true worship and have been enlightened by God's Word. More than
 that, in Christ have been bestowed upon you great and glorious
 gifts--discerning of the Scriptures, diversities of tongues, power to
 work miracles--things impossible to the world. It is unmistakably
 evident that you embrace the true God, who does not, like dumb idols,
 leave you to wander in the error of your own speculations,
 uncounseled by the Word; a living God, who speaks to you that you may
 know what to expect from him, and works among you publicly and
 visibly.
 
 "Therefore, it is not for you to make divisions among yourselves
 after the manner of the heathen as you see in the great Babel
 confusion and divisions of the world, where no one agrees with
 another, where one runs to this his idol and another to that, each
 claiming superiority for his own. Knowing that you all embrace the
 one true God and his Word, you are to hold together in one faith and
 one mind, not disagreeing among yourselves as if you had a variety of
 gods, of faiths, of baptisms, spirits and salvations."
 
 
 CAVILERS THEMSELVES LED ASTRAY.
 
 10. Paul speaks with particular plainness to the fault-finding and
 insolent cavilers against Christians and to other factious leaders
 when he says, "Ye were led away unto those dumb idols, howsoever ye
 might be led." This class peremptorily judge and criticise the life
 and doctrine of the Church because they see therein a measure of
 defects, and even some divisions and disagreements; notwithstanding
 the fact is plainly evident to them that the Church possesses the
 Word of God in purity, a knowledge of Christ, an illumined
 understanding of God's will and his grace, and true comfort for all
 distress of conscience, and that, in addition to all these, the Holy
 Spirit manifestly operates with them. At the same time, these same
 uncalled-for and self-constituted critics would never have been able
 to say anything about the Christian religion had they not witnessed
 that religion in the little company of Christians who have the Word
 of God and the Spirit's gifts.
 
 11. These fault-finders were individuals who, undoubtedly to a
 greater extent than others, suffered themselves to be blindly led in
 whatever way was pointed out, and who gave credence to what was
 taught and preached to them concerning the way to serve God, yet who
 all the time were but worshipers of dumb idols, possessing not the
 Word of God and having no witness to the truth of their faith and
 their works. Each believed and followed the devices of his own
 imagination or the popular choice. No man was able to teach anything
 certain and steadfast, anything to give the heart satisfaction and
 perfect security. They continually changed from one thing to another,
 accepting every new thing presented as real worship and true
 doctrine.
 
 12. And the world, ever from the beginning, has had naught but dumb
 idols in the countless forms of worship offered to the numerous
 gods--gods which never existed, but of which images were made and to
 which divine honors were shown. Worship has been rendered to the mere
 names of misfortune, disaster and disease, of all sorts; yes, to
 insects, and to garlic and onions even. Yet, in the practice of all
 this idolatry, supposed to be evidence of great holiness, each one
 sacrificing to the idol of his choice--in it all no one could have
 the assurance of being heard and answered by his god. Men had no word
 or sign of the divine will or work; they possessed naught but a vain
 dream and delusion of the human imagination; man devised and made his
 own idols.
 
 13. And what did we under the papacy but walk blindly? We suffered
 ourselves to be led just as we were directed by the names of God and
 the saints. I was myself a pious monk and priest, holding mass daily,
 wherein I worshiped St. Barbara, St. Anna, St. Christopher and
 others--more saints than the calendar mentions, some of whom no one
 knew anything about. I had no knowledge of Christ, I knew not why I
 should find comfort in him nor what I should expect of him. I was as
 much afraid of him as of the devil himself, regarding him more a
 stern Judge than a Saviour. How many shameful pilgrimages were made
 to dead idols of wood and stone, images of Mary and of the saints!
 How many were the pilgrimages to the graves of the dead, and to bones
 called "holy relics"! These relics were mere open deception, devised
 by shameless impostors; yet such worship was established by popes and
 bishops, and indulgences granted therefor.
 
 14. How many new saints, new brotherhoods, new psalms to Mary, and
 new rosaries and crowns did the monks daily invent? In fact,
 everything each individual monk might dream of had to be a special
 form of worship, and no one inquired whether or not it was at all
 authorized by God's Word. When we had done all, we were uncertain
 that we had pleased God. What was this sort of worship but a worship
 of dumb idols in the place of the living God--idols which could not
 talk with us and could not give any definite information or comfort,
 but left the people fettered and ruined with eternal doubts?
 
 
 FAITH IN THE ONE CHRIST PRODUCTIVE OF UNITY.
 
 15. But Christians, as Paul says, have not a dead and dumb god, for
 which the Lord be praised! Nor will we countenance such idols. We
 have a living, speaking God, who gives us his infallible Word. We
 know how he is disposed toward us and what we may expect from him;
 namely: through faith in Christ we have forgiveness of sins and are
 his beloved children; and as evidence of acceptance with God, we have
 baptism and the Holy Supper, the office and gifts of the Holy Spirit,
 by which he works in our hearts. We know that in the faith of Christ
 our works and lives are pleasing to God, and that he will hear and
 help when in our distress and weakness we cry unto him.
 
 16. Where this confidence obtains, where hearts enjoy such faith,
 there will be unity in the Church; for verily no one then will allow
 himself to be led into the manifold doctrines of insensible idols.
 But dissensions, sects and divisions are sure signs that the true
 doctrine is either ignored or misunderstood, men thus being left in a
 condition to be "tossed to and fro and carried about with every wind
 of doctrine," as Paul says (Eph 4, 14); which is indisputably the
 case with these same schismatics who condemn the Church and her
 doctrines because of some discordant ones.
 
 The schismatics show by their very instability that they do not
 embrace the true, uniform and established doctrine, nor can exhibit
 any substitute for it. They refuse to see that in cases where the
 Christian doctrine does not obtain, there is only blindness,
 distraction and confusion, and warring factions and sects, none
 agreeing with another, each claiming to be better than the other.
 Numerous have been the sects of monks, and of saints of the Pope and
 his god the devil, no two of which agreed. Each class regarded its
 own whims and speculations, and claimed to be holier than the others.
 The Pope, however, gave validity to them all, granting great
 indulgence to these factious fraternities. And I am not saying
 anything of other discords in the papacy--among the monasteries and
 in the parishes, and between these and the cloisters everywhere,
 perpetual quarreling, rioting and bitter contention. Such is
 inevitably the case when righteousness and divine worship are made to
 consist in external self-devised works and forms, for then each
 individual, pleased with his own ideas, thinks his way right; under
 such circumstances, there can never be unanimity of opinion as to
 what is right and the best.
 
 17. "From these numerous sources of disunion and idolatry," Paul
 would say to the Corinthians, "you are now delivered. You know you
 embrace the real Word of God, the true faith. You worship one God,
 one Lord, and enjoy the same grace, the same Spirit, the same
 salvation. You need not seek other forms and ceremonies as essential
 to salvation--wearing a white or a gray cowl, refraining from this or
 that food, forbearing to touch certain things. No diversity of
 external service, of persons, offices and conditions, destroys the
 unity in Christ.
 
 "But take heed to continue in unity, to hold fast to it.
 Unquestionably, you should be made wiser by the experience you have
 had with error; in the future you ought to be prudent, and watchful
 against being allured from the unity of this settled mind and true
 faith into your former blindness again. But so it will certainly
 befall you if you forget such grace and seek your own honor and
 praise more than the doctrine of the Holy Spirit and his gifts, and
 come to despise one another and to conduct yourselves as if you had
 many and not the same God, the same Christ, the same Spirit. God's
 gifts cannot be different from, but must be one with his nature, and
 hence he cannot give to one a better Gospel or a different baptism
 from that given another."
 
 In short, Paul teaches there must be unity in Christ, otherwise we
 have no Christ, no God and Holy Spirit, no grace nor salvation; as
 the next verse emphasizes.
 
 "Wherefore I make known unto you that no man speaking in the Spirit
 of God saith, Jesus is anathema [calleth Jesus accursed]; and no man
 can say, Jesus is Lord, but in the Holy Spirit."
 
 18. "Why make divisions and differences," Paul inquires, "in the
 doctrine and faith of the Church, which rests wholly upon the one
 Christ? In him you are to be one if you are Christians at all; you
 must harmoniously praise him, according to your individual gifts. No
 one can possibly possess the Holy Spirit if he does not regard Christ
 as the Lord, much less if he call him accursed. Destroy the
 foundation and you destroy all; there will be no God, no Spirit, and
 all your claims, teaching and works are naught. You must recognize
 and be governed by the fact that either Christ must be received and
 believed in as the one true Lord, and praised and glorified as such,
 or else he will be cursed; between these alternatives is no medium."
 
 
 THE SPIRIT, THE TEST OF THE TRUE TEACHER.
 
 It is easy, then, to judge the doctrine of every official teacher of
 the Christian Church. No one need resort to faction, no one need gaze
 hither and thither in uncertainty and hesitate as to which gift or
 which person is most to be regarded. We are to make the doctrine of
 this verse the standard and authority as to what and how we preach
 concerning Christ. He who speaks by inspiration of the Holy Spirit
 certainly will not curse Christ; he will glorify and praise him. So
 doing, he surely will not teach error, or give occasion for
 divisions. If his teaching is not to the glory of God, you may safely
 conclude that he is not true, not inspired by the Holy Spirit.
 
 19. Thus Paul rejects the glorying and boasting of the sects over
 their offices and gifts--they who pretend to be filled with the
 Spirit and to teach the people correctly, and who make out that Paul
 and other teachers are of no consequence. Themselves the chief of
 apostles, the people must hear them and accept their baptism. More
 than that, they demand a higher attainment in the Spirit for Gospel
 ministers, deeming faith, the Sacrament and the outward office not
 sufficient.
 
 But Paul says: "Boast as you will about the great measure of the
 Spirit you possess, it is certain that the Spirit-inspired teacher
 will not curse Christ." In other words, such boasting of the Spirit
 will not answer the purpose. What you believe and teach concerning
 Christ must receive attention. You are either reproaching and cursing
 Jesus, or praising him and owning him your Lord. If your preaching
 and teaching fail to point to Christ, something else being offered,
 and you nevertheless boast of the Spirit, you are already judged: the
 spirit you boast is not the Holy Spirit, not the true Spirit, but a
 false one. To it we are not to listen. Rather we are to condemn it to
 the abyss of hell, as Paul declares (Gal 1, 8), saying: "But though
 we, or an angel from heaven, should preach unto you any Gospel other
 than that which we preached unto you, let him be anathema."
 
 20. When Paul here speaks of calling Jesus accursed, he does not only
 have reference to openly blaspheming or cursing Christ's name or
 person after the manner of heathen and of ungodly Jews; with them
 Paul has nothing to do here, nor are the Corinthians supposed to be
 of that character. Paul refers rather to the Christian who, though
 boasting of the Holy Spirit, does not preach Christ as the ground of
 our salvation as he should, but, neglecting this truth, points the
 soul away to something else, pretending that this substitute is of
 the Holy Spirit and is something better and more essential than the
 common doctrine of the Gospel.
 
 All such teachers are in reality simply guilty of condemning,
 reproaching and cursing Christ, though themselves bearing and
 boasting that name. To slight Christ's Word and ministry, and exalt
 in their stead other things as mediums for obtaining the Holy Spirit
 and eternal life, or at least as being equally efficacious and
 essential--what is this but scorning Christ and making him of no
 consequence? Indeed, according to Hebrews 6, 6 and 10, 29, it is
 crucifying the Son of God afresh, and treading under foot his blood.
 
 21. Christ himself explains the office and ministry of the Holy
 Spirit--what he is to teach in the Church--saying (Jn 15, 26), "He
 shall bear witness of me." Again (Jn 16, 14): "He shall glorify me:
 for he shall take of mine, and shall declare it unto you." The tongue
 of a minister of Christ--the language he employs--must be of that
 simplicity which preaches naught but Christ. If he is to testify of
 the Saviour and glorify him, he cannot present other things whereby
 Christ would be ignored and robbed of his glory. He who does so,
 certainly is not inspired by the Holy Spirit, even though he possess
 great gifts and be called a teacher, a bishop, a pope, a council, an
 apostle even--yes, an angel from heaven. There were among the
 Corinthians some who thus neglected to preach only Christ, and
 presented instead the apostles, making choice of them--one Cephas,
 another Apollos and a third Paul.
 
 And just so our monks have done. They have in a way highly extolled
 Jesus, have in words honored and worshiped his name and used it to
 clothe all their lying nonsense and idolatry. For instance, they
 exalt Mary as the mother of Jesus and Anna as his grandmother. But
 they have thus torn men's hearts away from Christ, turning over to
 Mary and the saints the honor due him alone, and teaching the people
 to invoke these as mediators and intercessors having power to protect
 us in the hour of death. This is substituting dumb idols for Christ.
 No saint has ever taught such things; still less does the Word of God
 enjoin them. Thus the monks really curse and insult Christ.
 
 22. The Pope, throughout his whole administration, has been guilty of
 such insult to Christ, notwithstanding his boast that his kingdom
 represents the Christian Church, that he truly possesses the Holy
 Spirit and that his decrees and ordinances must be respected. Nothing
 can dissuade the Papists from their practice. They ever boast of
 being led by the Spirit, yet their vaunting is mere malediction, not
 only of Christ in person, but of his Word and his sacraments. For
 they openly condemn, and denounce as heresy, the doctrine of the
 Gospel, which Gospel assures us that to Christ alone we owe the
 unmerited forgiveness of our sins; they condemn also the use of the
 sacraments according to Christ's command and institution. And they
 destroy the people who thus offend them.
 
 The fact is, the Pope has in our doctrine nothing to curse but Jesus
 Christ, its foundation and principle, expressed by his Word and
 sacraments. The same is true of other factions--the Anabaptists and
 similar sects. What else do they but slander baptism and the Lord's
 Supper when they pretend that the external Word and outward
 sacraments do not benefit the soul, that the Spirit alone can do
 that? But in these matters you have Paul's sure word of judgment to
 strengthen your faith. You may be assured that the factions of the
 Pope and other sects are not, as they boast, the Church of Christ,
 but accursed schisms of the devil. The true Church, the righteous
 bride of Christ, certainly will not curse him nor persecute his Word.
 Let no one be moved by hearing men loudly boast about Christ after
 the manner of the false apostles who called themselves disciples of
 the true apostles of Jesus, and claimed that certain of their number
 had even seen Christ in person. The Saviour himself warns us against
 this class when he says (Mt 24, 5-24), "Many shall come in my name
 ... and shall show wonders"; and (Mt 7, 21), "Not every one that
 saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into the kingdom of heaven."
 
 
 HOLY SPIRIT ALONE GIVES ASSURANCE.
 
 23. Paul has the same thought here when he says, "No man can say,
 Jesus is Lord, but in the Holy Spirit." To call Jesus "Lord" is to
 confess one's self his servant and to seek his honor alone; to act as
 his messenger or the bearer of his Word and command. Paul's reference
 here is chiefly to the office representative of Christ and bearing
 his Word. Where the office answers these conditions and points to
 Christ as the Lord, it is truly the message of the Holy Spirit, even
 though the occupant of the office does not in his own person possess
 the Spirit; the office itself is essentially the Holy Spirit.
 Hypocrisy and invention have no place here. One must proceed in
 sincerity if he would be certain he is Christ's minister, or apostle,
 and really handles his Word. Only the inspiration of the Holy Spirit
 can give one this assurance.
 
 24. All Christians--each in his own work or sphere--equally may call
 Christ "Lord." One may be assured he serves Christ if he can call him
 "Lord," for only by the Holy Spirit is he enabled to do that. Let him
 try for a single day--from morning until evening--whether or no he
 can truly say at all times that he is the servant of God and of
 Christ in what he does. When delivering a sermon or listening to one,
 when baptizing a child or bringing a child to baptism, when pursuing
 your daily home duties, ask yourself if the act is attended by such
 faith that you can, without misgiving and not hypocritically nor
 mechanically, boast--and if necessary die by your word--that you
 serve and please Christ therein. This is calling Christ "Lord."
 Unquestionably you will often feel your heart doubting and trembling
 over the matter.
 
 25. In the papacy we were altogether hindered from feeling thus
 confident--yes, frightened from it by accursed scepticism. No one
 could--no one dared--say, "I know I am a servant, a bondsman, of
 Christ, and that my conduct pleases him." Flesh and blood are too
 weak to obtain this glorious confidence; the Holy Spirit is
 essential. Reason and our own hearts cry out in protest: "Alas, I am
 far too evil and unworthy! How could I be proud and presumptuous
 enough to boast myself the servant of the Lord Jesus Christ? I might
 if I were as holy as St. Peter, St. Paul and others."
 
 26. I used often to wonder that St. Ambrose was so bold as, in his
 letters, to call himself a servant of Jesus Christ. I supposed we all
 ought to be terrified at thoughts of this kind, and that none but the
 apostles might boast of such honor. But the fact is, we must all say
 to Christ: "Thou art my Lord and I am thy servant; for I believe on
 thee and aspire to be with thee and all the faithful and to possess
 thy Word and Sacrament." Otherwise Christ will not acknowledge us.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS TO GIVE ALL GLORY TO GOD.
 
 It is written (Mt 4, 10)--indeed, it is the first commandment--"Thou
 shalt worship the Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou serve." There
 Christ requires of us, under the penalty of forfeiting eternal life,
 to honor him as our Lord and so to regulate our lives that we shall
 know we serve him. Peter also teaches (1 Pet 4, 11) that all the
 Christian's words and deeds should be regarded not as his own, but as
 God's. The word and the act are to be of the ability which God gives,
 that in it all God may be glorified. Of necessity this condition can
 obtain only through the Holy Spirit.
 
 27. In this point--the glorification of Christ--do the true
 Christians distinguish themselves from false Christians, hypocrites
 and factious spirits, who likewise triumphantly boast of the Spirit
 and of their divine office. But the vanity of their boasting is
 evident from the fact that they do not hold to the doctrine that
 glorifies Christ, but preach that which leads to other evils and
 deceives; yes, which condemns and persecutes the right doctrine and
 the true faith of Christ. Further evidence of the emptiness of their
 boasting is apparent in the fact that they have no conscious
 testimony that they serve Christ, nor can their followers give
 assurance on the same point. You have here the clear sentence of Paul
 declaring this class devoid of the Holy Spirit and thus separated
 from the true Church and from Christians. He exhorts us to be on our
 guard against them, and would bring Christians together in one faith
 and under one Lord and Spirit. Now he teaches how to employ rightly
 the manifold gifts of a united Church for the general benefit of its
 members.
 
 "Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Spirit."
 
 28. "In former time, when you were heathen, you followed many kinds
 of idolatrous worship, many doctrines and spirits; but it was only a
 divided religion, and representative of blindness and error. Now,
 however, you possess various beautiful divine gifts and offices.
 These are mutually related and all emanate, not from man's reason or
 faculties, but from the one true God. They are his work--the
 expression of his power. Notwithstanding the dissimilarity of gifts,
 offices and works, of a certain order in one and otherwise in
 another, many and few, great and small, weak and strong--notwithstanding
 all, we are not to divide the Spirit, God and faith; we are not to
 create factions, exalting this individual or that one solely because of
 his gifts, and despising others. All gifts are direct from one God, one
 Lord, one Spirit, and to serve the same purpose--to bring men to the
 knowledge of the one God and to build up the Church in the unity of
 faith. Therefore, you are united in the one doctrine, your object being
 to serve God and the Church in a harmonious way." This verse is briefly
 the substance of all that follows in the text.
 
 
 THE TRINITY.
 
 29. Paul presents three different points: "Diversities of gifts, but
 the same Spirit;" "diversities of administrations, and the same
 Lord;" "diversities of workings, but the same God." Unquestionably,
 Paul touches the article of faith concerning the Trinity, or three
 persons in the Divine Essence, and shows that both Christ and the
 Holy Spirit are true God and yet different in person from the Father
 and from each other. He teaches the same elsewhere (1 Cor 8, 5-6),
 saying: "For though there be that are called gods, whether in heaven
 or on earth; as there are gods many, and lords many; yet to us there
 is one God, the Father, of whom are all things, and we unto him; and
 one Lord, Jesus Christ, through whom are all things, and we through
 him."
 
 30. In the text before us, the apostle likewise distinguishes the
 three--one God, one Lord, one Spirit. He assigns to each the
 particular operation whereby he manifests himself. One is God the
 Father, and from him as the origin and first person emanates all
 power. Another is the Lord, Christ the Son of God, who as the head of
 the Church appoints all offices. The third is the Spirit, who
 produces and dispenses all gifts in the Church. Yet all three are of
 one divine, almighty and eternal essence. They are of the same name,
 and are truly one since God must be an indivisible essence.
 
 To each individual is attributed only the characteristics of the
 Divine Majesty. As he who is the source of all operative power in the
 Church and in the entire creation is true God; so also must the Lord
 who appoints all offices, and the Spirit who confers all gifts, be
 true God. No creature is able to impart spiritual offices and gifts;
 that is impossible to any but God. These three--God, Lord and
 Spirit--are not Gods of unlike nature, but one in divine essence. The
 Lord is no other God than God the Father; and the Spirit is none
 other than God and the Lord. But more on this topic elsewhere.
 
 
 SPIRITUAL GIFTS SPECIFIED.
 
 31. The names and nature of the spiritual gifts, the apostle here
 specifies. He names wisdom, knowledge, prophecy, power to discern
 spirits, capacity to speak with tongues and to interpret,
 extraordinary gifts of faith, and power to work miracles. "The word
 of wisdom" is the doctrine which teaches a knowledge of God,
 revealing his will, counsel and design. It embraces every article of
 belief and justification. The world knows nothing of this loftiest,
 most exalted gift of the Spirit.
 
 
 THE WORD OF KNOWLEDGE.
 
 The "word of knowledge" also teaches of the outward life and
 interests of the Christian: how we are to conduct ourselves toward
 all others, making a profitable use of the Gospel doctrine according
 as necessity of time and person demands; it teaches us the wisest
 course toward the weak and the strong, the timid and the obstinate.
 
 
 THE GIFT OF PROPHECY.
 
 The gift of prophecy is the ability to rightly interpret and explain
 the Scriptures, and powerfully to reveal therefrom the doctrine of
 faith and the overthrow of false doctrine. The gift of prophecy
 includes, further, the ability to employ the Scriptures for
 admonition and reproof, for imparting strength and comfort, by
 pointing out, on the one hand, the certainty of future indignation,
 vengeance and punishment for the unbelieving and disobedient, and on
 the other hand presenting divine aid and reward to godly believers.
 Thus did the prophets with the Word of God, both the Law and the
 promises.
 
 
 THE GIFT OF FAITH.
 
 32. Paul is making mention of gifts not common to all. Only to
 certain ones are they given, and the gifts in themselves are unlike.
 "To another faith," he says, "to another workings of miracles, and to
 another prophecy." In "faith" here the reference is not to ordinary
 faith in Christ which brings justification before God and forgiveness
 of sin; such faith is essentially the property of every Christian,
 even if they do not possess the particular gifts here enumerated.
 Paul is speaking of a particular virtue or power of the Spirit
 operating in the Church, whereby certain ones can effect great and
 glorious things by reason of their remarkable and confident courage;
 as instanced in Paul's words later on (1 Cor 13, 2), "If I have all
 faith, so as to remove mountains."
 
 To work such wonders, a very strong and sure faith is certainly
 necessary. An unwavering, vigorous, courageous faith may accomplish a
 special work in the name and power of Christ although the worker may
 not himself be truly repentant nor possess the right kind of faith to
 secure forgiveness of sins and grace in Christ. He may be a
 hypocrite, a false saint. Christ says (Mt 7, 22), "Many will say to
 me in that day, Lord, Lord, did we not prophesy by thy name, and by
 thy name cast out demons, and by thy name do many mighty works?" It
 is true that such gifts are exercised, such works performed, in the
 name of Christ, and that the gifts are granted to none but
 individuals in the Church of Christ, and yet the possessor may not be
 altogether righteous, may even be a false Christian. For the effects
 wrought do not emanate from the individual but from the office he
 represents, being the operation of the Spirit given in behalf of the
 Church. Thus, as occupants of the office and by virtue of the Church,
 these persons perform many and great works, benefiting not themselves
 but others.
 
 33. Paul says of all these, "There are diversities of gifts, but the
 same Spirit," by way of admonishing us against creating sects. The
 Spirit is equally effective through him whose gifts are few and less
 significant and through him of remarkable gifts. And as with gifts,
 so it is with workings and ministrations.
 
 
 MEANING OF "WORKINGS."
 
 34. The term "workings," or operations, has reference to remarkable
 works of God wrought through certain individuals in an exceptional
 way. For instance, he grants to Paul a ministerial office of unusual
 influence: Paul is permitted to convert more souls than other
 apostles, to perform more wonders and accomplish more. He says
 himself (1 Cor 15, 10) that by the grace of God he labored more
 abundantly than all.
 
 
 MEANING OF "ADMINISTRATIONS."
 
 35. The meaning of "administrations" is easily apparent. Office is an
 ordained and essential feature of every government. It represents
 various duties imposed and commanded by sovereign authority. It may
 have reference to the duties enjoined upon a society collectively, in
 the service of others. There are various offices in the Church; for
 instance, one individual is an apostle, another an evangelist,
 another a teacher, as Paul mentions in Ephesians 4, 11. And as he
 says in First Corinthians 14, 26 and also hints in this text, the
 office of one is to read the Scriptures in different languages, of
 another to interpret and explain. So it was ordained in the Church at
 that time, and similarly today are ordained certain offices--of
 pastors, preachers, deacons or priests, their duties being to hear
 confessions, to administer the Sacrament, and so on.
 
 36. Not every Christian is obliged, nor is able, to execute such
 duties; only upon certain ones are they enjoined. "Administrations"
 differ from what Paul terms "workings" and gifts. There have ever
 been many Christians who, though possessing the Holy Spirit, were not
 "administrators;" for instance, virgins and wives--Agnes Anastasia
 and others--and martyrs, many of whom wrought miracles and had other
 gifts. True, both gifts and workings are imparted chiefly for the
 execution of Christian duties. It is essential here, especially in
 the superior office of preaching, that the occupant be peculiarly
 qualified for the place. The preacher must be able to understand and
 explain the Scriptures and be familiar with the languages. It is
 necessary to the effectiveness of his labors that he be accompanied
 by God's operative power. Thus the three--gifts, workings,
 administrations--are harmonious features of one divine government in
 the Church; Christ is the Lord, who regulates and maintains the
 offices, while God works and the Holy Spirit bestows his gifts.
 
 
 DIVERSITY OF GIFTS NO REASON FOR SECTS.
 
 37. As we said, offices are many and varied, even as one gift is
 greater than another: an apostle, for instance, is superior to a
 teacher or expounder, while the office of a baptizer is inferior to
 that of a preacher. Yet notwithstanding, we are to remember, Paul
 says, that all are ordained of the same Lord, and the occupant of a
 superior office is not to consider himself any better by reason of
 his position and to despise others. He must bear in mind that all
 serve the same Lord, the least as well as the greatest, and
 consequently the holder of the inferior office is not necessarily
 inferior with his Lord, nor the executor of the higher office greater
 with him. Christ is ever Lord of all; one belongs as much to his
 realm as another. Therefore he will have no divisions and sects over
 this point; rather he wills that such diversity of gifts and offices
 be promotive of unity.
 
 38. When I preach and you listen, we are not exercising the same gift
 and office, yet you as truly serve Christ by listening as I by
 preaching. If you preach, explain the Scriptures, baptize, comfort or
 aught else, through you works the same Christ who works through
 another. All is wrought in obedience to the order of him who commands
 me to hear his Word as well as to preach to you, and to exercise the
 same faith and Spirit with you. Thus all alike praise the one Lord.
 You say, "The Word I hear is the true Word of God," and I as a
 preacher prove and declare the very same thing. When I baptize,
 administer the Sacrament or absolve, and you accept my
 administrations, we are both engaged in the service of the same Lord
 and harmoniously execute his command. You and I, however, so far as
 office and gifts are considered, may be of different capacities.
 
 39. A peculiarity of the Christian profession, and the chief point of
 distinction between Christians and the heathen, is their recognition
 of the fact that workings, offices and gifts are of God, Christ the
 Lord and the Holy Spirit. The world does not perceive this truth,
 though it, too, enjoys the gifts of God. For God remembers all his
 creatures, though, like swine that enter the trough on all fours with
 no thought but of eating and rooting therein, not even lifting their
 eyes, they cannot raise their thoughts to the source of all their
 good and have not a thought as to whom they should thank for it. He
 who is not a Christian comes before God in an insensible and beastly
 attitude. The world is but a pen of animals indifferent to the
 kingdom of God and with no idea of gratitude for his rich
 beneficence, his gifts for body and soul. The worldly seek only their
 husks and their troughs. To these they cleave like fattening swine
 intended for slaughter. Jeremiah (ch. 12, 3) says concerning the
 ungodly, who with great satisfaction persecute the righteous: "Pull
 them out like sheep for the slaughter, and prepare them for the day
 of slaughter."
 
 40. God gives the ungodly mighty kingdoms, riches, lands and houses,
 making them to enjoy greatness and abundance. But when the swine are
 fed and fat, the question of bacon and sausage introduces a struggle.
 A slaughterer--a sausage-maker--appears, perchance, to slaughter the
 swine in their sty; one comes desolating the country, overthrowing
 the kingdom, destroying people and all; for, desiring to be but
 swine, the people must be destroyed like swine. Even though the world
 have personal knowledge of such punishment, it continues its course
 so long as possible--until the slaughterer comes. Swine remain swine;
 they are capable of standing ever unmoved by their trough, one
 perfectly indifferent if another be struck dead before its eyes.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS RECOGNIZE THE DIVINE SOURCE OF THEIR GIFTS.
 
 41. Christians, however, though obliged to live among swine and to be
 at times trampled under foot and rooted about, have nevertheless
 surpassing glory; for they can look up and intelligently behold their
 Lord and his gifts. They are not of the pen of swine intended only
 for slaughter; they know themselves children of God, adorned by him
 with gifts and graces not merely temporal. They are conscious that,
 having given them body and life--for these they realize are not of
 their own obtaining--he will also supply their further needs,
 providing for them forever.
 
 42. Christians are able to recognize even God's least blessing as
 most precious, as truly excellent; not only because it comes from
 him, but because of its inherent value. No one who recognizes even
 temporal blessings would give an eye, or a less important member of
 the body, to redeem the riches of the entire world. How much loftier
 and more precious to the Christian are the spiritual gifts concerning
 which Paul here speaks--gifts bestowed as means unto salvation! The
 baptizing of a child or the absolution of a penitent makes no great
 show, but were the office viewed in the true light, the bestowed
 treasure rightly appreciated, all the officers, authority and riches
 of kings and emperors would be nothing at all in comparison.
 
 43. Regarding the baptizer--who may be a woman even--and the
 baptized, we certainly can see nothing wonderful. The humanity in the
 case does not effect any great work; the work is wrought by him who
 is God, Lord and Spirit. It is he who gives to the office power and
 greatness above that of all emperors, kings and lords, however
 inferior the instrumentality--the occupants of the sacred offices. By
 these ministrations souls are won from the devil, snatched out of
 hell and transformed into saints blessed forever. Person and office
 may be apparently inferior, but the office is of God and God is no
 inferior being. His greatness cannot be equaled by a hundred thousand
 worlds. He accomplishes things incomprehensible to the world and
 impossible to angels.
 
 The combined efforts of all creation could not produce baptism. Were
 the world to unite in baptizing an infant, the infant would receive
 no good therefrom unless God the Lord commanded the deed. Let the
 Sultan be many thousands of times more powerful than at present and
 he could not, with all his riches, his dominion and peoples, free
 himself or any other from the power of the least sin. He could not
 effectively pronounce the absolution, "God has forgiven you your
 sins." For the Sultan has neither gift, office nor work; indeed, he
 knows nothing about them. They belong to God alone, though human
 mouths and hands are instrumental therein.
 
 44. Note why Paul boasts of the fact that God bestows such great
 blessings. It is that Christians may discern them and thank him; and
 that such discernment may lead them to serve one another in humility,
 with mutual faith and love, each one learning to praise God fervently
 wherever he beholds God's gifts and offices operative in the Church,
 and to esteem them as he would esteem God himself. For,
 unquestionably, none would possess office and gifts had not God
 ordained and bestowed them.
 
 45. How we have exalted our own nonsense--pilgrimages, cloisters,
 cords, cowls, running to the dead in the wilderness and so on! But to
 what purpose? What benefit have we derived therefrom, notwithstanding
 we walked until our feet were bleeding, and watched and fasted and
 tormented ourselves to death? Such a life, it is true, may be called
 holy, divine, yet it is not at all the gift, the work, the office, of
 God. No God, no Lord, no Spirit, is in that practice. God has nowhere
 commanded such a life. We have devised it and may reward and help
 ourselves for so doing. We cannot boast his authority for it nor find
 divine comfort therein.
 
 But the discerning Christian can with satisfaction boast on this
 wise: "My baptism or my absolution is not of my own devising or
 ordaining, nor of another man's. It is of Christ my Lord. For here is
 his command ordaining the office: 'Go ye therefore, and make
 disciples of all the nations, baptizing them into the name of the
 Father and of the Son and of the Holy Spirit.' Mt 28, 19. Upon
 authority of the office, work and gift here presented, I can boast
 and be strong in faith against the devil and all the gates of hell;
 otherwise I cannot withstand Satan for one moment. He would not be
 afraid of me and my works though I should be able to boast of having
 lived seventy years as a member of a holy order, serving God every
 day and hour, praying, fasting, and so on."
 
 46. The devil hurls both person and work, as he finds them, into the
 abyss of hell. If he ask you where God has commanded such works as
 yours, you have no answer. But let him hear you boast in the
 confident faith God's command inspires: "I have received from Christ
 my Lord baptism and absolution; of this I am certain, and what I do
 is done at his command and by his power"--let him hear that and he is
 forced immediately to leave you. He must flee, not from your person
 or works, but from Christ's office and gifts found with you.
 
 47. Paul presents these thoughts to teach us what we Christians have
 from God in the three forms, blessings superior to those enjoyed by
 all others in the world. The apostle would have us be grateful for
 these things and make use of them in a spirit of Christian love. He
 desires that the possessor of gifts devote them to the service of
 others. He teaches we are to honor God in the gifts another
 possesses; that we are highly to esteem them, remembering they are
 not of man's production, not wrought of man's ability or skill, but
 are the offices, gifts and works of God. They are not the inferior
 and trivial things they seem to the world because making no show and
 noise. God does not give unredeemable coin or empty shells and mere
 husks. His gifts and works in his Church must effect inexpressible
 results, taking souls from the jaws of the devil and translating them
 into eternal life and glory.
 
 
 
 
 _Eleventh Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Corinthians 15, 1-10.
 
 1 Now I make known unto you, brethren, the gospel which I preached
 unto you, which also ye received, wherein also ye stand, 2 by which
 also ye are saved, if ye hold fast the word which I preached unto
 you, except ye believed in vain. 3 For I delivered unto you first of
 all that which also I received: that Christ died for our sins
 according to the scriptures; 4 and that he was buried; and that he
 hath been raised on the third day according to the scriptures; 5 and
 that he appeared to Cephas; then to the twelve; 6 then he appeared to
 above five hundred brethren at once, of whom the greater part remain
 until now, but some are fallen asleep; 7 then he appeared to James;
 then to all the apostles; 8 and last of all, as to the child untimely
 born, he appeared to me also. 9 For I am the least of the apostles,
 that am not meet to be called an apostle, because I persecuted the
 church of God. 10 But by the grace of God I am what I am: and his
 grace which was bestowed upon me was not found vain; but I labored
 more abundantly than they all: yet not I, but the grace of God which
 was with me.
 
 
 PAUL'S WITNESS TO CHRIST'S RESURRECTION.
 
 This text is fully explained in the sermons on the entire chapter,
 which have been published separately. He who desires may read them
 there. It speaks almost exclusively of the resurrection of the dead,
 and therefore ought properly to be read and preached at the Easter
 season. The reason of its selection for this Sunday seems to be that
 the latter part of it corresponds with the Gospel for this Sunday.
 
 For Saint Paul, though he was an exalted apostle, and had labored in
 that office more than all the others together, boasts not of his own
 deeds, as did the proud Pharisee. Like the poor publican he confessed
 his sin and unworthiness, and ascribed all that he is to the grace of
 God alone, which made a Christian and an apostle of him who had been
 a persecutor.
 
 
 
 
 _Twelfth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 2 Corinthians 3, 4-11.
 
 4 And such confidence have we through Christ to God-ward: 5 not that
 we are sufficient of ourselves, to account anything as from
 ourselves; but our sufficiency is from God; 6 who also made us
 sufficient as ministers of a new covenant; not of the letter, but of
 the spirit: for the letter killeth, but the spirit giveth life. 7 But
 if the ministration of death, written, and engraven on stones, came
 with glory, so that the children of Israel could not look stedfastly
 upon the face of Moses for the glory of his face; which glory was
 passing away: 8 how shall not rather the ministration of the spirit
 be with glory? 9 For if the ministration of condemnation hath glory,
 much rather doth the ministration of righteousness exceed in glory.
 10 For verily that which hath been made glorious hath not been made
 glorious in this respect, by reason of the glory that surpasseth. 11
 For if that which passeth away was with glory, much more that which
 remaineth is in glory.
 
 
 GOSPEL TRANSCENDS LAW.
 
 1. This epistle lesson sounds altogether strange and wonderful to
 individuals unaccustomed to Scripture language, particularly to that
 of Paul. To the inexperienced ear and heart it is not intelligible.
 In popedom thus far it has remained quite unapprehended, although
 reading of the words has been practiced.
 
 2. That we may understand it, we must first get an idea of Paul's
 theme. Briefly, he would oppose the vain boasting of false apostles
 and preachers concerning their possession of the spirit and their
 peculiar skill and gifts, by praising and glorifying the office of a
 preacher of the Gospel with which he is intrusted. For he found that,
 especially in the Church at Corinth, which he had converted by the
 words of his own lips and brought to faith in Christ, soon after his
 departure the devil introduced his heresies whereby the people were
 turned from the truth and betrayed into other ways. Since it became
 his duty to make an attack upon such heresies, he devoted both his
 epistles to the purpose of keeping the Corinthians in the right way,
 so that they might retain the pure doctrine received from him, and
 beware of false spirits. The main thing which moved him to write this
 second epistle was his desire to emphasize to them his apostolic
 office of a preacher of the Gospel, in order to put to shame the
 glory of those other teachers--the glory they boasted with many words
 and great pretense.
 
 3. He starts in on this theme just before he reaches our text. And
 this is how it is he comes to speak in high terms of praise of the
 ministration of the Gospel and to contrast and compare the twofold
 ministration or message which may be proclaimed in the Church,
 provided, of course, that God's Word is to be preached and not the
 nonsense of human falsehood and the doctrine of the devil. One is
 that of the Old Testament, the other of the New; in other words, the
 office of Moses, or the Law, and the office of the Gospel of Christ.
 He contrasts the glory and power of the latter with those of the
 former, which, it is true, is also the Word of God. In this manner he
 endeavors to defeat the teachings and pretensions of those seductive
 spirits who, as he but lately foretold, pervert God's Word, in that
 they greatly extol the Law of God, yet at best do not teach its right
 use, but, instead of making it tributary to faith in Christ, misuse
 it to teach work-righteousness.
 
 4. Since the words before us are in reality a continuation of those
 with which the chapter opens, the latter must be considered in this
 connection. We read:
 
 "Are we beginning again to commend ourselves? or need we, as do some,
 epistles of commendation to you or from you? Ye are our epistle,
 written in our hearts, known and read of all men; being made manifest
 that ye are an epistle of Christ, ministered by us, written not with
 ink, but with the Spirit of the living God; not in tables of stone,
 but in tables that are hearts of flesh."
 
 "We, my fellow-apostles and co-laborers and I," he says, "do not ask
 for letters and seals from others commending us to you, or from you
 commending us to others, in order to seduce people after gaining
 their good will in your church and in others as well. Such is the
 practice of the false apostles, and many even now present letters and
 certificates from honest preachers and Churches, and make them the
 means whereby their unrighteous plotting may be received in good
 faith. Such letters, thank God, we stand not in need of, and you need
 not fear we shall use such means of deception. For you are yourselves
 the letter we have written and wherein we may pride ourselves and
 which we present everywhere. For it is a matter of common knowledge
 that you have been taught by us, and brought to Christ through our
 ministry."
 
 
 PAUL'S CONVERTS LIVING EPISTLES.
 
 5. Inasmuch as his activity among them is his testimonial, and they
 themselves are aware that through his ministerial office he has
 constituted them a church, he calls them an epistle written by
 himself; not with ink and in paragraphs, not on paper or wood, nor
 engraved upon hard rock as the Ten Commandments written upon tables
 of stone, which Moses placed before the people, but written by the
 Holy Spirit upon fleshly tables--hearts of tender flesh. The Spirit
 is the ink or the inscription, yes, even the writer himself; but the
 pencil or pen and the hand of the writer is the ministry of Paul.
 
 6. This figure of a written epistle is, however, in accord with
 Scripture usage. Moses commands (Deut 6, 6-9; 11, 18) that the
 Israelites write the Ten Commandments in all places where they walked
 or stood--upon the posts of their houses, and upon their gates, and
 ever have them before their eyes and in their hearts. Again (Prov 7,
 2-3), Solomon says: "Keep my commandments and ... my law as the apple
 of thine eye. Bind them upon thy fingers; write them upon the tablet
 of thy heart." He speaks as a father to his child when giving the
 child an earnest charge to remember a certain thing--"Dear child,
 remember this; forget it not; keep it in thy heart." Likewise, God
 says in the book of Jeremiah the prophet (ch. 31, 33), "I will put my
 law in their inward parts, and in their heart will I write it." Here
 man's heart is represented as a sheet, or slate, or page, whereon is
 written the preached Word; for the heart is to receive and securely
 keep the Word. In this sense Paul says: "We have, by our ministry,
 written a booklet or letter upon your heart, which witnesses that you
 believe in God the Father, Son and Holy Ghost and have the assurance
 that through Christ you are redeemed and saved. This testimony is
 what is written on your heart. The letters are not characters traced
 with ink or crayon, but the living thoughts, the fire and force of
 the heart."
 
 7. Note further, that it is his ministry to which Paul ascribes the
 preparation of their heart thereon and the inscription which
 constitutes them "living epistles of Christ." He contrasts his
 ministry with the blind fancies of those fanatics who seek to
 receive, and dream of having, the Holy Spirit without the oral word;
 who, perchance, creep into a corner and grasp the Spirit through
 dreams, directing the people away from the preached Word and visible
 ministry. But Paul says that the Spirit, through his preaching, has
 wrought in the hearts of his Corinthians, to the end that Christ
 lives and is mighty in them. After such statement he bursts into
 praise of the ministerial office, comparing the message, or
 preaching, of Moses with that of himself and the apostles. He says:
 
 "Such confidence have we through Christ to God-ward: not that we are
 sufficient of ourselves, to account anything as from ourselves; but
 our sufficiency is from God."
 
 
 TRUE PREACHERS COMMISSIONED BY GOD.
 
 8. These words are blows and thrusts for the false apostles and
 preachers. Paul is mortal enemy to the blockheads who make great
 boast, pretending to what they do not possess and to what they cannot
 do; who boast of having the Spirit in great measure; who are ready to
 counsel and aid the whole world; who pride themselves on the ability
 to invent something new. It is to be a surpassingly precious and
 heavenly thing they are to spin out of their heads, as the dreams of
 pope and monks have been in time past.
 
 "We do not so," says Paul. "We rely not upon ourselves or our wisdom
 and ability. We preach not what we have ourselves invented. But this
 is our boast and trust in Christ before God, that we have made of you
 a divine epistle; have written upon your hearts, not our thoughts,
 but the Word of God. We are not, however, glorifying our own power,
 but the works and the power of him who has called and equipped us for
 such an office; from whom proceeds all you have heard and believed."
 
 9. It is a glory which every preacher may claim, to be able to say
 with full confidence of heart: "This trust have I toward God in
 Christ, that what I teach and preach is truly the Word of God."
 Likewise, when he performs other official duties in the
 Church--baptizes a child, absolves and comforts a sinner--it must be
 done in the same firm conviction that such is the command of Christ.
 
 10. He who would teach and exercise authority in the Church without
 this glory, "it is profitable for him," as Christ says (Mt 18, 6),
 "that a great millstone should be hanged about his neck, and that he
 should be sunk in the depths of the sea." For the devil's lies he
 preaches, and death is what he effects. Our Papists, in time past,
 after much and long-continued teaching, after many inventions and
 works whereby they hoped to be saved, nevertheless always doubted in
 heart and mind whether or no they had pleased God. The teaching and
 works of all heretics and seditious spirits certainly do not bespeak
 for them trust in Christ; their own glory is the object of their
 teaching, and the homage and praise of the people is the goal of
 their desire.
 
 "Not that we are sufficient of ourselves, to account anything as from
 ourselves."
 
 11. As said before, this is spoken in denunciation of the false
 spirits who believe that by reason of eminent equipment of special
 creation and election, they are called to come to the rescue of the
 people, expecting wonders from whatever they say and do.
 
 
 HUMAN DOCTRINE NO PLACE IN THE CHURCH.
 
 12. Now, we know ourselves to be of the same clay whereof they are
 made; indeed, we perhaps have the greater call from God: yet we
 cannot boast of being capable of ourselves to advise or aid men. We
 cannot even originate an idea calculated to give help. And when it
 comes to the knowledge of how one may stand before God and attain to
 eternal life, that is truly not to be achieved by our work or power,
 nor to originate in our brain. In other things, those pertaining to
 this temporal life, you may glory in what you know, you may advance
 the teachings of reason, you may invent ideas of your own; for
 example: how to make shoes or clothes, how to govern a household, how
 to manage a herd. In such things exercise your mind to the best of
 your ability. Cloth or leather of this sort will permit itself to be
 stretched and cut according to the good pleasure of the tailor or
 shoemaker. But in spiritual matters, human reasoning certainly is not
 in order; other intelligence, other skill and power, are requisite
 here--something to be granted by God himself and revealed through his
 Word.
 
 13. What mortal has ever discovered or fathomed the truth that the
 three persons in the eternal divine essence are one God; that the
 second person, the Son of God, was obliged to become man, born of a
 virgin; and that no way of life could be opened for us, save through
 his crucifixion? Such truth never would have been heard nor preached,
 would never in all eternity have been published, learned and
 believed, had not God himself revealed it.
 
 14. For this season they are blind fools of first magnitude and
 dangerous characters who would boast of their grand performances, and
 think that the people are served when they preach their own fancies
 and inventions. It has been the practice in the Church for anyone to
 introduce any teaching he saw fit; for example, the monks and priests
 have daily produced new saints, pilgrimages, special prayers, works
 and sacrifices in the effort to blot out sin, redeem souls from
 purgatory, and so on. They who make up things of this kind are not
 such as put their trust in God through Christ, but rather such as
 defy God and Christ. Into the hearts of men, where Christ alone
 should be, they shove the filth and write the lies of the devil. Yet
 they think themselves, and themselves only, qualified for all
 essential teaching and work, self-grown doctors that they are, saints
 all-powerful without the help of God and Christ.
 
 "But our sufficiency is from God."
 
 15. Of ourselves--in our own wisdom and strength--we cannot effect,
 discover nor teach any counsel or help for man, whether for ourselves
 or others. Any good work we perform among you, any doctrine we write
 upon your heart--that is God's own work. He puts into our heart and
 mouth what we should say, and impresses it upon your heart through
 the Holy Spirit. Therefore, we cannot ascribe to ourselves any honor
 therein, cannot seek our own glory as the self-instructed and proud
 spirits do; we must give to God alone the honor, and must glory in
 the fact that by his grace and power he works in you unto salvation,
 through the office committed unto us.
 
 16. Now, Paul's thought here is that nothing should be taught and
 practiced in the Church but what is unquestionably God's Word. It
 will not do to introduce or perform anything whatever upon the
 strength of man's judgment. Man's achievements, man's reasoning and
 power, are of no avail save in so far as they come from God. As Peter
 says in his first epistle (ch. 4, 11): "If any man speaketh, speaking
 as it were oracles of God; if any man ministereth, ministering as of
 the strength which God supplieth." In short, let him who would be
 wise, who would boast of great skill, talents and power, confine
 himself to things other than spiritual; with respect to spiritual
 matters, let him keep his place and refrain from boasting and
 pretense. For it is of no moment that men observe your greatness and
 ability; the important thing is that poor souls may rest assured of
 being presented with God's Word and works, whereby they may be saved.
 
 "Who also made us sufficient as ministers of a new covenant; not of
 the letter, but of the spirit: for the letter killeth, but the spirit
 giveth life."
 
 
 THE NEW COVENANT.
 
 17. Paul here proceeds to exalt the office and power of the Gospel
 over the glorying of the false apostles, and to elevate the power of
 the Word above that of all other doctrine, even of the Law of God.
 Truly we are not sufficient of ourselves and have nothing to boast of
 so far as human activity is considered. For that is without merit or
 power, however strenuous the effort may be to fulfil God's Law. We
 have, however, something infinitely better to boast of, something not
 grounded in our own activity: by God we have been made sufficient for
 a noble ministry, termed the ministry "of a New Covenant." This
 ministry is not only exalted far above any teaching to be evolved by
 human wisdom, skill and power, but is more glorious than the ministry
 termed the "Old Covenant," which in time past was delivered to the
 Jews through Moses. While this ministry clings, in common with other
 doctrine, to the Word given by revelation, it is the agency whereby
 the Holy Spirit works in the heart. Therefore, Paul says it is not a
 ministration of the letter, but "of the spirit."
 
 
 "SPIRIT" AND "LETTER."
 
 18. This passage relative to spirit and letter has in the past been
 wholly strange language to us. Indeed, to such extent has man's
 nonsensical interpretation perverted and weakened it that I, though a
 learned doctor of the holy Scriptures, failed to understand it
 altogether, and I could find no one to teach me. And to this day it
 is unintelligible to all popedom. In fact, even the old
 teachers--Origen, Jerome and others--have not caught Paul's thought.
 And no wonder, truly! For it is essentially a doctrine far beyond the
 power of man's intelligence to comprehend. When human reason meddles
 with it, it becomes perplexed. The doctrine is wholly unintelligible
 to it, for human thought goes no farther than the Law and the Ten
 Commandments. Laying hold upon these it confines itself to them. It
 does not attempt to do more, being governed by the principle that
 unto him who fulfils the demands of the Law, or commandments, God is
 gracious. Reason knows nothing about the wretchedness of depraved
 nature. It does not recognize the fact that no man is able to keep
 God's commandments; that all are under sin and condemnation; and that
 the only way whereby help could be received was for God to give his
 Son for the world, ordaining another ministration, one through which
 grace and reconciliation might be proclaimed to us. Now, he who does
 not understand the sublime subject of which Paul speaks cannot but
 miss the true meaning of his words. How much more did we invite this
 fate when we threw the Scriptures and Saint Paul's epistles under the
 bench, and, like swine in husks, wallowed in man's nonsense!
 Therefore, we must submit to correction and learn to understand the
 apostle's utterance aright.
 
 19. "Letter" and "spirit" have been understood to mean, according to
 Origen and Jerome, the obvious sense of the written word. St.
 Augustine, it must be admitted, has gotten an inkling of the truth.
 Now, the position of the former teachers would perhaps not be quite
 incorrect did they correctly explain the words. By "literary sense"
 they signify the meaning of a Scripture narrative according to the
 ordinary interpretation of the words. By "spiritual sense" they
 signify the secondary, hidden, sense found in the words.
 
 For instance: The Scripture narrative in Genesis third records how
 the serpent persuaded the woman to eat of the forbidden fruit and to
 give to her husband, who also ate. This narrative in its simplest
 meaning represents what they understand by "letter." "Spirit,"
 however, they understand to mean the spiritual interpretation, which
 is thus: The serpent signifies the evil temptation which lures to
 sin. The woman represents the sensual state, or the sphere in which
 such enticements and temptations make themselves felt. Adam, the man,
 stands for reason, which is called man's highest endowment. Now, when
 reason does not yield to the allurements of external sense, all is
 well; but when it permits itself to waver and consent, the fall has
 taken place.
 
 20. Origen was the first to trifle thus with the holy Scriptures, and
 many others followed, until now it is thought to be the sign of great
 cleverness for the Church to be filled with such quibblings. The aim
 is to imitate Paul, who (Gal 4, 22-24) figuratively interprets the
 story of Abraham's two sons, the one by the free woman, or the
 mistress of the house, and the other by the hand-maid. The two women,
 Paul says, represent the two covenants: one covenant makes only
 bond-servants, which is just what he in our text terms the
 ministration of the letter; the other leads to liberty, or, as he
 says here, the ministration of the spirit, which gives life. And the
 two sons are the two peoples, one of which does not go farther than
 the Law, while the other accepts in faith the Gospel.
 
 True, this is an interpretation not directly suggested by the
 narrative and the text. Paul himself calls it an allegory; that is, a
 mystic narrative, or a story with a hidden meaning. But he does not
 say that the literal text is necessarily the letter that killeth, and
 the allegory, or hidden meaning, the spirit. But the false teachers
 assert of all Scripture that the text, or record itself, is but a
 dead "letter," its interpretation being "the spirit." Yet they have
 not pushed interpretation farther than the teaching of the Law; and
 it is precisely the Law which Paul means when he speaks of "the
 letter."[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: What Luther means is that the popish theologians with
 their vaunted "spiritual" interpretation had never penetrated to the
 Gospel, which confers the life in the Spirit, but had satisfied
 themselves with so literal and superficial an interpretation of the
 Law as to seek salvation through work-righteousness.]
 
 21. Paul employs the word "letter" in such contemptuous sense in
 reference to the Law--though the Law is, nevertheless, the Word of
 God--when he compares it with the ministry of the Gospel. The letter
 is to him the doctrine of the Ten Commandments, which teach how we
 should obey God, honor parents, love our neighbor, and so on--the
 very best doctrine to be found in all books, sermons and schools.
 
 The word "letter" is to the apostle Paul everything which may take
 the form of doctrine, of literary arrangement, of record, so long as
 it remains something spoken or written. Also thoughts which may be
 pictured or expressed by word or writing, but it is not that which is
 written in the heart, to become its life. "Letter" is the whole Law
 of Moses, or the Ten Commandments, though the supreme authority of
 such teaching is not denied. It matters not whether you hear them,
 read them, or reproduce them mentally. For instance, when I sit down
 to meditate upon the first commandment: "Thou shalt have no other
 gods before me," or the second, or the third, and so forth, I have
 something which I can read, write, discuss, and aim to fulfil with
 all my might. The process is quite similar when the emperor or prince
 gives a command and says: "This you shall do, that you shall eschew."
 This is what the apostle calls "the letter," or, as we have called it
 on another occasion, the written sense.
 
 22. Now, as opposed to "the letter," there is another doctrine or
 message, which he terms the "ministration of a New Covenant" and "of
 the Spirit." This doctrine does not teach what works are required of
 man, for that man has already heard; but it makes known to him what
 God would do for him and bestow upon him, indeed what he has already
 done: he has given his Son Christ for us; because, for our
 disobedience to the Law, which no man fulfils, we were under God's
 wrath and condemnation. Christ made satisfaction for our sins,
 effected a reconciliation with God and gave to us his own
 righteousness. Nothing is said in this ministration of man's deeds;
 it tells rather of the works of Christ, who is unique in that he was
 born of a virgin, died for sin and rose from the dead, something no
 other man has been able to do. This doctrine is revealed through none
 but the Holy Spirit, and none other confers the Holy Spirit. The Holy
 Spirit works in the hearts of them who hear and accept the doctrine.
 Therefore, this ministration is termed a ministration "of the
 Spirit."
 
 23. The apostle employs the words "letter" and "spirit," to contrast
 the two doctrines; to emphasize his office and show its advantage
 over all others, however eminent the teachers whom they boast, and
 however great the spiritual unction which they vaunt. It is of design
 that he does not term the two dispensations "Law" and "Gospel," but
 names them according to the respective effects produced. He honors
 the Gospel with a superior term--"ministration of the spirit." Of the
 Law, on the contrary, he speaks almost contemptuously, as if he would
 not honor it with the title of God's commandment, which in reality it
 is, according to his own admission later on that its deliverance to
 Moses and its injunction upon the children of Israel was an occasion
 of surpassing glory.
 
 24. Why does Paul choose this method? Is it right for one to despise
 or dishonor God's Law? Is not a chaste and honorable life a matter of
 beauty and godliness? Such facts, it may be contended, are implanted
 by God in reason itself, and all books teach them; they are the
 governing force in the world. I reply: Paul's chief concern is to
 defeat the vainglory and pretensions of false preachers, and to teach
 them the right conception and appreciation of the Gospel which he
 proclaimed. What Paul means is this: When the Jews vaunt their Law of
 Moses, which was received as Law from God and recorded upon two
 tables of stone; when they vaunt their learned and saintly preachers
 of the Law and its exponents, and hold their deeds and manner of life
 up to admiration, what is all that compared to the Gospel message?
 The claim may be well made: a fine sermon, a splendid exposition;
 but, after all, nothing more comes of it than precepts, expositions,
 written comments. The precept, "Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with
 all thy heart, and thy neighbor as thyself," remains a mere array of
 words. When much time and effort have been spent in conforming one's
 life to it, nothing has been accomplished. You have pods without
 peas, husks without kernels.
 
 25. For it is impossible to keep the Law without Christ, though man
 may, for the sake of honor or property, or from fear of punishment,
 feign outward holiness. The heart which does not discern God's grace
 in Christ cannot turn to God nor trust in him; it cannot love his
 commandments and delight in them, but rather resists them. For nature
 rebels at compulsion. No man likes to be a captive in chains. One
 does not voluntarily bow to the rod of punishment or submit to the
 executioner's sword; rather, because of these things, his anger
 against the Law is but increased, and he ever thinks: "Would that I
 might unhindered steal, rob, hoard, gratify my lust, and so on!" And
 when restrained by force, he would there were no Law and no God. And
 this is the case where conduct shows some effects of discipline, in
 that the outer man has been subjected to the teaching of the Law.
 
 26. But in a far more appalling degree does inward rebellion ensue
 when the heart feels the full force of the Law; when, standing before
 God's judgment, it feels the sentence of condemnation; as we shall
 presently hear, for the apostle says "the letter killeth." Then the
 truly hard knots appear. Human nature fumes and rages against the
 Law; offenses appear in the heart, the fruit of hate and enmity
 against the Law; and presently human nature flees before God and is
 incensed at God's judgment. It begins to question the equity of his
 dealings, to ask if he is a just God. Influenced by such thoughts, it
 falls ever deeper into doubt, it murmurs and chafes, until finally,
 unless the Gospel comes to the rescue, it utterly despairs, as did
 Judas, and Saul, and perhaps pass out of this life with God and
 creation. This is what Paul means when he says (Rom 7, 8-9) that the
 Law works sin in the heart of man, and sin works death, or kills.
 
 27. You see, then, why the Law is called "the letter": though noble
 doctrine, it remains on the surface; it does not enter the heart as a
 vital force which begets obedience. Such is the baseness of human
 nature, it will not and cannot conform to the Law; and so corrupt is
 mankind, there is no individual who does not violate all God's
 commandments in spite of daily hearing the preached Word and having
 held up to view God's wrath and eternal condemnation. Indeed, the
 harder pressed man is, the more furiously he storms against the Law.
 
 28. The substance of the matter is this: When all the commandments
 have been put together, when their message receives every particle of
 praise to which it is entitled, it is still a mere letter. That is,
 teaching not put into practice. By "letter" is signified all manner
 of law, doctrine and message, which goes no farther than the oral or
 written word, which consists only of the powerless letter. To
 illustrate: A law promulgated by a prince or the authorities of a
 city, if not enforced, remains merely an open letter, which makes a
 demand indeed, but ineffectually. Similarly, God's Law, although a
 teaching of supreme authority and the eternal will of God, must
 suffer itself to become a mere empty letter or husk. Without a
 quickening heart, and devoid of fruit, the Law is powerless to effect
 life and salvation. It may well be called a veritable table of
 omissions (Lass-tafel); that is, it is a written enumeration, not of
 duties performed but of duties cast aside. In the languages of the
 world, it is a royal edict which remains unobserved and unperformed.
 In this light St. Augustine understood the Law. He says, commenting
 on Psalm 17, "What is Law without grace but a letter without spirit?"
 Human nature, without the aid of Christ and his grace, cannot keep
 it.
 
 29. Again, Paul in terming the Gospel a "ministration of the spirit"
 would call attention to its power to produce in the hearts of men an
 effect wholly different from that of the Law: it is accompanied by
 the Holy Spirit and it creates a new heart. Man, driven into fear and
 anxiety by the preaching of the Law, hears this Gospel message,
 which, instead of reminding him of God's demands, tells him what God
 has done for him. It points not to man's works, but to the works of
 Christ, and bids him confidently believe that for the sake of his Son
 God will forgive his sins and accept him as his child. And this
 message, when received in faith, immediately cheers and comforts the
 heart. The heart will no longer flee from God; rather it turns to
 him. Finding grace with God and experiencing his mercy, the heart
 feels drawn to him. It commences to call upon him and to treat and
 revere him as its beloved God. In proportion as such faith and solace
 grow, also love for the commandments will grow and obedience to them
 will be man's delight. Therefore, God would have his Gospel message
 urged unceasingly as the means of awakening man's heart to discern
 his state and recall the great grace and lovingkindness of God, with
 the result that the power of the Holy Spirit is increased constantly.
 Note, no influence of the Law, no work of man is present here. The
 force is a new and heavenly one--the power of the Holy Spirit. He
 impresses upon the heart Christ and his works, making of it a true
 book which does not consist in the tracery of mere letters and words,
 but in true life and action.
 
 30. God promised of old, in Joel 2, 28 and other passages, to give
 the Spirit through the new message, the Gospel. And he has verified
 his promise by public manifestations in connection with the preaching
 of that Gospel, as on the day of Pentecost and again later. When the
 apostles, Peter and others, began to preach, the Holy Spirit
 descended visibly from heaven upon their hearts. Acts 8, 17; 10, 44.
 Up to that time, throughout the period the Law was preached, no one
 had heard or seen such manifestation. The fact could not but be
 grasped that this was a vastly different message from that of the Law
 when such mighty results followed in its train. And yet its substance
 was no more than what Paul declared (Acts 13, 38-39): "Through this
 man is proclaimed unto you remission of sins: and by him every one
 that believeth is justified from all things, from which ye could not
 be justified by the law of Moses."
 
 31. In this teaching you see no more the empty letters, the valueless
 husks or shells, of the Law, which unceasingly enjoins, "This thou
 shalt do and observe," and ever in vain. You see instead the true
 kernel and power which confers Christ and the fullness of His Spirit.
 In consequence, men heartily believe the message of the Gospel and
 enjoy its riches. They are accounted as having fulfilled the Ten
 Commandments. John says (Jn 1, 16-17): "Of his fullness we all
 received, and grace for grace. For the Law was given through Moses;
 grace and truth came through Jesus Christ." John's thought is: The
 Law has indeed been given by Moses, but what avails that fact? To be
 sure, it is a noble doctrine and portrays a beautiful and instructive
 picture of man's duty to God and all mankind; it is really excellent
 as to the letter. Yet it remains empty; it does not enter into the
 heart. Therefore it is called "law," nor can it become aught else, so
 long as nothing more is given.
 
 
 CHRIST SUPERSEDES MOSES.
 
 Before there can be fulfilment, another than Moses must come,
 bringing another doctrine. Instead of a law enjoined, there must be
 grace and truth revealed. For to enjoin a command and to embody the
 truth[2] are two different things; just as teaching and doing differ.
 Moses, it is true, teaches the doctrine of the Law, so far as
 exposition is concerned, but he can neither fulfil it himself nor
 give others the ability to do so. That it might be fulfilled, God's
 Son had to come with his fullness; he has fulfilled the Law for
 himself and it is he who communicates to our empty heart the power to
 attain to the same fullness.
 
 [Footnote 2: Es ist zweirlei, Gesetz geben, und, Wahrheit werden.]
 
 This becomes possible when we receive grace for grace, that is, when
 we come to the enjoyment of Christ, and for the sake of him who
 enjoys with God fullness of grace, although our own obedience to the
 Law is still imperfect. Being possessed of solace and grace, we
 receive by his power the Holy Spirit also, so that, instead of
 harboring mere empty letters within us, we come to the truth and
 begin to fulfil God's Law, in such a way, however, that we draw from
 his fullness and drink from that as a fountain.
 
 
 CHRIST THE SOURCE OF LIFE GREATER THAN ADAM THE SOURCE OF DEATH.
 
 32. Paul gives us the same thought in Romans 5, 17-18, where he
 compares Adam and Christ. Adam, he says, by his disobedience in
 Paradise, became the source of sin and death in the world; by the sin
 of this one man, condemnation passed upon all men. But on the other
 hand, Christ, by his obedience and righteousness, has become for us
 the abundant source wherefrom all may obtain righteousness and the
 power of obedience. And with respect to the latter source, it is far
 richer and more abundant than the former. While by the single sin of
 one man, sin and death passed upon all men, to wax still more
 powerful with the advent of the Law, of such surpassing strength and
 greatness, on the other hand, is the grace and bounty which we have
 in Christ that it not only washes away the particular sin of the one
 man Adam, which, until Christ came, overwhelmed all men in death, but
 overwhelms and blots out all sin whatever. Thus they who receive his
 fullness of grace and bounty unto righteousness are, according to
 Paul, lords of life through Jesus Christ alone.
 
 
 THE LAW INEFFECTUAL.
 
 33. You see now how the two messages differ, and why Paul exalts the
 one, the preaching of the Gospel, and calls it a "ministration of the
 spirit," but terms the other, the Law, a mere empty "letter." His
 object is to humble the pride of the false apostles and preachers
 which they felt in their Judaism and the law of Moses, telling the
 people with bold pretensions: "Beloved, let Paul preach what he will,
 he cannot overthrow Moses, who on Mount Sinai received the Law, God's
 irrevocable command, obedience to which is ever the only way to
 salvation."
 
 34. Similarly today, Papists, Anabaptists and other sects make
 outcry: "What mean you by preaching so much about faith and Christ?
 Are the people thereby made better? Surely works are essential."
 Arguments of this character have indeed a semblance of merit, but,
 when examined by the light of truth, are mere empty, worthless
 twaddle. For if deeds, or works, are to be considered, there are the
 Ten Commandments; we teach and practice these as well as they. The
 Commandments would answer the purpose indeed--if one could preach
 them so effectively as to compel their fulfilment.
 
 But the question is, whether what is preached is also practiced. Is
 there something more than mere words--or letters, as Paul says? do
 the words result in life and spirit? This message we have in common;
 unquestionably, one must teach the Ten Commandments, and, what is
 more, live them. But we charge that they are not observed. Therefore
 something else is requisite in order to render obedience to them
 possible. When Moses and the Law are made to say: "You should do
 thus; God demands this of you," what does it profit? Ay, beloved
 Moses, I hear that plainly, and it is certainly a righteous command;
 but pray tell me whence shall I obtain ability to do what, alas, I
 never have done nor can do? It is not easy to spend money from an
 empty pocket, or to drink from an empty can. If I am to pay my debt,
 or to quench my thirst, tell me how first to fill pocket or can. But
 upon this point such prattlers are silent; they but continue to drive
 and plague with the Law, let the people stick to their sins, and make
 merry of them to their own hurt.
 
 35. In this light Paul here portrays the false apostles and like
 pernicious schismatics, who make great boasts of having a clearer
 understanding and of knowing much better what to teach than is the
 case with true preachers of the Gospel. And when they do their very
 best, when they pretend great things, and do wonders with their
 preaching, there is naught but the mere empty "letter." Indeed, their
 message falls far short of Moses. Moses was a noble preacher, truly,
 and wrought greater things than any of them may do. Nevertheless, the
 doctrine of the Law could do no more than remain a letter, an Old
 Testament, and God had to ordain a different doctrine, a New
 Testament, which should impart the "spirit."
 
 "It is the letter," says Paul, "which we preach. If any glorying is
 to be done, we can glory in better things and make the defiant plea
 that they are not the only teachers of what ought to be done,
 incapable as they are of carrying out their own precepts. We give
 direction and power as to performing and living those precepts. For
 this reason our message is not called the Old Testament, or the
 message of the dead letter, but that of the New Testament and of the
 living Spirit."
 
 36. No seditious spirit, it is certain, ever carries out its own
 precepts, nor will he ever be capable of doing so, though he may
 loudly boast the Spirit alone as his guide. Of this fact you may rest
 assured. For such individuals know nothing more than the doctrine of
 works--nor can they rise higher and point you to anything else. They
 may indeed speak of Christ, but it is only to hold him up as an
 example of patience in suffering. In short, there can be no New
 Testament preached if the doctrine of faith in Christ be left out;
 the spirit cannot enter into the heart, but all teaching, endeavor,
 reflection, works and power remain mere "letters," devoid of grace,
 truth, and life. Without Christ the heart remains unchanged and
 unrenewed. It has no more power to fulfil the Law than the book in
 which the Ten Commandments are written, or the stones upon which
 engraved.
 
 "For the letter killeth, but the spirit giveth life."
 
 37. Here is yet stronger condemnation of the glory of the doctrine of
 the Law; yet higher exaltation of the Gospel ministry. Is the apostle
 overbold in that he dares thus to assail the Law and say: "The Law is
 not only a lifeless letter, but qualified merely to kill"? Surely
 that is not calling the Law a good and profitable message, but one
 altogether harmful. Who, unless he would be a cursed heretic in the
 eyes of the world and invite execution as a blasphemer, would dare to
 speak thus, except Paul himself? Even Paul must praise the Law, which
 is God's command, declaring it good and not to be despised nor in any
 way modified, but to be confirmed and fulfilled so completely, as
 Christ says (Mt 5, 18), that not a tittle of it shall pass away. How,
 then, does Paul come to speak so disparagingly, even abusively, of
 the Law, actually presenting it as veritable death and poison? Well,
 his is a sublime doctrine, one that reason does not understand. The
 world, particularly they who would be called holy and godly, cannot
 tolerate it at all; for it amounts to nothing short of pronouncing
 all our works, however precious, mere death and poison.
 
 38. Paul's purpose is to bring about the complete overthrow of the
 boast of the false teachers and hypocrites, and to reveal the
 weakness of their doctrine, showing how little it effects even at its
 best, since it offers only the Law, Christ remaining unproclaimed and
 unknown. They say in terms of vainglorious eloquence that if a man
 diligently keep the commandments and do many good works, he shall be
 saved. But theirs are only vain words, a pernicious doctrine. This
 fact is eventually learned by him who, having heard no other
 doctrine, trusts in their false one. He finds out that it holds
 neither comfort nor power of life, but only doubt and anxiety,
 followed by death and destruction.
 
 
 TERRORS OF THE LAW.
 
 39. When man, conscious of his failure to keep God's command, is
 constantly urged by the Law to make payment of his debt and
 confronted with nothing but the terrible wrath of God and eternal
 condemnation, he cannot but sink into despair over his sins. Such is
 the inevitable consequence where the Law alone is taught with a view
 to attaining heaven thereby. The vanity of such trust in works is
 illustrated in the case of the noted hermit mentioned in Vitae Patrum
 (Lives of the Fathers). For over seventy years this hermit had led a
 life of utmost austerity, and had many followers. When the hour of
 death came he began to tremble, and for three days was in a state of
 agony. His disciples came to comfort him, exhorting him to die in
 peace since he had led so holy a life. But he replied: "Alas, I truly
 have all my life served Christ and lived austerely; but God's
 judgment greatly differs from that of men."
 
 40. Note, this worthy man, despite the holiness of his life, has no
 acquaintance with any article but that of the divine judgment
 according to the Law. He knows not the comfort of Christ's Gospel.
 After a long life spent in the attempt to keep God's commandments and
 secure salvation, the Law now slays him through his own works. He is
 compelled to exclaim: "Alas, who knows how God will look upon my
 efforts? Who may stand before him?" That means, to forfeit heaven
 through the verdict of his own conscience. The work he has wrought
 and his holiness of life avail nothing. They merely push him deeper
 into death, since he is without the solace of the Gospel, while
 others, such as the thief on the cross and the publican, grasp the
 comfort of the Gospel, the forgiveness of sins in Christ. Thus sin is
 conquered; they escape the sentence of the Law, and pass through
 death into life eternal.
 
 
 EFFICACY OF THE GOSPEL.
 
 41. Now the meaning of the contrasting clause, "the spirit giveth
 life," becomes clear. The reference is to naught else but the holy
 Gospel, a message of healing and salvation; a precious, comforting
 word. It comforts and refreshes the sad heart. It wrests it out of
 the jaws of death and hell, as it were, and transports it to the
 certain hope of eternal life, through faith in Christ. When the last
 hour comes to the believer, and death and God's judgment appear
 before his eyes, he does not base his comfort upon his works. Even
 though he may have lived the holiest life possible, he says with Paul
 (1 Cor 4, 4): "I know nothing against myself, yet am I not hereby
 justified."
 
 42. These words imply being ill pleased with self, with the whole
 life; indeed, even the putting to death of self. Though the heart
 says, "By my works I am neither made righteous nor saved," which is
 practically admitting oneself to be worthy of death and condemnation,
 the Spirit extricates from despair, through the Gospel faith, which
 confesses, as did St. Bernard in the hour of death: "Dear Lord Jesus,
 I am aware that my life at its best has been but worthy of
 condemnation, but I trust in the fact that thou hast died for me and
 hast sprinkled me with blood from thy holy wounds. For I have been
 baptized in thy name and have given heed to thy Word whereby thou
 hast called me, awarded me grace and life, and bidden me believe. In
 this assurance will I pass out of life; not in uncertainty and
 anxiety, thinking, Who knows what sentence God in heaven will pass
 upon me?"
 
 The Christian must not utter such a question. The sentence against
 his life and works has long since been passed by the Law. Therefore,
 he must confess himself guilty and condemned. But he lives by the
 gracious judgment of God declared from heaven, whereby the sentence
 of the Law is overruled and reversed. It is this: "He that believeth
 on the Son hath eternal life." Jn 3, 36.
 
 43. When the consolation of the Gospel has once been received and it
 has wrested the heart from death and the terrors of hell, the
 Spirit's influence is felt. By its power God's Law begins to live in
 man's heart; he loves it, delights in it and enters upon its
 fulfilment. Thus eternal life begins here, being continued forever
 and perfected in the life to come.
 
 44. Now you see how much more glorious, how much better, is the
 doctrine of the apostles--the New Testament--than the doctrine of
 those who preach merely great works and holiness without Christ. We
 should see in this fact an incentive to hear the Gospel with
 gladness. We ought joyfully to thank God for it when we learn how it
 has power to bring to men life and eternal salvation, and when it
 gives us assurance that the Holy Spirit accompanies it and is
 imparted to believers.
 
 "But if the ministration of death, written, and engraven on stones,
 came with glory, so that the children of Israel could not look
 stedfastly upon the face of Moses for the glory of his face; which
 glory was passing away: how shall not rather the ministration of the
 Spirit be with glory? For if the ministration of condemnation hath
 glory, much rather doth the ministration of righteousness exceed in
 glory."
 
 
 GLORY OF THE GOSPEL.
 
 45. Paul is in an ecstasy of delight, and his heart overflows in
 words of praise for the Gospel. Again he handles the Law severely,
 calling it a ministration, or doctrine, of death and condemnation.
 What term significant of greater abomination could he apply to God's
 Law than to call it a doctrine of death and hell? And again (Gal 2,
 17), he calls it a "minister (or preacher) of sin;" and (Gal 3, 10)
 the message which proclaims a curse, saying, "As many as are of the
 works of the law are under a curse." Absolute, then, is the
 conclusion that Law and works are powerless to justify before God;
 for how can a doctrine proclaiming only sin, death and condemnation
 justify and save?
 
 46. Paul is compelled to speak thus, as we said above because of the
 infamous presumption of both teachers and pupils, in that they permit
 flesh and blood to coquet with the Law, and make their own works
 which they bring before God their boast. Yet, nothing is effected but
 self-deception and destruction. For, when the Law is viewed in its
 true light, when its "glory," as Paul has it, is revealed, it is
 found to do nothing more than to kill man and sink him into
 condemnation.
 
 47. Therefore, the Christian will do well to learn this text of Paul
 and have an armor against the boasting of false teachers, and the
 torments and trials of the devil when he urges the Law and induces
 men to seek righteousness in their own works, tormenting their heart
 with the thought that salvation is dependent upon the achievements of
 the individual. The Christian will do well to learn this text, I say,
 so that in such conflicts he may take the devil's own sword, saying:
 "Why dost thou annoy me with talk of the Law and my works? What is
 the Law after all, however much you may preach it to me, but that
 which makes me feel the weight of sin, death and condemnation? Why
 should I seek therein righteousness before God?"
 
 48. When Paul speaks of the "glory of the Law," of which the Jewish
 teachers of work-righteousness boast, he has reference to the things
 narrated in the twentieth and thirty-fourth chapters of Exodus--how,
 when the Law was given, God descended in majesty and glory from
 heaven, and there were thunderings and lightnings, and the mountain
 was encircled with fire; and how when Moses returned from the
 mountain, bringing the Law, his face shone with a glory so dazzling
 that the people could not look upon his face and he was obliged to
 veil it.
 
 49. Turning their glory against them, Paul says: "Truly, we do not
 deny the glory; splendor and majesty were there; but what does such
 glory do but compel souls to flee before God, and drive into death
 and hell?" We believers, however, boast another glory,--that of our
 ministration. The Gospel record tells us (Mt 17, 2-4) that Christ
 clearly revealed such glory to his disciples when his face shone as
 the sun, and Moses and Elijah were present. Before the manifestation
 of such glory, the disciples did not flee; they beheld with amazed
 joy and said: "Lord, it is good for us to be here. We will make here
 tabernacles for thee and for Moses," etc.
 
 50. Compare the two scenes and you will understand plainly the import
 of Paul's words here. As before said, this is the substance of his
 meaning: "The Law produces naught but terror and death when it
 dazzles the heart with its glory and stands revealed in its true
 nature. On the other hand, the Gospel yields comfort and joy." But to
 explain in detail the signification of the veiled face of Moses, and
 of his shining uncovered face, would take too long to enter upon
 here.
 
 51. There is also especial comfort to be derived from Paul's
 assertion that the "ministration," or doctrine, of the Law "passeth
 away"; for otherwise there would be naught but eternal condemnation.
 The doctrine of the Law "passes away" when the preaching of the
 Gospel of Christ finds place. To Christ, Moses shall yield, that he
 alone may hold sway. Moses shall not terrify the conscience of the
 believer. When, perceiving the glory of Moses, the conscience
 trembles and despairs before God's wrath, then it is time for
 Christ's glory to shine with its gracious, comforting light into the
 heart. Then can the heart endure Moses and Elijah. For the glory of
 the Law, or the unveiled face of Moses, shall shine only until man is
 humbled and driven to desire the blessed countenance of Christ. If
 you come to Christ, you shall no longer hear Moses to your fright and
 terror; you shall hear him as one who remains servant to the Lord
 Christ, leaving the solace and the joy of his countenance unobscured.
 In conclusion:
 
 "For verily that which hath been made glorious hath not been made
 glorious in this respect, by reason of the glory that surpasseth."
 
 52. The meaning here is: When the glory and holiness of Christ,
 revealed through the preaching of the Gospel, is rightly perceived,
 then the glory of the Law--which is but a feeble and transitory
 glory--is seen to be not really glorious. It is mere dark clouds in
 contrast to the light of Christ shining to lead us out of sin, death
 and hell unto God and eternal life.
 
 
 
 
 _Thirteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Galatians 3, 15-22.
 
 15 Brethren, I speak after the manner of men: Though it be but a
 man's covenant, yet when it hath been confirmed, no one maketh it
 void, or addeth thereto. 16 Now to Abraham were the promises spoken,
 and to his seed. He saith not, And to seeds, as of many; but as of
 one, And to thy seed, which is Christ. 17 Now this I say: A covenant
 confirmed beforehand by God, the law, which came four hundred and
 thirty years after, doth not disannul, so as to make the promise of
 none effect. 18 For if the inheritance is of the law, it is no more
 of promise: but God hath granted it to Abraham by promise. 19 What
 then is the law? It was added because of transgressions, till the
 seed should come to whom the promise hath been made; and it was
 ordained through angels by the hand of a mediator. 20 Now a mediator
 is not a mediator of one; but God is one. 21 Is the law then against
 the promises of God? God forbid: for if there had been a law given
 which could make alive, verily righteousness would have been of the
 law. 22 But the scripture shut up all things under sin, that the
 promise by faith in Jesus Christ might be given to them that believe.
 
 
 GOD'S TESTAMENT AND PROMISE IN CHRIST.
 
 1. This is a keen, severe epistle, one that is unintelligible to the
 ordinary man. Because the doctrine it contains has not hitherto been
 employed and enforced, it has not been understood. It is also too
 long and rich to be treated briefly. But it is fully explained in the
 complete commentary on this epistle to the Galatians, where those who
 will may read it. The substance of it is, that here, as in the whole
 epistle, Paul would earnestly constrain the Christian to distinguish
 between the righteousness of faith and the righteousness of works or
 of the Law. In order that we may note to some extent the main points
 Paul makes in this text, we remark that he emphasizes two things. He
 treats first of the doctrine that we are justified by faith alone,
 and he maintains this, after giving many reasons and proofs, by
 saying in effect:
 
 2. In this connection you should note that no one, whether Jew or
 gentile, is justified by works or by the Law. For the Law was given
 four hundred and thirty years after the promise of a Savior had been
 made to Abraham (who was to be the father of all the people of God)
 and the assurance that all nations should be blessed in him. It was
 given after it had been testified of Abraham that his faith was
 imputed to him for righteousness. And as he was justified and
 received the blessing by reason of his faith, so also his children
 and descendants were justified and received the blessing through the
 same faith in that seed for whose sake the blessing had been promised
 to all the world. For in his dealings with the Jews and with the
 whole world, God always promised his grace and the forgiveness of
 sins (and that means to be blessed of God) even when there was as yet
 no Law by which they might pretend to become righteous, and before
 Moses was born.
 
 3. Therefore the Law, being given to this people only after the lapse
 of so long a period, could not have been given to them for
 justification; otherwise it would have been given earlier. Or if it
 had been necessary for righteousness, then Abraham and his children
 up to that date could not have been justified at all. Indeed God
 designed that the Law should be given so long after Abraham.
 Undoubtedly he would have been able to give it to the fathers much
 earlier if he had seen fit to do so. Apparently he desired thereby to
 teach that the Law was not given to the end that God's grace and
 blessing should be acquired through it, but that these come from the
 pure mercy of God which was promised and bestowed so long before upon
 Abraham and those who believed.
 
 4. Therefore Paul concludes: How could the Law produce righteousness
 for those who lived before Moses, since Moses was the first through
 whom the Law was given; and since even before his time there were
 holy people and people who were saved? Whence did they derive their
 righteousness? Certainly not from the fact that they had offered
 sacrifice at Jerusalem, but from the fact that they believed the Word
 in which God promised to bless them through the coming seed, Christ.
 Hence, those also who lived afterwards could not have been justified
 by the Law; for they did not receive the grace of God in a different
 way from that in which those who went before had received it. God did
 not annul or revoke by the Law the promise of blessing which he had
 made and freely bestowed without the Law.
 
 5. Here some might desire to show their wisdom and say to Paul:
 Although the fathers did not have the Law of Moses, they had the same
 Word of God which teaches the ten commandments and which was
 implanted in the human heart from the beginning of the world, whence
 also it is called the law of nature or the natural law; and the same
 law was afterwards given publicly to the Jewish people and
 comprehended in the ten commandments. It might also be said that
 Moses borrowed the ten commandments from the fathers, to which Christ
 testifies in John 7, 22. For it is certain that the fathers from the
 beginning taught them and urged them upon their children and
 descendants. With what consistency, then, does Paul conclude that the
 fathers were not justified by the Law because it was not given until
 four hundred years after Abraham's time; as if the fathers before
 that time had no Law?
 
 6. To answer this question we must observe the meaning and purpose of
 Paul's words; for he so speaks because of the boasting of the Jews,
 who placed their dependence on the Law and claimed that it was given
 to them that they might be God's people. They considered their
 attempts at keeping his Law, sufficient to procure justification. Why
 else did God give the Law, they said, and distinguish us from all
 heathen peoples, if we were not thereby to be preeminent before God
 and more pleasing to him than they who have it not? They made so much
 of this boasting that they paid no respect at all to the promise of
 blessing in the coming seed, given to the fathers, nor thought that
 faith therein was necessary to their justification. Thus they
 practically considered it as annulled and made void, excepting for a
 temporal interpretation which they put upon it--that the Messiah
 would come and, because of their Law and piety, give to them the
 dominion of the world and other great rewards.
 
 
 THE JEWS GOD'S PEOPLE BY PROMISE.
 
 7. To rout such vain delusions and boasts, and to show that the Jews
 were not justified through the Law and did not become God's children
 thereby, Paul cites the fact that the holy patriarchs, their fathers,
 were justified neither by the Law of which they boast, because it was
 not yet given, nor by their own deeds, whether of the natural law or
 the ten commandments. God had based no promise of blessing or
 salvation on their works. He had promised out of pure grace to give
 them the blessing freely (that is, to give them grace or
 righteousness and all eternal blessing), through the coming seed,
 which had been promised also to our first parents without their
 merit, when by their transgression they had fallen under God's wrath
 and condemnation. Therefore, although the fathers had a knowledge of
 the Law, or God's commandments, these did not help them to become
 righteous before God. They had to hear and apprehend by faith the
 promise of God, which was based not on works but only on the coming
 seed. For if they had been able by means of the Law or of good works
 to become righteous, it would have been wholly unnecessary to give
 the promise of blessing in Christ.
 
 8. Now, if Abraham and the fathers could not be justified by works,
 and in fact were not justified by them, no more were their children
 and descendants justified by the Law or by works. They were justified
 in no other way than by faith in the promise given to Abraham and to
 his seed, a promise by which not only the Jews but all the heathen
 (through the same faith) were blessed.
 
 9. This truth Paul now further enforces and establishes on the basis
 of these two particulars--God's promise, and his free grace or
 gift--in opposition to the boasting of the Law and our own merit.
 First, he makes a declaration concerning the value and weight which
 every testament or promise of the last will possesses. Likewise in
 the fourth commandment is implied an ordinance that the last will of
 parents should be honored by their children and heirs.
 
 10. In regard to this subject he asserts that the rule is, if a man's
 testament be confirmed (and it is confirmed by his death) no man dare
 alter it nor add to it nor take away from it. So the jurists declare
 it to be a divine law that no one should break a man's last will. How
 much more then should God's testament be honored intact? Now, God has
 made a testament, which is to be his final last will; namely, that he
 will bless all nations through the seed which at first he promised to
 the fathers. This he determined upon, and assured to Abraham, and in
 him to all the world--to us all. And he has confirmed it by the death
 of this seed, his only Son, who had to become man and die (as was
 typified by the sacrifice of Isaac on the part of Abraham) in order
 that the inheritance of the blessing and eternal life might be
 bestowed upon us. This is God's last will. He does not desire to make
 any other. Therefore, no man can or dare change it or add anything to
 it. Now, it is adding to it, it is breaking or revoking it--since
 this testament has been opened and the blessing proclaimed to all the
 world--if anyone claims that we must first earn that blessing through
 the Law, proceeding as if, without the Law, this testament, by mere
 virtue of its promise and will, had no force at all.
 
 11. In short, this testament, Paul concludes, is a simple promise of
 blessing and sonship with God. Accordingly, there is no law which we
 must keep in order to merit it. Here nothing avails but the will
 which promises saying, I will not regard your deeds, but promise the
 blessing--that is, grace and eternal life--to you who are found in
 sin and death. This I will confirm by the death of my Son, who shall
 merit and obtain this inheritance for you.
 
 Now, God made this testament in the first place without the Law, and
 has thus confirmed it; therefore, the Law, published and confirmed
 long afterwards, cannot take aught from it, much less annul or revoke
 it. And he who declares or teaches that we are to be justified by the
 Law--are to obtain God's blessing by it--does nothing else but
 interfere with God's testament and destroy and annul his last will.
 This is one argument of Paul, based on the word "promise," or
 "testament," and is readily understood; for no one is so stupid that
 he cannot distinguish between these two--law or commandment, and
 promise.
 
 12. The second argument of Paul is based on the words, "God gave it
 to Abraham by promise." Here also it is easy for one who is possessed
 of common sense to perceive there is a marked difference between
 receiving something as a gift and earning it. What is earned is given
 because of obligation and debt, as wages, and he who receives it may
 boast of it, rather than he who gives it, and may insist upon his
 right. But when something is given for nothing and, as Paul here
 says, is bestowed freely--out of grace--then there can be no boasting
 of right or of merit on the part of the recipient. On the contrary,
 he must praise the goodness and kindness of his benefactor. So Paul
 concludes: God freely gave the blessing and the inheritance to
 Abraham by promise. Therefore, Abraham did not earn it by his works;
 nor was it given to him as a reward, much less to his children.
 
 13. It is evident enough to even a child that what is earned by works
 as a reward is not identical with what is promised or bestowed
 gratis, out of grace and pure free will. There is a distinction
 between them. God has stopped the mouth of all the world and deprived
 it of all occasion for boasting that it has received God's grace by
 reason of the Law. For he promised and bestowed that as a gift,
 before the Law or merit through the Law had any existence. In his
 dealings with his own people, with Abraham and his descendants, God
 promised to bless the patriarch and all his race and said nothing of
 any law, works or reward; he based all solely on the coming seed.
 
 14. In the faith of this promise they lived and died--Abraham himself
 and his children's children--till over four hundred and thirty years
 had elapsed. Then only did God give the Law, institute an outward
 form of worship, a priesthood, etc., and direct them how to live and
 govern themselves. They had now become a separate people, released
 from foreign domination, and brought into their own land, and they
 needed an external form of government. It was not intended that only
 now and by means of these gifts they should obtain forgiveness of
 sins and God's blessing.
 
 15. This is the substance of the first part of this epistle. In
 teaching how we are to be justified before God, Paul would have us
 distinguish well these two points, promise and law; or again, gift
 and reward. If we teach that God, out of pure grace, and not because
 of any law or merit, bestows forgiveness of sins and eternal life,
 the question at once presents itself: Why is the Law given, or of
 what use is it? Shall we not perform any good works? Why do we teach
 the ten commandments at all? Paul takes up this matter and asks the
 question, "What then is the Law?" Then he proceeds to discuss at
 length what is the office and use of the Law, and shows the
 difference between it and the Gospel. Of this enough has been said
 elsewhere, in other postils.
 
 
 
 
 _Fourteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Galatians 5, 16-24.
 
 16 But I say, Walk by the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the lust of
 the flesh. 17 For the flesh lusteth against the Spirit, and the
 Spirit against the flesh; for these are contrary the one to the
 other; that ye may not do the things that ye would. 18 But if ye are
 led by the Spirit, ye are not under the law. 19 Now the works of the
 flesh are manifest, which are these: fornication, uncleanness,
 lasciviousness, 20 idolatry, sorcery, enmities, strife, jealousies,
 wraths, factions, divisions, parties, 21 envyings, drunkenness,
 revellings, and such like; of which I forewarn you, even as I did
 forewarn you, that they who practise such things shall not inherit
 the kingdom of God. 22 But the fruit of the Spirit is love, joy,
 peace, longsuffering, kindness, goodness, faithfulness, 23 meekness,
 self-control; against such there is no law. 24 And they that are of
 Christ Jesus have crucified the flesh with the passions and the lusts
 thereof.
 
 
 WORKS OF THE FLESH AND FRUITS OF THE SPIRIT.
 
 This Epistle has been treated at length in the complete commentary
 (Luther's Commentary on Galatians). It exhorts to good works or
 fruits of faith in those who have the Holy Spirit through faith. And
 it does so in a way to show that it is not the design of this
 doctrine to forbid good works or to tolerate and refrain from
 censuring bad ones, or to prevent the preaching of the Law. On the
 contrary it shows clearly that God earnestly wills that Christians
 should flee and avoid the lusts of the flesh, if they would remain in
 the Spirit. To have and retain the Spirit and faith, and yet to
 fulfil the lusts of the flesh, are two things that cannot harmonize;
 for "these," Paul says, "are contrary the one to the other," and
 there is between them a vehement conflict. They cannot tolerate each
 other; one must be supreme and cast the other out. For this reason he
 clearly mentions some works of the flesh which plainly and evidently
 are not of the Spirit, and immediately concludes that those who
 commit and practice these are not in a condition to inherit God's
 kingdom. They have lost the Holy Spirit and faith. But he also shows
 whence the Christians obtain strength to enable them to resist the
 lusts of the flesh; namely, from the fact that they have received the
 Holy Spirit through faith, and from the knowledge that they have a
 gracious God. Thus their hearts become filled with love and a desire
 to obey God and to shun sin. Consequently they resist and refuse to
 obey the lusts of the flesh, lest they make God angry again. And
 although in this conflict they still feel their weakness, the Law
 nevertheless cannot condemn them, because through faith they are and
 remain in Christ.
 
 
 
 
 _Fifteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Galatians 5, 25-26 and 6, 1-10.
 
 25 If we live by the Spirit, by the Spirit let us also walk. 26 Let
 us not become vainglorious, provoking one another, envying one
 another.
 
 1 Brethren, even if a man be overtaken in any trespass, ye who are
 spiritual, restore such a one in a spirit of gentleness; looking to
 thyself, lest thou also be tempted. 2 Bear ye one another's burdens,
 and so fulfil the law of Christ. 3 For if a man thinketh himself to
 be something when he is nothing, he deceiveth himself. 4 But let each
 man prove his own work, and then shall he have his glorying in regard
 of himself alone, and not of his neighbor. 5 For each man shall bear
 his own burden. 6 But let him that is taught in the word communicate
 unto him that teacheth in all good things. 7 Be not deceived; God is
 not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth, that shall he also reap. 8
 For he that soweth unto his own flesh shall of the flesh reap
 corruption; but he that soweth unto the Spirit shall of the Spirit
 reap eternal life. 9 And let us not be weary in well-doing: for in
 due season we shall reap, if we faint not. 10 So then, as we have
 opportunity, let us work that which is good toward all men, and
 especially toward them that are of the household of the faith.
 
 
 CHURCH OFFICERS WARNED OF VAIN-GLORY.
 
 The chief aim of this epistle text is to instruct those in official
 authority in the Church. Since Christians are under obligation to
 honor their pastors and teachers, they are admonished by the apostle
 to guard against the sin of vain-glory, that those in authority may
 not become proud nor misuse their office against unity in doctrine
 and in love, and that they may not despise or pass by the wounded and
 helpless, as the priest and Levite did. Lk 10, 31-32. Finally, Paul
 exhorts all diligently to do the good and thus serve everyone, as
 Christ also teaches in the Gospel (Mt. 6, 34) that everyone should do
 the work of each day and not be anxious about the future. [See the
 explanation of these verses in Luther's Commentary on the Galatians.]
 
 
 
 
 _Sixteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Ephesians 3, 13-21.
 
 13. Wherefore I ask that ye may not faint at my tribulations for you,
 which are your glory. 14 For this cause I bow my knees unto the
 Father, 15 from whom every family in heaven and on earth is named, 16
 and that he would grant you, according to the riches of his glory,
 that ye may be strengthened with power through his Spirit in the
 inward man; 17 that Christ may dwell in your hearts through faith; to
 the end that ye, being rooted and grounded in love, 18 may be strong
 to apprehend with all the saints what is the breadth and length and
 height and depth, 19 and to know the love of Christ which passeth
 knowledge, that ye may be filled unto all the fulness of God. 20 Now
 unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly above all that we
 ask or think, according to the power that worketh in us, 21 unto him
 be the glory in the church and in Christ Jesus unto all generations
 for ever and ever. Amen.
 
 
 PAUL'S CARE AND PRAYER FOR THE CHURCH.[1]
 
 [Footnote 1: This sermon appeared in three editions the first year it
 was printed in 1525, at Wittenberg.]
 
 1. Up to this time Paul has been extolling the office of the
 ministry, which proclaims the Gospel of the New Testament. In lofty
 and impressive terms he introduces its purpose, power and wisdom--in
 a word, the great benefits the office effects, since God thereby
 bestows upon us abundantly all manner of wisdom, strength and
 blessings, all which things, in heaven or earth, are of his
 dispensing. The Gospel proclaims to us life from death, righteousness
 from sin, redemption from hell and all evil, and brings us out of the
 kingdom of darkness into the kingdom of God. So sublime is the whole
 subject, Paul does not venture to compass it with words but in the
 loftiest of language suggests much.
 
 2. In the first part of the text he shows the depth of his concern
 that the Ephesians should retain the Gospel preaching received from
 him, not allowing themselves to be torn away from it. To this end he
 employs two expedients: first, he consoles and admonishes; second, he
 prays and desires.
 
 "Wherefore I ask that ye may not faint at my tribulations for you,
 which are your glory."
 
 
 PAUL CONSOLES HIS CONVERTS.
 
 3. Having been imprisoned at Rome by order of the emperor, Paul thus
 consoles his beloved converts at Ephesus, admonishing them to cleave
 to the doctrine learned from him; not to be frightened from it by
 beholding his fate, nor permit themselves to be alienated by such
 comment as this: "This man Paul in his preaching to you made great
 pretentions to being commissioned of Christ himself, and to outdoing
 all the other apostles. And you made your boast in him and relied
 upon him as if he were the only and all-deserving one. Where is he
 now? What assistance can he render you? There he lies in Rome, by the
 Jews condemned to death; more than that, he is in the hands of that
 cruel tyrant, Emperor Nero. Did we not long ago tell you he would
 meet such fate? Presumably this puts an end to his boastings over
 every other man."
 
 4. To prevent the offense that threatened, Paul writes from his
 prison, and his message is, in effect, this: "Dear friends, you see I
 am imprisoned; the devil and the world have me in their hands. This
 may perhaps alarm you, and rouse in you the evil suspicion, 'If his
 doctrine were all right and if he were the great apostle of Christ he
 claims to be, God would not permit him to suffer such fate.'" For
 some of the false apostles thus taunted Paul's disciples. "But I
 entreat and exhort you," Paul would say, "not to be offended, or
 alarmed, not to grow faint, though I am in prison. Whether we be
 tempted and suffer tribulation, whether we be honored or dishonored,
 no matter what comes, only cleave to the doctrine I have preached to
 you--the Gospel, God's sure Word, as you know." He reminds them, as
 before he has done, of that whereunto God has called them, and of
 what they have received through his preaching.
 
 5. Such admonition is still, and will ever be, necessary in the
 Christian community. The weak must endure severe conflicts in the
 tribulations the Gospel inevitably entails. The trial is especially
 hard when they must lose their leaders and teachers, and in addition
 hear the shameful, bitter taunts of the calumniators. We in this day
 have to expect that some will be offended when teachers are assailed.
 We should therefore be prepared, and when any of our number fall away
 from our faith to flatter tyrants and the Pope, and to become liars
 and knaves, we must individually lay hold of the Gospel in a way to
 enable us to stand and say: "Not because a certain one has so taught,
 do I believe. It matters not what becomes of him or what he may be,
 the doctrine itself is right. This I know, whatever God may permit to
 befall myself or others because of it."
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN'S CONFIDENCE MUST BE IN GOD.
 
 6. So have I personally had to do, and must still do. Otherwise I
 would have been terrified and enervated when I saw the Pope, and
 bishops, emperors, kings and all the world, opposed to the doctrine
 they ought to sustain. I would have been overwhelmed, thinking,
 "They, too, are men and cannot all be followers of the devil." How
 could I comfort myself and stand firm unless I were able to say:
 "Though ten other worlds and everything great, lofty, wise and
 prudent, and all my dear friends and brethren as well, should turn
 from me, the doctrine still remains true. It stands: it will not,
 like men, totter and fall. I will adhere to the Word of God, stand or
 fall what may."
 
 7. The Christian must be discerning enough to strip the individual of
 his mask--of his great pomp and majesty--and distinguish it from the
 Word. He who cannot so do, cannot stand under temptation; let one
 fall, and he will soon follow suit.
 
 8. Such is the nature of the Church in its earthly government that
 human wisdom must stumble thereat; various sects of the offended must
 rise in opposition to the faith. But God delights to rule, not with
 the sword or with visible power, but through weakness and in
 opposition to the devil and the world. Seemingly, he would permit his
 Church to be utterly overthrown. Guard against and resist offenses as
 well as we may--and the practice is not without its efficacy--still
 we must ultimately be driven to say defiantly: "He who established
 the Church and has to this time preserved it, will continue to
 protect it. Man would not rule it wisely, but the living Christ is
 seated upon the throne whereon God placed him, and we shall see who
 can pull him down and destroy his Church."
 
 
 PAUL'S SUFFERINGS FOR THE CHURCH'S GOOD.
 
 9. When the trying hour arrives, we are able to accomplish about as
 little against the enemy as Paul when he lay in chains powerless to
 succor a soul. He was obliged to commit his cause to the Lord. At the
 same time, as a faithful apostle, he ceased not, though removed from
 his followers, to admonish and warn to the full extent of his power.
 Well he knew that many false apostles were ready, so sure as he said
 a word, to pervert it and to fill the ears of the people with their
 own empty words and poisonous teaching. He elsewhere complains (2 Tim
 1, 15) that by the influence of this class all Asia was turned away
 from him. He had reference to the nearest neighbors of the Ephesians
 in Asia.
 
 10. For the sake of affording his converts comfort and strength, Paul
 proceeds to make his sufferings and tribulations pleasing to them by
 speaking of these afflictions in unusual and beautiful terms. He
 presents a view quite opposed to the opinion of the world and the
 judgment of calumniators. "My sufferings and tribulations," says
 Paul, "which to you and the world, viewed in a fleshy way, are most
 disastrous, really work you no injury nor disadvantage,
 notwithstanding what the pernicious babblers claim about such trials.
 Rather, they are beneficial to you and me. Though your enemies seek
 thus to injure you to the fullest extent, benefits they never foresee
 will accrue to us.
 
 "My sufferings are not for my own sake, but yours. They work your
 benefit; it is better for you as it is, than for me to be present and
 preach to you. And how so? Because I suffer only for the sake of the
 ministry, for that Gospel I delivered you. I risk my life and all I
 have that you may hold it fast; such is my earnest desire. I contend
 for and cleave to, at the risk of my life, that which Christ gave me
 and enjoined upon me. Thus by my chains and bands I honor and
 establish the Gospel, that you may be strengthened and may cleave
 more firmly to it.
 
 11. "So we shall joyfully transform the tribulation imposed by the
 world in an attempt to inflict great evils: God will have to
 pronounce the sentence: 'Hear, O world, devil, emperor, tyrant! Thou
 hast imprisoned my apostle Paul for the sake of my godly Christians.
 What injury have they done thee? what fault committed? With no wrong
 on their part, thou persecutest them. It is simply because I gave
 them my Word; therefore thou art opposing and defying me. What shall
 I say but that thou hast imprisoned and bound, not Paul, but me? Is
 it not insupportable that a perishable worm, be he emperor or prince,
 should presume to apprehend God in heaven? But thinkest thou I will
 remain silent and unprotesting? Thinkest thou I will not break
 chains, stocks and bands, and give command: Hold thou, devil and
 tyrant, and submit! Let me rule, substituting for one Paul, ten; and
 for one Church at Ephesus establishing thirty, yes, a hundred.'"
 
 12. And as in Paul's time, so today: when our enemies get hold of an
 evangelical preacher, either he must secretly be drowned or murdered,
 or he must publicly be hanged or burned. Why is it? Because of the
 Christians to whom he has taught his doctrine. For a while God looks
 on serenely. He says: "Beloved lords, be not enraged. Know you whom
 you have apprehended and murdered? It is I, the Divine Majesty. It
 was not their own word and command but mine which these preachers
 taught and my Christians believed. You cannot deny the fact. I must,
 then, consider how to secure myself against your wrath. How shall I
 do it? Indeed, by way of returning your favors and kindnesses, I must
 so arrange that where one town had a minister and the Gospel, ten,
 yes twenty, towns must have their pastor and preachers. I will, O
 Pope and bishops, invade your own dioceses and you must tolerate and
 accept the Gospel, whether to your joy or your grief. If you begin to
 rave, I will give you cause for alarm, for you shall be overthrown,
 bishops, hats and all."
 
 13. Note, when Paul says he suffers for the Ephesians, he means that
 his suffering is for their profit, to teach them they have nothing to
 fear in suffering. They, not he, are the subjects of concern in this
 matter. His pains are not merely those of Paul--upon whom not so much
 depends--but of an apostle or preacher of the Church of Christ. When
 the latter name is associated with the suffering, when it is not John
 or Peter who is cast into prison--that God might tolerate--but a
 minister of the Church, then the deed is a too gross jesting with the
 majesty of God; it is tempting him too far, yes apprehending him.
 
 14. It was necessary that Paul give his converts this admonition:
 "Dear children, fear not. Do not be alarmed at my arrest and intended
 execution. Let our enemies put forth their utmost effort. You shall
 see how I will rend the cords and burst the prison, humiliating them
 until they lie in ashes; the place of one resister of the Gospel will
 be filled by ten who preach it."
 
 
 CHRIST PERSECUTED IN CHRISTIANS.
 
 Since Paul's enemies refuse instruction and will not cease their
 raging, since they refuse to learn against whom they rage, he must
 make known to them who is the object of their persecution. It is
 neither Paul nor an apostle, but he to whom it was said (Ps 110, 1),
 "Sit thou at my right hand." It is a perilous thing to take liberties
 with him. He is now seated where he will brook no suffering. The
 enemies of the Christians must behold such things as did the Jews who
 delivered Paul into the Emperor's hands, and as the Romans witnessed.
 Soon after Paul's execution, Jerusalem lay in ashes, and not a great
 while after, the city of Rome was destroyed. For when Christ was
 oppressed, when in the person of his apostles and martyrs he was
 seized and put to death, he had no alternative but to destroy a whole
 city. And Germany may expect a similar fate.
 
 
 NO MAN CAN MERIT ETERNAL LIFE FOR ANOTHER.
 
 15. It is unnecessary here to reply to those wicked and illiterate
 dolts, the Papists and Anabaptist factions, who explain Paul's words,
 "my tribulations for you," and similar passages, as teaching that one
 Christian can by his sufferings merit or aid in the salvation of
 others. Paul does not say, "My tribulations for you are designed to
 secure for you forgiveness of sins and salvation." He clearly
 declares, as the Scriptures everywhere do, that only Christ's
 sufferings are thus effective and for all men. Paul's thought may
 well be expressed--and every minister may say the same--in these
 words: "My preaching and my suffering are for your sake." Just as a
 parent may say to a child, "I must do or endure this for you."
 
 True, works wrought and sufferings endured for another's sake are
 productive of the good and comfort of that one or of many, but the
 worker or sufferer does not thereby merit, either for himself or
 another, God's grace and eternal life. No, these things demand the
 offices of a being of another order--Christ. He through his
 sufferings exterminates your sins, and through his death gives you
 life. Then again, Paul is addressing those already Christians and
 having forgiveness of sins and all the requirements of a Christian;
 yet he suffers for them; that is, for their good--that in proportion
 as his enemies seek to oppose the Gospel, its influence may be
 widened and the faith of his followers strengthened.
 
 16. In the effort to comfort and strengthen the Ephesians, Paul yet
 further glorifies and extols his tribulations in the words "which are
 your glory." What unheardof talk is this? Is it not much rather, as
 reason dictates and as all the world affirms, a disgrace to his
 followers that he lies there in prison? What greater dishonor can
 Christians suffer than to have their ministers and pastors--their
 instructors and consolers--shamefully arrested? So it seems to the
 world, it is true; but I tell you, in God's sight and in reality,
 this trial is a great honor to you, one of which you may proudly
 boast. This very disgrace and provocation you may turn squarely to
 your good, saying: "From the very fact of our disgrace, I know the
 doctrine is true and divine. For it is the lot of the Word of God and
 of salutary doctrine, together with the supporters of the same, to be
 defamed and persecuted by the world and the devil." Such persecution
 is but glory and honor to Christians. Paul says in Romans 5, 3, "We
 rejoice in our tribulations." In other words, we regard them as
 glorious, beneficial, precious, blessed.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS TO REJOICE IN PERSECUTIONS.
 
 17. Christians should not, and cannot, have their glory in the things
 the world esteems and honors; for the world will not, nor can it,
 honor even God and his Word. Christ's followers, then, should not be
 terrified at such treatment as Paul received nor feel disgraced. Let
 them rather rejoice, deriving comfort and glory therefrom, as did the
 apostles. We read (Acts 4, 13) of their boldness, and (Acts 5, 41)
 that they rejoiced in being "counted worthy to suffer dishonor for
 the Name." So it fared with Christ himself, and Christians ought to
 be grieved if it be otherwise with them and if the world regard them
 in a kindly way. In proportion as the world persecutes them and heaps
 upon them its malice, should they rejoice. Let them accept
 persecution as a good indication, regarding themselves blessed, as
 Christ teaches in Matthew 5, 11. So much for the first part of our
 text; now follows the second:
 
 "For this cause I bow my knees unto the Father [of our Lord Jesus
 Christ], from whom every family in heaven and on earth is named."
 
 
 PREACHING MUST BE FOLLOWED BY PRACTICE.
 
 18. Having comforted his followers concerning his tribulations, Paul
 tells them it is his earnest petition, his longing, that God would
 grant them power to cleave in firm faith to the Gospel, not forsaking
 it or growing weary when they have to endure affronts and
 tribulations, but firmly resisting these. It is not enough merely to
 accept the Gospel, or even to preach it. Acceptance must be followed
 by that spiritual power which renders faith firm and manifests
 steadfastness in conflicts and temptations; for "the kingdom of God
 is not in word, but in power," as Paul says, 1 Cor 4, 20. There must
 be a motive force consisting of the inner belief of the heart and the
 outward proofs of faith: not mere speaking, but doing: not mere
 talking, but living. Conditions must be such that the Word does not
 simply remain on the tongue and in the ears, but becomes operative
 and accomplishes something. In the Old Testament dispensation, Moses
 preached much indeed, and the people practiced little; but here Paul
 desires that much be done and little said. He would not have the
 Gospel preached in vain, but desires that it accomplish the object of
 its revelation.
 
 19. Note how Paul devotes himself to the welfare of the Christian
 community. He sets an example, to us ministers in particular, of how
 to effect the good of the people. But we do not rightly heed his
 example. We imagine it sufficient to hear the Gospel and be able to
 discourse about it; we stop at the mere knowledge of it; we never
 avail ourselves of the Gospel's power in the struggles of life.
 Unquestionably, the trouble is, we do not earnestly pray. We ought
 constantly to come to God with great longing, entreating him day and
 night to give the Word power to move men's hearts. David says (Ps 68,
 33), "Lo, he uttereth his voice, a mighty voice."
 
 20. Not only preachers, but all Christians, should constantly entreat
 the God who grants knowledge to grant also efficacy; should beseech
 him that the Word may not pass with the utterance, but may manifest
 itself in power. The prevailing complaint at present is that much
 preaching obtains, but no practice; that the people are shamefully
 rude, cold and indolent, and less active than ever, while at the same
 time they enjoy the strong, clear light of revelation concerning all
 right and wrong in the world. Well may we pray, then, as Paul does
 here. He says, in effect: "You are well supplied: the Word is richly
 proclaimed to you--abundantly poured out upon you. But I bend my
 knees to God, praying that he may add his blessing to the Word and
 grant you to behold his honor and praise and to be firmly
 established, that the Word may grow in you and yield fruit."
 
 21. Feelingly does Paul speak of praying for his followers. He seems
 to say: "I must lie here imprisoned, not privileged to be with you or
 to aid you in any way but by bending my knees--that is, entreating
 and imploring God earnestly and in deep humility--to the end that God
 may grant you, may effect in you, what neither myself nor any other
 human being can accomplish--what I could not do even were I free and
 ever present with you."
 
 
 TRUE PRAYER CONSISTS NOT IN OUTWARD THINGS.
 
 22. Observe, the apostle alludes to his prayer by naming its outward
 expression--bending the knees. But the external posture, if
 accompanied by nothing else, is sheer hypocrisy. When prayer is
 genuine, possessing the fire by which it is kindled, prompted by a
 sincere heart which recognizes its need and likewise the blessings
 that are ours as proclaimed in the Word, and when faith in God's
 Word--in his promise--revives, then the individual will be possessed
 with a fervor prompting him to fall upon his knees and pray for
 strength and for the power of the Spirit. When the Spirit of prayer
 is enkindled and burns within the heart, the body will responsively
 assume the proper attitude; involuntarily, eyes and hands will be
 upraised and knees bended. Witness the examples of Moses, David and
 even Christ himself.
 
 When we pray with glowing hearts, external gestures will take care of
 themselves. They are prompted by the Spirit, and therefore are not to
 be denounced. If assumed, unbidden of the Spirit, they are
 hypocritical; as, for instance, when one presumes outwardly to serve
 God and perform good works while his heart is far away. The prophet
 says (Is 29, 13), "This people draw nigh unto me, and with their
 mouth and with their lips do honor me, but have removed their heart
 far from me."
 
 23. By the declaration, "I bow my knees unto the Father of our Lord
 Jesus Christ," Paul establishes the doctrine that no one should
 presume to speak to God, to entreat him for any favor, unless
 approaching, as Paul does here, in the name of "the Father of our
 Lord Jesus Christ." For Christ is our sole Mediator, and no one need
 expect to be heard unless he approach the Father in the name of that
 Mediator and confess him Lord given of God as intercessor for us and
 ruler of our bodies and souls. Prayer according to these conditions
 is approved. Strong faith, however, is necessary to lay hold of the
 comforting Word, picturing God in our hearts as the Father of our
 Lord Jesus Christ.
 
 24. The statement that Christ is our Lord is very comforting, though
 we have made it terrifying by regarding Christ as a stern and angry
 judge. But the fact is, he is Lord for the sole purpose of securing
 us against harsh lords, tyrants, the devil, the world, death, sin and
 every sort of misfortune. We are his inheritance, and therefore he
 will espouse our cause, deliver us from violence and oppression of
 all kinds and better our condition.
 
 The name "Lord," then, is altogether lovable and comforting to us who
 believe, and gives us confidence of heart. But still more comforting
 is it to know that our God, our Lord, is the Father of our Lord Jesus
 Christ. The name "Lord" stands for the complete Godhead, who gives
 himself to us. Therefore, all we ask in this name must be abundantly
 bestowed. Naught is here for me but real help and pure grace. For God
 designs to have me his child in Christ, placed above all things
 temporal and eternal.
 
 
 GOD OUR FATHER.
 
 25. Paul further declares that God is not merely a father, but the
 true Father, "from whom every family in heaven and on earth is
 named." Earthly fathers are so called because in a flesh and blood
 way they have begotten us, or on account of their age and their claim
 to honor. It is the universal custom to apply the term "father" to an
 old master. In Second Kings 5, 13, for instance, the servants of
 Naaman called their lord "father." Paul's thought is: "All fatherhood
 on earth is but a semblance, a shadow, a painted image, in comparison
 with the divine Fatherhood of God."
 
 26. But reason can never see it so. And only by the Spirit's work can
 the heart recognize the fact. Reason may go so far as to regard God
 an angry and terrible judge, one who makes the world, even hell
 itself, too narrow for it and leaves it without a foothold. But it is
 impossible for natural reason to call God a father in sincerity; much
 less to regard him the divine Father, preeminent over all who bear
 the name of "father" in heaven or on earth, of whom all other fathers
 are as mirror reflections.
 
 27. Think of the attitude of an earthly father toward his child, and
 of the child toward his father. Even where actual parenthood is
 lacking, the name engenders a confidence affectionate and pleasing
 enough to kindle the brightest anticipations of great good to be
 received. Now, if the sincere, loyal designs of earthly fathers for
 their children are mere pretense compared to the blessed purposes of
 our heavenly Father, what must we look for from this heavenly Father,
 this Father above all others? Paul would teach us to look at the
 proportions, and from the confidence we repose in our natural fathers
 estimate the character of God as a Father and what we may expect from
 him.
 
 28. He who can put his trust in God, who can confidently rely upon
 him and sincerely cry, "Thou art my beloved Father!" need not fear to
 ask anything of God, or that God will at all deny him. His own heart
 will tell him that his petitions will be granted. Because of the
 strength of his confidence, he cannot fail to secure his heart's
 desires. Thus God himself teaches us to break open heaven and lay him
 bare before our eyes that we may see who this Father is.
 
 [Thus Paul is confident what he asks is pleasing to God and will be
 granted. If we did the same we would, doubtless, have a like
 experience. There are still people who pray. It would be a blessing
 if there were many more. Then the Gospel would make greater progress
 and impart to us greater power. It is evident, God be praised, that
 all who rage against the Gospel must be put to shame. The more they
 rage, the more the Gospel spreads, and all without our help or
 counsel, only because God awakens hearts to pray that it may prosper,
 even without our help. The more fervently we pray, the greater is
 God's pleasure to hear.]
 
 29. What is the nature of the prayer Paul here presents? It is the
 same as the Lord's Prayer, being particularly identical with the
 first, second and third petitions. In words of different sound but
 implying the very same thing, Paul briefly embraces these
 petitions--the hallowing of God's name and Word in our midst, and the
 destruction of the devil's kingdom and all evil--whatever is opposed
 to the Word and will of God. He says:
 
 "That he would grant you, according to the riches of his glory, that
 ye may be strengthened with power."
 
 
 GOD LAVISH IN HIS BLESSINGS.
 
 30. Sublime words are these, wrung from a fervent heart. Evidently,
 in the effort to express himself fully, clearly and in language
 worthy of his subject, the apostle finds words too weak and rare. The
 fervor of his heart can be but poorly portrayed. By the phrase,
 "according to the riches of his glory," Paul means to say: "Such is
 the greatness of God's glory, it deserves the title of riches. For it
 is conducive to God's honor and praise that he gives abundantly."
 These words reveal the nature of God, proclaiming him the source
 whence we may expect all good, and all aid in time of need. He is God
 of all the world. The reason the world has made many gods, has
 invoked many saints, is because it looks to them for aid and benefit.
 The Scriptures term "gods" certain individuals who do good and lend
 assistance to their fellows. God says to Moses (Ex 7, 1), "I have
 made thee as God [a god] to Pharaoh."
 
 31. But God, because of the abundance and lavishness of his gifts, is
 entitled to greater honor and glory. He is the true God, to whom
 alone belongs all glory; yea, the riches of glory. He pours out his
 blessings abundantly and above measure; he is the source of all
 blessings in heaven and on earth. Even his most inferior
 creatures--water, air, the earth and its products--are so generously
 bestowed that we can appropriate only an infinitesimal part of them.
 Yet in our blindness and stupidity we do not see, yea, we utterly
 ignore the fact that God is the giver of these. Now, how much more
 generous is God in spiritual blessings! He has freely given
 himself--poured out himself--for us, and also gifts and blessings of
 the highest order. He has illumined us with a light bright enough to
 reveal to us the real character of the world, the devil and the
 angels. Yes, to show to us God's purposes, present, past and future.
 Thus we have all wisdom and all power over sin, the devil and death,
 being lords of all creatures. In a word, our riches are inexpressibly
 great.
 
 32. Paul employs forcible words to record his prayer here. He has
 firm confidence in God that the petition must be efficacious, must
 penetrate the clouds and open heaven. He does not say that God looks
 upon our merit and worthiness and for the sake of these grants our
 requests; but for the sake of the riches of his glory. We are not
 worthy his favors, but his glory is worthy of our recognition, and we
 are to honor him because he gratuitously lavishes his blessings upon
 us, that his name alone may be hallowed. Only with a recognition of
 these facts may prayer be offered if it is to avail before God. If
 God were to consider our merit, very small would be the portion due
 us. But if we are to be richly blessed, it must come about through
 our recognition of pure grace as the source of our gifts, and our
 praise of God's exceeding glory.
 
 33. But what are the blessings for which Paul's prayer entreats?
 Something more than continuance of the Word with his followers,
 though it is a great and good gift even to have the Word thoroughly
 taught: he prays that the heart may taste the Word and that it may be
 effectual in the life. Thus the apostle contrasts a knowledge of the
 Word with the power of the Word. Many have the knowledge, but few the
 impelling and productive power that the results may be as we teach.
 Hence they are criticised and not without reason. But our enemies
 cannot censure and reproach us to greater extent than to say that we
 preach and accept much good doctrine to no purpose; that no one
 practices it and profits thereby; that in fact we are morally worse
 than before we heard the doctrines, and consequently it would have
 been better had things remained as they were.
 
 
 WE SHOULD PRAY FOR THE POWER OF THE WORD.
 
 34. What answer shall we make? This: In the first place, considering
 our unsatisfactory condition and the lack of power with the Word, we
 have great reason to pray with the earnestness Paul's example
 teaches. And secondly, though our enemies see little improvement and
 few fruits of the Gospel, it is not theirs to judge. They think we
 ought to do nothing but work miracles--raising the dead and bordering
 the Christian's walk with roses, until naught but holiness obtains
 everywhere. This being the case, where would be the need to pray? We
 cannot, nor dare we, pray for what we already have, but must thank
 God for it. But, since Paul and other Scripture authorities command
 us to pray, a defect somewhere in our strength is indicated.
 Otherwise why say they so much about it?
 
 Thus Paul himself acknowledges the Ephesians were weak. He complains
 of the same weakness in other Epistles and especially in those to the
 Corinthians. Everywhere he urges them to do and live as they had been
 taught. The only reason Paul advocates this is that he saw, as we now
 see, that everywhere they fail, and things are not as they should be.
 
 In spite of the fact that not everyone's conduct is satisfactory,
 some do mend their ways; and the happy condition obtains that many
 consciences are assured and many former evils are now avoided. If the
 two sides of the question were carefully compared, we would see much
 advantage with us not now noticed. Again, even though we are somewhat
 weak, is that any reason for saying all is lost? Further, there is
 naught else but filth and corruption in the ranks of our enemies,
 which they would gladly adorn with our weakness even. But they must
 look upon their way as excellent and ours as odious.
 
 35. Let them go on with their judging. We admit we are not all
 strong, but it is also true that were there no weakness in our ranks,
 we would have no need of prayer, perseverance, exhortation and daily
 preaching. In condemning the Gospel because of our admitted weakness,
 something we ourselves confess, our enemies are themselves judged
 before God by their judging us. It is possible for me to be truly in
 the kingdom of grace and at the same time outwardly weak enough to be
 regarded of men as a knave. My faith is not apparent to men, but God
 sees it and I am myself sensible of it. You meantime erroneously
 judge me by my outward conduct, thus bringing judgment upon yourself.
 We are aware of, and also lament, our weakness and imperfection.
 Hence we cry and groan, and pray to God to grant us strength and
 power.
 
 
 WORLD SEES NOT INNER MARKS OF CHRISTIANS.
 
 36. A third answer to our enemies is: We are certain that wherever
 the Word of God is proclaimed, the fruits of the same must exist. We
 have the Word of God, and therefore the Spirit of God must be with
 us. And where the Spirit is, faith must obtain, however weak it may
 be. Though visible evidence may be lacking, yet inevitably there must
 be some among us who daily pray, while we may not be aware of it. It
 is reasonably to be expected that our enemies should judge
 erroneously, because they look for outward evidences of Christianity,
 which are not forthcoming.
 
 The Word is too sublime to pass under our judgment; it is the
 province of the Word to judge us. The world, however, while unwilling
 to be judged and convicted by us, essays to judge and convict the
 Word of God. Here God steps in. It would be a pity for the worldly to
 see a godly Christian, so God blinds them and they miss his kingdom.
 As Isaiah says (ch. 26, 10): "In the land of uprightness will he deal
 wrongfully, and will not behold the majesty of Jehovah." For this
 reason, few real Christians come under the observation of cavilers;
 the latter, in general, observe fools and fanatics, at whom they
 maliciously stumble and take offense. They are unworthy to behold
 God's honor in a godly Christian upon whom the Lord has poured out
 himself in fullness of blessing.
 
 37. Let the real Christian come into the presence of the caviler,
 stand before his very eyes, and the caviler will not see him. Let the
 fault-finder hear that one leads an irreproachable life and he will
 say: "Heretics have behaved similarly, but under a good appearance
 concealed poison." Let one be refractory and reckless, and he must be
 a knave. Whatever we do, they are not satisfied. If we pipe, they
 will not dance; if we mourn, they will not lament. Neither sweet nor
 sour appeals to them. Wisdom must permit herself to be schooled and
 governed by these cavilers, as Christ says in Matthew 11, 19. Thus
 God confounds and shames the world; while all the time tolerating its
 judgment of himself, he is ever careful to have the Gospel
 inculcated, even though the worldly burst with rage. I say these
 things to teach us to be careful not to join the caviler in judging
 presumptuously the work and Word of God. Notwithstanding our
 weakness, we are yet certain the kingdom of God is in our midst so
 long as we have his Word and daily pray for its efficacy and for an
 increase of our faith, as the following words recommend:
 
 "That ye may be strengthened with power through his Spirit in the
 inward man."
 
 
 THE SPIRIT IMPARTS REAL STRENGTH.
 
 38. The apostle here speaks with varied expression. He leaves little
 honor and glory, as it were, for free-will, but desires for his
 followers the heavenly power imparted through the Holy Spirit. There
 is also a power of the world, and a spirit--the devil, the prince of
 the world, who blinds and hardens men's hearts. He boasts of himself
 and imparts to men a spirit of daring in his purpose to suppress and
 exterminate Christian doctrine. But while worldings are courageous
 and daring, so are Christians, and the latter are greater and far
 more powerful through the Holy Spirit, and are undaunted by the
 world, the devil, death and all kinds of misfortune. This is real
 spiritual strength. The Hebrew word "spirit" might well be rendered
 "bold, undaunted courage." Spiritual strength is not the strength of
 muscle and bone; it is true courage--boldness of heart. Weakness, on
 the contrary, is faint-heartedness, timidity, lack of courage.
 
 39. Paul's meaning, then, is: "I desire for you, and pray God to
 grant you, that bold, dauntless courage and that strong, cheerful
 spirit which will not be terrified by poverty, shame, sin, the devil
 or death, but is confident that nothing can harm us and we will never
 be in need." The courage of the world--the spirit of the world--holds
 out only until exhaustion of the stores whereon it relies. As the
 saying is, "Wealth gives temporal boldness, but the soul must rely on
 God alone." The boldness resulting from riches and worldly power is
 haughty and makes its boast in earthly things. But the soul has no
 hoarded treasure. In God alone it braves every evil; it has a courage
 and heart very different from that of the world.
 
 This is the strength for which Paul prays on behalf of his converts,
 a strength not inherent in flesh and blood. The possessor thereof
 does not rely and build on his own powers and riches, nor upon any
 human help and support. This strength dwells in the inner man. It is
 the trust of the dauntless, cheerful heart in God's grace and
 assistance, and in these alone. The heart which so trusts has no
 fear. It possesses by faith abundance of riches and pleasures--God
 himself with all his blessings. At the same time, to human sight only
 want, weakness and terror may be apparent.
 
 "That Christ may dwell in your hearts through faith."
 
 40. The Holy Spirit brings Christ into the heart and teaches it to
 know him. He imparts warmth and courage through faith in Christ. Paul
 everywhere intimates that no man should presume to approach God
 otherwise than through Christ, the one Mediator. Now, if Christ
 dwells in my heart and regulates my entire life, it matters not
 though my faith be weak. Christ is not mere bone but also flesh. Yes,
 he has blisters and boils and sins of which he is not ashamed,
 notwithstanding the eminent saints may hold their noses thereat. And
 where he dwells all fullness is, let the individual be weak or strong
 as God permits.
 
 
 CHRIST EMBRACED ONLY BY THE HEART.
 
 41. For Christ to dwell in the heart is simply for the heart to know
 him; in other words, to understand who he is and what we are to
 expect from him--that he is our Saviour, through whom we may call God
 our Father and may receive the Spirit who imparts courage to brave
 all trials. It is thus that Christ dwells with us, in our hearts.
 Only so can he be embraced; for he is not an inanimate thing, but the
 living God. How does man lay hold of the Saviour in the heart? Not by
 embracing him intellectually. It is accomplished only by living
 faith. Christ will not permit himself to be received by works, nor to
 be apprehended with mental vision; he will consent only to be
 embraced by the heart. If your faith be true and on a firm
 foundation, you have and feel Christ in your heart and are aware of
 all he thinks and does in heaven and on earth--how he rules through
 his Word and his Spirit, and the attitude of those who have Christ
 and those who have him not.
 
 42. Paul desires Christ to be efficacious in the hearts of his
 followers unto the full realization of the promises of the
 Word--liberation from sin and death, and assurance of grace and
 eternal life. It is impossible for the heart having such experience
 to be other than firm and courageous to oppose the terrors of the
 devil and the world. But the heart which has not yet arrived at this
 point is here advised what course to take, namely, to pray God for
 such faith and strength, and to avail himself of the prayers of
 others to the same end. So much in regard to faith; now follows the
 mention of love.
 
 "That ye, being rooted and grounded in love."
 
 
 LOVE, THE EXPRESSION OF FAITH.
 
 43. This is an unusual way of speaking. Is it not in faith that we
 are to be rooted, engrafted and grounded? Why, then, does Paul here
 substitute "love?" I reply: Faith, it is true, is the essential
 thing, but love shows whether or no faith is real and the heart
 confident and courageous in God. Where one has an unquestioning
 confidence that God is his Father, necessarily, be his faith never so
 weak, that faith must find expression in word and deed. He will serve
 his neighbor in teaching and in extending to him a helping hand. This
 is what Paul calls being rooted and grounded in love--having the
 conscious experience of possessing true faith. Love is the test that
 determines the reality of faith. Peter says (2 Pet 1, 10), "Give the
 more diligence to make your calling and election sure." That is,
 proceed to good works that others may see and you experience that you
 have true faith. Until you do, you will always be uncertain,
 vacillating, superficial in heart, not rooted and grounded. So by
 these two clauses Paul teaches, first, that we should have in our
 hearts genuine faith toward God; and second, that faith should find
 expression in loving service to one's neighbor.
 
 "May be strong to apprehend with all the saints what is the breadth
 and length and height and depth."
 
 
 TRUE CHRISTIANS FIND CHRIST EVERYWHERE.
 
 44. These words represent another feature of the apostle's desire for
 his Christians to be established and comforted in God through faith,
 and rooted and grounded in love toward their neighbors. "When you are
 thus strengthened," he would say, "and are perseveringly pressing
 forward, you will be able to grasp with all saints the four parts, to
 increase therein and to appreciate them more and more." Faith alone
 effects this apprehension. Love is not the moving force here, but it
 contributes by making faith manifest.
 
 45. Some teachers would make these words reflect and measure the holy
 cross. But Paul does not say a word about the cross. He simply says,
 in effect: "That you may apprehend all things; may see the length and
 breadth, the height and depth, of Christ's kingdom." This condition
 obtains when my heart has reached the point where Christ cannot make
 the spiritual life too long or too wide for me to follow, nor high
 enough or deep enough to cause my fall from him or his Word; the
 point where I may be satisfied that wherever I go he is, and that he
 rules in all places, however long or broad, deep or high, the
 situation from either a temporal or eternal point of view. No matter
 how long or wide I measure, I find him everywhere. David says (Ps
 139, 7-8): "Whither shall I go from thy Spirit? or whither shall I
 flee from thy presence? If I ascend up into heaven, thou art there:
 if I make my bed in Sheol, behold, thou art there." Christ rules
 eternally. His length and breadth, his depth and height, are
 unlimited. If I descend into hell, my heart and my faith tell me he
 is there.
 
 46. The sum of the matter is this: Depressed or exalted,
 circumscribed in whatsoever way, dragged hither or thither, I still
 find Christ. For he holds in his hands everything in heaven or on
 earth, and all are subject to him--angels, the devil, the world, sin,
 death and hell. Therefore, so long as he dwells in my heart, I have
 courage, wherever I go, I cannot be lost. I dwell where Christ my
 Lord dwells. This, however, is a situation impossible to reason.
 Should reason ascend a yard above the earth or descend a yard below,
 or be deprived of the tangible things of the present, it would have
 to despair. We Christians are, through Christ, better fortified. We
 are assured that he dwells everywhere, be it in honor or dishonor,
 hunger, sorrow, illness, imprisonment, death or life, blessing or
 affliction. It is Paul's desire for the Ephesians that God give them
 grace and strength to have such heart-apprehension of his kingdom. He
 concludes the details of his prayer in these words:
 
 "And to know the love of Christ which passeth knowledge, that ye may
 be filled unto all the fulness of God."
 
 47. He means: "I desire you, in addition to having faith and
 apprehending the four proportions of Christ's kingdom, to know the
 love of Christ we should have--the love Christ bears toward us, and
 the love we owe our neighbor. This knowledge transcends all other,
 even familiarity with the Gospel; for, know as much as you may, your
 knowledge will avail little or nothing without love."
 
 48. Paul's desire, briefly summed up, is that the faith of Christians
 may be strengthened unto efficacy, and that love may be warm and
 fervent, and the heart filled with the fullness of God. "Filled unto
 all the fullness of God" means, if we follow the Hebrew, filled with
 everything God's bounty supplies, full of God, adorned with his grace
 and the gifts of his Spirit--the Spirit who gives us steadfastness,
 illuminates us with his light, lives within us his life, saves us
 with his salvation, and with his love enkindles love in us; in short,
 it means having God himself and all his blessings dwelling in us in
 fullness and being effective to make us wholly divine--not so that we
 possess merely something of God, but all his fullness.
 
 
 CHRISTIAN PERFECTION.
 
 49. Much has been written about the way we are to become godlike.
 Some have constructed ladders whereby we are to ascend to heaven, and
 others similar things. But this is all patchwork. In this passage is
 designated the truest way to attain godlikeness. It is to become
 filled to the utmost with God, lacking in no particular; to be
 completely permeated with him until every word, thought and deed, the
 whole life in fact, be utterly godly.
 
 50. But let none imagine such fullness can be attained in this life.
 We may indeed desire it and pray for it, like Paul here, but we will
 not find a man thus perfect. We stand, however, upon the fact that we
 desire such perfection and groan after it. So long as we live in the
 flesh, we are filled with the fullness of Adam. Hence it is necessary
 for us continually to pray God to replace our weakness with courage,
 and to put into our hearts his Spirit to fill us with grace and
 strength and rule and work in us absolutely. We ought all to desire
 this state for one another. To this end may God grant us grace. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 _Seventeenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Ephesians 4, 1-6.
 
 1 I, therefore, the prisoner in the Lord, beseech you to walk
 worthily of the calling wherewith ye were called, 2 with all
 lowliness and meekness, with longsuffering, forbearing one another in
 love; 3 giving diligence to keep the unity of the Spirit in the bond
 of peace. 4 There is one body, and one Spirit, even as also ye were
 called in one hope of your calling; 5 one Lord, one faith, one
 baptism, 6 one God and Father of all, who is over all, and through
 all, and in all.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN CALLING AND UNITY.
 
 1. This, too, is a beautiful sermon, delivered by Paul to the
 Ephesians, concerning the good works of Christians, who believe and
 are obedient to the doctrine of the Gospel. In the knowledge of good
 works Paul desires Christians to grow and increase, as we learned in
 the epistle for last Sunday. The ground of all doctrine, of all right
 living, the supreme and eternal treasure of him who is a Christian in
 the sight of God, is faith in Christ. It alone secures forgiveness of
 sins and makes us children of God. Now, where this faith is, fruits
 should follow as evidence that Christians in their lives honor and
 obey God. They are necessary for God's glory and for the Christian's
 own honor and eternal reward before him.
 
 2. Paul, remembering the imprisonment and tribulations he suffered
 because of the Gospel and for the advantage, as he before said, of
 the Ephesians, gives the admonition here. He would have them, in
 return for his sufferings, honor the Gospel in their lives. First he
 names a general rule of life for Christians.
 
 "To walk worthily of the calling wherewith ye were called."
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN CALLING.
 
 3. The chief thing that should influence a Christian's outward walk
 is the remembrance of his calling and appointment by God. He should
 be mindful of why he is called a Christian, and live consistently. He
 must shine before the world; that is, through his life and God's
 work, the Word and the name of Christ the Lord must be exalted.
 Christ exhorts his disciples: "Even so let your light shine before
 men; that they may see your good works, and glorify your Father who
 is in heaven." Mt 5, 16.
 
 4. Similarly, Paul would say: "You have received God's grace and his
 Word and are a blessed people. In Christ all your needs are blessedly
 supplied. Be mindful of this and remember you are called to a far
 different and vastly higher life than others know. Show by your
 manner of living that you seek a higher good than the world
 seeks--indeed, that you have received far greater blessings. Let your
 lives honor and glorify the Lord who has given you such blessings.
 Give no occasion for dishonoring your treasured faith, or for
 scorning his Word. Rather, influence men by your godly walk and good
 works to believe in Christ and to glorify him."
 
 5. Let the Christian know his earthly life is not unto himself, nor
 for his own sake; his life and work here belong to Christ, his Lord.
 Hence must his walk be such as shall contribute to the honor and
 glory of his Master, whom he should so serve that he may be able to
 say with Paul, not only with respect to the spiritual life--the life
 of faith and of righteousness by grace--but also with respect to its
 fruits--the outward conduct: "It is no longer I that live, but Christ
 liveth in me." Gal 2, 20. The Christian's manner of life may be
 styled "walking in Christ"; yes, as Paul elsewhere has it (Rom 13,
 14), "putting on" the Lord Jesus Christ, like a garment or an
 ornament. The world is to recognize Christ by his shining in us.
 
 6. But the so-called Christian life that does not honor Christ makes
 its sin the more heinous for the name it bears. Every sin the people
 of God commit is a provocation of Jehovah; not only in the act of
 disobedience itself, but also in the transgression of the second
 commandment. The enormity of the sin is magnified by the conditions
 that make it a blasphemy of God's name and an occasion of offense to
 others. Paul says in Romans 2, 24: "For the name of God is blasphemed
 among the Gentiles because of you." So a Christian should, in his
 life, by all means guard the honor of God--of Christ. He must take
 heed that he be not guilty of blaspheming that name and of doing
 wickedness. The devil, aided by the world, construes every act, when
 possible, to reflect upon God's honor and glory. His purpose is to
 manifest his bitter hatred against Christ and the Word; also to
 injure the Church by charging offenses, thus deterring unbelievers
 from embracing the Gospel and causing the weak to fall away.
 
 7. To guard against such disaster, Christians should be particularly
 careful to give, in their conduct, no occasion for offense, and to
 value the name and honor of their God too highly to permit blasphemy
 of them. They should prefer to lose their own honor, their wealth,
 their physical well-being, even their lives, rather than that these,
 their most precious possessions and greatest blessings, should suffer
 disgrace. Let them remember that upon keeping sacred the name and
 honor of God depends their own standing before God and men. God
 promises (1 Sam 2, 30), "Them that honor me I will honor." But
 pursuing the opposite course, Christians bring upon themselves God's
 sternest wrath and effect their own rejection and shame. For he says
 further: "They that despise me shall be lightly esteemed." And in the
 second commandment God threatens certain and terrible punishment to
 abusers of his name; that is, to them who do not employ it to his
 honor and praise.
 
 8. Well may every Christian examine his own life to see if he is
 careful to guard against offense to the Gospel and to regulate his
 words and conduct by God's first commandment, making them contribute
 to the honor and praise of the divine name and the holy Gospel.
 Weighty indeed and well calculated to cause complaint are the sins to
 which every Christian is liable in this respect; well may he avoid
 them lest he heap to himself the wrath of God. Especially need we be
 careful in these last and evil times when the Gospel is everywhere
 suppressed by great offenses. Man was created to be the image of God,
 that through this his image God might himself be expressed. God's
 image, then, should be reflected in the lives of men as a likeness in
 a glass, and a Christian can have no higher concern than to live
 without dishonor to the name of God.
 
 
 ADMONITION TO SPECIAL CHRISTIAN VIRTUES.
 
 9. Such is the first part of Paul's admonition concerning the general
 life of Christians. He goes on to make special mention of several
 good works which Christians should diligently observe: humility,
 meekness, long-suffering, preservation of the unity of the Spirit,
 and so on. These have been specially treated before, in other epistle
 lessons, particularly those from Peter. Humility, for
 instance--mentioned in today's lesson--is taken up the third Sunday
 after Trinity; patience and meekness, the second Sunday after Easter,
 and the fifth Sunday after Trinity.
 
 10. The text here presents good works sufficient to occupy all
 Christians in every station of life; we need not seek other nor
 better ones. Paul would not impose upon Christians peculiar works,
 something unrelated to the ordinary walks of life, as certain false
 saints taught and practiced. These teachers commanded separation from
 society, isolation in the wilderness, the establishment of monkeries
 and the performance of self-appointed works. Such works they exalted
 as superior to ordinary Christian virtues. Indeed, their practice
 amounted to rejection of the latter, and they actually regarded them
 as dangerous. The Papacy has in the past shamelessly styled the
 observance of Christian good works as worldly living, and men were
 compelled to believe they would find it hard to reach heaven unless
 they became ecclesiasts--for they regarded only the monks and priests
 worthy--or at least made themselves partakers of the works of
 ecclesiasts by purchasing their merits.
 
 But Paul--in fact, the entire Scriptures--teaches no other good works
 than God enjoins upon all men in the Ten Commandments, and which
 pertain to the common conditions of life. True, these make not such
 brilliant show in the eyes of the world as do the self-appointed
 ceremonials constituting the divine service of hypocrites;
 nevertheless, they are true, worthy, good and profitable works in the
 sight of God and man. What can be more acceptable to God and
 advantageous to man than a life lived, in its own calling, in the way
 that contributes to the honor of God, and that by its example
 influences others to love God's Word and to praise his name?
 Moreover, what virtues, of all man possesses, serve him better than
 humility, meekness, patience and harmony of mind?
 
 11. Now, where is a better opportunity for the exercise of these
 virtues than amidst the conditions in which God destined us to
 live--in society, where we mingle with one another? Upon these
 conditions, self-appointed, unusual lives and monastic holiness have
 no bearing. For what other person is profited by your entering a
 cloister, making yourself peculiar, refusing to live as your fellows
 do? Who is benefited by your cowl, your austere countenance, your
 hard bed? Who comes to know God or to have a peaceful conscience by
 such practices on your part, or who is thereby influenced to love his
 neighbor? Indeed, how can you serve your neighbor by such a life? How
 manifest your love, humility, patience and meekness if you are
 unwilling to live among men? if you so strenuously adhere to your
 self-appointed orders as to allow your neighbor to suffer want before
 you would dishonor your rules?
 
 12. Astonishing fact, that the world is merged in darkness so great
 it utterly disregards the Word of God and the conditions he designed
 for our daily living. If we preach to the world faith in God's Word,
 the world receives it as heresy. If we speak of works instituted of
 God himself and conditions of his own appointing, the world regards
 it as idle talk; it knows better. To live a simple Christian life in
 one's own family, to faithfully perform the duties of a man-servant
 or maid-servant--"Oh, that," it says, "is merely the following of
 worldly pursuits. To do good works you must set about it in a
 different way. You must creep into a corner, don a cap, make
 pilgrimages to some saint; then you may be able to help yourself and
 others to gain heaven." If the question be asked, "Why do so? where
 has God commanded it?" there is, according to their theory, really no
 answer to make but this: Our Lord God knows nothing about the matter;
 he does not understand what good works are. How can he teach us? He
 must himself be tutored by these remarkably enlightened saints.
 
 
 FRUITS OF ORIGINAL SIN.
 
 13. But all this error results from that miserable inherent plague,
 that evil termed "original sin." It is a blind wickedness, refusing
 to recognize the Word of God and his will and work, but introducing
 instead things of its own heathenish imagination. It draws such a
 thick covering over eyes, ears and hearts that it renders men unable
 to perceive how the simple life of a Christian, of husband or wife,
 of the lower or the higher walks of life, can be beautified by
 honoring the Word of God. Original sin will not be persuaded to the
 faithful performance of the works that God testifies are well
 pleasing to him when wrought by believers in Christ. In a word,
 universal experience proves that to perform really good works is a
 special and remarkable grace to which few attain; while the great
 mass of souls aspiring after holiness vainly busy themselves with
 worthless works, being deceived into thinking them great, and thus
 make themselves, as Paul says, "unto every good work reprobate." Tit
 1, 16. This fruitless effort is one evil result of the error of human
 ideas of holiness and the practice of self-chosen works.
 
 14. Another error is the hindrance--yes, the suppression and
 destruction--of the beautiful virtues of humility, meekness, patience
 and spiritual harmony here commended of Paul. At the same time the
 devil is given occasion to encourage fiendish blasphemy. In every
 instance where the Word of God is set aside for humanly-appointed
 works, differing views and theories must obtain. One introduces this
 and another that, each striving for first recognition; then a third
 endeavors to improve upon their doctrine. Consequently divisions and
 factions ensue as numerous as the teachers and their creeds; as
 exemplified in the countless sects to this time prevalent in Popedom,
 and in the factious spirits of all time. Under such circumstances,
 none of the virtues like humility, meekness, patience, love, can have
 place. Opposite conditions must prevail, since harmony of hearts and
 minds is lacking. One teacher haughtily rejects another, and if his
 own opinions fail to receive recognition and approval, he displays
 anger, envy and hatred. He will neither affiliate with nor tolerate
 him whose practices accord not with his own.
 
 15. On the other hand, the Christian life, the life of faith with its
 fruits, controlled as it is by the Word of God, is in every way
 conducive to the preservation of love and harmony, and to the
 promotion of all virtues. It interferes not with the God-ordained
 relations of life and their attendant obligations upon men--the
 requirements of social order, the duties of father and mother, of son
 and daughter, master and mistress, servant and maid. All life's
 relations are confirmed by it as valid and its duties as vital. The
 Christian faith bids each person in his life, and all in common, to
 be diligent in the works of love, humility, patience. It teaches that
 one be not intolerant of another, but rather render him his due,
 remembering that he whose condition in life is the most insignificant
 can be equally upright and blessed before God with the occupant of
 the most significant position. Again, it teaches that man must have
 patience with the weakness of his fellow, being mindful of how others
 must bear with his own imperfections. In short, it says one must
 manifest to another the love and kindness he would have that other
 extend to him.
 
 16. To this Christian attainment, contributes very largely the single
 fact that a Christian is conscious he has, through Christ, the grace
 of God, the forgiveness of sins and eternal life. And these not for
 his own merits or peculiar life and works, but because he is, no
 matter how insignificant in condition before the world, a child of
 God and blessed; a partaker, if he but believes, in all the blessings
 of Christ, sharing equally with the most eminent saint. So, then, he
 need not look about for works not enjoined upon him. He need not
 covet those wrought in prominence and by the aid of great gifts of
 God--of unusual attainments. Let him confine himself to his own
 sphere; let him serve God in his vocation, remembering that God makes
 him, too, his instrument in his own place.
 
 Again, the occupant of a higher sphere, the possessor of higher gifts
 and accomplishments, who likewise serves in his vocation received
 from God, should learn and exhibit harmony of mind. So shall he
 continue humble and be tolerant of others. He should remember that he
 is not worthier in the eyes of God because of his greater gifts, but
 rather is under deeper obligation to serve his fellows, and that God
 can use the possessor of lesser gifts for even greater
 accomplishments than himself can boast. Having so learned, he will be
 able to manifest patience, meekness and love toward his weak and
 imperfect neighbors, considering them members of Christ with him, and
 partakers of the same grace and salvation.
 
 
 THE UNITY OF THE SPIRIT.
 
 17. Now you have the reason why the apostles Paul and Peter
 everywhere so faithfully enforce this virtue, the unity of the
 Spirit. It is the most necessary and beautiful grace that Christians
 possess. It holds together the Christian community, preventing
 factions and schisms, as before explained. So Paul here admonishes
 men to be careful for harmony, making every endeavor to preserve it.
 The term "unity of the Spirit" is used to make plain the apostle's
 meaning. He would thus emphasize oneness of doctrine--the one true
 faith. Since the Holy Spirit is present only where there is knowledge
 of and faith in the Gospel of Christ, "unity of the Spirit" implies a
 unity of faith. Above all things, then, the effort must be to
 preserve, in the Church, the doctrine of the Scriptures, pure and in
 its unity.
 
 18. One of the wickedest offenses possible to commit against the
 Church is the stirring up of doctrinal discord and division, a thing
 the devil encourages to the utmost. This sin usually has its rise
 with certain haughty, conceited, self-seeking leaders who desire
 peculiar distinction for themselves and strive for personal honor and
 glory. They harmonize with none and would think themselves disgraced
 were they not honored as superior and more learned individuals than
 their fellows, a distinction they do not merit. They will give honor
 to no one, even when they have to recognize the superiority of his
 gifts over their own. In their envy, anger, hatred and vengefulness,
 they seek occasion to create factions and to draw people to
 themselves. Therefore Paul exhorts first to the necessary virtue of
 love, having which men will be enabled to exercise humility, patience
 and forbearance toward one another.
 
 19. The character of the evils resulting to the Church from divisions
 and discords in doctrine is evident from the facts. Many are
 deceived; the masses immediately respond to new doctrine brilliantly
 presented in specious words by presumptuous individuals thirsting for
 fame. More than that, many weak but well-meaning ones fall to
 doubting, uncertain where to stand or with whom to hold. Consequently
 men reject and blaspheme the Christian doctrine and seek occasion to
 dispute it. Many become reckless pleasure-lovers, disregarding all
 religion and ignoring the Word of God. Further, even they who are
 called Christians come to have hard feelings against one another,
 and, figuratively, bite and devour in their hate and envy.
 Consequently their love grows cold and faith is extinguished.
 
 20. Of so much disturbance in the Church, and of the resulting
 injuries to souls, are guilty those conceited, factious leaders who
 do not adhere to the true doctrine, preserving the unity of the
 Spirit, but seek to institute something new for the sake of advancing
 their own ideas and their own honor, or gratifying their revenge.
 They thus bring upon themselves damnation infinitely more intolerable
 than others suffer. Christians, then, should be careful to give no
 occasion for division or discord, but to be diligent, as Paul here
 admonishes, to preserve unity. And this is not an easy thing to do,
 for among Christians occasions frequently arise provoking self-will,
 anger and hatred. The devil is always at hand to stir and blow the
 flame of discord. Let Christians take heed they do not give place to
 the promptings of the devil and of the flesh. They must strive
 against them, submitting to all suffering, and performing all
 demands, whether honor, property, physical welfare or life itself be
 involved, in the effort to prevent, so far as in them lies, any
 disturbance of the unity of doctrine, of faith and of Spirit.
 
 "There is one body, and one Spirit, even as also ye were called in
 one hope of your calling; one Lord, one faith, one baptism, one God
 and Father of all."
 
 21. Christians should feel bound to maintain the unity of the Spirit,
 since they are all members of one body and partakers of the same
 spiritual blessings. They have the same priceless treasures--one God
 and Father in heaven, one Lord and Savior, one Word, baptism and
 faith; in short, one and the same salvation, a blessing common to all
 whereof one has as much as another, and cannot obtain more. What
 occasion, then, for divisions or for further seeking?
 
 22. Here Paul teaches what the true Christian Church is and how it
 may be identified. There is not more than one Church, or people of
 God, one earth. This one Church has one faith, one baptism, one
 confession of God the Father and of Jesus Christ. Its members
 faithfully hold, and abide by, these common truths. Every one
 desiring to be saved and to come to God must be incorporated into
 this Church, outside of which no one will be saved.
 
 23. Unity of the Church does not consist in similarity of outward
 form of government, likeness of Law, tradition and ecclesiastical
 customs, as the Pope and his followers claim. They would exclude from
 the Church all not obedient to them in these outward things, though
 members of the one faith, one baptism, and so on. The Church is
 termed "one holy, catholic or Christian Church," because it
 represents one plain, pure Gospel doctrine, and an outward confession
 thereof, always and everywhere, regardless of dissimilarity of
 physical life, or of outward ordinances, customs and ceremonies.
 
 24. But they are not members of the true Church of Christ who,
 instead of preserving unity of doctrine and oneness of Christian
 faith, cause divisions and offenses--as Paul says (Rom 16, 17)--by
 the human doctrines and self-appointed works for which they contend,
 imposing them upon all Christians as necessary. They are perverters
 and destroyers of the Church, as we have elsewhere frequently shown.
 The consolation of the true doctrine is ours, and we hold it in
 opposition to Popedom, which accuses us of having withdrawn from
 them, and so condemns us as apostates from the Church. They are,
 however, themselves the real apostates, persecuting the truth and
 destroying the unity of the Spirit under the name and title of the
 Church and of Christ. Therefore, according to the command of God, all
 men are under obligation to shun them and withdraw from them.
 
 
 
 
 _Eighteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Corinthians 1, 4-9.
 
 4 I thank my God always concerning you, for the grace of God which
 was given you in Christ Jesus; 5 that in everything ye were enriched
 in him, in all utterance and all knowledge; 6 even as the testimony
 of Christ was confirmed in you: 7 so that ye come behind in no gift;
 waiting for the revelation of our Lord Jesus Christ; 8 who shall also
 confirm you unto the end, that ye be unreprovable in the day of our
 Lord Jesus Christ. 9 God is faithful, through whom ye were called
 into the fellowship of his Son Jesus Christ our Lord.
 
 
 TREASURE CHRISTIANS HAVE IN THE GOSPEL.
 
 1. We have before us the opening words of the Epistle to the
 Corinthians, which Paul was moved to write because of unpleasant
 conditions in the Church at Corinth after his departure. Divisions
 had arisen and sad confusion prevailed in doctrine and life. Hence
 the apostle was constrained to rebuke their wickedness and correct
 their infirmities. Because of these wholesome admonitions, the
 reading and heeding of this epistle is not only profitable but
 essential to this day; for the devil takes no respite, but whenever
 the Gospel is preached in its purity he mixes with the children of
 God and sows his seed.
 
 2. Paul intends to be rather severe--even caustic--but he begins very
 leniently, showing them what they have received through the Gospel.
 His purpose is to arouse their gratitude to God, and to induce them,
 for his honor and glory, to be harmonious in doctrine and life,
 avoiding divisions and other offenses.
 
 "I thank my God always concerning you, for the grace of God which was
 given you in Christ Jesus," etc.
 
 3. In other words, Paul would say: Dear brethren, consider, I pray
 you, what abundant grace and gifts have been given you of God. They
 are bestowed not because of the Law, or because of your
 righteousness, your merits and works; you are given no reason to
 exalt yourselves above others, or to originate sects or schisms. Nay,
 all these blessings have been freely given you in Christ and for his
 sake, through the preaching of the Gospel. The Gospel is a grace
 which brings to you all manner of gifts, by him enriching you in
 everything. You lack nothing from God, but you await this one thing,
 that blessed day when Christ will reveal himself to you with all
 those heavenly gifts which you now possess in faith.
 
 4. In this wise he extols to them the preaching of the Gospel (as
 indeed he does on different occasions); his purpose is to induce them
 to regard it most appreciatively. He gives them an example of his own
 gratitude, thanking God on their behalf, for the purpose of calling
 forth their especial gratitude when they should consider what they
 formerly were and what they now had received through the Gospel. And
 again, he would have them beware lest, forgetful of their former
 misery and present grace, they relapse into their old blindness. A
 sad beginning in such backsliding had been made by factions in their
 midst, who, satiated with the Gospel and indifferent to the abundant
 grace they enjoyed, began to cast about for something else.
 
 5. Now observe: If the exalted apostle and venerable teacher of the
 Gentiles in his day had to witness in his own parish such factions
 and sects as those which, in sinful security and ingratitude toward
 the Gospel, arose during his life, what wonder is it that today, when
 we do not have the excellent preachers and pious Christians of those
 times, there are similar sects? We are aware of the great benefits
 bestowed upon us, but at the same time we see and realize that the
 devil instigates divisions and scandals. And the cause of these evils
 may be traced to our ingratitude; we have quickly forgotten the ills
 we endured under the blindness of popery, and how miserably we were
 deluded and tormented. Necessarily, where God's mercies are lightly
 dismissed from the mind and disregarded, gratitude and regard for
 God's Word cannot be the result; satiated, listless Christians go
 their way fancying that spiritual conditions always were and always
 will be as now.
 
 6. The people, therefore, must be awakened to consider their former
 destitution, the very wretchedness they were in. The apostle later on
 vividly pictures such condition to his Corinthians, while here, in
 the opening chapter, he intimates to them, in kind and courteous
 words, to consider, in the light of the Gospel benefits they now
 enjoy, what they lacked before and might be deprived of again.
 
 7. Therefore he says, You now have received the grace whereby in
 everything ye are enriched. Formerly you had not this grace and would
 not have it today had not the Gospel been preached to you. You are
 enriched in everything pertaining to yonder life, for it is not the
 purpose of the Gospel to give earthly riches. But in spiritual
 blessings ye come behind in no gift and have need of naught except
 this one thing, that the Lord himself should come. This blessing you
 are yet to have, and biding its advent you here live by the gifts and
 grace with which you were enriched, until you are finally redeemed
 from the sinful, wicked life of the world and from all its
 oppressions. You must know, and must thank God for it, that you need
 not seek after any higher calling or better gifts, thinking you have
 not all that is essential, as the factious spirits would have you
 believe.
 
 8. For in your own judgment, what better thing could you have than is
 the Christian's in his Gospel and his faith? He has assurance of sins
 forgiven and washed away in holy baptism, of justification and
 holiness before God, and of the fact that he is God's child and heir
 to eternal life. Furthermore, although the Christian is conscious of
 remaining weakness and sin, yea, although he be overcome by a fault,
 he may avail himself of absolution, comfort and strength through his
 fellow Christians and by the aid of the sacraments; and he has daily
 guidance for his conduct and faith in all the walks of life. Again,
 he can call upon God in prayer in the day of trouble, and the firm
 assurance is his that God will hear and help him. What further can
 one desire, or what more does he need, than the knowledge that he is
 God's child through baptism and has God's Word at hand for comfort
 and strength in weakness and sin? Do you consider it slight
 enrichment to have assurance of the fact that God himself is speaking
 to you and, by means of the office of the ministry, is effective in
 you, teaching, admonishing, comforting, sustaining you, yea, granting
 you victory over the devil, death and all evil influences on earth?
 
 9. Formerly what would we not gladly have given and done for but a
 single Gospel truth in our distress and trials of conscience! True,
 when one was discouraged or perplexed he was advised to seek and
 follow the counsel of some intelligent and judicious mind; but such
 judicious one who might assist with his counsel was nowhere to be
 found. For a wise man's counsel does not answer in such case. The
 Word of God alone suffices, and you are to rely on it as if God
 himself revealed his counsel to you from heaven.
 
 10. As Paul says, it is great riches, a precious treasure, to possess
 in very fact the Word of God and not to doubt that it is the Word of
 God. It is this that will answer; this can comfort your heart and
 support it. Of spiritual benefits you know we had none under the
 tyranny and darkness of the Pope. At that time we suffered ourselves
 to be led and driven by his commandments, vain human baubles, by
 bulls, lies, invocation of saints, indulgences, masses, monkery. And
 we did whatever was enjoined in the name of the Church, solely to
 gain comfort and help, that we might not despair of God's grace. But
 instead of comforting us, these things led us to the devil and thrust
 us into greater anguish and terror; for there was nothing in the
 doctrine of the papists that could give us certainty. Indeed, they
 themselves had to confess that by its teachings no man could or
 should be certain of his state of grace.
 
 11. Yea, they forced poor, timid, tempted hearts to dread and fear
 Christ more than the devil even, as I myself experienced full well. I
 resorted to the dead--St. Barbara, St. Ann and other departed
 saints--regarding them as mediators between me and Christ's wrath.
 But this availed me nothing, nor did it free me from a fearful and
 fugitive conscience. There was not one among us all--and we were
 called very learned doctors of Holy Writ--who could have given true
 comfort from God's Word, saying: This is God's Word; this one thing
 God asks of you, that you honor him by accepting comfort; believe and
 know that he forgives your transgressions and has no wrath against
 you. If someone could have told me this, I would have given all I
 possessed for the knowledge; yea, for such word of comfort I would
 not have taken in exchange the glory and the crowns of all kings, for
 it would have restored my soul, it would have refreshed and sustained
 my body and life.
 
 12. All this we should bear in mind, by no means should we forget it;
 that we may return thanks to God, recounting the superior and
 wonderful gifts which have enriched us in all things. We have besides
 the Word, free prayer and the Lord's Prayer, knowing what to pray for
 and how to pray--knowledge common to the very children today, thank
 God. In former times, all men, especially we monks, tormented
 themselves with lengthy repetitions in reading and singing; yet our
 prayers were but chattering, as the noise of geese over their food,
 or of monks repeating a psalm.
 
 13. I, too, wanted to be a pious and godly monk and I prepared with
 earnest devotion for mass and for prayers. But when most devout I
 went to the altar a doubter and left the altar a doubter. When I had
 rendered my confession I still doubted, and I doubted when I did not
 render it. For we were wholly wrapped up in the erroneous idea that
 we could not pray and would not be heard unless we were absolutely
 clean and without sin, like the saints in heaven. It would have been
 much better not to pray at all and to have done something else, than
 thus to take God's name in vain. Still, we monks--in fact all the
 ecclesiastics--deluded the people, promising them our prayers for
 their money and possessions, actually selling our prayers, though we
 did not even know that we prayed in a manner acceptable to God. But
 today, thank God, we do know and understand, not only what to pray
 for and how to approach God "nothing doubting," but we can also add a
 hearty Amen, believing that according to his promise he will
 certainly hear us.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN'S TREASURE.
 
 14. The Christian has indeed inestimable treasure. In the first place
 he has the testimony of the Word of God, which is the word of eternal
 grace and comfort, that he has a right and true conception of
 baptism, the Lord's Supper, the Ten Commandments and the Creed. In
 addition he has the sure refuge of God's promise to deliver us from
 every trouble in which we shall call upon him, and to give us, as he
 promised by the prophet Zechariah (12, 10), the Spirit of grace and
 of prayer. And the Christian, by virtue of his enlightened
 understanding, can wisely discern what are good works and what
 callings are pleasing to God; on the other hand, his judgment is
 equally true as to unprofitable and vain works and false services.
 Before, we had not this wholesome knowledge. We knew not what we
 believed, or how we prayed and lived. We sought comfort and salvation
 in self-devised trivialities, in penances, confessions and
 satisfactions, in self-righteous works of monkery and in obedience to
 the commands of the Pope. We believed such works to be fully
 satisfactory and, indeed, the only things that were holy; the
 pursuits of common Christians we considered worldly and dangerous.
 
 15. In illustration of this idea, a picture was exhibited--with the
 sanction of the Pope--representing a great ship in the wild, wide
 sea, containing only the holy monks and the super-holy popes,
 cardinals, bishops, etc., who were throwing their merits to those in
 peril struggling in the water, or extending a hand, or by means of
 ropes and their stoles drawing the drowning to safety in the boat.
 
 16. In contrast to this darkness, consider the priceless and
 to-be-cherished blessing of knowing with certainty wherein the heart
 is to take comfort, how to seek help in distress and how to conduct
 one's self in one's own station. If, though provided with spiritual
 riches on all sides, you are not sufficient of yourself at all times
 to grasp them, you can, nevertheless, always reach and appropriate
 them by means of the ordinary ministry and office of the Church, yes,
 by the aid of your fellow-Christians. Again, it is productive of the
 greatest happiness to know that when living aright in the ordinary
 walks of life established by God, you are more acceptable and
 pleasing to him than you would be to purchase the works and merits of
 all the monks and hermits.
 
 17. What Paul terms being "enriched," first, "in all utterance," or
 knowledge--which, in the exalted spiritual meaning of the words,
 bears on life everlasting--is having the comfort of faith in Christ
 and of invocation and prayer. And enriched in "all knowledge," means
 having true conception and right judgment in all things of our
 physical life and in all our earthly relations. All things that a
 Christian should know and should possess are comprehended in these
 two terms. These blessings are gifts and treasures indescribably
 great. He who will contrast them with the destitution of our former
 condition cannot but be joyful and thankful. I remember the time when
 I, engaged in earnest study of Holy Writ, would have given a great
 deal for the right exposition of a psalm; and when had I but begun to
 understand a verse aright, I would have been as rejoiced as if born
 to life anew.
 
 18. Truly, then, we should now render to God heartfelt thanks for the
 great favor and blessing of restored light and understanding in
 Scripture, and the right conception of doctrinal matters. But, alas!
 it is likely to be with us as with the Corinthians, who had received
 most abundantly from Paul but by way of return had made ill use of it
 and proved shamefully unthankful. And they met with retribution, the
 worst of it being false doctrine and seductions, until at last that
 grand congregation was wholly ruined and destroyed. A similar
 retribution threatens us, yes, is before the door with appalling
 knock, in the instance of the Turks and in other distress and
 calamity. For this reason we should, with a thankful heart and
 serious mind, pray, as Paul here does for his Corinthians, that God
 would keep us steadfast in the possession of his gifts and blameless
 in the day of our Lord Jesus Christ.
 
 19. Paul admonishes us to continue in this knowledge and appreciation
 of the grace and gifts of God. Since by these blessings we have
 received riches and happiness to the satisfying of all our need, the
 apostle further admonishes us to look only for the Lord to reveal to
 us publicly by his coming that which he has promised and through
 faith already granted us.
 
 20. In the past, much has been written and ingeniously devised on the
 topic of preparing for death and the final judgment. But it has only
 served to further confuse timid consciences. For these comforters
 were not able to show anything of the comfort to be found in the
 riches of grace and bliss in Christ. They directed the people to
 oppose with their own works and good life, death and God's judgment.
 In place of this delusion is now evident the precious truth; he who
 knows the Gospel doctrines, goes on and performs his own work and
 duty in his respective calling. He takes comfort in the fact that
 through baptism he is engrafted into Christ; he receives absolution
 and partakes of the holy supper for the strengthening of his faith,
 commending his soul and body to Christ. Why should such a one fear
 death? Though it come at any time, in form of pestilence or accident,
 it will always find the Christian ready and well prepared, be he
 awake or asleep; for he is in Christ Jesus.
 
 21. For all these things the Christian may well thank and bless God,
 realizing that he has no further need, nor can he gain anything
 better than he already has in the remission of sins, the gift of the
 Holy Spirit and the faithful prosecution of his calling; however, he
 should remain in, and daily grow in, faith and supplication. But he
 cannot hope to attain to another and better doctrine, faith, Spirit,
 prayer, sacrament, reward, etc., than had all the saints, John the
 Baptist, Peter, Paul, or in fact than has now every Christian that is
 baptized. Therefore I need not idly spend time in trying to prepare
 people for death and inspire them with courage by such commonplaces
 as recalling and relating the innumerable daily accidents, ills and
 dangers of this life. This method will not answer; death will not
 thereby be frightened away, nor will the fear of death be removed.
 The Gospel teaching is: Believe in Christ, pray and live in
 accordance with God's Word, and then, when death overtakes and
 attacks you, you will know that you are Christ the Lord's. Paul says
 (Rom 14, 8): "Whether we live ... or die, we are the Lord's." Indeed,
 we Christians live upon this earth to the very end that we may have
 assured comfort, salvation and victory over death and hell.
 
 22. Of this Paul here reminds us, and dwells on it more fully later
 in this Epistle; he would have us duly thankful for this great grace
 and living among ourselves in a Christian and brotherly manner, in
 doctrine and practice, ignoring and avoiding that wild, disorderly
 conduct of the contentious and disorderly. He who recognizes such
 grace and blessing cannot but love and thank God and conduct himself
 aright toward his neighbor; and when he finds himself falling short
 in this he will, by admonition and the Word of God, make amends.
 
 23. Here you might put the question: Why does Paul speak in such a
 commendatory way of the Corinthians, saying that they were enriched
 in everything and came behind in no gift, when he himself confesses
 later on that they had contentions and schisms--in regard to baptism,
 to the sacrament, to the doctrine of the resurrection of the dead and
 in regard to abuse of liberty, and some lived as they pleased. Would
 you not call these things faults and shortcomings? How, then, is he
 in a position to say that they were abundantly supplied with all
 things spiritual, lacking not one thing?
 
 24. Well, you should recall what I have repeatedly stated:
 Christendom is never so spotless that there are not some spurious and
 wicked admixed, just as you will always find weeds, darnel, tares, or
 wild mustard together with pure grain. And he who will examine the
 Church with only a view of finding faults and frailties among those
 called Christians, will miss the Church, yes, the Gospel and Christ,
 and never discover a Church at all.
 
 25. But we have the consolation of knowing that if we have the Gospel
 pure, we have the treasure God gives his Church and we cannot go
 astray nor want. But as yet we have not reached that degree of
 perfection where all hearers of the Gospel will grasp it fully and
 wholly or are faultless in faith and life; at all times there will be
 some who do not believe and some who are weak and imperfect. However,
 that great treasure and rich blessing of doctrine and knowledge is
 present. There is no defect in this, and it is effective and
 fruitful. The fact that some do not believe, does not weaken baptism
 or the Gospel or the Church; they only harm themselves. To sum up,
 where the Word remains, there most assuredly is also the Church. For
 wherever the doctrine is pure, there you can also keep purity in
 baptism, the sacrament, absolution, the Ten Commandments, the Lord's
 Prayer, good works and all callings; and wherever you find a defect
 or an irregularity, you can admonish, amend and rectify by means of
 the Word.
 
 26. Some there must be who have the Word and sacraments pure and
 unadulterated, who have faith, pray aright, keep God's commandments
 and do other things, as, thank God, we have with us. Then we may
 firmly conclude: If the true Church were not here, these
 characteristics would be lacking; therefore we must have among
 ourselves true members of the Church and true saints. Now even though
 children of the world intermingle (as will be the case always and in
 all places), who show neither faith nor a godly life, it would
 corrupt neither faith, nor baptism, nor doctrine, nor would the
 Church perish on that account--the treasure remains in its integrity
 and efficacy, and God may graciously cause some to turn from their
 unbelief and wicked life and be added to the faithful and to mend
 their ways.
 
 27. Again, they with whom this treasure--the Word or doctrine and its
 knowledge--is not found, cannot be the Christian Church nor members
 of it, and for that reason they cannot pray or believe aright or do
 good works pleasing to God. It follows that their whole lives are in
 God's sight lost and condemned, though they may assiduously extol God
 and the Church and before the world may have the appearance and
 reputation of leading particularly holy lives and excelling even the
 upright Christians in virtues and honor. It is a settled fact that
 outside the Church of Christ there is no God, no grace, no bliss; as
 Paul says (Eph 4, 5): "One Lord, one faith, one baptism, one God and
 Father of all," etc. And Acts 4, 12 says: "And in none other is there
 salvation: for neither is there any other name under heaven, that is
 given among men, wherein we must be saved."
 
 28. And so Paul, when here extolling the Corinthians, has not an eye
 to the contentious, the Epicureans, or to those who give public
 offense, as the man that "had his father's wife;" but the apostle
 looks to the fact that a few remain who have the pure Word of God,
 faith, baptism and the sacrament, though some hypocrites be among
 them. Because of these few--and few indeed there may be--we recognize
 the presence of that inestimable treasure of which the apostle
 speaks. It is found as well where two or three are gathered together
 as with thousands. Neither the Gospel nor the ministers nor the
 Church is to be blamed that the multitude miss this treasure; the
 multitude have but themselves to blame, for they close their ears and
 eyes.
 
 29. Now behold how loftily Paul has extolled and how beautifully
 portrayed the Christian Church--where she is to be found on earth and
 what inestimable blessings and gifts she has received of Christ, for
 which she is in duty bound to thank and praise him in her confession
 and in her life. This subject the apostle concludes with the words:
 
 "God is faithful, through whom ye were called into the fellowship of
 his Son Jesus Christ our Lord."
 
 30. The good work which Christ has begun in you and already assured
 to you, he will without fail establish in you until the end and for
 ever, if you but do not fall away through unbelief, or cast grace
 from you. For his Word or promise given to you, and his work begun in
 you, are not changeable as is man's word and work, but are firm,
 certain, divine, immovable truth. Since you are in possession of this
 your divine calling, draw comfort therefrom and rely on it without
 wavering. Amen.
 
 
 
 
 _Nineteenth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Ephesians 4, 22-28.
 
 22 That ye put away, as concerning your former manner of life, the
 old man, that waxeth corrupt after the lusts of deceit; 23 and that
 ye be renewed in the spirit of your mind, 24 and put on the new man,
 that after God hath been created in righteousness and holiness of
 truth. 25 Wherefore, putting away falsehood, speak ye truth each one
 with his neighbor: for we are members one of another. 26 Be ye angry,
 and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your wrath: 27 neither give
 place to the devil. 28 Let him that stole steal no more: but rather
 let him labor, working with his hands the thing that is good, that he
 may have whereof to give to him that hath need.
 
 
 DUTY TO NEW AND OLD MAN.
 
 1. Here again is an admonition for Christians to follow up their
 faith by good works and a new life, for though they have forgiveness
 of sins through baptism, the old Adam still adheres to their flesh
 and makes himself felt in tendencies and desires to vices physical
 and mental. The result is that unless Christians offer resistance,
 they will lose their faith and the remission of sins and will in the
 end be worse than they were at first; for they will begin to despise
 and persecute the Word of God when corrected by it. Yea, even those
 who gladly hear the Word of God, who highly prize it and aim to
 follow it, have daily need of admonition and encouragement, so strong
 and tough is that old hide of our sinful flesh. And so powerful and
 wily is our old evil foe that wherever he can gain enough of an
 opening to insert one of his claws, he thrusts in his whole self and
 will not desist until he has again sunk man into his former
 condemnable unbelief and his old way of despising and disobeying God.
 
 2. Therefore, the Gospel ministry is necessary in the Church, not
 only for instruction of the ignorant--such as the simple, unlettered
 people and the children--but also for the purpose of awakening those
 who know very well what they are to believe and how they are to live,
 and admonishing them to be on their guard daily and not to become
 indolent, disheartened or tired in the war they must wage on this
 earth with the devil, with their own flesh and with all manner of
 evil.
 
 3. For this reason Paul is so persistent in his admonitions that he
 actually seems to be overdoing it. He proceeds as if the Christians
 were either too dull to comprehend or so inattentive and forgetful
 that they must be reminded and driven. The apostle well knows that
 though they have made a beginning in faith and are in that state
 which should show the fruits of faith, such result is not so easily
 forthcoming. It will not do to think and say: Well, it is sufficient
 to have the doctrine, and if we have the Spirit and faith, then
 fruits and good works will follow of their own accord. For although
 the Spirit truly is present and, as Christ says, willing and
 effective in those that believe, on the other hand the flesh is weak
 and sluggish. Besides, the devil is not idle, but seeks to seduce our
 weak nature by temptations and allurements.
 
 4. So we must not permit the people to go on in their way, neglecting
 to urge and admonish them, through God's Word, to lead a godly life.
 Indeed, you dare not be negligent and backward in this duty; for, as
 it is, our flesh is all too sluggish to heed the Spirit and all too
 able to resist it. Paul says (Gal 5, 17): "For the flesh lusteth
 against the Spirit, and the Spirit against the flesh ... that ye may
 not do the things that ye would." Therefore, God is constrained to do
 as a good and diligent householder or ruler, who, having a slothful
 man-servant or maid-servant, or careless officers, who otherwise are
 neither wicked nor faithless, will not consider it sufficient once or
 twice to direct, but will constantly be supervising and directing.
 
 5. Nor have we as yet arrived at the point where our flesh and blood
 will joyfully and gladly abound in good works and obedience to God as
 the spirit is inclined and faith directs. Even with the utmost
 efforts the Spirit scarce can compel our old man. What would be the
 result if we were no more urged and admonished but could go our way
 thinking, as many self-satisfied persons do: I am well acquainted
 with my duties, having learned them many years ago and having heard
 frequent explanations of them; yea, I have taught others? It might be
 that one year's intermission of preaching and admonition would place
 us below the level of the heathen.
 
 6. Now, this exhortation in itself is simple and easy of
 comprehension. The apostle is but repeating his exhortations of other
 places--on the fruits of faith, or a godly walk--merely in different
 terms. Here he speaks of putting away the old man and putting on the
 new man, of being "renewed in the spirit of your mind."
 
 
 "THE OLD MAN."
 
 7. What he calls "the old man" is well known to us; namely, the whole
 nature of man as descended from Adam after his fall in paradise,
 being blinded by the devil, depraved in soul, not keeping God before
 his eyes nor trusting him, yes, utterly regardless of God and the
 judgment day. Though with his mouth he may honor God's Word and the
 Gospel, yet in reality he is unchanged; if he does have a little
 additional knowledge, he has just as little fear, love and trust in
 God as heretofore.
 
 8. Such a life and such conduct should not be found among you, says
 the apostle; you are not to continue with "the old man." He must be
 put off and laid aside. Your former manner of life, inherited of
 Adam, consisted in disobeying God, in neither fearing, trusting nor
 calling upon him. Again, in your body you obeyed not God's
 commandments, being given to lust, pride, insatiable greed, envy,
 hatred, etc. A life and walk of this nature is not becoming a
 Christian who is regarded as, and truly is, a different order of
 being from his former self, as we shall hear. Necessarily he should
 walk differently.
 
 9. In this respect a Christian must take heed that he does not
 deceive himself; the true Christian differs from the hypocrite. True
 Christians so live that it is apparent from their lives that they
 keep God before their eyes and truly believe the Gospel, while
 hypocrites likewise show by their walk that their pretensions of
 faith and forgiveness of sin are hollow. No proof is seen in their
 lives and works showing that they have in any wise mended their
 former ways; they merely deck themselves with a pretense, with the
 name of Gospel, of faith, of Christ.
 
 10. Now, the apostle has two things to say of the old man: that he
 corrupts himself in error as to the soul and in lusts as to the body.
 Paul portrays the old man--meaning every man without true faith
 though he bear the name of a Christian--as in the first place given
 to error: coming short of the truth, knowing naught of the true
 knowledge of Christ and faith in him, indifferent alike to God's
 wrath and God's grace, deceiving himself with his own conceit that
 darkness is light. The old man believes that God will not be moved to
 vengeance though he do as he pleases, even to decorating vices with
 the names of virtues. Haughtiness, greed, oppressing and tormenting
 the poor, wrath, envy--all this he would call preserving his dignity,
 exercising strict discipline, honestly and economically conducting
 his domestic affairs, caring for his wife and children, displaying
 Christian zeal and love of justice, etc. In short, he proceeds in the
 perfectly empty delusion and self-conceit that he is a Christian.
 
 11. Out of this error proceeds the other corruption, the lusts of the
 body, which are fruits of unbelief. Unbelief causes men to walk in
 sinful security and yield to all the appetites of their flesh. Such
 have no inclination toward what is good, nor do they aim to promote
 orderliness, honor or virtue. They take desperate chances on their
 lives, wanting to live according to the lusts of their flesh and yet
 not be reprimanded.
 
 12. This, says the apostle, is the old man's course and nature. He
 will do naught but ruin himself. The longer continued, the greater
 his debasement. He draws down upon himself his own condemnation and
 penalty for body and soul; for in proportion as he becomes
 unbelieving and hard-hearted, does he become haughty, hateful and
 faithless, and eventually a perfect scoundrel and villain. This was
 your former manner of life, when as yet you were heathen and
 non-Christians. Therefore you must by all means put off the old man
 and cast him far from you; otherwise you cannot remain a Christian.
 For glorying in the grace of God and the forgiveness of sin is
 inconsistent with following sin--remaining in the former old
 un-Christian life and walking in error and deceitful lusts.
 
 
 THE GROWTH OF "THE NEW MAN."
 
 "And that ye be renewed in the spirit of your mind, and put on the
 new man, that after God hath been created in righteousness and
 holiness of truth."
 
 13. Having put away the old man, the apostle exhorts us further to
 put on the new man, that day by day we may grow as new creatures.
 This is effected by first being delivered from error--from the
 erroneous thoughts and ideas incident to our corrupt nature with its
 false conceptions of God, wherein we do not fear nor believe him--and
 then from God's Word receiving the right understanding of him. When
 we rightly understand, we shall fear his wrath against sin and rely
 on his grace in true faith, believing that he will forgive our sins
 for Christ's sake and will hear our prayer for strength and
 assistance to withstand and conquer, and to continually grow in
 faith.
 
 14. This change Paul calls being "renewed in the spirit of your
 mind"; that is, constantly growing and becoming established in that
 true conception and clear knowledge of Christ begun in us, in
 opposition to error and idle vaporings. He who is thus received, says
 the apostle, is a man "that after God hath been created in
 righteousness and holiness of truth." In the old man there is naught
 but error, by means of which the devil leads to destruction. But the
 new man has the Spirit and the truth, by which the heart is illumined
 unto righteousness and holiness, wherein man follows the guidance of
 God's Word and feels a desire for a godly walk and good life; just
 as, on the other hand, the desire and love for sin and wickedness is
 the product of error. This new man is created after God, as an image
 of God, and must of necessity differ from such as live in error and
 in lusts, without the knowledge of God and disobedient to him. For if
 God's image is in man, man must consequently have the right knowledge
 of God and right conceptions and ideas, and lead a godly life
 consistent with holiness and righteousness as found in God himself.
 
 15. Such an image of God Adam was when first created. He was, as to
 the soul, truthful, free from error, and possessed of true faith and
 knowledge of God; and as to the body, holy and pure, that is, without
 the impure, unclean desires of avarice, lasciviousness, envy, hatred,
 etc. And all his children--all men--would have so remained from their
 birth if he had not suffered himself to be led astray by the devil
 and to be thus ruined. But since Christians, by the grace and Spirit
 of God, now have been renewed to this image of God, they are so to
 live that soul and spirit are righteous and pleasing to God through
 faith in Christ; and that also the body--meaning the whole external
 life--be pure and holy, which is genuine holiness.
 
 16. Some there are who pretend to great holiness and purity, but it
 is mere pretense, deceiving the people in general. Such are the
 factious spirits and monastic saints, who base their holiness and
 uprightness solely on an external, peculiar life and on self-elected
 works. Theirs may be apparently a commendable, holy and pure way of
 praying and fasting, of denying self, etc., and the people may call
 it so; but inwardly they are and remain haughty, venomous, hateful,
 filled with the filth of human lust and evil thoughts, as Christ says
 of such. Mt 15, 19; Lk 16, 15. Likewise their righteousness on which
 they pride themselves before God has a certain gloss, on the strength
 of which they presume to merit the grace of God for themselves and
 others; but inwardly they have no true conception of God, being in
 rank unbelief, that is, false and vain suppositions, or doubts. Such
 righteousness, or holiness, is not true nor honest. It is made up
 wholly of hypocrisy and deceit. It is built, not of God nor after
 God, but after that lying spirit, the devil.
 
 17. The true Christian, Paul asserts, has been molded through faith
 in Christ into a new man, like unto God, truly justified and holy in
 his sight; even as Adam originally was in perfect harmony of heart
 with God, showing true, straightforward confidence, love and
 willingness. And his body was holy and pure, knowing naught of evil,
 impure or improper desire. Thus the whole life of the man was a
 beautiful portrait of God, a mirror wherein God himself was
 reflected; even as the lives and natures of the holy spirits the
 angels are wrapped up in God and represent true knowledge of him,
 assurance, and joy in him and utterly pure and holy thoughts and
 works according to the will of God.
 
 18. But since man is now so grievously fallen from this cheerful
 confidence, this certainty and joy, into doubts or into presumption
 toward God, and from unspotted, noble obedience into the lusts of
 iniquity and ungodliness, it follows that not from mankind can come
 help or relief. Nor can any one hope for remedy except the
 Christians, who through faith in Christ begin again to have a joyful
 and confident heart toward God. They thus enter again into their
 former relation and into the true paradise of perfect harmony with
 God and of justification; they are comforted by his grace.
 Accordingly they are disposed to lead a godly life in harmony with
 God's commandments and to resist ungodly lusts and ways. These begin
 to taste God's goodness and loving kindness, as Paul says, and
 realize what they lost in paradise. He, therefore, that would be a
 Christian should strive to be found in this new man created after
 God; not in blind error and vain conceit, but in the very essence of
 righteousness and holiness before God.
 
 
 TWO CLASSES OF SINS.
 
 "Wherefore, putting away falsehood, speak ye truth each one with his
 neighbor: for we are members one of another."
 
 19. Lest there might be one who failed to understand the meaning of
 the old and the new man, or of true and false righteousness and
 holiness, the apostle now proceeds to give an example or two, making
 it easier for us to grasp the idea. All sin comes under one of two
 classes: First, that of the devil's own making, such as murder and
 deceit; for by lies he establishes all idolatry, error, false faith
 and holiness, and among men he creates faithlessness, deceit, malice,
 etc. Secondly, those sins which he instigates man to commit against
 man; deeds of wrath, hatred, vengeance and murder. Paul combines
 these two classes.
 
 20. Now, when a man does not deal fairly with his neighbor, but
 practices dishonesty and deceit, be it in matters spiritual or
 temporal (and the world is ever deceitful in all transactions), then
 certainly the old man holds sway and not righteousness nor holiness,
 however much the man may effect a good appearance and evade the
 courts. For such conduct does not reflect God's image, but the
 devil's. For the heart does not rely on God and his truth, otherwise
 it would war with fraud and deception; but its object is to clothe
 itself with a misleading garb, even assuming the name of God, and
 thus to deceive, belie, betray and forsake its neighbor at the
 bidding of every fiendish whim, and all for the satisfaction of its
 avarice, selfishness and pride.
 
 21. In contrast thereto you can recognize the new man. He speaks the
 truth and hates lies, not only those momentous lies against the first
 table of the Ten Commandments, but also those against the second
 table; for he deals faithfully and in a brotherly way with others,
 doing as he would be done by himself. Thus should Christians live
 with each other, as members of one body, according to the apostle,
 and as having in Christ all things common and alike.
 
 "Be ye angry and sin not: let not the sun go down upon your wrath."
 
 22. Half the sins which the world has learned of its lord and master,
 the devil, consist in lying and deceiving, and that in the name and
 appearance of truth. No one wants to be called a liar, and even the
 devil covers his lies with the name of truth. The other half, which
 is easier to recognize, consists in wrath and its fruits. And this
 class is usually the result of the other. The world, for its own
 advantage, lies and deceives; and when it sees mankind acting in
 opposition to its wishes, or beholds its lies exposed and its schemes
 thwarted, it begins to rage in wrath against God, endeavoring to
 avenge itself and inflict harm, but fraudulently disguising its
 wicked motive under the plea of having good and abundant reasons for
 its action.
 
 23. Therefore Paul admonishes the Christians as new creatures, to
 guard against this vice of wrath, adducing the fourth verse of the
 fourth Psalm: "Stand in awe and sin not." The repetition of this
 passage sounds, in Paul's rendering, as if permission to be angry
 were given; he says: "Be ye angry, and sin not." But Paul is taking
 into consideration the way of the world. Men are tempted and moved to
 anger. There are no clean records. Under sudden provocation the heart
 swells with ire, while the devil busily fans the flame; for he is
 ever alert to stamp upon us his seal and image and make us like unto
 him, either through error and false doctrine, or through wrath and
 murder in conflict with love and patience. These two forms of evil
 you will encounter, especially if you make an effort to be a godly
 Christian, to defend the truth and to live uprightly in the sight of
 all. You will meet with all manner of malice aforethought and deceit,
 and with faithlessness and malignity on the part of those you have
 benefited; again, with unmasked violence and injustice on the part of
 those who should protect you and see to your interests. This will
 hurt and move you to wrath. Yea, in your own house and among your
 dear Christian brethren you will often meet with that which vexes
 you; again, a word of yours may hurt their feelings. And it will not
 be otherwise. This life of ours is so constituted that such
 conditions must be. Flesh and blood cannot but be stirred at times by
 wrath and impatience, especially when it receives evil for good; and
 the devil is ever at hand kindling your anger and endeavoring to fan
 into a blaze the wrath and ill humor between yourself and your
 neighbor.
 
 24. But right here, says the apostle, you should beware and not sin;
 not give rein, nor yield to the impulse and promptings of wrath. That
 you may indeed be moved, the apostle would say, I well know, and you
 may fancy to have the best of reasons for exhibiting anger and
 vengeance; but beware of doing what your wrath would have you do: and
 if overcome by wrath and led to rashness, do not continue in it, do
 not harbor it, but subdue and restrain it, the sooner the better; do
 not suffer it to take root or to remain with you over night.
 
 25. If followed, wrath will not suffer you to do a single right
 thing, as James affirms (ch. 1, 20). It causes man to fall and sin
 against God and his neighbor. Even the heathen have seen that wrath
 gets the better of reason and is never the source of good counsel. In
 line with this, we read that St. Ambrose reproved the emperor
 Theodosius for having, while in a rage, caused the execution of many
 persons in Thessalonica; and that he succeeded in having the emperor
 issue a rescript to the effect that no one should be executed, even
 on his imperial order and command, until a full month had passed by,
 thus affording an opportunity to rescind the order if given in haste
 and wrath.
 
 26. Therefore the Psalm says: When wrath attacks and moves you, do
 not at once give it leave to do its will. Therein you would certainly
 commit sin. But go into your chamber, commune and take counsel with
 yourself, pray the Lord's Prayer, repeat some good passages from
 God's Word, curb yourself and confide in God; he will uphold your
 rights.
 
 27. It is this the apostle has in mind when saying: "Let not the sun
 go down upon your wrath." A Christian must not entertain wrath; he
 should instantly quench and stifle it. It is the part of the new man
 to control anger, that the devil may not move him from his new-found
 faith and make him lose what he has received. If he yields to these
 instigations of his flesh, he thereby returns to the error and
 condemnation in the old man and loses control of himself, following
 his own desires. Then he adorns a lie with the appearance of truth,
 claiming the right to be angry and take revenge; just as the world
 does when it asserts: This fellow has done me infinite violence and
 injustice; am I to suffer it? I have a just cause and shall not
 recline my head in ease until he is repaid! By such talk it loses its
 case before both God and men; as the saying goes: He that strikes
 back has the most unjust cause.
 
 28. Both divine and human justice forbids that a man be judge in his
 own case. For this very reason God has established governmental and
 judicial authority, in his stead to punish transgressions,
 which--when properly administered--is not man's but God's judgment.
 He therefore that invades such judgment, invades the authority of God
 himself; he commits a double wrong and merits double condemnation. If
 you desire to seek and obtain redress in the courts, you are at
 liberty to do so, provided you proceed in the proper way, at the
 proper place and with those to whom God has entrusted authority. To
 these authorities you may appeal for redress. If you obtain it
 according to law, well and good; if not, you must suffer wrong and
 commit your case to God, as we have explained more fully elsewhere.
 
 29. In short, we find in this unique passage a statement to the
 effect that he who curbs not his wrath but retains it longer than a
 day, or over night, cannot be a Christian. Where then do they stand
 who entertain wrath and hatred indefinitely, for one, two, three,
 seven, ten years? Such is no longer human wrath but fiendish wrath
 from hell; it will not be satisfied nor extinguished, but when it
 once takes possession of a man he would, if able, destroy everything
 in a moment with his hellish fire. Even so the arch-fiend is not
 satisfied with having cast the whole human race into sin and death,
 but will not rest content unless he can drag all human beings into
 eternal damnation.
 
 30. A Christian therefore has ample cause to carefully guard against
 this vice. God may have patience with you when wrath wells up in your
 heart--although that, too, is sinful--but take heed that wrath does
 not overcome you and cause you to fall. Rather take serious counsel
 with yourself and extinguish and expel your anger by applying
 passages of Holy Writ and calling upon your faith. When alone or
 about to retire, repeat the Lord's Prayer, ask for forgiveness and
 confess that God daily forgives you much oftener than your neighbor
 sins against you.
 
 "Neither give place to the devil. Let him that stole steal no more:
 but rather let him labor, working with his hands the thing that is
 good, that he may have whereof to give to him that hath need."
 
 31. This thought is brought out also in the next Epistle, namely,
 that a Christian should guard against giving offense to anybody by
 his life, lest God's name be blasphemed. It is a grand thing to be a
 Christian, who, as has been stated, is a new man created after God
 and a true image of God, wherein God himself desires to be reflected.
 Therefore, whatever of good a Christian does, or whatever of evil he
 does, under the name of a Christian, either honors or disgraces God's
 name. Now, says Paul, whenever you follow your lusts, in obedience to
 your old Adam, you do naught but give occasion to the slanderers--the
 devil and his troop--to blaspheme the name of God. For the devil,
 even without your assistance, at all times seeks opportunity--nor can
 he desist--to befoul our dear Gospel and the name of God with his
 slanderous tales, composed, if need be, entirely of lies. But where
 he finds the semblance of occasion he knows how to profit by it. He
 will then open his mouth wide and cry: Behold, these are your Gospel
 people! Here you have the fruits of this new doctrine! Is their
 Christ such a one as they honor by their lives?
 
 32. So then a Christian should be exceedingly careful and cautious
 for this reason, if for no other: to protect the name and honor of
 his dear God and Saviour and not to do the devil the favor of letting
 him whet his slanderous tongue on Christ's name. How shall we stand
 and answer in his sight when we cannot deny the fact that our life
 gives just cause for complaint and offense? By such a life we
 intentionally bring disgrace and shame upon God's name and Word,
 which things should be our highest treasures and most valuable
 possessions.
 
 33. When the apostle says, "Let him that stole steal no more: but
 rather let him labor, working with his hands the thing that is good,
 that he may have whereof to give to him that hath need," he indicates
 the true fruit of repentance, which consists in abandoning and
 utterly abstaining from evil and in doing good. He at the same time
 attacks and reproves the sin of theft so common in all walks of life.
 And them who idle away their time and neglect their duty of serving
 and helping their fellow-beings, he calls--and rightfully--thieves in
 God's sight.
 
 34. For the right interpretation of the commandment, Thou shalt not
 steal, is this: Thou shalt live of thine own work, that thou mayest
 have to give to the needy. This is your bounden duty, and if you do
 not so God will pronounce you not a Christian but a thief and robber.
 In the first place, because you are an idler and do not support
 yourself, but live by the sweat and toil of others; in the second
 place, because you withhold from your neighbor what you plainly owe
 him. Where now shall we find those who keep this commandment? Indeed,
 where should we dare look for them except where no people live? But
 such a class of people should Christians be. Therefore, let each of
 us beware lest he deceive himself; for God will not be mocked nor
 deceived. Gal 6, 7.
 
 
 
 
 _Twentieth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Ephesians 5, 15-21.
 
 15 Look therefore carefully how ye walk [See then that ye walk
 circumspectly], not as unwise, but as wise; 16 redeeming the time,
 because the days are evil. 17 Wherefore be ye not foolish, but
 understand what the will of the Lord is. 18 And be not drunken with
 wine, wherein is riot, but be filled with the Spirit; 19 speaking one
 to another in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing and
 making melody with your heart to the Lord; 20 giving thanks always
 for all things in the name of our Lord Jesus Christ to God, even the
 Father; 21 subjecting yourselves one to another in the fear of
 Christ.
 
 
 THE CAREFUL WALK OF THE CHRISTIAN.
 
 1. Paul's admonition here is designed for those who, having heard the
 Gospel and made a fine start in believing, immediately imagine
 themselves secure and think they have accomplished all. Forgetful
 that they are still flesh and blood, and in the world and in contact
 with the devil's kingdom, they live in unconcern, as if delivered
 from all danger, and the devil far fled. By the very reason of their
 security they are overcome of the devil and their own flesh, and fall
 unawares from the Gospel. They have just enough connection with it to
 be able to prate of it, boasting themselves Christians but giving no
 indication of the fact in their conduct.
 
 2. Paul would tell them how, in view of these things, vigilance is
 essential to the Christian life. To regulate the life by keeping
 God's will ever before the eyes, always conforming the conduct to
 it--this he calls walking circumspectly and being wise. If you for a
 moment lose sight of God's will, the devil immediately possesses you
 and works pernicious results, transforming a Christian into an
 indolent, self-secure hypocrite; a hypocrite into a heretic and
 factionist; and a heretic into an open enemy. So the apostle here
 teaches that in all seriousness if we would secure ourselves against
 the craft and power of the devil we must be vigilant; we must be
 careful how we walk. In Satan we have an enemy bent on hindering us;
 on undermining our very foundation.
 
 3. Consequently they who fail to keep earnest watch over their
 Christian life--that is, to have a care for soundness of belief and
 to gladly hear and obey the Word of God--are unwise, even foolish,
 and have no knowledge of God's will. They have removed the light from
 before their eyes to behold instead a thing of their own imagination.
 They see as through a painted glass, presuming they do well in
 following such phantoms of their reason, until they are misled and
 defeated of the devil.
 
 
 THE WORD, THE GUIDE OF THE CHRISTIAN.
 
 4. Therefore, not without reason does Paul warn Christians to be
 always wise and circumspect--to keep the Word of God before them.
 Upon so doing depends their wisdom and understanding. Let each one
 make it a matter of personal concern, and especially should it be the
 general interest of the congregation. Where care is not observed to
 retain the Word in the Church, but there are admitted to the pulpit
 brawlers who set forth their own fraudulent doctrines, the Church is
 injured; the congregation will soon be as the preacher. Again, if the
 individual fails to regulate his daily life--the affairs of his
 calling--by the Word of God; if he forgets the Word and absorbs
 himself in accumulating wealth; if he is tangled with secular
 interests, he soon becomes a cold and indolent Christian, then an
 erring soul, and finally utterly disregards God's will and his Word.
 
 It is for these reasons God so frequently commands us in the
 Scriptures continually to explain and apply his Word, to hear it
 willingly and practice it faithfully, and to meditate upon it day and
 night. He would have our lives emanate from the Word in honor to God
 and gratitude to him--from the Word wherein we daily look as in a
 mirror. But care and diligence are necessary to bring it to pass, and
 we should faithfully assist each other by instruction, advice, and in
 other ways.
 
 5. In my admonitions I have often enough urged those who have
 influence, to use all diligence in drawing the young to school, where
 they may receive proper instruction to become pastors and preachers;
 and I have earnestly advised that in cases of necessity ample
 financial provision be made for students. But, alas, few communities,
 few States, are interested in the matter. In all Germany, look at the
 bishops, princes, noblemen, the inhabitants of town and country--how
 confidently they go on sleeping and snoring in their indifference to
 the question. They presume to think there is no need for action; the
 matter will adjust itself; there will always be pastors and
 preachers. But assuredly they deceive themselves if they think they
 are consulting their best interests in this affair; for they will, as
 the text says, become foolish and fail to recognize the will of God.
 Therefore they will some day have to experience what they do not now
 believe: in a few years after our day they will seek preachers and
 find none; they will have to hear rude, illiterate dolts who, lacking
 understanding of the Word of God, will, like all stupid Papists,
 preach the vile, offensive things of the Pope, about consecrated
 water and salt, about gray gowns, new monasteries and the like.
 
 6. Cry, preach and admonish as we will, no one will hear; foreseeing
 which, Paul prophesies that they who observe not God's will, become
 unwise, foolish, and consequently waste the day of grace and neglect
 their salvation. Now, it is God's will we should sanctify his name,
 love and advance his Word, and so aid in building up his kingdom.
 When we fulfill his will in these things, he will regard our desires,
 providing us with daily bread and granting peace and happiness.
 
 7. Now, it should be our chief concern to preserve to ourselves the
 Word and will of God. That would truly be wisdom, and redeeming the
 time. But failing therein, it must be with us as with the unwise and
 fools; we will have to hear the declaration: "Since you refuse to
 sanctify my name, to advance my kingdom and to do my will, neither
 will I provide you daily bread, nor forgive your sins, nor keep from
 temptation and deliver from evil." God will then permit us to deplore
 the great calamities of the world--its turmoil and wickedness, the
 cause whereof the world attributes to the Gospel. But the punishment
 just mentioned must be visited upon them who will not recognize the
 will of God and submit to it. These, however, desire to justify
 themselves and are unwilling to receive censure for having conducted
 themselves unwisely, even foolishly.
 
 8. So much for a general observation upon the expression "walking
 wisely and circumspectly"; so much upon unwise conduct in regard to
 matters of vital importance to the Church, which have to do with the
 office of the ministry and with God's Word. Where the ministry and
 the Word of God are preserved, there will always be some among the
 masses to attend upon the preaching of the Word and to conform their
 lives to it. But when the Bible leaves the pulpit, little good will
 be accomplished, even though one here and there be able to read the
 Scriptures for themselves and imagine they have no need of the
 preached Word. Where will the untaught masses stand? Note how it has
 been with the poor people in our time who were misled by Munzer and
 Munster, and their prophets and factionists.
 
 
 PUBLIC PREACHING OF THE WORD ENJOINED.
 
 Then let everyone lend earnest effort to promote public preaching of
 the Word everywhere, and public attendance upon that preaching; and
 thus rightly to found and build up the Church. Let him also put on
 the wedding garment himself (mentioned in the Gospel for today); let
 him take care to be found an earnest advocate of the Word of God,
 uninfluenced by thoughts common to the secure spirit: "Oh, there are
 pastors and preachers enough for me. I can hear or read the Word when
 I please; have access to it any day. I must give first attention to
 bread-winning and like things. Let others look out for themselves."
 Take care, my dear sir; you can easily fail by carelessness here and
 be found without the wedding garment, perhaps may die without it,
 unaware how you are being deceived. Whose fault will it be but your
 own since you would not hear Paul's admonition to walk wisely and
 circumspectly?
 
 9. We should make provision while the opportunity is at our doors,
 for, judging from the present course of the world, it will not long
 retain what it has. Everywhere men are diligently helping to hunt
 down ministers, or at least to so bring to bear upon them hunger and
 poverty, to so oppose them with secret fraud, as to drive them from
 the land. And little trouble and labor will be required to accomplish
 it. We shall only too soon be rid of our ministers and have their
 places amply supplied by deceivers. I would much rather suffer in
 hell with Judas the Betrayer than to bear the guilt of accomplishing
 one minister's death or of being instrumental in offering place to
 one deceiver. For it would not be so intolerable to suffer the
 anguish of the betrayer of Christ as to endure that of one who, by
 his sin in this respect, is responsible for the loss of countless
 souls.
 
 
 NECESSITY OF IMPROVING THE TIME.
 
 10. Paul goes on to elaborate his admonition by explaining what it is
 to walk circumspectly and wisely--to "redeem the time, because the
 days are evil." In other words: Think not happy days are in store for
 you and you may defer duty till better times; better times will never
 be. The devil is always in the world to hinder your every effort to
 do good, and his opposition increases with time. The longer you
 tarry, the less your power to accomplish good; wasted time only makes
 matters worse. Then redeem the time; grasp your opportunities as best
 you can. Let no interest be so dear to you as the promotion of God's
 kingdom and the serving of the public in every good and useful way
 possible, whatever befall yourself.
 
 11. Christ in like manner says to the Jews: "While ye have the light,
 believe on the light, that ye may become sons of light." Jn 12, 36.
 And Paul, after quoting from Isaiah 49, 8, adds: "Behold, now is the
 acceptable time; behold, now is the day of salvation." 2 Cor 6, 2. So
 his counsel in our text means: Take heed you receive not the grace of
 God in vain. Or, neglect not the matter of your salvation; enjoy
 while you may the opportunity of furthering the kingdom of God, for
 the sake of your own and others' salvation. Defer not the thing to
 another time, lest the opportunity escape you.
 
 Elsewhere (Gal 6, 10) the apostle says, "As we have opportunity, let
 us work that which is good." In other words: Act now, while you may.
 Your time passes with astonishing rapidity. Be not deceived, then, by
 the thought, "Oh, I can attend to the matter a year from now--two
 years--three." That is simply foolish. It is an unwise conclusion of
 the thoughtless. Before they are aware, they have lost the salvation
 extended them. They defer to consider God's will, putting it off for
 a season, until they shall have accomplished their own aims; then
 they have deferred too long.
 
 12. The Lord comes to your door. You do not have to seek him. If you
 are grateful he tarries to speak with you. But if you let him pass by
 you will have to complain as did the bride in Song of Solomon 5, 6:
 "I opened to my beloved; but my beloved had withdrawn himself, and
 was gone ... I sought him, but I could not find him; I called him,
 but he gave me no answer." Think not you will find the Lord when he
 has once gone, though you traverse the world. But while he is near
 you may seek and find; as Isaiah says (ch. 55, 6), "Seek ye Jehovah
 while he may be found." If through your neglect he pass by, all
 seeking then will be vain.
 
 For more than twenty years in my cloister I experienced the meaning
 of such disappointment. I sought God with great toil and with severe
 mortification of the body, fasting, watching, singing and praying. In
 this way I shamefully wasted my time and found not the Lord. The more
 I sought and the nearer I thought I was to him, the farther away I
 got. No, God does not permit us to find him so. He must first come
 and seek us where we are. We may not pursue and overtake him. That is
 not his will.
 
 13. Then be careful to avail yourself of the present opportunity.
 Embrace it while he is near, and faithfully consider what he requires
 of you. To ascertain this, go to the Creed and the Ten Commandments.
 They will tell you. Regulate your life by them. Be helped by the
 Lord's Prayer. Begin with yourself; then pray for the Church. Let it
 be your desire that God's name be everywhere sanctified and that your
 life conform to his will. If you are faithful in these things,
 assuredly you will walk wisely; you will avoid sin and do good. For
 the study and practice of these precepts will leave you no
 opportunity to do evil. God's Word will soon teach you to sanctify
 his name, to extend his kingdom, to do your neighbor no injury in
 mind, body or estate.
 
 14. Observe this is "redeeming the time." This is employing it well,
 while the golden days last in which we have remission from pain and
 sin. Not such remission as the Pope grants in his jubilees, wherein
 he deceives the world. Right here let us be careful not to cheat
 ourselves with the false idea that salvation cannot escape us. Let it
 not be with us as befell the children of Israel, of whom it is said
 in Psalms 95, 11 and Hebrews 4, 3 that because of their unbelief they
 entered not into the rest of God. They would not accept their
 opportunity in the forty years wherein he gave them his Word and
 showed them his wonders, daily admonishing them and calling to
 repentance and faith. They but tempted and provoked him the more.
 Hence another admonition was given the people of God and a certain
 day appointed: "Today if ye shall hear his voice, harden not your
 hearts." Heb 4, 7. Every day with us is "today" and we are permitted
 to hear God's voice still imploring us not to waste the time.
 
 15. Surely we ought supremely to thank God, as the latter part of our
 text enjoins, for the great blessing of his nearness to us. We have
 his presence in our homes. He is with us at our board, by our
 couch--anywhere we desire him. He offers us all assistance and grants
 all we may ask. So gracious a guest should indeed receive our high
 esteem. We ought to honor him while he is with us.
 
 16. Well may we pray, as I have said. There is too much slumbering
 everywhere in Germany. We cannot perceive how it is possible to
 preserve the Gospel and fill the pulpits for ten years longer. To
 such extent does wickedness rage in the world that blindness and
 error must sweep it as before. And no one will be to blame but the
 stupid bishops and princes, and those of us who esteem not the Word
 of God.
 
 
 INGRATITUDE WILL BE PUNISHED.
 
 Alas, that I am compelled against my will to be a prophet of ill to
 Germany. Yet it is not I, but the prayer of my Lord and your Lord;
 for according to its teachings he will say: "You neglected my Word.
 Unwilling to tolerate it, you persecuted and starved out its
 messengers. Therefore I will withhold your daily bread and give
 instead famine and war and murder, unto utter desolation; for you
 wish to have it so. Then when you cry for forgiveness of sins and
 deliverance from the evils come upon you, I will hear you as you
 heard my Word, my entreaties. I will leave you in your misfortunes as
 you left me and my Word."
 
 17. In fact, no one for a moment thinks of how God has signally,
 richly and graciously blessed us; how we are in possession of actual
 paradise--yes, the entire kingdom of heaven--if we only recognized
 the fact: and yet we shamefully, ungratefully and unreasonably reject
 the kingdom; as if it were not enough for us to overstep the Ten
 Commandments in our disobedience, but must even trample under foot
 the mercy God offers in the Gospel. Then why should we be surprised
 if he send down wrath upon us? What else is he to do but fulfill our
 Gospel passage for today, which threatens every individual rejecter
 and persecutor of God's Son and his servants, by whom we are invited
 to the marriage--what else is God to do but send out a divine army of
 servants to arrest the career of such murderers and to terminate
 their existence? We are given a special illustration--an example to
 the world--in the instance of the fate of Jerusalem, and in fact of
 the entire Jewish nation. They sinned unceasingly against all God's
 commandments, and when he proclaimed grace and offered forgiveness of
 sins, they trampled upon his mercy. Should Christ not revenge himself
 when they shamed and mocked his precious blood?
 
 18. Unto all the abominable sins mentioned, we must heap blasphemies;
 for when wrath and punishment come upon us we make outcry,
 complaining that the Gospel--or the new doctrine, as it is now
 called--is responsible. The Jews blame us Christians alone for the
 fact that they are scattered throughout the world. Their prayers day
 and night are directed against us, in blasphemies and reproaches
 inexpressible. Nevertheless, it was not the Christians who harassed
 and scattered them, but the heathenish Roman emperor.
 
 But whom other than themselves have the Jews to blame for their
 condition? for they would not tolerate Christ, when he brought them
 only help and boundless grace. Refusing to accept him whom God gave
 and in whom he promised all blessings, they necessarily lost their
 daily bread from God, except as they rebelliously extort it by usury
 and wickedness. They had also to suffer the loss of their national
 life, their priesthood and public worship, forgiveness of sins and
 redemption, and so remain eternally captive under the wrath and
 condemnation of God. Such is the just and inevitable punishment of
 the unwise--the foolish--who refused to recognize their opportunity
 when Christ was with them.
 
 19. With this terrible example before our eyes, we are still
 unrepentant, pursuing the same course the Jews followed, not only in
 disobedience to the will of God, but in rejecting his grace. For that
 grace we should earnestly long and pray, striving to secure to our
 children after us baptism, the ministry and the sacrament, in their
 purity. In return for our perversity, it will eventually be with us
 as with the Jews and other ungrateful persecutors and rejecters.
 
 20. Then let him who will receive advice and help, faithfully heed
 Paul's counsel and redeem the time, not sleeping away the blessed
 golden hour of grace; as Christ earnestly admonishes in the parable
 of the five foolish virgins. Mt 25, 13. The foolish virgins might
 have made their purchases in season, before the bridegroom's arrival;
 but failing to attend to the matter until time to meet the
 bridegroom, they missed both the market and the wedding.
 
 21. The ancient poets and sages make use of a similar illustration at
 the expense of the cricket or grasshopper. As the fable runs, when
 winter came the grasshoppers, having nothing to eat, went to the ants
 and asked them to divide their gathered store. "What did you in the
 summer time that you gathered nothing?" asked the ants. "We sang,"
 the grasshoppers replied. "If you sang in the summer, you must dance
 for it in the winter," was the response. Similarly should fools
 unwilling to learn the will of God be answered. Terrible and alarming
 is the wrath of God when with scorn and mockery he turns away a soul.
 In Proverbs 1, 24 and 26 he threatens: "Because I have called, and ye
 have refused; I have stretched out my hand, and no man hath
 regarded.... I also will laugh in the day of your calamity; I will
 mock when your fear cometh."
 
 22. Some may ask what Paul means by adding to the phrase, "Redeeming
 the time," the modifier, "because the days are evil"; if we are to
 regard the present opportunity golden, why are the days evil?
 
 
 EVIL DOCTRINES EVER OPPOSE THE CHRISTIAN.
 
 23. I answer: The time is unquestionably good so long as the Gospel
 is sounded--is faithfully preached and received. At the same time,
 even today the world is filled with evils, factions, false theories
 and bad examples of every sort; much of this wickedness is inherent
 in ourselves. With these things the Christian must always contend;
 the devil pursues, and our own flesh discourages us and allures from
 recognition and observance of the divine will. If we strive not
 against it, we shall soon lose sight of God's will, to our own
 injury, even while listening to the Gospel. For the devil's strongest
 fury is exerted to befoul the world with fanaticism, and to draw from
 the pure doctrine of faith into that evil even them who possess the
 Gospel. Moreover, being still flesh and blood we are always
 self-secure, unwilling to be led by the Spirit, and indolent and
 unresponsive in relation to the Word of God and to prayer. Again, in
 the outward walks of life, in temporal conditions, only obstacles and
 evils meet us everywhere, impeding our spiritual progress and
 impelling us to suppress the Gospel and to rend the Church.
 
 24. Let no one, then, expect to enjoy an era of peace and pleasure
 here on earth. Although the present time is in itself good, and God
 bestows upon us the golden year of his Word and his grace, yet the
 devil is here with his factions and followers, and our own flesh
 supports him. He corrupts the blessed days of grace at every possible
 opportunity, and so oppresses Christians that they must contend
 against him with their utmost strength and vigilance if they would
 not, through the influence of evils and obstacles, be wrested from
 the Gospel they have received, and if they would persevere therein
 unto the end.
 
 Wherefore, we have the best reasons to adapt ourselves to the present
 time in the best possible way; to walk wisely and circumspectly,
 showing all faithfulness to the will of God; obeying it while we have
 opportunity--while still in possession of God's Word, his grace and
 his Spirit. Being opposed and obstructed by the devil and our own
 flesh, we must, as Paul implies, be wise and careful; we must guard
 against following them. If we fail in this respect, it will not avail
 us to pretend we did not know our duty, or had not time to perform it
 and consequently could not cope with them. So, then, we are to
 understand by "evil days" the allurements that lead us away from
 God's Word and his will.
 
 "And be not drunk with wine, wherein is excess."
 
 25. The apostle touches upon several evils strongly tending to waste
 of time and neglect of the golden opportunity. Especially is
 drunkenness one, for drink makes men particularly self-secure,
 reckless and disorderly. The evil was formerly common in Greece, and
 in Germany today are men who delight in being riotously drunk night
 and day. Such individuals are utterly lacking in the faithfulness and
 interest essential to following the will of God. They are unable,
 even in temporal affairs, to persistently apply themselves, much less
 to be opportune. Indeed, so beastly and swinish do they become, they
 lose all sense of either shame or honor; they have no modesty nor any
 human feeling. Alas, examples are before our eyes plainer and more
 numerous than we can depict.
 
 26. Paul's words of admonition, "Speaking to yourselves in psalms and
 hymns and spiritual songs," are treated in the epistle passage for
 the fifth Sunday after Epiphany, where the text is similar.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty First Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Ephesians 6, 10-17.
 
 10 Finally, be strong in the Lord, and in the strength of his might.
 11 Put on the whole armor of God, that ye may be able to stand
 against the wiles of the devil. 12 For our wrestling is not against
 flesh and blood, but against the principalities, against the powers,
 against the worldrulers of this darkness, against the spiritual hosts
 of wickedness in the heavenly places. 13 Wherefore take up the whole
 armor of God, that ye may be able to withstand in the evil day, and,
 having done all, to stand. 14 Stand therefore, having girded your
 loins with truth, and having put on the breastplate of righteousness,
 15 and having shod your foot with the preparation of the gospel of
 peace; 16 withal taking up the shield of faith, wherewith ye shall be
 able to quench all the fiery darts of the evil one. 17 And take the
 helmet of salvation, and the sword of the Spirit, which is the word
 of God.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN ARMOR AND WEAPONS.
 
 This epistle text is fully expounded in "The Explanations and Sermons
 on Paul's Epistles"--in the sermon on Ephesians 6, 10-17, entitled
 "The Christian Armor and Weapons," preached in the year 1533.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Second Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Philippians 1, 3-11.
 
 3 I thank my God upon all my remembrance of you, 4 always in every
 supplication of mine on behalf of you all making my supplication with
 joy, 5 for your fellowship in furtherance of the gospel from the
 first day until now; 6 being confident of this very thing, that he
 who began a good work in you will perfect it until the day of Jesus
 Christ: 7 even as it is right for me to be thus minded on behalf of
 you all, because I have you in my heart, inasmuch as, both in my
 bonds and in the defence and confirmation of the gospel, ye all are
 partakers with me of grace. 8 For God is my witness, how I long after
 you in all the tender mercies of Christ Jesus. 9 And this I pray,
 that your love may abound yet more and more in knowledge and all
 discernment; 10 so that ye may approve the things that are excellent;
 that ye may be sincere and void of offence unto the day of Christ; 11
 being filled with the fruits of righteousness, which are through
 Jesus Christ, unto the glory and praise of God.
 
 
 PAUL'S THANKS AND PRAYERS FOR CHURCHES.
 
 1. First, the apostle Paul thanks God, as his custom is in the
 beginning of his epistles, for the grace whereby the Philippians came
 into the fellowship of the Gospel and were made partakers of it.
 Secondly, his desire and prayer to God is for their increase in the
 knowledge of the Gospel, and their more abundant fruits. His intent
 in extolling the Gospel is to admonish them to remain steadfast in
 their faith, continuing as they have begun and as they now stand.
 Apparently this is a simple passage, especially to learned and apt
 students of the Scriptures. They may not think it holds any great
 truth to be discovered. Yet we must explain this and like discourses
 for the benefit of some who do not fully understand it, and who
 desire to learn.
 
 2. These words give us an exact delineation of the Christian heart
 that sincerely believes in the holy Gospel. Such hearts are rare in
 the world. It is especially difficult to find one so beautiful as we
 observe here unless it be among the beloved apostles or those who
 approached them in Christ-likeness. For in the matter of faith we
 today are entirely too indolent and indifferent.
 
 3. But the Christian heart is such as inspired Paul's words; here its
 characteristics are shown. He rejoices in the Gospel with his inmost
 soul. He thanks God that others have come into its fellowship. His
 confidence is firm regarding certain beginners in the faith, and he
 is so interested in their salvation he rejoices in it as much as in
 his own, seeming unable to thank God sufficiently for it. He
 unceasingly prays that he may live to see many come with him into
 such fellowship and be preserved therein until the day of the Lord
 Jesus Christ, who shall perfect and complete all the defects of this
 earthly life. He prays these beginners may go forth faultlessly in
 faith and hope until that joyful day.
 
 4. Thus the godly apostle expresses himself, pouring out the depths
 of his heart--a heart filled with the real fruits of the Spirit and
 of faith. It burns with love and joy whenever he sees the Gospel
 recognized, accepted and honored, and the Church flourishing. Paul
 can conceive for the converts no loftier desire--can offer no greater
 petition for them than to implore God they may increase and persevere
 in the Gospel faith. Such is the inestimable value he places upon
 possessing and holding fast God's Word. And Christ in Luke 11, 28
 pronounces blessed those who keep the Word of God.
 
 
 I. THE DUTY OF GRATITUDE.
 
 5. Now, the first thing in which Paul is here an example to us is his
 gratitude. It behooves the Christian who recognizes the grace and
 goodness of God expressed in the Gospel, first of all to manifest his
 thankfulness therefor; toward God--his highest duty--and toward men.
 As Christians who have abandoned the false services and sacrifices
 that in our past heathenish blindness we zealously practiced, let us
 remember our obligation henceforth to be the more fervent in offering
 true service and right sacrifices to God. We can render him no
 better--in fact, none other--service, or outward work, than the
 thank-offering, as the Scriptures term it. That is, receiving and
 honoring the grace of God and the preaching and hearing of his Word,
 and furthering their operation, not only in word, but sincerely in
 our hearts and with all our physical and spiritual powers. This is
 the truest gratitude.
 
 6. God calls that a "pure offering" which is rendered to him "among
 the gentiles" (Mal 1, 11), where his name is not preached and praised
 from avariciousness, not from pride and presumption in the priesthood
 and in the holiness of human works. These motives actuated the
 boasting Jews, who, as God charges in this reference, presumptuously
 thought to receive honor from him for every trivial service like
 closing a door or opening a window. But the offering of the gentiles
 is joyfully rendered from a sincere, willing heart. This kind of
 thanksgiving and sacrifices are acceptable to God, for he says in
 Psalms 110, 3, "Thy people shall be willing"; and in Second
 Corinthians 9, 7, "God loveth a cheerful giver." The knowledge of the
 Gospel should inspire us with gratitude of this order. Let us not be
 found unthankful, and forgetful of God's infinite goodness.
 
 
 INGRATITUDE DENOUNCED BY THE HEATHEN.
 
 7. The heathen everywhere, despite their ignorance of God and his
 grace, condemned to the utmost the evil of ingratitude. They regarded
 it the mother of evils, than which was none more malevolent and
 shameful. Among many examples in this respect is one left us by a
 people in Arabia called Nabathians, who had an excellent form of
 government. So strict were they in regard to this evil that anyone
 found guilty of ingratitude to his fellows was looked upon as a
 murderer and punished with death.
 
 8. No sin is more abominable to human nature, and of none is human
 nature less tolerant. It is easier to forgive and to forget the act
 of an enemy who commits a bodily injury, or even murders one's
 parents, than it is to forget the sin of him who repays simple
 kindness and fidelity with ingratitude and faithlessness; who for
 love and friendship returns hatred. In the sentiment of the Latin
 proverb, to be so rewarded is like rearing a serpent in one's bosom.
 God likewise regards this sin with extreme enmity and punishes it.
 The Scriptures say: "Whoso rewardeth evil for good, evil shall not
 depart from his house." Prov 17, 13.
 
 9. Thus we have the teaching of nature and of reason regarding the
 sin of men's ingratitude toward one another. How much greater the
 evil, how much more shameful and accursed, when manifested toward God
 who, in his infinite and ineffable goodness, conferred upon us while
 yet enemies to him and deserving of the fires of hell--conferred upon
 us, I say, not ten dollars, not a hundred thousand dollars even, but
 redemption from divine wrath and eternal death, and abundantly
 comforted us, granting us safety, a good conscience, peace and
 salvation! These are inexpressible blessings, incomprehensible in
 this life. And they will continue to occupy our minds in yonder
 eternal life. How much more awful the sin of ingratitude for these
 blessings, as exemplified in the servant mentioned in the Gospel
 passage for today, to whom was forgiven the debt of ten thousand
 talents and who yet would not forgive the debt of his fellow-servant
 who owed him a hundred pence!
 
 10. Is it not incredible that there are to be found on earth
 individuals wicked enough to manifest for the highest and eternal
 blessings such unspeakable ingratitude? But alas, we have the
 evidence of our own eyes. We know them in their very dwelling-places.
 We see how the world abounds with them. Not only are the ingrates to
 be found among deliberate rejecters of the acknowledged truth of the
 Gospel, concerning God's grace, an assured conscience and the promise
 of eternal life, terrible as such malice of the devil is, but they
 are present also in our midst, accepting the Gospel and boasting of
 it. Such shameful ingratitude prevails among the masses it would not
 be strange were God to send upon them the thunders and lightnings of
 his wrath, yes, all the Turks and the devils of hell.
 
 There is a generally prevalent ingratitude like that of the wicked
 servant who readily forgot the straits he experienced when, being
 called to account for what he could not pay, the wrathful sentence
 was pronounced against him that he and all he possessed must be sold,
 and he be indefinitely imprisoned. Nor have we less readily forgotten
 how we were tortured under the Papacy; how we were overwhelmed,
 drowned as in a flood, with numberless strange doctrines, when our
 anxious consciences longed for salvation. Now that we are, through
 the grace of God, liberated from these distresses, our gratitude is
 of a character to increasingly heap to ourselves the wrath of God. So
 have others before us done, and consequently have endured terrible
 chastisement.
 
 11. Only calculate the enormity of our wickedness when, God having
 infinitely blessed us in forgiving all our sins and making us lords
 over heaven and earth, we so little respect him as to be unmindful of
 his blessings; to be unwilling for the sake of them sincerely to
 forgive our neighbor a single slighting word, not to mention
 rendering him service. We conduct ourselves as if God might be
 expected to connive at our ingratitude and permit us to continue in
 it, at the same time conferring upon us as godly and obedient
 children, success and happiness. More than this, we think we have the
 privilege and power to live and do as we please. Indeed, the more
 learning and power we have and the more exalted our rank, the greater
 knaves we are; perpetrating every wicked deed, stirring up strife,
 discord, war and murder for the sake of executing our own arbitrary
 designs, where the question is the surrender of a penny in
 recognition of the hundreds of thousands of dollars daily received
 from God notwithstanding our ingratitude.
 
 12. Two mighty lords clash with each other like powerful battering
 rams, and for what? Perhaps for undisputed possession of a city or
 two, a matter they must be ashamed of did they but call to mind what
 they have received from God. They would be constrained to exclaim:
 "What are we doing that we injure one another--we who are all
 baptized in one name, the name of Christ, and pledged to one Lord?"
 But no, it will not do for them to consider this matter; not even to
 think of it. They must turn their eyes away from it, and put it far
 from their hearts. Wholly forgetting God's benefits, they must wage
 war against each other, involving nations, and subjecting people to
 the Turk. And all for sake of the insignificant farthing each refused
 to yield to the other.
 
 13. The world permits the very devil to saddle and ride it as he
 pleases. It seems to be characteristic of every phase of life that
 one will not yield to another--will not submit to any demand.
 Everyone is disposed to force his arrogant authority. The presumption
 is that supreme honor and final success depend upon an unyielding,
 unforgiving disposition, and that to seek to retain our possessions
 by peaceable means will prove our ruin. Even the two remaining cows
 in the stall must be brought into requisition, and war waged to the
 last stick, until when the mutineer comes and we have neither cow nor
 stall, nor house nor stick, we are obliged to cease.
 
 
 RETRIBUTION FOLLOWS INGRATITUDE.
 
 Oh, had we but grace enough to reflect on how it would be with us did
 God require us, as he has a perfect right to do, to pay our whole
 indebtedness, none being forgiven! grace enough to think whether we
 would not this very moment be in the abyss of hell! But so must it
 finally be with those who disregard the question and continually heap
 to themselves the wrath of God, being at the same time unwilling for
 him to deal otherwise with them than he did with the servant he
 forgave. But against that servant was finally passed the irrevocable
 sentence which, without mercy, delivered him to the tormentor till he
 should pay the debt, something he could never do.
 
 14. Nor is there any wrong or injustice in this ruling. For, as St.
 Bernhard says, ingratitude is an evil damnable and pernicious enough
 to quench all the springs of grace and blessing known to God and men;
 it is like a poison-laden, burning, destructive wind. Human nature
 will not tolerate it. Nor can God permit you, upon whom he has
 bestowed all grace and goodness, all spiritual and temporal blessing,
 to go on continually in wickedness, defiantly abusing his benevolence
 and dishonoring him; you thus recklessly bring upon yourself his
 wrath. For God cannot bless you if you are ungrateful, if you reject
 his goodness and give it no place in your heart.
 
 In such case the fountain of grace and mercy that continually springs
 for all who sincerely desire it, must be quenched for you. You cannot
 enjoy it. It would afford you an abundant and unceasing supply of
 water did you not yourself dry it up by the deadly wind of your
 ingratitude; by shamefully forgetting the ineffable goodness God
 bestows upon you; and by failing to honor the blood of Christ the
 Lord, wherewith he purchased us and reconciled us to God--failing to
 honor it enough to forgive your neighbor, for Christ's sake, a single
 wrong word.
 
 15. What heavy burden is there for the individual who, in submission
 and gratitude to his God, and in honor to Christ, would conduct
 himself something like a Christian? It will cost him no great effort
 nor trouble. It will not break any bones nor injure him in property
 or honor. Even were it to affect him to some trifling extent, to
 incur for him some slight injustice, he should remember what God has
 given him, and will still give, of his grace and goodness.
 
 Yes, why complain even were you, in some measure, to endanger body
 and life? What did not the Son of God incur for you? It was not
 pleasure for him to take upon himself the wrath of God, to bear the
 curse for you. It cost him bloody sweat and unspeakable anguish of
 heart, as well as the sacrifice of his body, the shedding of his
 blood, when he bore for you the wrath and curse of God, which would
 have rested upon you forever. Yet he did it cheerfully and with
 fervent love. Should you not, then, be ashamed in your own heart, and
 humiliated before all creatures, to be so slow and dull, so
 stock-and-stone-hardened, about enduring and forgiving an occasional
 unkind word--something to be suffered in token of honor and gratitude
 to him? What more noble than, for the sake of Christ, to incur
 danger, to suffer injury, to aid the poor and needy? in particular to
 further the Word of God and to support the ministry, the pulpit and
 the schools?
 
 16. It would be no marvel had Germany long ago sunk to ruin, or had
 it been razed to its very foundations by Turks and Tartars, because
 of its diabolical forgetfulness, its damnable rejection, of God's
 unspeakable grace. Indeed, it is a wonder the earth continues to
 support us and the sun still gives us light. Because of our
 ingratitude, well might the heavens become dark and the earth be
 perverted--as the Scriptures teach (Ps 106)--and suffer the fate of
 Sodom and Gomorrah, no longer yielding a leaf nor a blade of grass,
 but completely turned from its course--well might it be so did not
 God, for the sake of the few godly Christians known and acknowledged
 of him, forbear and still delay.
 
 
 EXAMPLES OF INGRATITUDE FOR THE GOSPEL.
 
 17. Wherever we turn our eyes we see, in all conditions of life, a
 deluge of terrible examples of ingratitude for the precious Gospel.
 We see how kings, princes and lords scratch and bite; how they envy
 and hate one another, oppressing their own people and destroying
 their own countries; how they tax themselves with not so much as a
 single Christian thought about ameliorating the wretchedness of
 Germany and securing for the oppressed Church somewhere a shelter of
 defense against the murderous attacks of devil, Pope and Turks. The
 noblemen rake and rend, robbing whomever they can, prince or
 otherwise, and especially the poor Church; like actual devils, they
 trample under foot pastors and preachers. Townsmen and farmers, too,
 are extremely avaricious, extortionate and treacherous; they
 fearlessly perpetrate every sort of insolence and wickedness, and
 without shame and unpunished. The earth cries to heaven, unable
 longer to tolerate its oppression.
 
 18. But why multiply words? It is in vain so far as the world is
 concerned; no admonition will avail. The world remains the devil's
 own. We must remember we shall not by any means find with the world
 that Christian heart pictured by the apostle; on the contrary we
 shall find what might be represented by a picture of the very
 opposite type--the most shameless ingratitude. But let the still
 existing God-fearing Christians be careful to imitate in their
 gratitude the spirit of the apostle's beautiful picture. Let them
 give evidence of their willingness to hear the Word of God, of
 pleasure and delight in it and grief where it is rejected. Let them
 show by their lives a consciousness of the great blessing conferred
 by those from whom they received the Gospel. As recipients of such
 goodness, let their hearts and lips ever be ready with the happy
 declaration: "God be praised!" For thereunto are we called. As before
 said, praise should be the constant service and daily sacrifice of
 Christians; and according to Paul's teaching here, the Christian's
 works, his fruits of righteousness, should shine before men. Such
 manifestation of gratitude assuredly must result when we comprehend
 what God has given us.
 
 19. Notwithstanding the world's refusal to be influenced by the
 recognition of God's goodness, and in spite of the fact that we are
 obliged daily to see, hear and suffer the world's increasing
 ungratefulness the longer it stands, we must not allow ourselves to
 be led into error; for we will be unable to change it. We must preach
 against the evil of ingratitude wherever possible, severely censuring
 it, and faithfully admonish all men to guard against it. At the same
 time we have to remember the world will not submit. Although
 compelled to live among the ungrateful, we are not for that reason to
 fall into error nor to cease from doing good. Let our springs be
 dispersed abroad, as Solomon says in Proverbs 5, 16. Let us
 continually do good, not faltering when others receive our good as
 evil. Just as God causes his sun to rise on the thankful and the
 unthankful. Mt 5, 45.
 
 20. But if your good works are wrought with the object of securing
 the thanks and applause of the world, you will meet with a reception
 quite the reverse. Your reward will justly be that of him who crushes
 with his teeth the hollow nut only to defile his mouth. Now, if when
 ingratitude is met with, you angrily wish to pull down mountains, and
 resolve to give up doing good, you are no longer a Christian. You
 injure yourself and accomplish nothing. Can you not be mindful of
 your environment--that you are still in the world where vice and
 ingratitude hold sway? that you are, as the phrase goes, with "those
 who return evil for good"? He who would escape this fact must flee
 the boundaries of the world. It requires no great wisdom to live only
 among the godly and do good, but the keenest judgment is necessary to
 live with the wicked and not do evil.
 
 21. Christianity should be begun in youth, to give practice in the
 endurance that will enable one to do good to all men while expecting
 evil in return. Not that the Christian is to commend and approve evil
 conduct; he is to censure and restrain wickedness to the limit of the
 authority his position in life affords. It is the best testimony to
 the real merit of a work when its beneficiaries are not only
 ungrateful but return evil. For its results tend to restrain the doer
 from a too high opinion of himself, and the character of the work is
 too precious in God's sight for the world to be worthy of rewarding
 it.
 
 
 II. THE DUTY OF PRAYER.
 
 22. The other Christian duty named by Paul in this passage is that of
 prayer. The two obligations--gratitude for benefits received, and
 prayer for the preservation and growth of God's work begun in us--are
 properly related. Prayer is of supreme importance, for the devil and
 the world assail us and delight in turning us aside; we have
 continually to resist wickedness. So the conflict is a sore one for
 our feeble flesh and blood, and we cannot stand unvanquished unless
 there be constant, earnest invocation of divine aid. Gratitude and
 prayer are essential and must accompany each other, according to the
 requirements of the daily sacrifice of the Old Testament: the
 offering of praise, or thank-offering, thanks to God for blessings
 received; and the sacrifice of prayer, or the Lord's Prayer--the
 petition against the wickedness and evil from which we would be
 released.
 
 23. Our life has not yet reached the heights it is destined to
 attain. We know here only its incipient first-fruits. Desire is not
 satisfied; we have but a foretaste. As yet we only realize by faith
 what is bestowed upon us; full and tangible occupancy is to come.
 Therefore, we need to pray because of the limitations that bind our
 earthly life, until we go yonder where prayer is unnecessary, and all
 is happiness, purity of life and one eternal song of thanks and
 praise to God.
 
 But heavenly praise and joy is to have its inception and a measure of
 growth here on earth through the encouragement of prayer--prayer for
 ourselves and the Church as a whole; that is, for them who have
 accepted and believe the Gospel and are thus mutually helpful. For
 the Gospel will receive greater exaltation and will inspire more joy
 with the individual because of its acceptance by the many. So Paul
 says he thanks God for the fellowship of the Philippians in the
 Gospel, and offers prayer in their behalf.
 
 
 PRAYER FOR OTHERS.
 
 24. Yes, it should be the joy of a Christian heart to see multitudes
 accept the offer of mercy, and praise and thank God with him. This
 desire for the participation of others in the Gospel promotes the
 spirit of prayer. The Christian cannot be a misanthrope, wholly
 unconcerned whether his fellows believe or not. He should be
 interested in all men and unceasingly long and pray for their
 salvation; for the sanctification of God's name, the coming of his
 kingdom, the fulfilment of his will; and for the exposure everywhere
 of the devil's deceptions, the suppression of his murderous power
 over poor souls and the restraint of his authority.
 
 25. This prayer should be the sincere, earnest outflow of the true
 Christian's heart. Note, Paul's words here indicate that his praise
 and prayer were inspired by a fervent spirit. It is impossible that
 the words "I thank my God upon all my remembrance of you, always in
 every supplication" be the expression of any but a heart full of such
 sentiments.
 
 Truly, Paul speaks in a way worthy of an apostle--saying he renders
 praise and prayer with keenest pleasure. He rejoices in his heart
 that he has somewhere a little band of Christians who love the Gospel
 and with whom he may rejoice; that he may thank God for them and pray
 in their behalf. Was there not much more reason that all they who had
 heard the Gospel should rejoice, and thank Paul in heart and in
 expression for it, praying God in his behalf? should rejoice that
 they became worthy of the apostle's favor, were delivered from their
 blindness and had now received from him the light transferring from
 sin and death into the grace of God and eternal life?
 
 26. But Paul does not wait for them to take the initiative, as they
 ought to have done to declare their joy and their gratitude to him.
 In his first utterance he pours out the joy of his heart, fervently
 thanking God for them, etc. Well might they have blushed, and
 reproached themselves, when they received the epistle beginning with
 these words. Well might they have said, "We should not have permitted
 him to speak in this way; it was our place first to show him
 gratitude and joy."
 
 
 FEW BELIEVERS NO REASON FOR DISCOURAGEMENT.
 
 27. We shall not soon be able to boast the attainment of that
 beautiful, perfect Christian spirit the apostle's words portray.
 Seeing how the apostle rejoices over finding a few believers in the
 Gospel, why should we complain because of the smaller number who
 accord us a hearing and seriously accept the Word of God? We have no
 great reason to complain nor to be discouraged since Christ and the
 prophets and apostles, meeting with the same backwardness on the part
 of the people, still were gratified over the occasional few who
 accepted the faith. We note how Christ rejoiced when now and then he
 found one who had true faith, and on the other hand was depressed
 when his own people refused to hear him, and reluctantly censured
 them. And Paul did not meet with more encouragement. In all the Roman
 Empire--and through the greater part of it he had traveled with the
 Gospel--he only occasionally found a place where was even a small
 band of earnest Christians; but over them he peculiarly rejoices,
 finding in them greater consolation than in all the treasures on
 earth.
 
 28. But it is a prophecy of good to the world, a portent of ultimate
 success, that Christ and his apostles and ministers must rejoice over
 an occasional reception of the beloved Word. Such acceptance will
 tell in time. One would think all men might eagerly have hastened to
 the ends of the earth to be afforded an opportunity of hearing an
 apostle. But Paul had to go through the world himself upon his
 ministry, enduring great fatigue and encountering privations and
 grave dangers, being rejected and trampled upon by all men. However,
 disregarding it all, he rejoiced to be able now and then to see some
 soul accept the Gospel. In time past it was not necessary for the
 Pope and his officials to run after anyone. They sat in lordly
 authority in their kingdom, and all men had to obey their summons,
 wherever wanted, and that without thanks.
 
 29. What running on the part of our fathers, even of many of us, as
 if we were foolish--running from all countries, hundreds of miles, to
 Jerusalem, to the holy sepulcher, to Compostella, St. James, Rome, to
 the heads of St. Peter and St. Paul; some barefooted and others in
 complete armor--all this, to say nothing of innumerable other
 pilgrimages! We thus expended large sums of money, and thanked God,
 and rejoiced to be able thereby to purchase the wicked indulgences of
 the Pope and to be worthy to look upon or to kiss the bones of the
 dead exhibited as holy relics, but preferably to kiss the feet of His
 Most Holy Holiness, the Pope. This condition of things the world
 desires again, and it shall have nothing better.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Third Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Philippians 3, 17-21.
 
 17 Brethren, be ye imitators [followers] together of me, and mark
 them that so walk even as ye have us for an ensample. 18 For many
 walk, of whom I told you often, and now tell you even weeping, that
 they are the enemies of the cross of Christ: 19 whose end is
 perdition, whose god is the belly, and whose glory is in their shame,
 who mind earthly things. 20 For our citizenship [conversation] is in
 heaven; whence also we wait for a Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ: 21
 who shall fashion anew the body of our humiliation [change our vile
 body], that it may be conformed [fashioned] to the body of his glory,
 according to the working whereby he is able even to subject all
 things unto himself.
 
 
 ENEMIES OF THE CROSS OF CHRIST AND THE CHRISTIAN'S CITIZENSHIP IN
 HEAVEN.
 
 1. Paul immeasurably extols the Philippians for having made a good
 beginning in the holy Gospel and for having acquitted themselves
 commendably, like men in earnest, as manifest by their fruits of
 faith. The reason he shows this sincere and strong concern for them
 is his desire that they remain steadfast, not being led astray by
 false teachers among the roaming Jews. For at that time many Jews
 went about with the intent of perverting Paul's converts, pretending
 they taught something far better; while they drew the people away
 from Christ and back to the Law, for the purpose of establishing and
 extending their Jewish doctrines.
 
 Paul, contemplating with special interest and pleasure his Church of
 the Philippians, is moved by parental care to admonish them--lest
 they sometime be misled by such teachers--to hold steadily to what
 they have received, not seeking anything else and not imagining, like
 self-secure, besotted souls who allow themselves to be deceived by
 the devil--not imagining themselves perfect and with complete
 understanding in all things. In the verses just preceding our text he
 speaks of himself as having not yet attained to full knowledge.
 
 
 PURITY OF DOCTRINE ENJOINED.
 
 2. He particularly admonishes them to follow him and to mark those
 ministers who walk as he does; also to shape their belief and conduct
 by the pattern they have received from him. Not only of himself does
 he make an example, but introduces them who similarly walk, several
 of whom he mentions in this letter to the Philippians. The
 individuals whom he bids them observe and follow must have been
 persons of special eminence. But it is particularly the doctrine the
 apostle would have the Philippians pattern after. Therefore we should
 be chiefly concerned about preserving the purity of the office of the
 ministry and the genuineness of faith. When these are kept unsullied,
 doctrine will be right, and good works spontaneous. Later on, in
 chapter 4, verse 8, Paul admonishes, with reference to the same
 subject: "If there be any virtue, and if there be any praise, think
 on these things."
 
 3. Apparently Paul is a rash man to dare boast himself a pattern for
 all. Other ministers might well accuse him of desiring to exalt his
 individual self above others. "Think you," our wise ones would say to
 him, "that you alone have the Holy Spirit, or that no one else is as
 eager for honor as yourself?" Just so did Miriam and Aaron murmur
 against Moses, their own brother, saying: "Hath Jehovah indeed spoken
 only with Moses? hath he not spoken also with us?" Num 12, 2. And it
 would seem as if Paul had too high an appreciation of his own
 character did he hold up his individual self as a pattern, intimating
 that no one was to be noted as worthy unless he walked as he did;
 though there might be some who apparently gave greater evidence of
 the Spirit, of holiness, humility and other graces, than himself, and
 yet walked not in his way.
 
 4. But he does not say "I, Paul, alone." He says, "as ye have us for
 an example", that does not exclude other true apostles and teachers.
 He is admonishing his Church, as he everywhere does, to hold fast to
 the one true doctrine received from him in the beginning. They are
 not to be too confident of their own wisdom in the matter, or to
 presume they have independent authority; but rather to guard against
 pretenders to a superior doctrine, for so had some been misled.
 
 
 RIGHTEOUSNESS OF THE LAW IS VAIN.
 
 5. In what respect he was a pattern or example to them, he has made
 plain; for instance, in the beginning of this chapter, in the third
 verse and following, he says: "For we are the circumcision, who
 worship by the Spirit of God, and glory in Christ Jesus, and have no
 confidence in the flesh: though I myself might have confidence even
 in the flesh: if any other man thinketh to have confidence in the
 flesh, I yet more: circumcised the eighth day, of the stock of
 Israel, of the tribe of Benjamin, a Hebrew of Hebrews." That is, he
 commands the highest honor a Jew can boast. "As touching the law," he
 goes on, "a Pharisee; as touching zeal, persecuting the Church; as
 touching the righteousness which is in the law, found blameless.
 Howbeit what things were gain to me, these have I counted loss for
 Christ. Yea verily, and I count all things to be loss for the
 excellency of the knowledge of Christ Jesus my Lord: for whom I
 suffered the loss of all things, and do count them but refuse, that I
 may gain Christ, and be found in him, not having a righteousness of
 mine own, even that which is of the law, but that which is through
 faith in Christ, the righteousness which is from God by faith."
 
 6. "Behold, this is the picture or pattern," he would say, "which we
 hold up for you to follow, that remembering how you obtained
 righteousness you may hold to it--a righteousness not of the Law." So
 far as the righteousness of the Law is concerned, Paul dares to say
 he regards it as filth and refuse (that proceeds from the human
 body); notwithstanding in its beautiful and blameless form it may be
 unsurpassed by anything in the world--such righteousness as was
 manifest in sincere Jews, and in Paul himself before his conversion;
 for these in their great holiness, regarded Christians as knaves and
 meriting damnation, and consequently took delight in being party to
 the persecution and murder of Christians.
 
 7. "Yet," Paul would say, "I who am a Jew by birth have counted all
 this merit as simply loss that I might be found in 'the righteousness
 which is from God by faith'." Only the righteousness of faith teaches
 us how to apprehend God--how to confidently console ourselves with
 his grace and await a future life, expecting to approach Christ in
 the resurrection. By "approaching" him we mean to meet him in death
 and at the judgment day without terror, not fleeing but gladly
 drawing near and hailing him with joy as one waited for with intense
 longing.
 
 Now, the righteousness of the Law cannot effect such confidence of
 mind. Hence, for me it avails nothing before God; rather it is a
 detriment. What does avail is God's imputation of righteousness for
 Christ's sake, through faith. God declares to us in his Word that the
 believer in his Son shall, for Christ's own sake, have God's grace
 and eternal life. He who knows this is able to wait in hope for the
 last day, having no fear, no disposition to flee.
 
 8. But is it not treating the righteousness of the Law with
 irreverence and contempt to regard it--and so teach--as something not
 only useless and even obstructive, but injurious, loathsome and
 abominable? Who would have been able to make such a bold statement,
 and to censure a life so faultless and conforming so closely to the
 Law as Paul's, without being pronounced by all men a minion of the
 devil, had not the apostle made that estimation of it himself? And
 who is to have any more respect for the righteousness of the Law if
 we are to preach in that strain?
 
 9. Had Paul confined his denunciations to the righteousness of the
 world or of the heathen--the righteousness dependent upon reason and
 controlled by secular government, by laws and regulations--his
 teaching would not have seemed so irreverent. But he distinctly
 specifies the righteousness of God's Law, or the Ten Commandments, to
 which we owe an obligation far above what is due temporal powers, for
 they teach how to live before God--something no heathenish court of
 justice, no temporal authority, knows anything about. Should we not
 condemn as a heretic this preacher who goes beyond his prerogative
 and dares find fault with the Law of God? who also warns us to shun
 such as observe it, such as trust in its righteousness, and exalts to
 sainthood "enemies of the cross of Christ ... whose God is the
 belly"--who serve the appetites instead of God?
 
 10. Paul would say of himself: I, too, was such a one. In my most
 perfect righteousness of the Law I was an enemy to and persecutor of
 the congregation, or Church, of Christ. It was the legitimate fruit
 of my righteousness that I thought I must be party to the most
 horrible persecution of Christ and his Christians. Thus my holiness
 made me an actual enemy of Christ and a murderer of his followers.
 The disposition to injure is a natural result of the righteousness of
 the Law, as all Scripture history from Cain down testifies, and as we
 see even in the best of the world who have not come to the knowledge
 of Christ. Princes, civil authorities in proportion to their wisdom,
 their godliness and honor are the bitter and intolerant enemies of
 the Gospel.
 
 11. Of the sensual papistical dolts at Rome, cardinals, bishops,
 priests and the like, it is not necessary to speak here. Their works
 are manifest. All honorable secular authorities must confess they are
 simply abandoned knaves, living shameless lives of open scandal,
 avarice, arrogance, unchastity, vanity, robbery and wickedness of
 every kind. Not only are they guilty of such living, but shamelessly
 endeavor to defend their conduct. They must, then, be regarded
 enemies of Christ and of all honesty and virtue. Hence every
 respectable man is justly antagonistic toward them. But, as before
 said, Paul is not here referring to this class, but to eminent, godly
 individuals, whose lives are beyond reproach. These very ones, when
 Christians are encountered, are hostile and heinous enough to be able
 to forget all their own faults in the sight of God, and to magnify to
 huge beams the motes we Christians have. In fact, they must style the
 Gospel heresy and satanic doctrine for the purpose of exalting their
 own holiness and zeal for God.
 
 
 RIGHTEOUSNESS OF THE LAW OPPOSES THE CROSS.
 
 12. The thing seems incredible, and I would not have believed it
 myself, nor have understood Paul's words here, had I not witnessed it
 with my own eyes and experienced it. Were the apostle to repeat the
 charge today, who could conceive that our first, noblest, most
 respectable, godly and holy people, those whom we might expect, above
 all others, to accept the Word of God--that they, I say, should be
 enemies to the Christian doctrine? But the examples before us testify
 very plainly that the "enemies" the apostle refers to must be the
 individuals styled godly and worthy princes and noblemen, honorable
 citizens, learned, wise, intelligent individuals. Yet if these could
 devour at one bite the "Evangelicals," as they are now called, they
 would do it.
 
 13. If you ask, Whence such a disposition? I answer, it naturally
 springs from human righteousness. For every individual who professes
 human righteousness, and knows nothing of Christ, holds that
 efficacious before God. He relies upon it and gratifies himself with
 it, presuming thereby to present a flattering appearance in God's
 sight and to render himself peculiarly acceptable to him. From being
 proud and arrogant toward God, he comes to reject them who are not
 righteous according to the Law; as illustrated in the instance of the
 Pharisee. Lk 18, 11-12. But greater is his enmity and more bitter his
 hatred toward the preaching that dares to censure such righteousness
 and assert its futility to merit God's grace and eternal life.
 
 14. I myself, and others with me, were dominated by such feelings
 when, under popery, we claimed to be holy and pious; we must confess
 the fact. If thirty years ago, when I was a devout, holy monk,
 holding mass every day and having no thought but that I was in the
 road leading directly to heaven--if then anyone had accused me--had
 preached to me the things of this text and pronounced our
 righteousness--which accorded not strictly with the Law of God, but
 conformed to human doctrine and was manifestly idolatrous--pronounced
 it without efficacy and said I was an enemy to the cross of Christ,
 serving my own sensual appetites, I would immediately have at least
 helped to find stones for putting to death such a Stephen, or to
 gather wood for the burning of this worst of heretics.
 
 15. So human nature ever does. The world cannot conduct itself in any
 other way, when the declaration comes from heaven saying: "True you
 are a holy man, a great and learned jurist, a conscientious regent, a
 worthy prince, an honorable citizen, and so on, but with all your
 authority and your upright character you are going to hell; your
 every act is offensive and condemned in God's sight. If you would be
 saved you must become an altogether different man; your mind and
 heart must be changed." Let this be announced and the fire rises, the
 Rhine is all ablaze; for the self-righteous regard it an intolerable
 idea that lives so beautiful, lives devoted to praiseworthy callings,
 should be publicly censured and condemned by the objectionable
 preaching of a few insignificant individuals regarded as even
 pernicious, and according to Paul, as filthy refuse, actual obstacles
 to eternal life.
 
 16. But you may say: "What? Do you forbid good works? Is it not right
 to lead an honorable, virtuous life? Do you not acknowledge the
 necessity of political laws, of civil governments? that upon
 obedience to them depends the maintenance of discipline, peace and
 honor? Indeed, do you not admit that God himself commands such
 institutions and wills their observance, punishing where they are
 disregarded? Much more would he have his own Law and the Ten
 Commandments honored, not rejected. How dare you then assert that
 such righteousness is misleading, and obstructive to eternal life?
 What consistence is there in teaching people to observe the things of
 the Law, to be righteous in that respect, and at the same time
 censuring those things as condemned before God? How can the works of
 the Law be good and precious, and yet repulsive and productive of
 evil?"
 
 17. I answer, Paul well knows the world takes its stand on this point
 of righteousness by the Law, and hence would contradict him. But let
 him who will, consult the apostle as to why he makes such bold
 assertions here. For indeed the words of the text are not our words,
 but his. True, law and government are essential in temporal life, as
 Paul himself confesses, and God would have everyone honor and obey
 them. Indeed, he has ordained their observance among Turks and
 heathen. Yet it is a fact that these people, even the best and most
 upright of them, they who lead honorable lives, are naturally in
 their hearts enemies to Christ, and devote their intellectual powers
 to exterminating God's people.
 
 It must be universally admitted that the Turks, with all the
 restrictions and austerity of life imposed upon them by the Koran, a
 life more rigorous even than that of Christians--it must be admitted
 they belong to the devil. In other words, we adjudge them condemned
 with all their righteousness, but at the same time say they do right
 in punishing thieves, robbers, murderers, drunkards and other
 offenders; more, that Christians living within their jurisdiction are
 under obligation to pay tribute, and to serve them with person and
 property. Precisely the same thing is true respecting our princes who
 persecute the Gospel and are open enemies to Christ: we must be
 obedient to them, paying the tribute and rendering the service
 imposed; yet they, and all obedient followers willingly consenting to
 the persecution of the Gospel, must be looked upon as condemned
 before God.
 
 18. Similarly does Paul speak concerning the righteousness of all the
 Jews and pious saints who are not Christians. His utterance is bold
 and of certain sound. He censures them and, weeping, deprecatingly
 refers to certain who direct the people to the righteousness of the
 law with the sole result of making "enemies to the cross of Christ."
 
 19. Again, all the praise he has for them is to say that their "end
 is perdition"; they are condemned in spite of strenuous efforts all
 their lives to teach and enforce the righteousness of works. Here on
 earth it is truly a priceless distinction, an admirable and noble
 treasure, a praiseworthy honor, to have the name of being a godly and
 upright prince, ruler or citizen; a pious, virtuous wife or virgin.
 Who would not praise and exalt such virtue? It is indeed a rare and
 valuable thing in the world. But however beautiful, priceless and
 admirable an honor it is, Paul tells us, it is ultimately condemned
 and pertains not to heaven.
 
 
 HUMAN RIGHTEOUSNESS IDOLATROUS.
 
 20. The apostle makes his accusation yet more galling with the words
 "whose god is their belly." Thus you hear how human righteousness,
 even at its best, extends no higher than to service of the sensual
 appetites. Take all the wisdom, justice, jurisprudence, artifice,
 even the highest virtues the world affords, and what are they? They
 minister only to that god, carnal appetite. They can go no farther
 than the needs of this life, their whole purpose being to satisfy
 physical cravings. When the physical appetites of the worldly pass,
 they pass likewise, and the gifts and virtues we have mentioned can
 no longer serve them. All perish and go to destruction
 together--righteousness, virtues, laws and physical appetites which
 they have served as their god. For they are wholly ignorant of the
 true and eternal God; they know not how to serve him and receive
 eternal life. So then in its essential features such a life is merely
 idolatrous, having no greater object than the preservation of this
 perishable body and its enjoyment of peace and honor.
 
 21. The fourth accusation is, "whose glory is in their shame." That
 is all their glory amounts to. Let wise philosophers, scrupulous
 heathen, keen jurists, receive the acme of praise and honor--it is
 yet but shame. True, their motto is "Love of Virtue"; they boast
 strong love of virtue and righteousness and may even think themselves
 sincere. But judged by final results, their boast is without
 foundation and ends in shame. For the utmost their righteousness can
 effect is the applause of the world--here on earth. Before God it
 avails nothing. It cannot touch the life to come. Ultimately it
 leaves its possessor a captive in shame. Death devours and hell
 clutches him.
 
 22. You may again object, "If what you say is true, why observe
 temporal restrictions? Let us live in indulgent carelessness
 following our inclinations. Let pass the godly, honorable man; the
 virtuous, upright wife or virgin." I answer, By no means; that is not
 the design. You have heard it is God's command and will that there be
 temporal righteousness even among Turks and heathen. And later on
 (ch. 4, 8) Paul admonishes Christians to "think on these things,"
 that is, on what is true. He says: "Whatsoever things are honorable,
 whatsoever things are just, whatsoever things are pure, whatsoever
 things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if there be
 any virtue, and if there be any praise, think on these things." And
 continuing, in verse 9, he refers them to his own example, saying,
 "which ye both learned and received and heard and saw in me."
 
 
 FRUITS OF FAITH.
 
 23. With the believers in Christ, them who have their righteousness
 in him, there should follow in this life on earth the fruits of
 upright living, in obedience to God. These fruits constitute the good
 works acceptable to God, which, being works of faith and wrought in
 Christ, will be rewarded in the life to come. But Paul has in mind
 the individuals who, rejecting faith in Christ, regard their
 self-directed lives, their humanly-wrought works, which conform to
 the Law, as righteousness availing in the sight of God. His reference
 is to them who so trust, though wholly ignorant of Christ, for whose
 sake, without any merit on our part, righteousness is imputed to us
 by God. The only condition is we must believe in Christ; for he
 became man, died for our sins and rose from the dead, for the very
 purpose of liberating us from our sins and granting us his
 resurrection and life. Toward the heavenly life we should tend, in
 our life here walking in harmony with it; as Paul says in conclusion:
 "Our citizenship is in heaven [not earthly and not confined to this
 temporal life only]; whence also we wait for a Saviour, the Lord
 Jesus Christ."
 
 If we have no knowledge, no consciousness, of this fact, it matters
 not how beautiful and praiseworthy our human, earthly righteousness
 may be, it is merely a hindrance and an injury. For flesh and blood
 cannot help relying on its own righteousness and arrogantly boasting
 in this strain: "We are better, more honorable, more godly, than
 others. We Jews are the people of God and keep his Law." Even
 Christians are not wholly free from the pernicious influence of human
 holiness. They ever seek to bring their own works and merits before
 God. I know for myself what pains are inflicted by this godless
 wisdom, this figment of righteousness, and what effort must be made
 before the serpent's head is bruised.
 
 24. Now, this is the situation and there is no alternative: Either
 suffer hell or regard your human righteousness as loss and filth and
 endeavor not to be found relying on it at your last hour, in the
 presence of God and judgment, but rather stand in the righteousness
 of Christ. In the garment of Christ's righteousness and reared in him
 you may, in the resurrection from sin and death, meet Christ and
 exclaim: "Hail, beloved Lord and Saviour, thou who hast redeemed me
 from the wretched body of sin and death, and fashioned me like unto
 thy holy, pure and glorious body!"
 
 
 GOD'S PATIENCE WITH HUMAN RIGHTEOUSNESS.
 
 25. Meantime, while we walk in the faith of his righteousness, he has
 patience with the poor, frail righteousness of this earthly life,
 which otherwise is but filth in his sight. He honors our human
 holiness by supporting and protecting it during the time we live on
 earth; just as we honor our corrupt, filthy bodies, adorning them
 with beautiful, costly garments and golden ornaments, and reposing
 them on cushions and beds of luxury. Though but stench and filth
 encased in flesh, they are honored above everything else on earth.
 For their sake are all things performed--the ordering and ruling,
 building and laboring; and God himself permits sun and moon to shine
 that they may receive light and heat, and everything to grow on earth
 for their benefit. What is the human body but a beautiful pyx
 containing that filthy, repulsive object of reverence, the digestive
 organs, which the body must always patiently carry about; yes, which
 we must even nourish and minister to, glad if only they perform their
 functions properly?
 
 26. Similarly God deals with us. Because he would confer eternal life
 upon man, he patiently endures the filthy righteousness of this life
 wherein we must dwell until the last day, for the sake of his chosen
 people and until the number is complete. For so long as the final day
 is deferred, not all to have eternal life are yet born. When the time
 shall be fulfilled, the number completed, God will suddenly bring to
 an end the world with its governments, its jurists and authorities,
 its conditions of life; in short, he will utterly abolish earthly
 righteousness, destroying physical appetites and all else together.
 For every form of human holiness is condemned to destruction; yet for
 the sake of Christians, to whom eternal life is appointed, and for
 their sake only, all these must be perpetuated until the last saint
 is born and has attained life everlasting. Were there but one saint
 yet to be born, for the sake of that one the world must remain. For
 God regards not the world nor has he need for it, except for the sake
 of his Christians.
 
 27. Therefore, when God enjoins upon us obedience to the emperor, and
 godly, honest lives on earth, it is no warrant that our subjection to
 temporal authority is to continue forever. Instead, God necessarily
 will minister to, adorn and honor this wretched body--vile body, as
 Paul here has it--with power and dominion. Yet the apostle terms
 human righteousness "filth," and says it is not necessary to God's
 kingdom; indeed, that it is condemned in the sight of God with all
 its honor and glory, and all the world must be ashamed of it in his
 presence, confessing themselves guilty. Paul in Romans 3, 27 and 4, 2
 testifies to this fact when he tells how even the exalted, holy
 fathers--Abraham, and others--though having glory before the world
 because of their righteous works, could not make them serve to obtain
 honor before God. Much less will worldly honor avail with God in the
 case of individuals who, being called honorable, pious, honest,
 virtuous--lords and princes, wives and husbands--boast of such
 righteousness.
 
 28. Outwardly, then, though your righteousness may appear dazzlingly
 beautiful before the world, inwardly you are but filth. Illustrative
 of this point is the story told of a certain nun regarded holy above
 all others. She would not fellowship with anyone else, but sat alone
 in her cell in rapt devotion, praying unceasingly. She boasted
 special revelations and visions and had no consciousness of anything
 but that beloved angels hovered about and adorned her with a golden
 crown. But some outside, ardently desiring to behold such sights,
 peeped through holes and crevices, and seeing her head but defiled
 with filth, laughed at her.
 
 29. Notice, the reason Paul calls the righteousness of the Law filth
 and pollution, is his desire to denounce the honor and glory claimed
 for it in God's sight; notwithstanding he honors before the world the
 observance of the Law by styling it "righteousness." But if you
 ostentatiously boast of such righteousness to him, he pronounces his
 sentence of judgment making you an abomination, an enemy of the cross
 of Christ, and shaming your boasted honor and finally casting you
 into hell. Concerning the righteousness of faith, however, which in
 Christ avails before God, he says:
 
 "Our citizenship [conversation] is in heaven, from whence also we
 look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus Christ; who shall change our
 vile body, that it may be fashioned like unto his glorious body."
 
 30. We who are baptized and believe in Christ, Paul's thought is, do
 not base our works and our hope on the righteousness of this temporal
 life. Through faith in Christ, we have a righteousness that holds in
 heaven. It abides in Christ alone; otherwise it would avail naught
 before God. And our whole concern is to be eternally in Christ; to
 have our earthly existence culminate in yonder life when Christ shall
 come and change this life into another, altogether new, pure, holy
 and like unto his own, with a life and a body having the nature of
 his.
 
 
 THE CHRISTIAN A CITIZEN OF HEAVEN.
 
 31. Therefore we are no longer citizens of earth. The baptized
 Christian is born a citizen of heaven through baptism. We should be
 mindful of this fact and walk here as if native there. We are to
 console ourselves with the fact that God thus accepts us and will
 transplant us there. Meantime we must await the coming again of the
 Saviour, who is to bring from heaven to us eternal righteousness,
 life, honor and glory.
 
 32. We are baptized and made Christians, not to the end that we may
 have great honor, or renown of righteousness, or earthly dominion,
 power and possessions. Notwithstanding we do have these because they
 are requisite to our physical life, yet we are to regard them as mere
 filth, wherewith we minister to our bodily welfare as best we can for
 the benefit of posterity. We Christians, however, are expectantly to
 await the coming of the Saviour. His coming will not be to our injury
 or shame as it may be in the case of others. He comes for the
 salvation of our unprofitable, impotent bodies. Wretchedly worthless
 as they are in this life, they are much more unprofitable when
 lifeless and perishing in the earth.
 
 33. But, however miserable, powerless and contemptible in life and
 death, Christ will at his coming render our bodies beautiful, pure,
 shining and worthy of honor, until they correspond to his own
 immortal, glorious body. Not like it as it hung on the cross or lay
 in the grave, blood-stained, livid and disgraced; but as it is now,
 glorified at the Father's right hand. We need not, then, be alarmed
 at the necessity of laying aside our earthly bodies; at being
 despoiled of the honor, righteousness and life adhering in them, to
 deliver it to the devouring power of death and the grave--something
 well calculated to terrify the enemies of Christ: but we may joyfully
 hope for and await his speedy coming to deliver us from this
 miserable, filthy pollution.
 
 "According to the working whereby he is able even to subdue all
 things unto himself."
 
 
 THE GLORIFIED BODY OF THE CHRISTIAN.
 
 34. Think of the honor and the glory Christ's righteousness brings
 even to our bodies! How can this poor, sinful, miserable, filthy,
 polluted body become like unto that of the Son of God, the Lord of
 Glory? What are you--your powers and abilities, or those of all men,
 to effect this glorious thing? But Paul says human righteousness,
 merit, glory and power have nothing to do with it. They are mere
 filth and pollution, and condemned as well. Another force intervenes,
 the power of Christ the Lord, who is able to bring all things into
 subjection to himself. Now, if he has power to subject all things
 unto himself at will, he is also able to glorify the pollution and
 filth of this wretched body, even when it has become worms and dust.
 In his hands it is as clay in the hands of the potter, and from the
 polluted lump of clay he can make a vessel that shall be a beautiful,
 new, pure, glorious body, surpassing the sun in its brilliance and
 beauty.
 
 35. Through baptism Christ has taken us into his hands, actually that
 he may exchange our sinful, condemned, perishable, physical lives for
 the new, imperishable righteousness and life he prepares for body and
 soul. Such is the power and the agency exalting us to marvelous
 glory--something no earthly righteousness of the Law could
 accomplish. The righteousness of the Law leaves our bodies to shame
 and destruction; it reaches not beyond physical existence. But the
 righteousness of Christ inspires with power, making evident that we
 worship not the body but the true and living God, who does not leave
 us to shame and destruction, but delivers from sin, death and
 condemnation, and exalts this perishable body to eternal honor and
 glory.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Fourth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: Colossians 1, 3-14.
 
 3 We give thanks to God the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying
 always for you, 4 having heard of your faith in Christ Jesus, and of
 the love which ye have toward all the saints, 5 because of the hope
 which is laid up for you in the heavens, whereof ye heard before in
 the word of the truth of the gospel, 6 which is come unto you; even
 as it is also in all the world bearing fruit and increasing, as it
 doth in you also, since the day ye heard and knew the grace of God in
 truth; 7 even as ye learned of Epaphras our beloved fellow-servant,
 who is a faithful minister of Christ on our behalf, 8 who also
 declared unto us your love in the Spirit.
 
 9 For this cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to
 pray and make request for you, that ye may be filled with the
 knowledge of his will in all spiritual wisdom and understanding, 10
 to walk worthily of the Lord unto all pleasing, bearing fruit in
 every good work, and increasing in the knowledge of God; 11
 strengthened with all power, according to the might of his glory,
 unto all patience and longsuffering with joy; 12 giving thanks unto
 the Father, who made us meet to be partakers of the inheritance of
 the saints in light; 13 who delivered us out of the power of
 darkness, and translated us into the kingdom of the Son of his love;
 14 in whom we have our redemption, the forgiveness of our sins.
 
 
 PRAYER AND SPIRITUAL KNOWLEDGE.
 
 1. In this short epistle to the Colossians Paul treats of many
 things, but particularly of faith, love, patience and gratitude. Upon
 these topics he is remarkably eloquent, for as God himself declares
 in Acts 9, 15, Paul is a chosen vessel, or instrument, of God--his
 best preacher on earth. He is particularly strong in his discussion
 of the main principle of the Gospel, faith in Christ. And he exalts
 Christ supremely, in person and kingdom, making him all in all in his
 Church--God, Lord, Master, Head and Example, and everything
 mentionable in goodness and divinity.
 
 2. The apostle's first words are praise for the Colossians. He
 remarks upon the good report he has heard of them, how they have
 faith in Christ and love for all saints, and hold fast the hope of
 eternal life reserved for them in heaven: in other words, that they
 are true Christians, who have not allowed themselves to be led away
 from the pure Word of God but who earnestly cling to it, proving
 their faith by their fruits; for they love the poor Christians, and
 for Christ's sake have endured much in the hope of the promised
 salvation. So he exalts them as model Christians, a mirror of the
 entire Christian life.
 
 3. "Hearing these things of you," Paul would say, "I heartily rejoice
 in your good beginning." Apparently he was not the one who first
 preached to them. In the first verse of the second chapter he speaks
 of his care for them and others who have not seen his face, and he
 also intimates here that the Colossians learned of Christ and the
 Gospel from Epaphras, Paul's fellow-servant.
 
 4. "And therefore I always pray for you," he writes, "that you may
 continue in this way; may increase and be steadfast." He is aware of
 the necessity for such prayer and exhortation in behalf of Christians
 if they are to abide firm and unchangeable in their new-found faith,
 against the ceaseless assaults of the devil, the wickedness of the
 world, and the weakness of the flesh in tribulation and affliction.
 
 "That ye may be filled," Paul continues, "with the knowledge of his
 will."
 
 5. This is his chief prayer and desire for them and if it is
 fulfilled there can be no lack. The words are, "be filled"; that is,
 not only hear and understand God's will, but become rich in the
 knowledge of it, with ever-increasing fullness. "You have begun well;
 you are promising shoots." But something more than a good beginning
 is required, and the knowledge of God's will is not to be
 exhaustively learned immediately on hearing the Word. On the contrary
 it must be constantly pursued and practiced as long as we live if it
 is ever to be rounded and perfected in us.
 
 
 KNOWLEDGE OF GOD'S WILL IMPOSES OBLIGATION.
 
 6. "Knowing the will of God" means more than simply knowing about
 God, that he created heaven and earth and gave the Law, and so on, a
 knowledge even the Jews and Turks possess. For doubtless to them has
 been revealed that knowledge of God and of his will concerning our
 conduct which nature--the works of creation--can teach. Rom 1, 20.
 But if we fail to do God's revealed will, the knowledge of it does
 not benefit us. Such mere mental consciousness is a vain, empty
 thing; it does not fulfil God's will in us. Indeed, it eventually
 becomes a condemnatory knowledge of our own eternal destruction. When
 this point has been reached, further enlightenment is necessary if
 man is to be saved. He must know the meaning of Christ's words in
 John 6, 40: "This is the will of my Father, that every one that
 beholdeth the Son, and believeth on him, should have eternal life";
 and in Matthew 18, 14: "It is not the will of your Father, that one
 of these should perish, which believe on me."
 
 7. Since we have not done God's will according to the first
 revelation and must be rejected and condemned by his eternal,
 unendurable wrath, in his divine wisdom and mercy he has determined,
 or willed, to permit his only Son to take upon himself our sin and
 wrath; to give Christ as a sacrifice for our ransom, whereby the
 unendurable wrath and condemnation might be turned from us; to grant
 us forgiveness of sins and to send the Holy Spirit into our hearts,
 thus enabling us to love God's commandments and delight in them. This
 determination or will he reveals through the Son, and commands him to
 declare it to the world. And in Matthew 3, 17 he directs us to Christ
 as the source of all these blessings, saying: "This is my beloved
 Son, in whom I am well pleased: hear ye him."
 
 
 SPIRITUAL KNOWLEDGE ENJOINED.
 
 8. Paul would gladly have a spiritual knowledge of these things
 increase in us until we are enriched and filled--wholly assured of
 their truth. Sublime and glorious knowledge this, the experience of a
 human heart which, born in sins, boldly and confidently believes that
 God, in his unfathomable majesty, in his divine heart, has
 irrevocably purposed--and wills for all men to accept and believe
 it--that he will not impute sin, but will forgive it and be gracious,
 and grant eternal life, for the sake of his beloved Son.
 
 9. This spiritual knowledge or confidence, is not so easily learned
 as are other things. It is not so readily apprehended as the
 knowledge of the law written in nature, which when duly recognized by
 the heart overpowers with the conviction of God's wrath. Indeed, that
 more than anything else hinders Christians and saints from obtaining
 the knowledge of God's will in Christ, for it compels heart and
 conscience to plead guilty in every respect and to confess having
 merited the wrath of God; therefore the soul naturally fears and
 flees from God. Then, too, the devil fans the flame of fear and sends
 his wicked, fiery arrows of dismay into the heart, presenting only
 frightful pictures and examples of God's anger, filling the heart
 with this kind of knowledge to the exclusion of every other thought
 or perception. Thus recognition of God's wrath is learned only too
 well, for it becomes bitterly hard for man to unlearn it, to forget
 it in the knowledge of Christ. Again, the wicked world eagerly
 contributes its share of hindrance, its bitter hatred and venomous
 outcry against Christians as people of the worst type, outcast,
 condemned enemies of God. Moreover, by its example it causes the weak
 to stumble. Our flesh and blood also is a drawback, being waywardly
 inclined, making much of its own wisdom and holiness and seeking
 thereby to gain honor and glory or to live in security a life of
 wealth, pleasure and covetousness. Hence on every side a Christian
 must be in severe conflict, and fight against the world and the
 devil, and against himself also, if he is to succeed in preserving
 the knowledge of God's will.
 
 
 WE MUST PRAY FOR SPIRITUAL LIGHT.
 
 10. Now, since this knowledge of the Gospel is so difficult to attain
 and so foreign to nature, it is necessary that we pray for it with
 all earnestness and labor to be increasingly filled with it, and to
 learn well the will of God. Our own experience testifies that if it
 be but superficially and improperly learned, when one is overtaken by
 a trifling misfortune or alarmed by a slight danger or affliction,
 his heart is easily overwhelmed with the thunderbolts of God's wrath
 as he reflects: "Wo to me! God is against me and hates me." Why
 should this miserable "Wo!" enter the heart of a Christian upon the
 occasion of a little trouble? If he were filled with the knowledge of
 God as he should be, and as many secure, self-complacent spirits
 imagine themselves to be, he would not thus fear and make outcry. His
 agitation and his complaint, "O Lord God! why dost thou permit me to
 suffer this?" are evidence that he as yet knows not God's will, or at
 least has but a faint conception of it; the wo exceeds the joy. But
 full knowledge of God's will brings with it a joy that far
 overbalances all fear and terror, ay, removes and abolishes them
 altogether.
 
 11. Therefore let us learn this truth and with Paul pray for what we
 and all Christians supremely need--full knowledge of God's will, not
 a mere beginning; for we are not to imagine a beginning will suffice
 and to stop there as if we had comprehended it all. Everything is not
 accomplished in the mere planting; watering and cultivation must
 follow. In this case the watering and cultivating are the Word of
 God, and prayer against the devil, who day and night labors to
 suppress spiritual knowledge, to beat down the tender plants wherever
 he sees them springing up; and also against the world, which promotes
 only opposition and directs its wisdom and reason to conflicting
 ends. Did not God protect us and strengthen the knowledge of his
 will, we would soon see the devil's power and the extent of our
 spiritual understanding.
 
 12. We have a verification of this assertion in that poetical work,
 the book of Job. Satan appears before God, who asks (ch. 1, 8): "Hast
 thou considered my servant Job? for there is none like him in the
 earth, a perfect and upright man, one that feareth God." And Satan
 answers on this wise: "Yea, thou hast surrounded him with thy
 protection and kept me at bay; but only withdraw thy hand and I
 venture I will soon bring him around to curse thee to thy face"; as
 he afterward did when he afflicted Job with ugly boils and in
 addition filled him with his fiery arrows--terrifying thoughts of
 God. Further, Christ said to Peter and the other apostles: "Satan
 asked to have you, that he might sift you as wheat: but I made
 supplication for thee, that thy faith fail not." Lk 22, 31-32. In
 short, if God hinders him not, Satan dares to overthrow even the
 greatest and strongest saints.
 
 13. Therefore, although we have become Christians and have made a
 beginning in the knowledge of God's will, we ought nevertheless to
 walk in fear and humility, and not to be presumptuous like the
 soon-wearied, secure spirits, who imagine they exhausted that
 knowledge in an instant, and know not the measure and limit of their
 skill. Such people are particularly pleasing to the devil, for he has
 them completely in his power and makes use of their teaching and
 example to harm others and make them likewise secure, and unmindful
 of his presence and of the fact that God may suffer them to be
 overwhelmed. Verily, there is need of earnest and diligent use of the
 Word of God and prayer, that Christians may not only learn to know
 the will of God, but also to be filled with it. Only so can the
 individual walk always according to God's will and make constant
 progress, straining toward the goal of an ever-increasing comfort and
 strength that shall enable him to face fears and terrors and not
 allow the devil, the world, and flesh and blood to hinder him.
 
 
 SPIRITUAL KNOWLEDGE BRINGS INCREASING JOY.
 
 14. Such is the nature of this fullness of knowledge that the
 possessor never becomes satiated with it or tired of it, but it
 yields him ever-increasing pleasure and joy, and he is ever more
 eager, more thirsty, for it. As the Scriptures declare, "They that
 drink me shall yet be thirsty." Ecclus 24, 21. For even the dear
 angels in heaven never become sated with fullness of knowledge, but
 as Peter says, they find an everlasting joy and pleasure in the
 ability to behold what is revealed and preached to us. 1 Peter 1, 12.
 Therefore, if we have not a constant hunger and thirst after the full
 and abundant comprehension of God's will--and certainly we ought to
 have it in greater degree than the angels--until we, too, shall be
 able to behold it eternally in the life everlasting, then we have but
 a taste of that knowledge, a mere empty froth, which can neither
 refresh nor satisfy us, cannot comfort us nor make us better.
 
 
 WHY AFFLICTIONS ARE SENT.
 
 15. To create and stimulate this hunger and thirst in us, and to
 bring us to the attainment of full knowledge, God kindly sends upon
 his Christians temptation, sorrow and affliction. These preserve them
 from carnal satiety and teach them to seek comfort and help. So God
 did also in former ages, in the time of the martyrs, when he daily
 suffered them to be violently seized in person and put to death by
 sword, fire, blood and wild beasts. In this way he truly led his
 people to school, where they were obliged to learn to know his will
 and to be able defiantly to say: "No, O tyrant, O world, devil and
 flesh, though you may injure me bodily, may beat or torment me,
 banish me or even take my life, you shall not deprive me of my Lord
 Jesus Christ--of God's grace and mercy." So faith taught them and
 confirmed to them that such suffering was God's purpose and immutable
 will concerning themselves, which, whatever attitude towards them he
 might assume, he could not alter, even as he could not in the case of
 Christ himself. This discipline and experience of faith strengthened
 the martyrs and soon accustomed them to suffering, enabling them to
 go to their death with pleasure and joy. Whence came, even to young
 girls thirteen and fourteen years old, like Agnes and Agatha, the
 courage and confidence to stand boldly before the Roman judge, and,
 when led to death, to go as joyfully as to a festivity, whence unless
 their hearts were filled with a sublime and steadfast faith, a
 positive assurance that God was not angry with them, but that all was
 his gracious and merciful will and for their highest salvation and
 bliss?
 
 16. Behold, what noble and enlightened, what strong and courageous,
 people God produced by the discipline of cross and affliction! We, in
 contrast, because unwilling to experience such suffering, are weak
 and enervated. If but a little smoke gets into our eyes, our joy and
 courage are gone, likewise our perception of God's will, and we can
 only raise a loud lamentation and cry of woe. As I said, this is the
 inevitable condition of a heart to which the experience of affliction
 is unknown. Just so Christ's disciples in the ship, when they saw the
 tempest approach and the waves beat over the vessel, quite forgot, in
 their trembling and terror, the divine will, although Christ was
 present with them. They only made anxious lamentation, yet withal
 cried for help: "Save, Lord; we perish!" Mt 8, 25. So also in the
 time of the martyrs, many Christians became timid and at first denied
 Christ from fear of torture or of long confinement in prison.
 
 17. It is God's will that we, too, should learn to accustom ourselves
 to these things through temptation and affliction, though these be
 hard to bear and the heart is prone to become agitated and utter its
 cry of woe. We can quiet our disturbed hearts, saying: "I know what
 is God's thought, his counsel and will, in Christ, which he will not
 alter: he has promised to me through his Son, and confirmed it
 through my baptism, that he who hears and sees the Son shall be
 delivered from sin and death, and live eternally."
 
 18. Now, what Paul calls being filled with the knowledge of the
 divine will in Christ through the faith of the Gospel, means faith in
 and the comfort of the forgiveness of sins, since we have not in
 ourselves the ability to fulfil his will in the ten commandments.
 This knowledge is not a passive consciousness, but a living, active
 conviction, which will stand before the judgment of God, contend with
 the devil and prevail over sin, death and life.
 
 19. Now, the heart possessing such knowledge or faith is kindled by
 the Holy Spirit and acquires a love for and delight in God's
 commandments. It becomes obedient to them, patient, chaste, modest,
 gentle, given to brotherly kindness, and honors God in confession and
 life. Thus it is increasingly filled with the knowledge of God's
 will; it is armed and fortified on all sides to withstand and defeat
 the flesh and the world, the devil and hell.
 
 
 "SPIRITUAL WISDOM" DEFINED.
 
 20. By way of explanation Paul adds the words, "all spiritual wisdom
 and understanding." This is not the wisdom of the world. There is no
 necessity to strive and to endure persecution for that which concerns
 itself with other than spiritual matters. Nor is it the wisdom of
 reason, which indeed presumes to judge of divine things, but yet can
 never understand them; on the contrary, although it accepts them, it
 quickly falls away into doubt and despair.
 
 21. "Wisdom" signifies with Paul, when he places it in apposition
 with "spiritual understanding," the sublime and secret doctrine of
 the Gospel of Christ, which teaches us to know the will of God. And a
 "wise man" is a Christian, who knows himself and can intelligently
 interpret God's will toward us and how we perceive his will by
 faith--growing and obediently living in harmony with it. This wisdom
 is not devised of reason; it has not entered into the heart of man
 nor is it known to any of the princes of this world, as Paul says in
 1 Corinthians 2, 8-10. But it is revealed from Heaven by the Holy
 Spirit to those who believe the Gospel.
 
 22. But there is necessary to the full completion of wisdom something
 which the apostle calls "understanding"; that is, a careful retention
 of what has been received. It is possible for one having the
 spiritual wisdom to be overtaken by the devil through a momentary
 intellectual inspiration, or through anger and impatience, or even
 through greed and similar deceitful allurements. Therefore it is
 necessary here to be cautious, alert and watchful in an effort to
 guard against the devil's cunning attacks and always to oppose him
 with his own spiritual wisdom, that he may not be undeceived. The
 Pauline and scriptural use of the word "understanding" signifies the
 ability to make good use of one's wisdom; to make it effective as a
 test whereby to prove all things, to judge with keen discernment
 whatever presents itself in the name and appearance of wisdom. Thus
 armed, the soul defends itself and does not in any case violate its
 own discretion. To furnish himself with understanding, the Christian
 must ever have regard to the Word of God, must put it into practice,
 lest the devil dazzle his mind with some palaver and error and
 deceive him before he is aware of it. This Satan is well able to do;
 indeed, he uses every art to accomplish it if a man be not on his
 guard and seek not counsel in God's Word. Such is the teaching of
 David's example, who says in Psalm 119, 11: "Thy word have I laid up
 in my heart, that I might not sin against thee." And again in verse
 24: "Thy testimonies also are my delight and my counsellors."
 
 23. A man may be familiar with God's Word, yet if he walks in
 self-security, concerned about other matters, or if perhaps being
 tempted he loses sight of God's Word, it may easily come to pass that
 he is seduced and deceived by the secret craft and cunning of the
 devil; or of himself he may become bewildered, losing his wisdom and
 being unable to find counsel or help even in the most trivial
 temptations. For the devil and reason, or human wisdom, can dispute
 and syllogize with extraordinary subtlety in these things until one
 imagines to be true wisdom that which is not. A wise man soon becomes
 a fool; men readily err and make false steps; a Christian likewise is
 prone to stumble; ay, even a good teacher and prophet can easily be
 deceived by reason's brilliant logic. Essentially, then, Christians
 must take warning and study, with careful meditation, the Word of
 God.
 
 24. We read of St. Martin how he would not undertake to dispute with
 heretics for the simple reason that he was unwilling to fall into
 wrangling, to rationalize with them or to attempt to defeat them by
 the weapon of reason, the sole means whereby they pointed and adorned
 all their arguments, as the world always does when opposing the Word
 of God. The shrewd Papists today pretend, as they think, very acutely
 to confirm and support all their antichristian abominations by the
 name of the Church, making the idiotic claim that one must not effect
 nor suffer any change in the religious teaching commonly accepted by
 Christendom. They say we must believe the Christian Church is always
 guided by the Holy Spirit and therefore demands our obedience. Notice
 here the name of the Church, concerning which your spiritual wisdom
 teaches according to the article: "I believe in a holy Christian
 Church." But that name is distorted to confirm the lies and idolatry
 of the Papacy, just as is true of the name of God. So there is need
 of understanding, of careful, keen discernment, that wisdom be not
 perverted and falsified, and man be deceived with its counterfeit.
 
 25. By close examination and comparison with God's Word, the standard
 and test, you may clearly prove the Papacy to be not the Church of
 Christ, but a sect of Satan; it is filled with open idolatry, lies
 and murder, which its adherents fain would defend. These things the
 Church of Christ does not endorse, and to tax it with resolving,
 appointing, ordering and demanding obedience to that which is at
 variance with the Word of God, is to do the Church wrong and
 violence.
 
 
 CHURCH NOT TO COMPROMISE WITH PAPISTS.
 
 26. The world at the present time is sagaciously discussing how to
 quell the controversy and strife over doctrine and faith, and how to
 effect a compromise between the Church and the Papacy. Let the
 learned, the wise, it is said, bishops, emperor and princes,
 arbitrate. Each side can easily yield something, and it is better to
 concede some things which can be construed according to individual
 interpretation, than that so much persecution, bloodshed, war, and
 terrible, endless dissension and destruction be permitted. Here is
 lack of understanding, for understanding proves by the Word that such
 patchwork is not according to God's will, but that doctrine, faith
 and worship must be preserved pure and unadulterated; there must be
 no mingling with human nonsense, human opinions or wisdom. The
 Scriptures give us this rule: "We must obey God rather than men."
 Acts 5, 29.
 
 27. We must not, then, regard nor follow the counsels of human
 wisdom, but must keep ever before us God's will as revealed by his
 Word; we are to abide by that for death or life, for evil or good. If
 war or other calamity results complain to him who wills and commands
 us to teach and believe our doctrine. The calamity is not of our
 effecting; we have not originated it. And we are not required to
 prove by argument whether or no God's will is right and to be obeyed.
 If he wills to permit persecution and other evils to arise in
 consequence of our teaching, for the trial and experience of true
 Christians and for the punishment of the ungrateful, let them come;
 and if not, his hand is doubtless strong enough to defend and
 preserve his cause from destruction, that man may know the events to
 be of his ordering. And so, praise his name, he has done in our case.
 He has supported us against the strong desires of our adversaries.
 Had we yielded and obeyed them, we would have been drawn into their
 falsehood and destruction. And God will still support us if we deal
 uprightly and faithfully in these requirements, if we further and
 honor the Word of God, and be not unthankful nor seek things that
 counterfeit God's Word.
 
 28. So much by way of explaining what Paul means by wisdom and
 understanding to know the will of God, and by way of teaching the
 necessity of having both wisdom and understanding. For not only must
 the doctrine whereby wisdom is imparted be inculcated in Christendom,
 but there is also need for admonition and exhortation concerning that
 understanding necessary to preserve wisdom, and for defense in strife
 and conflict. Were not these principles exercised and inculcated in
 us, we would be deceived by false wisdom and vain imaginations, and
 would accept their gloss and glitter for pure gold, as many in the
 Church have ever done.
 
 29. The Galatians had received from Paul the wisdom of justification
 before God by faith in Christ alone. Nevertheless, in spite of that
 knowledge, they were deceived and would have lost their wisdom
 altogether through the claim of the false prophets that the God-given
 Law must be observed, had not Paul aroused their understanding at
 this point and brought them back from error. The Corinthians were
 taught by their spiritual wisdom the article of Christian liberty;
 they knew that sacrifices to idols are nothing. But they failed in
 this respect: they proceeded without understanding, and made carnal
 use of their liberty, contrary to wisdom and offending others.
 Therefore Paul had to remind them of their departure from his
 doctrine and wisdom.
 
 30. The Scriptures record many instances of failure in this matter of
 understanding. A notable one is found in the thirteenth chapter of
 First Kings. A man of God from the kingdom of Judah, who had in the
 presence of King Jeroboam openly denounced the idolatry instituted by
 the king, and had confirmed his preaching and prophecy by a miracle,
 was commanded by God not under any circumstances to abide in the
 place whither he had gone to prophesy, nor to eat and drink there. He
 was to go straight home by another way than the route he had come.
 Yet on the way homeward he allowed himself to be persuaded by another
 prophet, one who falsely claimed to have a revelation from God, by an
 angel, commanding him to take the man of God to his home and give him
 to eat and drink. While they sat together at the table the Word of
 the Lord came to the inviting prophet and under its inspiration he
 told the other that he should not reach home alive. The latter,
 departing on his journey, was killed on the way by a lion, which
 remained standing by the body and the ass the man of God had ridden,
 not touching them further, until the old prophet came and found them.
 He brought the body home on the ass and buried it, commanding that
 after his own death he should be laid in the same grave. Such was
 God's punishment of the prophet who allowed himself to be deceived
 and obeyed not God's express command. However, his soul suffered not
 harm, as God testified by the fact the lion did not devour his body
 but defended it. Now, in what was the prophet lacking? Not in wisdom,
 for he had the Word of God. He lacked in understanding, allowing
 himself to be deceived when the other man declared himself a prophet
 whom the angel of the Lord had instructed. The man of God should have
 abided by the word given to him, and have said to the other: "You may
 be a prophet, indeed, but God has commanded me to do this thing. Of
 that I am certain and I will be governed by it. I will regard no
 conflicting order, be it in the name of an angel or of God."
 
 
 NEITHER REASON NOR FEELINGS A RIGHT JUDGE.
 
 31. So it is often with man today, not only in doctrinal controversy
 but in private affairs and in official capacity. He is prone to
 stumble and to fail in understanding when not watchful of his
 purposes and motives, to see how they accord with the wisdom of God's
 Word. Particularly is his understanding unreliable when the devil
 moves him to wrath, impatience, dejection, melancholy, or when he is
 otherwise tempted. Often they who have been well exercised with
 trials become bewildered in small temptations and uncertain what
 course to take. Here must one be watchful and not go by his reason or
 his feelings, but remember God's Word--or ascertain if he does not
 know what it is--and be guided thereby. When tempted man cannot judge
 aright by the dictates of reason. Therefore he ought not to follow
 his own natural intelligence nor to act from hasty conclusions. Let
 him be suspicious of all his reasoning and beware the cunning of the
 devil, who seeks either to allure or to intimidate us by his specious
 arguments. First of all let man call upon the understanding born of
 his wisdom in the Gospel, what his faith, love, hope and patience
 counsel, in fact, what God's will eloquently teaches everywhere and
 in all circumstances if only one strive, labor and pray to be filled
 with such knowledge.
 
 32. Paul uses the expression, "spiritual wisdom and understanding,"
 because it represents that which makes us wise and prudent to oppose
 the devil and his assaults and temptations, or wiles as Paul calls
 them in Ephesians 6, 11; which governs and guides, shepherds and
 leads, teaches and keeps us, and enables us to fare well
 spiritually--in faith and a good conscience toward God--and also in
 the temporal affairs of life when reason fails as a counselor or
 teacher. Paul further says:
 
 "To walk worthily of the Lord unto all pleasing, bearing fruit in
 every good work; and increasing in the knowledge of God; strengthened
 with all power, according to the might of his glory, unto all
 patience and longsuffering with joy; giving thanks unto the Father,
 who made us meet to be partakers of the inheritance of the saints in
 light."
 
 33. What is meant by "walking worthily of the Lord" we have heard in
 other epistles, namely to believe, and to confess the faith by
 doctrine and life, as people worthy of the Lord and of whom the Lord
 can triumphantly say: "These are my people--Christians who live and
 abide in what they have been taught by the Word, who know my will and
 obediently do and suffer for it."
 
 34. Our wisdom and understanding of the knowledge of God should serve
 to make us characters that are an honor and praise to God, in whom he
 may be glorified, and who live to God unto all pleasing, that is,
 please him in every way, according to his Word. And because of such
 wisdom and knowledge, we should, in our lives, in our stations and
 appointed work, not be unfruitful nor harmful hypocrites and
 unbelievers, as false Christians are, but doers of much good, useful
 characters to the honor of God's kingdom. All the time we are to make
 constant growth and progress in the knowledge of God, that we may not
 be seduced or driven from it by the cunning of the devil, who at all
 times and in all places assails Christians and strenuously seeks to
 effect their fall from the Word and from God's will, even as in the
 beginning he did with Adam and Eve in paradise.
 
 
 ONLY GOD'S POWER CAN OVERCOME THE DEVIL.
 
 35. The apostle continues: "strengthened with all power, according to
 the might of his glory." Here is preparation to sustain the conflict
 against the devil, the world and the flesh, and to overcome. Not our
 own power, nor the combined power of all mankind, can effect it. Only
 God's own divine, glorious power and might can overcome the devil and
 win honor and praise in the contest with the gates of hell. Christ in
 himself proved such efficacy of the divine strength when he overcame
 all the devil's superlative assaults.
 
 36. By this power and might of God must we be strengthened in faith.
 We must strive after such divine agency and by the help of the Word
 persevere and pray, that there may be not only a beginning, but a
 continuation and a victorious end. So shall we become ever stronger
 and stronger in God's might. Whatever we do, it must not be
 undertaken in and by our own strength. We must not boast as if we had
 ourselves accomplished it, but must rely upon God, upon his strength
 and support. Certainly it is not due to our ability but to his own
 omnipotent agency if one remains a Christian, steadfast in the
 knowledge of God and not deceived nor conquered by the devil.
 
 
 PATIENCE ESSENTIAL TO ENDURANCE.
 
 37. But, the writer tells us, the attainment of strength and victory
 calls for "all patience." We must have patience to endure the
 persistent persecution of the devil, the world and the flesh. Not
 only patience is required here, but "longsuffering." The apostle
 makes a distinction between the two words, regarding the latter as
 something more heroic. It is the devil's way, when he fails to defeat
 by affliction and trouble, to try the heart with endurance. He makes
 the ordeal unbearably hard and long to patience, even apparently
 without end. His scheme is to accomplish by unceasing persistence
 what he cannot attain by the severity and multitude of his
 temptations; he aims to wear out one's patience and to discourage his
 hope of conquering. To meet these conditions there is necessary, in
 addition to patience, longsuffering, which holds out firmly and
 steadfastly in suffering, with the determination: "Indeed, you cannot
 try me too severely or too long, even though the trial continue to
 the end of the world." True, knightly, Christian strength is that
 which in conflict and suffering is able to endure not only severe and
 manifold assaults of the devil, but to hold out indefinitely. More
 than anything else do we need to be strengthened, through prayer,
 with the power of God, that we may not succumb in such grievous
 warfare, but achieve the end.
 
 
 CHRISTIANS SHOULD REJOICE AND BE THANKFUL.
 
 38. And your patience and longsuffering, Paul says, must be exercised
 "with joy." In these severe, multiplied and long temptations you must
 not allow yourselves to be filled with sad and depressing thoughts.
 You are to be hopeful and joyous, despising the devil and the
 troubles and tumults of the world and himself. Rejoice because you
 have on your side the knowledge of the divine will in Christ, and his
 power and glorious might, and doubt not that his omnipotence will
 help you through.
 
 39. Finally the apostle enjoins us to give thanks, or to be thankful.
 Forget not, he would say, the unspeakable benefits and gifts God has
 bestowed upon you above all men on earth. He has richly blessed you,
 and liberated you from the power and might of sin, death, hell and
 the devil, wherein you would, for all you could help yourselves, have
 had to remain eternally captive; he has appointed you for eternal
 glory, making you co-heirs with the saints elected for his eternal
 kingdom; and he has made you partakers of all eternal, divine,
 heavenly blessings. In your sufferings and conflicts, remember these
 glories ordained for and given to you, and remembering rejoice the
 more and willingly fight and suffer to obtain possession, to enjoy
 the fruition, of what is certainly appropriated to you in the Word
 and in faith.
 
 40. The writer of the epistle calls it "the inheritance of the saints
 in light," or of the "light" saints, that is, the true saints. Thus
 he distinguishes from false saints, intimating that there are two
 classes of saints. To one class belong the many in the world who have
 only their own claim to sainthood: the Jews, for instance, with their
 holiness of the Law; and the world generally, the philosophers,
 jurists and their kind, with their self-righteousness. These are not
 saints of light; they are saints of darkness, unclean, even defiled.
 In Philippians 3, 8 Paul counts such righteousness loss and refuse.
 To this class belong also many false, hypocritical saints in the
 company of Christians who have the Gospel; they, too, hear the Gospel
 and attend upon the Holy Supper, but they remain in darkness, without
 the least experience of the wisdom and understanding that knows the
 divine will. But they who exercise themselves in these spiritual
 graces by faith, love and patience in temptation, and perceive the
 wonderful grace and blessing God imparts through the Gospel--these
 honorably may be called the saints, destined, even appointed, to
 eternal light and joy in God's kingdom.
 
 "Who delivered us out of the power of darkness, and translated us
 into the kingdom of the Son of his love; in whom we have our
 redemption, the forgiveness of our sins."
 
 41. Paul now expatiates on the things that call for our gratitude to
 God the Father. He sums up the whole teaching of the Gospel, showing
 us what is ours in Christ and giving a glorious and comforting
 description of his person and the blessing he brings. But first, he
 says, we ought, above all, to thank God unceasingly for the knowledge
 of his revealed Gospel. In it we have no small treasure. Rather, it
 is a possession with which all the gold, silver and other riches of
 this world, all the earthly joy and comfort of this life, are not to
 be compared. For it means redemption from eternal, irreparable loss
 and ruin under God's eternal, unbearable wrath and condemnation. And
 this wretchedness was the result of our sin. We were committed to sin
 and without help, without deliverance, ay, we were captive in such
 blindness and darkness that we did not recognize our misery; much
 less could we devise and effect our escape. Now, in place of this
 misery, we have, without any merit on our part, any preparation, any
 deed or design, ay, without even a thought, assuredly received,
 through God's unfathomable grace and mercy, redemption, or the
 forgiveness of sins.
 
 
 GOD'S GRACE INCOMPREHENSIBLE.
 
 42. The measure of such graciousness and blessing no tongue can
 express; indeed, in this life no man can understand it. In hell the
 wicked shall become sensible of it by the realization of their
 condemnation and the never-ending wrath of the eternal, divine
 Majesty and of all creatures. No created thing shall they be able to
 behold with joy, because in these ever shall be reflected the
 condemned one's own unceasing, lamentable sorrow, terror and despair.
 Nor, on the other hand, can the creature behold the condemned with
 pleasure, but must abhor them; it must be an object of further terror
 and condemnation to the damned. However, in this life God in his
 unspeakable goodness has subjected the creature to vanity, as Paul
 says in Romans 8, 20, and to the service of the wicked. Yet it serves
 against its will, travailing as a woman in pain, with the supreme
 desire to be liberated from this service of the wicked, condemned
 world. It must, however, have patience in its hope of redemption, for
 the sake of those children of God yet to come to Christ and finally
 to be brought to glory; otherwise it is as hostile to sin as God
 himself.
 
 43. But because an eternal, unchangeable sentence of condemnation has
 passed upon sin--for God cannot and will not regard sin with favor,
 but his wrath abides upon it eternally and irrevocably--redemption
 was not possible without a ransom of such precious worth as to atone
 for sin, to assume the guilt, pay the price of wrath and thus abolish
 sin.
 
 44. This no creature was able to do. There was no remedy except for
 God's only Son to step into our distress and himself become man, to
 take upon himself the load of awful and eternal wrath and make his
 own body and blood a sacrifice for the sin. And so he did, out of his
 immeasurably great mercy and love towards us, giving himself up and
 bearing the sentence of unending wrath and death.
 
 45. So infinitely precious to God is this sacrifice and atonement of
 his only beloved Son who is one with him in divinity and majesty,
 that God is reconciled thereby and receives into grace and
 forgiveness of sins all who believe in this Son. Only by believing
 may we enjoy the precious atonement of Christ, the forgiveness
 obtained for us and given us out of profound, inexpressible love. We
 have nothing to boast of for ourselves, but must ever joyfully thank
 and praise him who at such priceless cost redeemed us condemned and
 lost sinners.
 
 46. The essential feature of redemption--forgiveness of sins--being
 once obtained, everything belonging to its completion immediately
 follows. Eternal death, the wages of sin, is abolished, and eternal
 righteousness and life are given; as Paul says in Romans 6, 23, the
 grace, or gift, of God is eternal life. And now that we are
 reconciled to God and washed in the blood of Christ, everything in
 heaven and earth, as Paul again declares (Eph 1, 10), is in turn
 reconciled to us. The creatures are no longer opposed, but at peace
 with us and friendly; they smile upon us and we have only joy and
 life in God and his creation.
 
 47. Such is the doctrine of the Gospel, and so is it to be declared.
 It shows us sin and forgiveness, wrath and grace, death and life; how
 we were in darkness and how we are redeemed from it. It does not,
 like the Law, make us sinners, nor is its mission to teach us how to
 merit and earn grace. But it declares how we, condemned and under the
 power of sin, death and the devil, as we are, receive by faith the
 freely-given redemption and in return show our gratitude.
 
 48. Paul also explains who it is that has shed his blood for us. He
 would have us understand the priceless cost of our redemption,
 namely, the blood of the Son of God, who is the image of the
 invisible God. The apostle declares that he existed before creation,
 and by him were all things created, and that therefore he is true,
 eternal God with the Father. Hence, Paul says, the shed blood truly
 is God's own blood. And so the writer of this epistle clearly and
 mightily establishes the article of the divinity of Christ. But this
 requires a special and separate sermon.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Fifth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 1 Thessalonians 4, 13-18.
 
 13 But we would not have you ignorant, brethren, concerning them that
 fall asleep; that ye sorrow not, even as the rest, who have no hope.
 14 For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them
 also that are fallen asleep in Jesus will God bring with him. 15 For
 this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we that are alive,
 that are left unto the coming of the Lord, shall in no wise precede
 them that are fallen asleep. 16 For the Lord himself shall descend
 from heaven, with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with
 the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall rise first; 17 then we
 that are alive, that are left, shall together with them be caught up
 in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the air: and so shall we ever be
 with the Lord. 18 Wherefore comfort one another with these words.
 
 
 LIVING AND DEAD WHEN CHRIST RETURNS.
 
 Paul writes these words to comfort Christians who were troubled about
 what would take place at the resurrection of the dead. Shall all rise
 together? Shall those living on the earth at the last day meet Christ
 before others? These and like thoughts worried them. Here Paul
 answers them by saying that Christ would take all his believers to
 himself at the same time, etc.
 
 This epistle text you will find richly expounded in "The Explanation
 of Certain Epistles," which appeared on special occasions. [The
 Miscellaneous Sermons of the Year 1532.]
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Sixth Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 2 Thessalonians 1, 3-10.
 
 3 We are bound to give thanks to God always for you, brethren, even
 as it is meet, for that your faith groweth exceedingly, and the love
 of each one of you all toward one another aboundeth; 4 so that we
 ourselves glory in you in the churches of God for your patience and
 faith in all your persecutions and in the afflictions which ye
 endure; 5 which is a manifest token of the righteous judgment of God;
 to the end that ye may be counted worthy of the kingdom of God, for
 which ye also suffer: 6 if so be that it is a righteous thing with
 God to recompense affliction to them that afflict you, 7 and to you
 that are afflicted rest with us, at the revelation of the Lord Jesus
 from heaven with the angels of his power in flaming fire, 8 rendering
 vengeance to them that know not God, and to them that obey not the
 gospel of our Lord Jesus: 9 who shall suffer punishment, even eternal
 destruction from the face of the Lord and from the glory of his
 might, 10 when he shall come to be glorified in his saints, and to be
 marvelled at in all them that believed (because our testimony unto
 you was believed) in that day.
 
 
 GOD'S JUDGMENT WHEN CHRIST RETURNS.
 
 1. First, Paul has words of praise for his Church at Thessalonica. In
 view of its faith and its love it was one of the first rank.
 Patiently it stood firm, and even increased, under crosses of
 affliction. The apostle's intent in commending these people is to
 incite to perseverance. He would hold them up to others as an
 example--an illustration--of the fruits resulting when the Gospel is
 preached and received. He also points out in what the edification and
 success of the true Church of Christ consist. Then he consoles them
 for their patient sufferings with the mention of the glorious coming
 of Christ the Lord, which shall mean their final redemption, the
 recompense of peace and joy for their tribulations, and the bringing
 of eternal wrath upon their persecutors.
 
 2. This consolation Paul draws from their sufferings and God's
 righteous judgment, by which he makes plain why God lets them suffer
 here on earth--what is his purpose in it. Looking at the Christian
 community with the eye of human reason and reflection, no more
 wretched, tormented, persecuted, unhappy people are in evidence on
 earth than those who confess and glory in Christ the crucified. In
 the world they are continually persecuted, tormented and assailed by
 the devil with all manner of wretchedness, misfortune, distress and
 death. Even to their own perceptions, it seems as if they surely are
 forgotten and forsaken by God in the sight of mankind. For he allows
 them to remain prostrate under the weight of the cross, while others
 in the world, particularly their persecutors, live in the enjoyment
 of honor and fortune, of happiness, power and riches, with everything
 moving to the fulfilment of their desires. The Scriptures frequently
 deplore this condition of things, especially the Psalms, and Paul in
 First Corinthians 15, 19 confesses: "If we have only hoped in Christ
 in this life, we are of all men most pitiable."
 
 
 CHRISTIAN'S SUFFERINGS LEAD TO HAPPINESS.
 
 3. Now, assuredly this state of affairs cannot continue without end;
 it cannot be God's intention to permit Christians thus to suffer
 continually while they live, to die because of it and remain dead. It
 would be incompatible with his eternal, divine truth and honor
 manifest in his Word. For there he declares he will be the God of the
 pious, of them who fear and trust him, and gives them unspeakable
 promises. Necessarily, then, he has planned a future state for
 Christians and for non-Christians, in either instance unlike what
 they know on earth. Possibly one of the chief reasons why God permits
 Christians to suffer on earth is to make plain the distinction
 between their reward and that of the ungodly. In the sufferings of
 believing Christians, and in the wickedness, tyranny, rage, and
 persecution directed by the unrighteous against the godly, is certain
 indication of a future life unlike this and a final judgment of God
 in which all men, godly and wicked, shall be forever recompensed.
 
 4. Notice, Paul means to say here when he speaks of the tribulations
 and sufferings of Christians: "These afflictions are the indication
 of God's righteous judgment, and a sign you are worthy of the kingdom
 of God for which you suffer." In other words: "O beloved Christians,
 regard your sufferings as dear and precious. Think not God is angry
 with you, or has forgotten you, because he allows you to endure these
 things. They are your great help and comfort, for they show God will
 be a righteous judge, will richly bless you and avenge you upon your
 persecutors. Yes, therein you have unfailing assurance. You may
 rejoice, and console yourselves, believing without the shadow of a
 doubt that you belong to the kingdom of God, and have been made
 worthy of it, because you suffer for its sake."
 
 5. Whatever the Christian suffers here on earth at the hands of the
 devil and the world, befalls him simply for the sake of the name of
 God and for his Word. True, as a baptized child of God the Christian
 should justly enjoy unalloyed goodness, comfort and peace on earth;
 but since he must still dwell in the kingdom of the devil, who
 infuses sin and death into human flesh, he must endure the devil. Yet
 all Satan's inflictions and the world's plagues, persecutions,
 terrors, tortures, even the taking of the Christian's life, and all
 its abuse, is wrought in violence and injustice. But to offset this,
 the Christian has the comforting assurance of God's Word that because
 he suffers for the sake of the kingdom of Christ and of God he shall
 surely be eternally partaker of that kingdom. Certain it is, no one
 will be worthy of it unless he suffers for it.
 
 6. "If so be that it is a righteous thing with God to recompense
 affliction to them that afflict you," continues the apostle. It is
 impossible it should continue to be, as now, well with the world and
 evil with you. God's righteousness will not admit of it. Just because
 he is a righteous judge, things must be eventually different: the
 godly must have eternal good, and the wicked, on the other hand, must
 be punished forever. Otherwise God's judgment would not be righteous;
 in other words, he would not be God. Now, since this is an impossible
 proposition, since God's righteousness and truth are immutable, in
 his capacity of judge he must perforce, in due time, come from
 heaven, when he shall have assembled his Christians, and avenge them
 of their enemies, recompense the latter according to their merits,
 and confer eternal rest and peace upon his followers for the temporal
 sufferings they have endured here.
 
 
 GOD DOES NOT FORGET HIS CHILDREN.
 
 7. Christians should certainly expect this and comfort themselves in
 the confidence that God will not permit the wrongs of his people to
 continue unpunished and unavenged. We might think he had forgotten
 were we to judge from the facts that godly Abel was shamefully
 murdered by his brother, that God's prophets and martyrs--John the
 Baptist, Jeremiah, Paul and others--suffered death at the hands of
 bloodhounds like the Herods, Neros and other shameless, sanguinary
 tyrants of the sort, and this when God had, even in this life, given
 glorious testimony to their being his beloved children. A judgment
 must be forthcoming that tyrants may suffer pains and punishments,
 and that the godly, delivered from sufferings, may have eternal rest
 and joy. Let all the world know God does not forget, even after
 death.
 
 8. This is the consolation the future judgment at the resurrection of
 the dead holds, that, as God's righteousness requires, the saints
 shall receive for their sufferings a supremely rich and glorious
 recompense. Paul seems to present as the principal reason why God
 must punish the world with everlasting pain, the fact that the world
 has inflicted tribulations on Christians. Apparently his words imply
 that the perpetrations of the devil and the world--their supreme
 contempt and hatred of God's name and Word, their blasphemies of
 these, their wickedness and disobedience in other respects, whereby
 they bring upon themselves everlasting pain and damnation--that for
 these sins against himself God is not so ready to punish as for their
 persecution and torment of his poor, believing Christians. This truth
 is indicated where we read that Christ on the last day shall say:
 "Depart from me, ye cursed, into the eternal fire which is prepared
 for the devil and his angels ... inasmuch as ye did it not unto one
 of these least, ye did it not unto me." Mt 25, 41 and 45.
 
 9. Paul's further observations, concerning the manner of the judgment
 to come and the painful punishment of the ungodly, is sufficiently
 clear as rendered, and is also explained in the sermon on the Gospel
 text. Further explanation here is unnecessary.
 
 
 
 
 _Twenty Seventh Sunday After Trinity_
 
 Text: 2 Peter 3, 3-7.
 
 
 TO THE READER.
 
 When the year has twenty-seven Sundays after Trinity, which seldom
 occurs, substitute the text of 2 Peter 3, 3-7 for the twenty-sixth
 Sunday and use the text of the twenty-sixth Sunday for the
 twenty-seventh Sunday.
 
 
 
 
 
 
